
THE GHOST  NEXT DOOR 

1 

Hannah wasn’t sure which had awakened her—the brittle crackling sounds or the 
bright yellow flames. 

She sat straight up in bed and stared in wide-eyed horror at the fire that 
surrounded her. 

Flames rippled across her dresser. The burning wallpaper curled and then 
melted. The door of her closet had burned away, and she could see the fire 
leaping from shelf to shelf. 

Even the mirror was on fire. Hannah could see her reflection, dark behind 
the wall of flickering flames. 

The fire moved quickly to fill the room. 

Hannah began to choke on the thick, sour smoke. 

It was too late to scream. 

But she screamed anyway. 

* * * 

How nice to find out it was only a dream. 

Hannah sat up in bed, her heart pounding, her mouth as dry as cotton. 

No crackling flames. No leaping swirls of yellow and orange. 

No choking smoke. 

All a dream, a horrible dream. So real. 

But a dream. 

“Wow. That was really scary,” Hannah muttered to herself. She sank back 
on her pillow and waited for her heart to stop thudding so hard in her chest. She 
raised her gray-blue eyes to the ceiling, staring at the cool whiteness of it. 

Hannah could still picture the black, charred ceiling, the curling wallpaper, 
the flames tossing in front of the mirror. 

“At least my dreams aren’t boring!” she told herself. Kicking off the light 
blanket, she glanced at her desk clock. Only eight-fifteen. 

How can it only be eight-fifteen? she wondered. I feel as if I’ve been 
sleeping forever. What day is it, anyway? 

It was hard to keep track of these summer days. One seemed to melt into 
another. 

Hannah was having a lonely summer. Most of her friends had gone away on 
family vacations or to camp. 

There was so little for a twelve-year-old to do in a small town like 
Greenwood Falls. She read a lot of books and watched a lot of TV and rode her 
bike around town, looking for someone to hang out with. 

Boring. 

But today Hannah climbed out of bed with a smile on her face. 

She was alive! 

Her house hadn’t burned down. She hadn’t been trapped inside the 
crackling wall of flames. 

Hannah pulled on a pair of Day-Glo green shorts and a bright orange 
sleeveless top. Her parents were always teasing her about being color blind. 

“Give me a break! What’s the big deal if I like bright colors?” she always 
replied. 

Bright colors. Like the flames around her bed. 

“Hey, dream—get /ost!” she muttered. She ran a hairbrush quickly through 
her short blonde hair, then headed down the hall to the kitchen. She could smell 
the eggs and bacon frying on the stove. 

“Good morning, everyone!” Hannah chirped happily. 

She was even happy to see Bill and Herb, her six-year-old twin brothers. 

Pests. The noisiest nuisances in Greenwood Falls. 

They were tossing a blue rubber ball across the breakfast table. “How many 
times do I have to tell you—no ball-playing in the house?” Mrs. Fairchild called, 
turning away from the stove to scold them. 

“A million,” Bill said. 

Herb laughed. He thought Bill was hilarious. They both thought they were a 

riot. 

Hannah stepped behind her mother and wrapped her up in a tight hug 
around the waist. 

“Hannah—stop!” her mother cried. “I nearly knocked over the eggs!” 

“Hannah — stop! Hannah — stop!” The twins imitated their mother. 

The ball bounced off Herb’s plate, rebounded off the wall, and flew onto the 
stove, inches from the frying pan. 

“Nice shot, ace,” Hannah teased. 

The twins laughed their high-pitched laughs. 

Mrs. Fairchild spun around, frowning. “If the ball goes in the frying pan, 
you’re going to eat it with your eggs!” she threatened, shaking her fork at them. 

This made the boys laugh even harder. 

“They’re in goofy moods today,” Hannah said, smiling. She had a dimple in 
one cheek when she smiled. 

“When are they ever in serious moods?” her mother demanded, tossing the 
ball into the hallway. 

“Well, I’m in a great mood today!” Hannah declared, gazing out the 
window at a cloudless, blue sky. 

Her mother stared at her suspiciously. “How come?” 

Hannah shrugged. “I just am.” She didn’t feel like telling her mother about 
the nightmare, about how good it felt just to be alive. “Where’s Dad?” 

“Went to work early,” Mrs. Fairchild said, turning the bacon with the fork. 
“Some of us don’t get the entire summer off,” she added. “What are you going to 
do today, Hannah?” 

Hannah opened the refrigerator and pulled out a carton of orange juice. 
“The usual, I guess. You know. Just hang out.” 

“I’m sorry you’re having such a boring summer,” her mother said, sighing. 
“We just didn’t have the money to send you to camp. Maybe next summer—” 

“That’s okay, Mom,” Hannah replied brightly. “I’m having an okay 
summer. Really.” She turned to the twins. “How’d you guys like those ghost 
stories last night?” 

“Not scary,” Herb quickly replied. 

“Not scary at all. Your ghost stories are dumb,” Bill added. 

“You guys looked pretty scared to me,” Hannah insisted. 

“We were pretending,” Herb said. 

She held up the orange juice carton. “Want some?” 

“Does it have pulp in it?” Herb asked. 

Hannah pretended to read the carton. “Yes. It says ‘one hundred percent 
pulp’.” 

“I hate pulp!” Herb declared. 

“Me, too!” Bill agreed, making a face. 

It wasn’t the first time they’d had a breakfast discussion about pulp. 

“Can’t you buy orange juice without pulp?” Bill asked their mother. 

“Can you strain it for us?” Herb asked Hannah. 

“Can I have apple juice instead?” Bill asked. 

“I don’t want juice. I want milk,” Herb decided. 

Normally, this discussion would have made Hannah scream. But today, she 
reacted calmly. “One apple juice and one milk coming up,” she said cheerfully. 

“You certainly are in a good mood this morning,” her mother commented. 

Hannah handed Bill his apple juice, and he promptly spilled it. 

After breakfast, Hannah helped her mother clean up the kitchen. “Nice day,” 
Mrs. Fairchild said, peering out the window. “Not a cloud in the sky. It’s 
supposed to go up to ninety.” 

Hannah laughed. Her mother was always giving weather reports. “Maybe 
I’ll go for a long bike ride before it gets really hot,” she told her mother. 

She stepped out the back door and took a deep breath. The warm air 
smelled sweet and fresh. She watched two yellow-and-red butterflies fluttering 
side by side over the flower garden. 

She took a few steps across the grass toward the garage. From somewhere 
down the block she could hear the low drone of a power mower. 

Hannah gazed up at the clear blue sky. The sun felt warm on her face. 

“Hey —look out!” an alarmed voice cried. 

Hannah felt a sharp pain in her back. 

She uttered a frightened gasp as she fell to the ground. 

2 

Hannah landed hard on her elbows and knees. She turned quickly to see what 
had hit her. 

A boy on a bike. “Sorry!” he called. He jumped off the bike and let it fall to 
the grass. “I didn’t see you.” 

I’m wearing Day-Glo green and orange, Hannah thought. Why couldn’t he 
see me? 

She climbed to her feet and rubbed the grass stains on her knees. “Ow,” she 
muttered, frowning at him. 

“I tried to stop,” he said quietly. 

Hannah saw that he had bright red hair, almost as orange as candy corn, 
brown eyes, and a face full of freckles. 

“Why were you riding in my yard?” Hannah demanded. 

“Your yard?” He narrowed his dark eyes at her. “Since when?” 

“Since before I was born,” Hannah replied sharply. 

He pulled a leaf from her hair. “You live in that house?” he asked, pointing. 

Hannah nodded. “Where do you live?” Hannah demanded. She examined 
her elbows. They were dirty, but not bruised. 

“Next door,” he said, turning toward the redwood ranch-style house across 
the driveway. 

“Huh?” Hannah reacted with surprise. “You can’t live there!” 

“Why not?” he demanded. 

“That house is empty,” she told him, studying his face. “It’s been empty 
ever since the Dodsons moved away.” 

“It’s not empty now,” he said. “I live there. With my mom.” 

How can that be? Hannah wondered. How could someone move in right 
next door without my knowing it? 

I was playing with the twins back here yesterday, she thought, gazing hard 
at the boy. I’m sure that house was dark and empty. 

“What’s your name?” she asked. 

“Danny. Danny Anderson.” 

She told him her name. “I guess we’re neighbors,” she said. “I’m twelve. 

How about you?” 

“Me, too.” He bent to examine his bike. Then he pulled out a tuft of grass 
that had gotten caught in the spokes of the back wheel. “How come Tve never 
seen you before?” he asked suspiciously. 

“How come Tve never seen you? she replied. 

He shrugged. His eyes crinkled in the corners as a shy smile crossed his 

face. 

“Well, did you just move in?” Hannah asked, trying to get to the bottom of 
the mystery. 

“Huh-uh,” he replied, concentrating on the bike. 

“No? How long have you lived here?” Hannah asked. 

“Awhile.” 

That’s impossible! Hannah thought. There’s no way he could have moved 
in next door without me knowing it! 

But before she could react, she heard a high-pitched voice calling her from 
the house. “Hannah! Hannah! Herb won’t give back my Gameboy!” Bill stood 
on the back stoop, leaning against the open screen door. 

“Where’s Mom?” Hannah shouted back. “She’ll get it for you.” 

“Okay.” 

The screen door slammed hard as Bill went to find Mrs. Fairchild. 

Hannah turned back to talk to Danny, but he had vanished into thin air. 

3 

The mail usually came a little before noon. Hannah rushed eagerly down to the 
bottom of the drive and pulled open the mailbox lid. 

No mail for her. No mail at all. 

Disappointed, she hurried back to her room to write a scolding letter to her 
best friend, Janey Pace. 

Dear Janey, 

I hope you ’re having a good time at camp. But not too good—because you 
broke your promise. You said that you’d write to me every day, and so far, I 
haven’t even received a crummy POSTCARD. 

I am so BORED I don’t know what to do! You can’t imagine how little there 
is to do in Greenwood Falls when no one is around. It’s really like DEATH! 

I watch TV and I read a lot. Do you believe I’ve already read ALL the books 
on our summer reading list? Dad promised to take us all camping in Miller 
Woods—BIG THRILL—but he’s been working just about every weekend, so I 
don’t think he will. 

BORING! 

Last night I was so bored, I marched the twins outside and built a little 
campfire behind the garage and pretended we were away at camp and told them 
a bunch of scary ghost stories. 

The boys wouldn’t admit it, of course, but I could see they enjoyed it. But 
you know how ghost stories freak me out. I started seeing weird shadows and 
things moving behind the trees. It was really kind of hilarious, I guess. I totally 
scared MYSELF. 

Don’t laugh, Janey. You don’t like ghost stories, either. 

My only other news is that a new boy moved into the Dodsons ’ old house 
next door. His name is Danny and he’s our age, and he has red hair and freckles, 
and he’s kind of cute, I think. 

I’ve only seen him once. Maybe I’ll have more to report about him later. 

But now it’s YOUR TURN to write. Come on, Janey. You promised. Have 
you met any cute guys at camp? Is THAT why you’re too busy to write to me? 

If I don’t hear from you, I hope you get poison ivy all over your body — 

especially in places where you can’t scratch! 

Love, 

Hannah 

Hannah folded the letter and stuffed it into an envelope. Her small desk 
stood in front of the bedroom window. Leaning over the desk, she could see the 
house next door. 

I wonder if that’s Danny’s room? she thought, peering into the window just 
across the driveway. Curtains were pulled over the window, blocking her view. 

Hannah pulled herself to her feet. She ran a hairbrush through her hair, then 
carried the letter to the front door. 

She could hear her mother scolding the twins somewhere in the back of the 
house. The boys were giggling as Mrs. Fairchild yelled at them. Hannah heard a 
loud crash. Then more giggling. 

“I’m going out!” she shouted, pushing open the screen door. 

They probably didn’t hear her, she realized. 

It was a hot afternoon, no breeze at all, the air heavy and wet. Hannah’s 
father had mowed the front lawn the day before. The freshly cut grass smelled 
sweet as Hannah made her way down the driveway. 

She glanced over to Danny’s house. No signs of life there. The front door 
was closed. The big living room picture window appeared bare and dark. 

Hannah decided to walk the three blocks to town and mail the letter at the 
post office. She sighed. Nothing else to do, she thought glumly. At least a walk 
to town will kill some time. 

The sidewalk was covered with cut blades of grass, the green fading to 
brown. Humming to herself, Hannah passed Mrs. Quilty’s redbrick house. Mrs. 
Quilty was bent over her garden, pulling up weeds. 

“Hi, Mrs. Quilty. How are you?” Hannah called. 

Mrs. Quilty didn’t look up. 

What a snob! Hannah thought angrily. I know she heard me. 

Hannah crossed the street. The sound of a piano floated from the house on 
the corner. Someone was practicing a piece of classical music, playing the same 
wrong note over and over, then starting the piece again. 

I’m glad they’re not my neighbors, Hannah thought, smiling. 

She walked the rest of the way to town, humming to herself. 

The two-story white post office stood across the tiny town square, its flag 

drooping on the pole in the windless sky. Around the square stood a bank, a 
barbershop, a small grocery, and a gas station. A few other stores, Harder’s Ice- 
Cream Parlor, and a diner called Diner stretched behind the square. 

Two women were walking out of the grocery. Through the barbershop 
window, Hannah could see Ernie, the barber, sitting in the chair, reading a 
magazine. 

Real lively scene, she thought, shaking her head. 

Hannah crossed the small, grassy square and dropped her letter in the 
mailbox in front of the post office door. She turned back toward home—but 
stopped when she heard the angry shouts. 

The shouts were coming from behind the post office, Hannah realized. A 
man was screaming. 

Hannah heard boys’ voices. More yelling. 

She began jogging around the side of the building, toward the angry voices. 

She was nearly to the alley when she heard the shrill yelp of pain. 

4 

“Hey—!” Hannah called out and ran the rest of the way. “What’s going on?” 

A narrow alley stretched behind the post office. It was a hidden place where 
kids liked to hang out. 

Hannah saw Mr. Chesney, the postmaster. He was shaking a fist angrily at a 
wiry brown mutt. 

There were three boys in the alley. Hannah recognized Danny. He was 
hanging behind the two boys she didn’t recognize. 

The dog had its head lowered and was whimpering softly. A tall boy, thin 
and lanky with scraggly blond hair, grabbed the dog gently and bent down to 
comfort it. 

“Don’t throw stones at my dog!” the boy shouted at Mr. Chesney. 

The other boy stepped forward. He was a short, stubby kid, kind of tough¬ 
looking, with spiky black hair. He glared at Mr. Chesney, his hands balled into 
fists at his sides. 

Danny lingered away from the others, very pale, his eyes narrowed tensely. 

“Get away! Go! I warned you!” Mr. Chesney snarled. He was a thin, red¬ 
faced man, entirely bald, with a bushy brown mustache under his pointed nose. 
He wore a tight-fitting gray wool suit, despite the summer heat. 

“You don’t have the right to hurt my dog!” the blond boy insisted, still 
cradling the mutt. The dog’s stubby tail was wagging furiously now. The dog 
licked the boy’s hand. 

“This is government property,” the postmaster replied sharply. “I’m 
warning you—get away from here. This isn’t a hangout for you troublemakers.” 
He took a menacing step toward the three boys. 

Hannah saw Danny take a few steps back, his expression frightened. The 
other two boys stood their ground, staring at the red-faced postmaster defiantly. 
They were big, Hannah saw. Bigger than Danny. They appeared to be older than 
Danny. 

“I’m telling my dad you hurt Rusty,” the blond boy said. 

“Tell your dad you were trespassing,” Mr. Chesney shot back. “And tell him 
you were rude and disrespectful. And tell him I’ll file a complaint against all 
three of you punks if I catch you back here again.” 

“We’re not punks!” the heavier boy shouted angrily. 

Then all three boys turned and started running down the alley. The dog 
zigzagged excitedly at their heels, its stubby tail twitching wildly. 

Mr. Chesney stormed past Hannah, muttering curses to himself. He was so 
angry, he pushed right past her as he made his way to the front of the post office. 

What a jerk, Hannah thought, shaking her head. What is his problem, 
anyway? 

All of the kids in Greenwood Falls hated Mr. Chesney. Mainly because he 
hated kids. He was always shouting at them to stop loitering in the square, or 
stop playing such loud music, or stop talking so loudly, or stop laughing so 
much, or to get out of his precious alley. 

He acts as if he owns the whole town, Hannah thought. 

At Halloween, Hannah and a bunch of friends had decided to go to Mr. 
Chesney’s house and spray-paint his windows. But to their disappointment, 
Chesney was prepared for any Halloween trick-players. He stood at the ready in 
his front window, an enormous shotgun in his hand. 

Hannah and her friends had gone on their way, disappointed and scared. 

He knows how much we all hate him, Hannah realized. 

And he doesn’t care. 

The alley was quiet now. Hannah headed back toward the town square, 
thinking about Danny. He had looked so frightened, so pale. So pale, he nearly 
seemed to fade away in the bright sunlight. 

Danny’s two friends didn’t seem frightened at all, Hannah thought. They 
seemed angry and tough. Or maybe they were just acting tough because Mr. 
Chesney was being so horrible to the blond boy’s dog. 

Crossing the square, Hannah searched for signs of life. In his brightly lit 
shop, Ernie was still sitting in the barber chair, his face buried in a magazine. A 
blue station wagon had pulled into the gas station. A woman Hannah didn’t 
recognize was hurrying to get to the bank before it closed. 

No sign of Danny and his two friends. 

I guess I’ll go home and catch General Hospital, Hannah thought with a 
sigh. She crossed the street and made her way slowly toward home. 

Tall trees, maples and birches and sassafras, lined the sidewalk. The leaves 
were so thick, they nearly blocked the sunlight. 

It was cooler under their shade, Hannah realized as she walked under them. 

She was halfway down the block when the dark figure slid out from behind 

a tree. 

At first Hannah thought it was just the shadow cast by the wide trunk. But 
then, as her eyes adjusted to the shade, the figure became clear. 

Hannah gasped and stopped walking. 

She stared hard, squinting at him, struggling to bring him into focus. 

He stood in a deep blue puddle of shadow. Dressed in black, he was tall and 
slender, his face completely hidden in darkness. 

Hannah felt a cold shiver of fear roll down her body. 

Who is he? she wondered. Why is he dressed like that? 

Why is he standing so still, keeping in the shadows, staring back at me from 
the dark shade? 

Is he trying to scare me? 

He slowly raised a hand, motioning for her to come nearer. 

Her heart fluttering in her chest, Hannah took a step back. 

Is there really someone there? 

A figure dressed in black? 

Or am I seeing shadows cast by the trees? 

She wasn’t sure—until she heard the whisper: 

“Hannah... Hannah...” 

The whisper was as dry as the brush of tree leaves, and nearly as soft. 
“Hannah... Hannah...” 

A slender black shadow, motioning to her with arms as bony as twigs, 
whispering to her. Such a dry, inhuman whisper. 

“No!” Hannah cried. 

She spun around and struggled to run. Her legs felt weak. Her knees didn’t 
want to bend. 

But she forced herself to run. Faster. 

Faster. 

Was he following her? 

5 

Panting loudly, Hannah crossed the street without stopping to look for traffic. 
Her sneakers pounded against the sidewalk as she ran. 

One more block to go. 

Is he following? 

The shadows shifted and bent as she ran under the trees. Shadows on top of 
shadows, sliding over each other, gray on black, blue on gray. 

“Hannah... Hannah...” The dry whisper. 

Dry as death. 

Calling to her from the shifting shadows. 

He knows my name, she thought, gulping for breath, forcing her legs to 
keep moving. 

And then she stopped. 

And spun around. 

“Who are you?” she shouted breathlessly. “What do you want? 

But he had vanished. 

There was silence now. Except for Hannah’s hard breathing. 

Hannah stared into the tangle of late afternoon shadows. Her eyes darted 
over the shrubs and hedges of the yards on her block. She searched the spaces 
between the houses, the darkness behind an open garage door, the slanting gray 
square beside a small shed. 

Gone. Vanished. 

No sign of the black-enshrouded figure that had whispered her name. 

“Whoa—!” she uttered out loud. 

It was an optical illusion, she decided, her eyes still warily studying the 
front lawns. 

No way. 

She argued with herself. An optical illusion doesn’t call your name. 

There’s nothing there, Hannah, she assured herself. Her breathing returned 
to normal. Nothing there. 

You’re making up more ghost stories. You’re scaring yourself again. 

You’re bored and lonely, and so you’re letting your imagination run away 

with you. 

Feeling only a little better, Hannah jogged the rest of the way home. 

Later, at dinner, she decided not to mention the shadow figure to her parents. 
They would never believe it anyway. 

Instead, Hannah told them about the new family who had moved next door. 
“Huh? Someone moved into the Dodsons’ house?” Mr. Fairchild set down 
his fork and knife and stared across the table at Hannah from behind his square¬ 
framed horn-rimmed glasses. 

“There’s a boy my age,” Hannah reported. “His name is Danny. He has 
bright orange hair and freckles.” 

“That’s nice,” Mrs. Fairchild replied distractedly, motioning for the twins to 
stop shoving each other and eat their dinners. 

Hannah wasn’t even sure her mother had heard her. 

“How did they move in without us seeing them?” Hannah asked her father. 
“Did you see a moving truck or anything?” 

“Huh-uh,” Mr. Fairchild muttered, picking up his silverware and returning 
to his roast chicken. 

“Well, don’t you think it’s weird?” Hannah demanded. 

But before either parent could reply, Herb’s chair toppled over backwards. 
His head hit the linoleum, and he began to howl. 

Her mom and dad leapt off their chairs and bent to help him. 

“I didn’t push him!” Bill screamed shrilly. “Really. I didn’t!” 

Frustrated that her parents weren’t interested in her big news, Hannah 
carried her plate to the kitchen. Then she wandered into her bedroom. 

Making her way to her desk, she pushed aside the curtains and peered out 
the window. 

Danny, are you in there? she wondered, staring at the curtains that covered 
his dark window. What are you doing right now? 

The summer days seemed to float by. Hannah could barely remember how she 
passed the time. If only some of my friends were around, she thought wistfully. 

If only one of my friends was around! 

If only one of my friends would write. 

Such a lonely summer... 

She looked for Danny, but he never seemed to be around. When she finally 

saw him in his back yard one late afternoon, she hurried over to talk to him. 
“Hi!” she cried enthusiastically. 

He was tossing a tennis ball against the back of the house and catching it. 
The ball made a loud thock each time it hit the redwood wall. 

“Hi!” Hannah called again, jogging across the grass. 

Danny turned, startled. “Oh. Hi. How’s it going?” He turned back to the 
house and tossed the ball. 

He was wearing a blue T-shirt over baggy black-and-yellow-striped shorts. 
Hannah stepped up beside him. 

Thock. The ball hit the wall just below the gutter and bounced into Danny’s 
hand. 

“I haven’t seen you around,” Hannah said awkwardly. 

“Uh-huh,” was his brief reply. 

Thock. 

“I saw you behind the post office,” she blurted out. 

“Huh?” He spun the ball in his hand, but didn’t throw it. 

“A few days ago, I saw you in the alley. With those two guys. Mr. Chesney 
is a real jerk, isn’t he?” Hannah said. 

Danny snickered. “When he yells, his whole head turns bright red. Just like 
a tomato.” 

“A rotten tomato,” Hannah added. 

“What’s his problem, anyway?” Danny asked, tossing the ball. Thock. “My 
friends and I—we weren’t doing anything. Just hanging out.” 

“He thinks he’s a big shot,” Hannah replied. “He’s always bragging how 
he’s a federal employee.” 

“Yeah.” 

“What are you doing this summer?” she asked. “Just hanging around like 

me?” 

“Kind of,” he said. Thock. He missed the ball and had to chase it to the 
garage. 

As he walked back toward the house, he gazed at her, as if seeing her for 
the first time. Hannah suddenly felt self-conscious. She was wearing a yellow 
top with grape jelly stains on the front, and her rattiest blue cotton shorts. 

“Those two guys, Alan and Fred—they’re the guys I usually hang out 
with,” he told her. “Guys from school.” 

Thock. 

How could he have friends from school? Hannah wondered. Didn’t he just 
move here? 

“Where do you go to school?” she asked, dodging out of the way as he 
backed up to catch the ball. 

“Maple Avenue Middle School,” he replied. 

Thock. 

“Hey—that’s where I go!” Hannah exclaimed. 

How come I’ve never seen him there? she wondered. 

“Do you know Alan Miller?” Danny asked, turning to her, shading his eyes 
with one hand from the late afternoon sun. 

Hannah shook her head. “No.” 

“Fred Drake?” he asked. 

“No,” she replied. “What grade are you in?” 

“I’ll be in eighth this year,” he said, turning back to the wall. 

Thock. 

“Me, too!” Hannah declared. “Do you know Janey Pace?” 

“No.” 

“How about Josh Goodman?” Hannah asked. 

Danny shook his head. “Don’t know him.” 

“Weird,” Hannah said, thinking out loud. 

Danny threw the tennis ball a little too hard, and it landed on the sloping 
gray-shingled roof. They both watched it hit, then roll down into the gutter. 
Danny sighed and, staring up at the gutter, made a disgusted face. 

“How can we be in the same grade and not know any of the same kids?” 
Hannah demanded. 

He turned to her, scratching his red hair with one hand. “I don’t know.” 
“How weird!” Hannah repeated. 

Danny stepped into the deep blue shadow of the house. Hannah squinted 
hard. He seemed to disappear in the wide rectangle of shadow. 

That’s impossible! she thought. 

I would have seen him at school. 

If we’re in the same grade, there’s no way I could have missed him. 

Is he lying? Is he making this all up? 

He had completely vanished in the shadow. Hannah squinted hard, waiting 
for her eyes to adjust. 

Where is he? Hannah asked herself. 

He keeps disappearing. 

Like a ghost. 

A ghost. The word popped in and out of her mind. 

When Danny came back into view, he was pulling an aluminum ladder 
along the back wall of the house. 

“What are you going to do?” Hannah asked, moving closer. 

“Get my ball,” he replied, and began climbing the ladder, his white Nikes 
hanging over the narrow metal rungs. 

Hannah moved closer. “Don’t go up there,” she said, suddenly gripped with 
a cold feeling. 

“Huh?” he called down. He was already halfway up the ladder, his head 
nearly level with the gutter. 

“Come down, Danny.” Hannah felt a wave of dread sweep over her. A 
heavy feeling in the pit of her stomach. 

“I’m a good climber,” he said, pulling himself up higher. “I climb 
everything. My mom says I should be in a circus or something.” 

Before Hannah could say anything more, he had clambered off the ladder 
and was standing on the sloping roof, his legs spread apart, his hands stretched 
high in the air. “See?” 

Hannah couldn’t shake the premonition, the heavy feeling of dread. 

“Danny—please!” 

Ignoring her shrill cry, he bent to pick the tennis ball from the gutter. 

Hannah held her breath as he reached for the ball. 

Suddenly, he lost his balance. His eyes went wide with surprise. 

His sneakers slipped on the shingles. His hands shot up as if trying to grab 
onto something. 

Hannah gasped, staring helplessly as Danny toppled headfirst off the roof. 

6 

Hannah screamed and shut her eyes. 

I’ve got to get help, she thought. 

Her heart pounding, she forced herself to open her eyes, and searched the 
ground for Danny. But to her surprise, he was standing in front of her, a 
mischievous grin on his face. 

“Huh?” Hannah uttered a gasp of surprise. “You—you’re okay?” 

Danny nodded, still grinning. 

He didn’t make a sound, Hannah thought, staring hard at him. He landed 
without making a sound. 

She grabbed his shoulder. “You’re okay?” 

“Yeah, I’m fine,” Danny said calmly. “My middle name is Daredevil. 
Danny Daredevil Anderson. That’s what my mom always says.” He tossed the 
ball casually from hand to hand. 

“You scared me to death!” Hannah cried. Her fright was turning to anger. 
“Why did you do that?” 

He laughed. 

“You could’ve been killed!” she told him. 

“No way,” he replied quietly. 

She scowled at him, staring hard into his brown eyes. “Do you do stuff like 
that all the time? Falling off roofs just to scare people?” 

His grin grew wider, but he didn’t say anything. He turned away from her 
and tossed the tennis ball at the house. 

Thock. 

“You were falling headfirst,” Hannah said. “How did you land on your 
feet?” 

Danny chuckled. “Magic,” he replied slyly. 

“But—but—!” 

“Hannah! Hannah!” She turned to see her mother calling to her from the 
back stoop. 

“What is it?” Hannah shouted. 

Thock. 

“I have to go out for an hour. Can you come take care of Bill and Herb?” 

Hannah turned back to Danny. “I’ve got to go. See you.” 

“See you,” he replied, flashing her a freckle-faced grin. 

Thock. 

Hannah heard the sound of the ball against the redwood wall as she jogged 
across the driveway to her house. Again, she pictured Danny plummeting off the 
roof. 

How did he do it? she wondered. How did he land on his feet so silently? 

‘Til only be gone an hour,” her mother said, searching her bag for the car 
keys. “How is it out? It’s supposed to cloud up and rain tonight.” 

Another weather report, Hannah thought, rolling her eyes. 

“Don’t let them kill each other, if you can help it,” Mrs. Fairchild said, 
finding the keys and shutting her bag. 

“That was Danny,” Hannah told her. “The new kid next door. Did you see 
him?” 

“Huh-uh. Sorry.” Mrs. Fairchild hurried to the door. 

“You didn’t see him?” Hannah called. 

The screen door slammed. 

Bill and Herb appeared and pulled Hannah into their room. “Chutes & 
Ladders!” Bill demanded. 

“Yeah. Let’s play Chutes & Ladders!” Herb echoed. 

Hannah rolled her eyes. She hated that game. It was so lame. “Okay,” she 
agreed with a sigh. She dropped down across from them on the rug. 

“Yaaaay!” Bill cried happily, opening the game-board. “You’ll play?” 

“Yeah. I’ll play,” Hannah told him unhappily. 

“And can we cheat?” Bill asked. 

“Yeah! Let’s cheat!” Herb urged with grinning enthusiasm. 

* * * 

After dinner, the twins were upstairs, arguing with their parents over which of 
them got to take the last bath. They both hated baths and always fought to be the 
last. 

Hannah helped clear the table, then wandered into the den. She was 
thinking about Danny as she made her way to the window. 

Pushing aside the curtains, she pressed her forehead against the cool glass 

and stared across the drive to Danny’s house. 

The sun had lowered behind the trees. Danny’s house was cast in heavy, 
dark shadows. The windows were covered with curtains and blinds. 

Hannah realized she had never actually seen anyone inside the house. She 
had never seen Danny go into the house or come out of it. 

She had never seen anyone come out of the house. 

Hannah stepped back from the window, thinking hard. She remembered the 
morning she had met Danny, after he had run her down in the back yard. She had 
been talking to him—and he had vanished into thin air. 

She thought about how he had seemed to disappear into the shadow at the 
side of his house, how she’d had to squint real hard to see him. And she thought 
about how he had seemed to float to the ground, landing silently from the roof. 

Silent as a ghost. 

“Hannah, what are you thinking ?” she scolded herself. 

Am I making up another ghost story? 

She suddenly had so many questions running through her mind: How had 
Danny and his family moved in without her noticing? How could he be in her 
school, in her grade, without her ever seeing him there? 

How come she didn’t know his friends, and he didn’t know hers? 

It’s all so weird, Hannah thought. 

I’m not imagining it all. I’m not making it up. 

What if Danny really is a ghost? 

If only she had someone to talk to, someone to discuss Danny with. But her 
friends were all away. And her parents would certainly never listen to such a 
crazy idea. 

I’ll have to prove it myself, Hannah decided. I’ll study him. I’ll be 
scientific. I’ll observe him. I’ll spy on him. 

Yes. I’ll spy on him. 

I’ll go look in his kitchen window, she decided. 

She stepped out onto the back stoop and pushed the screen door shut behind 
her. It was a warm, still night. A pale sliver of moon hung above the back yard in 
a royal-blue sky. 

As Hannah headed across her back yard, taking long, rapid strides, crickets 
began to chirp loudly. Danny’s house loomed in front of her, low and dark 
against the sky. 

The ladder was still propped against the back wall. 

Hannah crossed the driveway that separated her yard from his. Her heart 
pounding, she crept across the grass and climbed the three low concrete steps 
onto the back stoop. The kitchen door was closed. 

She stepped up to the door, pressed her face close to the window, peered 
into the kitchen—and gasped. 

7 

Hannah gasped because Danny was staring back at her from the other side of the 
window. 

“Oh!” she cried out and nearly toppled backwards off the narrow stoop. 

Inside the house, Danny’s eyes opened wide with surprise. 

Behind him, Hannah could see a table set with bright yellow plates. A tall, 
slender, blonde-haired woman—Danny’s mom, most likely—was pulling 
something out from a microwave oven onto the counter. 

The door swung open. Danny poked his head out, his expression still 
surprised. “Hi, Hannah. What’s up?” 

“Nothing. I—uh—nothing, really,” Hannah stammered. She could feel her 
cheeks grow hot, and knew she was blushing. 

Danny’s eyes burned into hers. His mouth turned up in a grin. “Well, do you 
want to come in or something?” he asked. “My mom is serving dinner, but—” 

“No!” she cried, much too loudly. “I don’t—I mean—I—” 

I’m acting like a total jerk! she realized. 

She swallowed hard, staring at his grinning face. 

He’s laughing at me! 

“See you!” she cried, then leapt awkwardly off the stoop, nearly stumbling 
to the ground. Without looking back, she took off, running at full speed back to 
her house. 

I’ve never been so embarrassed in my entire life! she thought miserably. 

Never! 

When she saw Danny come out of his house the next afternoon, Hannah hid 
behind the garage. Watching him walk his bike down the driveway, she felt her 
cheeks grow hot, felt embarrassed all over again. 

If I’m going to be a spy, I’m going to have to be a lot cooler, she told 
herself. Last night, I lost it. I panicked. 

It won’t happen again. 

She watched him climb on his bike and, standing up, pedal to the street. 
Pressed against the garage wall, she waited to see which direction he turned. 
Then she hurried into the garage to get her bike. 

He’s heading toward town, she saw. Probably meeting those two boys. I’ll 
let him get a head start, then I’ll follow him. 

She waited at the foot of the driveway, straddling her bike, watching Danny 
until he disappeared down the next block. 

Sunlight filtered through the overhanging trees as she began pedaling, 
keeping a slow, steady pace as she rode after him. Mrs. Quilty was out weeding 
her garden as usual. This time, Hannah didn’t bother to call hello. 

A small white terrier chased her for half a block, yapping loudly with 
excitement, then finally giving up as Hannah pedaled away. 

The school playground came into view. Several kids were playing softball 
on the corner diamond. Hannah looked for Danny, but he wasn’t there. 

She continued on into town. The sun felt warm on her face. She suddenly 
thought about Janey. Maybe I’ll get a letter from her today, she thought. 

She wished Janey were around to help spy on Danny. The two of them 
would be a great spy team, Hannah knew. She wouldn’t have lost her cool like 
she had last night if Janey were around. 

The town square came into view. The flag above the small, white post 
office was fluttering in a warm breeze. Several cars were parked in front of the 
grocery. Two women holding grocery bags were talking at the curb. 

Hannah braked her bike and lowered her feet to the ground. She shielded 
her eyes from the sun with one hand and searched for Danny. 

Danny, where are you? she thought. Are you with your friends? Where did 
you go? 

She pedaled across the small, grassy square toward the post office. Her bike 
bumped over the curb and she kept going, around the side of the building to the 
alley. 

But the alley was silent and empty. 

“Danny, where are you?” she called aloud in a quiet singsong. “Where are 
you?” 

He was only a block ahead of me, she thought, scratching her short hair. 
Has he vanished into thin air again? 

She rode back to the square, then checked out Harder’s Ice-Cream Parlor 
and the diner. 

No sign of him. 

“Hannah, you’re a great spy!” she laughed. 

With a sigh of defeat, she turned around and headed for home. 

She was nearly to her house when she saw the moving shadow. 

It’s back! she realized. 

She shifted gears and started to pedal harder. 

Out of the corner of her eye, she saw the shadow sliding across Mrs. 
Quilty’s front lawn. 

The dark figure floated silently over the grass toward her. 

Hannah pedaled harder. 

It’s back. I didn’t imagine it. 

It’s real. 

But what can it be? 

Standing up, she pedaled harder. Harder. 

But the figure glided along with her, picking up speed, floating effortlessly. 
She turned to see its arms stretch out toward her. 

She gasped in terror. 

Her legs suddenly felt as if they weighed a thousand pounds. 

I—I can’t move! she thought. 

The shadow swept over her. She could feel the sudden cold. 

Sticklike black arms reached out for her from the human-shaped shadow. 

Its face—why can’t I see its face? Hannah wondered, struggling to keep 
moving. 

The shadow blocked the bright sun. The whole world was blackening 
beneath it. 

Got to keep moving. Got to move, Hannah told herself. 

The dark figure floated beside her, its arms outstretched. 

Gaping in horror, Hannah saw bright red eyes glowing like embers from the 
blackness. 

“Hannah...” it whispered. “Hannah...” 

What does it want from me? 

She struggled to keep pedaling, but her legs wouldn’t cooperate. 

“Hannah... Hannah...” 

The dry whisper seemed to circle her, to wrap her in terror. 

“Hannah...” 

“No!” she screamed as she felt herself start to fall. 

She struggled to keep her balance. 

Too late. 

She was falling. She couldn’t stop herself. 

“Hannah... Hannah...” 

She reached out her hands to break her fall. 

“Ooof!” 

She gasped in pain as she landed hard on her side. 

The bike fell on top of her. 

The shadow figure, its red eyes glowing, moved in to capture her. 
“Hannah! Hannah!” 

8 

“Hannah! Hannah!” 

Its whisper became a shout. 

“Hannah!” 

Her side throbbed with pain. She struggled to catch her breath. 

“What do you want?” she managed to cry. “Leave me alone! Please!” 
“Hannah! It’s me!” 

She raised her head to see Danny standing above her. He straddled his bike, 
gripping the handlebars, staring down at her, his features tight with concern. 
“Hannah—are you okay?” 

“The shadow—!” she cried, feeling dazed. 

Danny lowered his bike to the grass and hurried over. He lifted her bike off 
her and set it down beside his. Then he reached for her hands. “Are you okay? 
Can you get up? I saw you fall. Did you hit a rock or something?” 

“No.” She shook her head, trying to clear it. “The shadow—he reached for 
me and—” 

Danny’s expression changed to bewilderment. “Huh? Who reached for 
you?” His eyes searched all around, then returned to her. 

“He knew my name,” Hannah said breathlessly. “He kept calling me. He 
followed me.” 

Danny studied her, frowning. “Did you hit your head? Do you feel dizzy, 
Hannah? Maybe I should go get some help.” 

“No... I... uh...” She gazed up at him. “Didn’t you see him? He was 
dressed in black. He had these glowing red eyes—” 

Danny shook his head, his eyes still studying her warily. “I only saw you,” 
he said softly. “You were riding really fast. Over the grass. I saw you fall.” 

“You didn’t see someone wearing black? A man? Chasing me?” 

Danny shook his head. “There was no one else on the street, Hannah. Just 

me.” 

“Maybe I did bump my head,” Hannah muttered, raising her hands to her 
short hair. 

Danny reached out a hand. “Can you stand? Are you hurt?” 

“I—I guess I can stand.” She allowed him to pull her to her feet. 

Her heart was still pounding. Her entire body felt shaky. Narrowing her 
eyes, she searched the front yards, her eyes lingering in the wide circles of shade 
from the neighborhood’s old trees. 

No one in sight. 

“You really didn’t see anyone?” she asked in a tiny voice. 

He shook his head. “Just you. I was watching from over there.” He pointed 
to the curb. 

“But I thought...” Her voice trailed off. She could feel her face grow red. 

This is embarrassing, she thought. He’s going to think I’m a total nut case. 

And then she thought, maybe I am! 

“You were going so fast,” he said, picking up her bike for her. “And there 
are so many shadows, from all the trees. And you were frightened. So maybe 
you imagined a guy dressed in black.” 

“Maybe,” Hannah replied weakly. 

But she didn’t think so.... 

High white clouds drifted over the sun the next afternoon as Hannah jogged 
down the driveway to the mailbox. Somewhere down the block, a dog barked. 

She pulled down the lid and eagerly reached inside. 

Her hand slid over bare metal. 

No mail. Nothing. 

Sighing with disappointment, she slammed the mailbox lid shut. Janey had 
promised to write every day. She had been gone for weeks, and Hannah still 
hadn’t received even a postcard. 

None of her friends had written to her. 

As she trudged back up the driveway, Hannah glanced at Danny’s house. 
The white clouds were reflected in the glass of the big living room window. 

Hannah wondered if Danny was home. She hadn’t seen him since yesterday 
morning after falling off her bike. 

My spying isn’t going too well, she sighed. 

Taking another glance at Danny’s front window, Hannah headed back up 
the drive to the house. 

I’ll write to Janey again, she decided. I have to tell her about Danny and the 
frightening shadow figure and the weird things that have been happening. 

She could hear the twins in the den, arguing loudly about which cartoon 
tape they wanted to see. Her mother was suggesting they go outside instead. 

Hannah hurried to her room to get paper and a pen. The room felt hot and 
stuffy. She had tossed a pile of dirty clothes onto her desk. She decided to write 
her letter outside. 

A short while later, she settled under the wide maple tree in the center of the 
front yard. A blanket of high clouds had rolled over the sky. The sun was trying 
to poke out from the white glare. The old, leafy tree protected her in comforting 
shade. 

Hannah yawned. She hadn’t slept well the night before. Maybe I’ll take a 
nap later, she thought. But first, I have to write this letter. 

Leaning back against the solid trunk, she began to write. 

Dear Janey, 

How are you? I seriously hope you’ve fallen in the lake and drowned. That 
would be the only good excuse for not writing to me in all this time! 

How could you ABANDON me here like this? Next summer, one way or the 
other, I’m going to camp with you. 

Things are definitely WEIRD around here. Do you remember I told you 
about that boy who moved in next door? His name is Danny Anderson, and he’s 
kind of cute. He has red hair and freckles and SERIOUS brown eyes. 

Well, don’t laugh, Janey—but I think Danny is a GHOST! 

I can hear you laughing. But I don’t care. By the time you get back to 
Greenwood Falls, I’m going to have PROOF. 

Please — don’t tell the other girls in your bunk that your best friend has 
totally freaked until you read the rest of this. Here is my evidence so far: 

1. Danny and his family suddenly appeared in the house next door. I didn’t 
see them move in, even though I’ve been home every day. Neither did my 
parents. 

2. Danny says he goes to Maple Avenue, and he says he’s going into eighth 
grade just like us. 

But how come we’ve never seen him? He hangs out with two guys I’ve 
never seen before. And he didn’t know any of my friends. 

3. Sometimes he vanishes — POOF—just like that. Don’t laugh! And once he 
fell off the roof and landed on his feet—without making a SOUND! I’m 
SERIOUS, Janey. 

4. Yesterday, I was being chased by a scary shadow, and I fell off my bike. 
And when I looked up, the shadow was gone, and Danny was standing in his 

place. And — 

Uh-oh. This is starting to sound really crazy. I wish you were here so I 
could explain it better. It all sounds so DUMB in a letter. Like I’m really 
MESSED UP or something. 

I know you’re laughing at me. Well, go ahead. 

Maybe I won’t mail this letter. I mean, I don’t want you to make jokes, or 
remind me of it for the rest of my life. 

So, enough about me. 

How’s it going out there in the woods? I hope you were bitten by a snake 
and your entire body swelled up, and that’s why I haven’t heard from you. 

Otherwise, I’m going to KILL you when you get back! Really! 

WRITE! 

Love, 

Hannah 

Yawning loudly, Hannah dropped her pen to the ground. She leaned back 
against the tree trunk and slowly read over the letter. 

Is it too crazy to send? she wondered. 

No. I have to send it. I have to tell somebody what’s going on here. It’s all 
too weird to keep to myself. 

The sun had finally managed to burst through the clouds. The tree leaves 
above her head cast shifting shadows across the letter in her lap. 

She glanced up into bright sunlight—and gasped, startled to see a face 
staring back at her. 

“Danny—!” 

“Hi, Hannah,” he said quietly. 

Hannah squinted up at him. His entire body was ringed by bright sunlight. 
He seemed to be shimmering in the light. 

“I—I didn’t see you,” Hannah stammered. “I didn’t know you were here. I 

“Give me the letter, Hannah,” Danny said softly but insistently. He reached 
out a hand for it. 

“Huh? What did you say?” 

“Give me the letter,” Danny demanded, more firmly. “Give it to me now, 
Hannah.” 

She gripped the letter tightly and stared up at him. She had to shield her 

eyes. The bright sun seemed to shine right through him. 

He hovered above her, his hand outstretched. “The letter. Hand it to me,” he 
insisted. 

“But—why?” Hannah asked in a tiny voice. 

“I can’t let you mail it,” Danny told her. 

“Why, Danny? It’s my letter. Why can’t I mail it to my friend?” 

“Because you found out the truth about me,” he said. “And there’s no way 
I’ll let you tell anyone.” 

9 

“So, I’m right,” Hannah said softly. “You’re a ghost.” 

She shuddered, a wave of cold fear sweeping over her. 

When did you die, Danny? 

Why are you here? To haunt me? 

What are you going to do to me? 

Questions raced through her mind. Frightening questions. 

“Give me the letter, Hannah,” Danny insisted. “No one will ever read it. No 
one can know.” 

“But, Danny—” She stared up at him. Stared up at a ghost. 

The golden sunlight poured through him. He shimmered in and out of view. 

She raised a hand to shield her eyes. 

He became too bright, too bright to look at. 

“What are you going to do to me, Danny?” Hannah asked, shutting her eyes 
tight. “What are you going to do to me now?” 

He didn’t reply. 

When Hannah opened her eyes, she stared up into two faces instead of one. 

Two grinning faces. 

Her twin brothers pointed at her and laughed. “You were asleep,” Bill said. 

“You were snoring,” Herb told her. 

“Huh?” Hannah blinked several times, trying to clear her mind. Her neck 
felt stiff. Her back ached. 

“Here’s how you were snoring,” Herb said. He performed some hideous 
snuffling sounds. 

Both boys fell to the grass, laughing. They rolled onto each other and began 
an impromptu wrestling match. 

“I had a bad dream,” Hannah said, more to herself than to her brothers. 
They weren’t listening to her. 

She climbed to her feet and stretched her arms above her head, trying to 
stretch away her stiff neck. “Ow.” Falling asleep sitting up against a tree trunk 
was a bad idea. 

Hannah gazed toward Danny’s house. That dream was so real, she thought, 

feeling a cold chill down her back. So frightening. 

“Thanks for waking me up,” she told the twins. They didn’t hear her. They 
were racing toward the back yard. 

Hannah bent down and picked up the letter. 

She folded it in half and made her way up the lawn to the front door. 
Sometimes dreams tell the truth, she thought, her shoulders still aching. 
Sometimes dreams tell you things you couldn’t know any other way. 

I’m going to find out the tmth about Danny, she vowed. 

I’m going to find out the truth if it kills me. 

The next evening, Hannah decided to see if Danny was home. Maybe he’d like 
to walk to Harders and get ice-cream cones, she thought. 

She told her mother where she was going and made her way across the back 

yard. 

It had rained all day. The grass glistened wetly, and the ground beneath her 
sneakers was soft and marshy. A pale, crescent-shaped moon rose above wisps of 
black cloud. The night air felt tingly and wet. 

Hannah crossed the driveway, then hesitated a few yards from Danny’s 
back stoop. A square of dim yellow light escaped through the window on the 
back door. 

She remembered standing at this door a few nights before and being totally 
embarrassed when Danny opened the door and she couldn’t think of a thing to 
say. 

At least this time I know what I’m going to say, she thought. 

Taking a deep breath, Hannah stepped into the square of light on the stoop. 
She knocked on the window of the kitchen door. 

She listened. The house was silent. 

She knocked again. 

Silence. No footsteps to answer the door. 

She leaned forward and peered into the kitchen. 

“Oh!” Hannah cried out in surprise. 

Danny’s mother sat at the yellow kitchen table, her back to Hannah, her hair 
glowing in the light of a low ceiling fixture. She had both hands wrapped around 
a steaming white coffee mug. 

Why doesn’t she answer the door? Hannah wondered. 

She hesitated, then raised her fist and knocked loudly on the door. Several 

times. 

Through the window, she could see that Danny’s mother didn’t react to the 
knocking at all. She lifted the white mug to her lips and took a long sip, her back 
to Hannah. 

“Answer the door!” Hannah cried aloud. 

She knocked again. And called: “Mrs. Anderson! Mrs. Anderson! It’s me— 
Hannah! From next door!” 

Under the cone of light, Danny’s mother set the white mug down on the 
yellow table. She didn’t turn around. She didn’t move from her chair. 

“Mrs. Anderson—!” 

Hannah raised her hand to knock, then lowered it in defeat. 

Why doesn’t she hear me? Hannah wondered, staring at the woman’s 
slender shoulders, at her hair gleaming down past the collar of her blouse. 

Why won’t she come to the door? 

And then Hannah shivered with fear as she answered her own questions. 

I know why she doesn’t hear me, Hannah thought, backing away from the 
window. 

I know why she doesn’t answer the door. 

Overcome with fear, Hannah uttered a low moan and backed away from the 
light, off the stoop, into the safety of the darkness. 

10 

Trembling all over, Hannah wrapped her arms around her chest, as if shielding 
herself from her frightening thoughts. 

Mrs. Anderson doesn’t hear me because she isn’t real, Hannah realized. 

She isn’t real. She’s a ghost. 

Like Danny. 

A ghost family has moved next door to me. 

And here I am, standing in this dark back yard, trying to spy on a boy who 
isn’t even alive! Here I am, trembling all over, cold with fear, trying to prove 
what I’m already sure of. He’s a ghost. His mother is a ghost. 

And I—I— 

The kitchen light went out. The back of Danny’s house was completely 
dark now. 

The pale light from the crescent moon trickled onto the glistening, wet 
grass. Hannah stood, listening to the silence, trying to force away the frightening 
thoughts that crowded her mind until it felt as if her head were about to burst. 

Where is Danny? she wondered. 

Crossing the driveway, she headed back to her house. She could hear music 
and voices from the TV in the den. She could hear the twins’ laughter floating 
out from the upstairs window of their room. 

Ghosts, she thought, staring at the lighted windows, like bright eyes shining 
back at her. 

Ghosts. 

I don’t believe in ghosts! 

The thought made her feel a little less frightened. She suddenly realized her 
throat was dry. The night air felt hot and sticky against her skin. 

She thought of ice-cream again. Going to Harder’s and getting a double¬ 
scoop cone seemed an excellent idea. Cookies-and-Cream, Hannah thought. She 
could already taste it. 

She hurried into the house to tell her parents she was walking into town. At 
the doorway to the dark-paneled den, she stopped. Her parents, bathed in the 
glow of the TV screen, turned to her expectantly. 

“What’s up, Hannah?” 

She had a sudden impulse to tell them everything. And so she did. 

“The people next door, they’re not alive,” she blurted out. “They’re ghosts. 
You know Danny, the boy my age? He’s a ghost. I know he is! And his mother 

55 

“Hannah, please—we’re trying to watch,” her father said, pointing to the 
TV with the can of diet Coke in his hand. 

They don’t believe me, she thought. 

And then she scolded herself: Of course they don’t believe me. Who would 
believe such a crazy story? 

In her room, she took a five-dollar bill from her wallet and shoved it into 
the pocket of her shorts. Then she brushed her hair, studying her face in the 
mirror. 

I look okay, she thought. I don’t look like a crazy person. 

Her hair was damp from the wet night air. Maybe I’ll let it grow, she 
thought, watching it fall into shape around her face. I should have something to 
show for this summer! 

As she headed toward the front door, she heard loud bumping and banging 
above her head. The twins must be wrestling up in their room, she realized, 
shaking her head. 

She stepped back out into the warm, wet darkness, jogged down the front 
lawn to the sidewalk, and headed toward town and Harder’s Ice-Cream Parlor. 

The tall, old-fashioned-looking streetlamps cast circles of blue-white light 
along the street. The trees, trembling in soft gusts of wind, rustled over the 
sidewalk as Hannah stepped beneath them. 

Ghosts on the sidewalk, she thought with a shiver. They seemed to reach 
down for her with their leafy arms. 

As she neared town, a strange feeling of dread swept over her. She 
quickened her pace as she passed the post office, its windows as black as the sky. 

The town square was deserted, she saw. It wasn’t even eight o’clock, and 
there were no cars passing through town, no one on the streets. 

“What a hick town!” she muttered under her breath. 

Behind the bank, she turned onto Elm Street. Harder’s Ice-Cream Parlor 
stood on the next corner, a large red neon ice-cream cone in its window, casting a 
red glow onto the sidewalk. 

At least Harder’s stays open past dark, Hannah thought. 

As she walked closer, she could see the glass front door of the small shop 

propped open invitingly. 

She stopped a few feet from the door. 

The feeling of dread suddenly became overpowering. Despite the heat of 
the night, she felt cold all over. Her knees trembled. 

What’s going on? she wondered. Why do I feel so strange? 

As she stared through the red glare of the neon cone into the open doorway, 
a figure burst out. 

Followed by another. And another. 

Into the light, they ran, their faces twisted in fear. 

Staring in surprise, she recognized Danny in front, followed by Alan and 

Fred. 

They each held ice-cream cones in front of them. 

They ran from the store, bent forward as if straining to flee as fast as 
possible. Their sneakers thudded against the pavement of the sidewalk. 

Hannah heard loud, angry shouts from inside the shop. 

Without realizing it, she had moved close to the door. 

She could still hear the three boys running away. But she could no longer 
see them in the darkness. 

She turned—and felt something hit her hard from behind. 

“Ohh!” She cried out as she was thrown heavily onto the hard pavement. 

11 

Hannah landed hard on the sidewalk on her elbows and knees. The fall took her 
breath away. 

A burning pain shot through her body. 

What happened? 

What hit me? 

Gasping for breath, she raised her head in time to see Mr. Harder barrel past 
her. He was shouting at the top of his lungs for the boys to stop. 

Hannah slowly pulled herself to her feet. Whoa! she thought. Harder is 
really mad! 

Standing up straight, her bare knees throbbing with pain, her heart still 
thudding loudly, she glared after the store owner. 

He could have at least said he was sorry he knocked me down, she thought 
angrily. 

She leaned over to examine her knees in the light from the ice-cream parlor. 
Were they cut? 

No. Just a little bruised. 

Brushing off her shorts, she glanced up to see Mr. Harder hurrying back to 
the store. He was a short, fat man with curls of white hair around his round, pink 
face. He wore a long white apron that flapped in the wind as he walked, his fists 
swinging at his sides. 

Hannah ducked back out of the light, behind a wide tree trunk. 

A few seconds later, she could hear him back behind the counter, 
complaining loudly to his wife. “What is wrong with these kids?” he was 
bellowing. “They take ice-cream and run without paying? Don’t they have 
parents? Don’t they have anyone to teach them right from wrong?” 

Mrs. Harder murmured something to soothe her husband. Hannah couldn’t 
hear the words. 

With Mr. Harder’s angry shouts filling the air, she crept out from behind the 
tree and hurried away, in the direction the boys had run. 

Why did Danny and his friends pull such a stupid stunt? she wondered. 
What if they had been caught? Was it really worth being arrested, getting a 
police record just for an ice-cream cone? 

Halfway down the block, she could still hear Mr. Harder bellowing with 
rage from inside his small shop. Hannah started to run, eager to get away from 
his angry voice. Her left knee ached. 

The air suddenly felt stifling hot, heavy and damp. Strands of hair were 
matted against her forehead from sweat. 

She pictured Danny running from the store, holding the ice-cream cone in 
one hand. She pictured the frightened expression on his face as he fled. She 
pictured Alan and Fred right behind him, their sneakers thudding against the 
pavement as they made their getaway. 

And now she was running, too. She wasn’t sure why. 

Her left knee still ached from her fall. She was out of the town square now, 
running past dark houses and lawns. 

She turned a corner, the streetlamp casting a cone of white light around her. 
More houses. A few porchlights lit. No one on the street. 

Such a boring little town, she thought again. 

She stopped short when she saw the three boys. They were halfway up the 
block, huddled behind a tall, wall-like hedge. 

“Hey—you guys!” Her voice came out a whisper. 

Running in the street, she made her way toward them quickly. As she came 
closer, she could see them laughing together, enjoying their ice-cream cones. 

They hadn’t seen her. Hannah made her way into the deep shadows on the 
other side of the street. Keeping in the dark, she crept closer, until she was in the 
yard across the street from them, hidden by a bushy evergreen shrub. 

Fred and Alan were shoving each other playfully, enjoying their triumph 
over the store owner. Danny stood by himself, behind them against the tall 
hedge, silently licking his cone. 

“Harder’s was having a special tonight,” Alan declared loudly. “Free ice¬ 
cream!” 

Fred hee-hawed and slapped Alan hard on the back. 

Both boys turned to Danny. The light from the streetlamp made their faces 
look pale and green. “You looked real scared,” Alan told Danny. “I thought you 
were going to puke your guts out.” 

“Hey, no way,” Danny insisted. “I was the first one out of there, you know. 
You guys were so slow, I thought I’d have to come back and rescue you.” 

“Yeah. For sure,” Fred replied sarcastically. 

Danny’s acting tough, Hannah realized. He’s trying to be like them. 

“That was kind of exciting,” Danny said, tossing the remainder of his cone 
into the hedge. “But maybe we’d better be careful. You know. Not hang around 
there for a while.” 

“Hey, it’s not like we robbed a bank or something,” Alan said. “It was just 
ice-cream.” 

Fred said something to Alan that Hannah couldn’t hear, and the two boys 
started wrestling around, uttering high-pitched giggles. 

“Hey, guys—not so loud,” Danny warned. “I mean—” 

“Let’s go back to Harder’s,” Alan suggested. “I wanted two scoops!” 

Fred hee-hawed and slapped Alan a high-five. Danny joined in the laughter. 

“Hey, guys—we should get going,” Danny said. 

Before his friends could reply, the street filled with light. 

Hannah turned to see two bright white lights looming toward them. 

Car headlights. 

The police, Hannah thought. 

They’re caught. All three of them are caught. 

12 

The car stopped. 

Hannah peered out from behind the shrub. 

“Hey, you kids—” the driver called to the boys in a gruff voice. He poked 
his head out the car window. 

It isn’t the police, Hannah realized, breathing a long sigh of relief. 

The boys froze against the hedge. In the dim light from the streetlamp, 
Hannah could see that the driver was an elderly man, white-haired, wearing 
glasses. 

“We’re not doing anything. Just talking,” Fred called to the man. 

“Do any of you know how to get to Route 112?” the man asked. The light 
went on inside the car. Hannah could see a roadmap in the man’s hand. 

Fred and Alan laughed, relieved laughter. Danny continued to stare at the 
driver, his expression still frightened. 

“Route 112?” the man repeated. 

“Main Street turns into Route 112,” Alan told the man, pointing in the 
direction the car was heading. “Go up two blocks. Then turn right.” 

The light went out in the car. The man thanked them and drove off. 

The boys watched until the car had disappeared in the darkness. Fred and 
Alan slapped each other high-fives. Then Fred shoved Alan into the hedge. They 
all laughed giddily. 

“Hey, look where we are,” Alan said, surprised. 

The boys turned toward the driveway. From her hiding place across the 
street, Hannah followed their gaze. 

At the end of the hedge stood a tall wooden mailbox on a pole. A hand- 
carved swan’s head perched on top of the box, which had graceful wings jutting 
out from its sides. 

“It’s Chesney’s house,” Alan said, making his way along the hedge toward 
the mailbox. He grabbed the wings with both hands. “Do you believe this 
mailbox?” 

“Chesney carved it himself,” Fred said, snickering. “What a dork.” 

“It’s his pride and joy,” Alan sneered. He pulled open the lid and peered 
inside. “Empty.” 

“Who would write to him?” Danny declared, trying to sound as tough as his 
two friends. 

“Hey, I’ve got an idea, Danny,” Fred said. He stepped behind Danny and 
started shoving him toward the mailbox. 

“Whoa,” Danny protested. 

But Fred pushed him up to the mailbox. “Let’s see how strong you are,” 
Fred said. 

“Hey, wait—” Danny cried. 

Hannah leaned out from behind the low shrub. “Oh, wow,” she muttered to 
herself. “Now what are they going to do?” 

“Take the mailbox,” she heard Alan order Danny. “I dare you.” 

“We dare you,” Fred added. “Remember what you told us about dares, 
Danny? How you never turn one down?” 

“Yeah. You told us you never turn down a dare,” Alan said, grinning. 

Danny hesitated. “Well, I—” 

A heavy feeling of dread formed in the pit of Hannah’s stomach. Watching 
Danny step toward Mr. Chesney’s hand-carved mailbox, she suddenly had a 
premonition—a feeling that something really terrible was about to happen. 

I’ve got to stop them, she decided. 

Taking a deep breath, she stepped out from behind the bush. 

As she started to call to them, everything went black. 

“Hey—!” she cried aloud. 

What had happened? 

Her first thought was that the streetlamp had gone out. 

But then Hannah saw the two red circles glowing in front of her. 

The two glowing eyes surrounded by darkness. 

The shadow figure rose up inches in front of her. 

She tried to scream, but her voice was muffled in its heavy darkness. 

She tried to run, but it blocked her path. 

The red eyes burned into hers. 

Closer. Closer. 

It’s got me now, Hannah knew. 

13 

“Hannah...” it whispered. “Hannah...” 

So close, she could smell its hot, sour breath. 

“Hannah... Hannah...” Its whisper like crackling, dead leaves. 

The ruby eyes burned like fire. Hannah felt the darkness circle her, wrap 
around her tightly. 

“Please—” was all she could manage to choke out. 

“Hannah...” 

And the light returned. 

Hannah blinked, struggled to breathe. 

The sour odor lingered in her nostrils. But the street was bright now. 

Car headlights washed over her. 

It—it’s gone, Hannah realized. The lights had chased away the shadow 
figure. 

But would it return? 

As the car passed by, Hannah dropped to the ground behind the low 
evergreen shrub and struggled to catch her breath. When she looked up, the boys 
were still huddled in front of Mr. Chesney’s hedge. 

“Let’s get going,” Danny urged them. 

“No way. Not yet,” Alan said, stepping in front of Danny to block his way. 
“You’re forgetting about our dare.” 

Fred shoved Danny toward the mailbox. “Go ahead. Take it.” 

“Hey, wait.” Danny spun around. “I never said I’d do it.” 

“I dared you to take Chesney’s mailbox,” Fred told him. “Remember? You 
told us you never turned down a dare?” 

Alan laughed. “Chesney will come out tomorrow and think his swan flew 
away.” 

“No, wait—” Danny protested. “Maybe it’s a dumb idea.” 

“It’s a cool idea. Chesney is a creep,” Alan insisted. “Everyone in 
Greenwood Falls hates his guts.” 

“Take his mailbox, Danny,” Fred challenged. “Pull it up. Come on. I dare 
you.” 

“No, I—” Danny tried to back away, but Fred held him from behind by the 
shoulders. 

“You chicken?” Alan challenged. 

“Look at the chicken,” Fred said in a mocking, babyish voice. “Cluck 
cluck.” 

“I’m not a chicken,” Danny snapped angrily. 

“Prove it,” Alan demanded. He grabbed Danny’s hands and raised them to 
the carved wings that stretched from the sides of the mailbox. “Go ahead. Prove 
it.” 

“What a riot!” Fred declared. “The town postmaster—his mailbox flies 
away.” 

Don’t do it, Danny, Hannah urged silently from her dark hiding place across 
the street. Please — don’t do it. 

Another set of car headlights made the three boys back away from the 
mailbox. The car rolled past without slowing. 

“Let’s go. It’s getting late,” Hannah heard Danny say. 

But Fred and Alan insisted, teasing him, challenging him. 

As Hannah stared into the white light of the streetlamp, Danny stepped up 
to Chesney’s mailbox and grabbed the wings. 

“Danny, wait—” Hannah cried. 

He didn’t seem to hear her. 

With a loud groan, he began to tug. 

It didn’t budge. 

He lowered his hands to the pole and wrapped them tightly around it just 
below the box. 

He tugged again. 

“It’s in really deep,” he told Alan and Fred. “I don’t know if I can get it.” 

“Try again,” Alan urged. 

“We’ll help you,” Fred said, placing his hands above Danny’s on the box. 

“Let’s all pull together,” Alan urged. “At the count of three.” 

“I wouldn’t do that if I were you!” exclaimed a gruff voice behind them. 

They all turned to see Mr. Chesney glaring at them from the driveway, his 
face knotted in a furious snarl. 

14 

Mr. Chesney grabbed Danny’s shoulders and pulled him away from the mailbox. 

One of the wooden swan wings came off in Danny’s hands. As Mr. Chesney 
wrestled him away, Danny let it drop to the ground. 

“You punks!” Mr. Chesney sputtered, his eyes wide with rage. “You—you 

“Let go of him!” Hannah screamed from across the street. But fear muffled 
her voice. Her cry came out a whisper. 

With a loud groan, Danny pulled free of the man’s grasp. 

Without another word, the three boys were running, running down the 
middle of the dark street, their sneakers pounding loudly on the pavement. 

“I’ll remember you!” Mr. Chesney called after them. “I’ll remember you. 
I’ll see you again! And next time, I’ll have my shotgun!” 

Hannah watched Mr. Chesney bend to pick up the broken swan’s wing. He 
examined the wooden wing, shaking his head angrily. 

Then she began running, keeping in the dark front yards, hidden by hedges 
and low shrubs, running in the direction Danny and his friends had headed. 

She saw the boys turn a corner, and kept running. Keeping well behind, she 
followed them through the town square, still deserted and dark. Even Harders 
ice-cream parlor was closed now, the shop dark behind the red glare of the neon 
window sign. 

Two dogs, tall, ungainly mutts with thin, shaggy frames, crossed the street 
in front of them, trotting slowly, out for their evening walk. The dogs didn’t look 
up as the boys ran past. 

Halfway up the next block, she saw Fred and Alan collapse beneath a dark 
tree, giggling up at the sky as they sprawled on the ground. 

Danny leaned against the wide tree trunk, panting loudly. 

Fred and Alan couldn’t stop laughing. “Did you see the look on his face 
when that stupid wing dropped off?” Fred cried. 

“I thought his eyes were going to pop out!” Alan exclaimed gleefully. “I 
thought his head was going to explode!” 

Danny didn’t join in their laughter. He rubbed his right shoulder with one 
hand. “He really wrecked my shoulder when he grabbed me,” he said, groaning. 

“You should sue him!” Alan suggested. 

He and Fred laughed uproariously, sitting up to slap each other high-fives. 

“No. Really,” Danny said quietly, still rubbing the shoulder. “He really hurt 
me. When he swung me around, I thought—” 

“What a creep,” Fred said, shaking his head. 

“We’ll have to pay him back,” Alan added. “We’ll have to—” 

“Maybe we should stay away from there,” Danny said, still breathing hard. 
“You heard what he said about getting his shotgun.” 

The other two boys laughed scornfully. “Yeah. For sure. He’d really come 
after us with a shotgun,” Alan scoffed, brushing blades of freshly cut grass from 
his scraggly hair. 

“The respected town postmaster, shooting at innocent kids,” Fred said, 
snickering. “No way. He was just trying to scare us—right, Danny?” 

Danny stopped rubbing his shoulder and frowned down at Alan and Fred, 
who were still sitting in the grass. “I don’t know.” 

“Oooh, Danny is scared!” Fred cried. 

“You’re not scared of that old geek, are you?” Alan demanded. “Just 
because he grabbed your shoulder doesn’t mean—” 

“I don’t know,” Danny interrupted angrily. “The old guy seemed pretty out 
of control to me. He was so angry! I mean, maybe he would shoot us to protect 
his precious mailbox.” 

“Bet we could make him a lot angrier,” Alan said quietly, climbing to his 
feet, staring intently at Danny. 

“Yeah. Bet we could,” Fred agreed, grinning. 

“Unless you’re chicken, Danny,” Alan said, moving close to Danny, 
challenge in his voice. 

“I—it’s getting late,” Danny said, trying to read his watch in the dark. “I 
promised my mom I’d get home.” 

Fred climbed to his feet and moved next to Alan. “We should teach 
Chesney a lesson,” he said, brushing blades of grass off the back of his jeans. 
His eyes gleamed mischievously in the dim light. “We should teach him not to 
pick on innocent kids.” 

“Yeah, you’re right,” Alan agreed, his eyes on Danny. “I mean, he hurt 
Danny. He had no business grabbing him like that.” 

“I’ve got to get home. See you guys tomorrow,” Danny said, waving. 

“Okay. See you,” Fred called after him. 

“At least we got some free ice-cream tonight!” Alan exclaimed. 

As Danny walked quickly away, Hannah could hear Alan and Fred giggling 
their gleeful, high-pitched giggles. 

Free ice-cream, she thought, frowning. Those two guys are really looking 
for trouble. 

She couldn’t help herself. She had to say something to Danny. “Hey!” she 
called, running to catch up to him. 

He spun around, startled. “Hannah—what are you doing here?” 

“I—I followed you. From the ice-cream store,” she confessed. 

He snickered. “You saw everything?” 

She nodded. “Why do you hang out with those two guys?” she demanded. 

He scowled, avoiding her eyes, picking up his pace. “They’re okay,” he 
muttered. 

“They’re going to get in big trouble one of these days,” Hannah predicted. 
“They really are.” 

Danny shmgged. “They just talk tough. They think it’s cool. But they’re 
really okay.” 

“But they stole ice-cream cones and—” Hannah decided she’d said enough. 

They crossed the street in silence. 

Hannah glanced up to see the pale crescent of moon disappear behind black 
wisps of cloud. The street grew darker. The trees shook their leaves, sending 
whispers all around. 

Danny kicked a stone down the sidewalk. It clattered softly onto the grass. 

Hannah suddenly remembered going over to Danny’s house earlier to get 
him. In all the excitement of the stolen ice-cream cones and Mr. Chesney and his 
mailbox, she had completely forgotten what had happened on his back stoop. 

“I—I went over to your house tonight,” she started reluctantly. “Before I 
went into town.” 

Danny stopped and turned to her, his eyes studying hers. “Yeah?” 

“I thought maybe you’d want to walk to town or something,” Hannah 
continued. “Your mother was home. In the kitchen.” 

He continued to stare hard at her, as if trying to read her thoughts. 

“I knocked and knocked on the kitchen door,” Hannah said, tugging a 
strand of blonde hair off her forehead. “I could see your mother at the table. She 
had her back to me. She didn’t turn around or anything.” 

Danny didn’t reply. He lowered his eyes to the pavement and started 

walking again, hands shoved in his pockets. 

“It was so strange,” Hannah continued. “I knocked and knocked. Really 
loud. But it was like—like your mother was in a different world or something. 
She didn’t answer the door. She didn’t even turn around.” 

Their houses came into view ahead of them. A porchlight sent a yellow 
glow over Hannah’s front lawn. On the other side of the driveway, Danny’s 
house loomed in darkness. 

Hannah’s throat suddenly felt dry. She wished she could ask Danny what 
she really wanted to ask. 

Are you a ghost? Is your mother a ghost, too? 

That was the real question in Hannah’s mind. 

But it was too crazy. Too stupid. 

How can you ask a person if he is real or not? If he is alive or not? 

“Danny—why didn’t your mother answer the door?” she asked quietly. 

Danny turned at the bottom of her driveway, his expression set, his eyes 
narrowed. His face glowed eerily in the pale yellow light from the porch. 

“Why?” Hannah repeated impatiently. “Why didn’t she answer the door?” 

He hesitated. 

“I guess I should tell you the truth,” he said finally, his voice a whisper, as 
soft as the whisper of the shuddering trees. 

15 

Danny leaned close to Hannah. She could see that his red hair was matted to his 
forehead by perspiration. His eyes burned into hers. 

“There’s a good reason why my mother didn’t answer the door,” Danny told 
her. 

Because she’s a ghost, Hannah thought. She felt a cold shiver roll down her 
back. A tremor of fear. 

She swallowed hard. Am I afraid of Danny? she asked herself. 

Yes. A little, she realized. Her scary dream about him flashed into her mind. 
Yes. A little. 

“You see,” Danny started, then hesitated. He cleared his throat. He shifted 
his weight nervously. “You see, my mom is deaf.” 

“Huh?” Hannah wasn’t sure she had heard correctly. It wasn’t at all what 
she was expecting. 

“She got this inner-ear infection,” Danny explained in a low voice, keeping 
his eyes trained on Hannah. “In both ears. A couple of years ago. The doctors 
treated it, but the infection spread. They thought they could save one ear, but 
they couldn’t. It made her completely deaf.” 

“You—you mean—?” Hannah stammered. 

“That’s why she couldn’t hear you knocking,” Danny explained. “She can’t 
hear anything at all.” He lowered his eyes to the ground. 

“I see,” Hannah replied awkwardly. “I’m sorry, Danny. I didn’t know. I 
thought... well, I didn’t know what to think.” 

“Mom doesn’t like people to know,” Danny continued, backing toward his 
house. “She thinks people will feel sorry for her if they know. She hates to have 
people feeling sorry for her. She’s a really good lip-reader. She usually fools 
people.” 

“Well, I won’t say anything,” Hannah replied. “I mean, I won’t tell anyone. 
I—” She suddenly felt very stupid. 

Her head lowered, she made her way up the driveway toward her front 
walk. 

“See you tomorrow,” Danny called. 

“Yeah. Okay,” she replied, thinking about what he had just told her. 

She looked up to wave good-night to him. 

But he had vanished. 

Hannah turned and began jogging around the side of the house toward the back 
door. Danny’s words troubled her. She realized all of her thoughts about ghosts 
may have been a big mistake. 

Her parents were always predicting that some day her imagination would 
mn away with her. 

Now maybe it has, Hannah thought unhappily. 

Maybe I’ve totally lost it. 

She turned the corner of the house and started toward the back door, her 
sneakers squishing on the soft, wet ground. 

The light over the porch sent a narrow cone of white light onto the concrete 
stoop. 

Hannah was nearly to the door when the dark figure, wrapped in black 
shadow, its red eyes glowing like hot coals, stepped into the light, blocking her 
path. 

“Hannah—stay away!” It whispered, pointing menacingly at her with one 
long, shadowy finger. 

16 

Gripped with horror, Hannah thought she saw the shadow of an evil grin inside 
the deeper shadow that hovered over the stoop. “Hannah, stay away. Stay away 
from DANNY!” 

“Noooooooooo!” 

In her panic, Hannah didn’t even realize that the howl came from her own 
throat. 

The red eyes glowed brighter in reaction to her scream. The fiery stare 
burned into her eyes, forcing her to shield her face with both hands. 

“Hannah—listen to my warning.” The dreadful dry whisper. 

The whisper of death. 

The sinewy black finger, outlined in the white porchlight, pointed to her, 
threatened her again. 

And again Hannah cried out in a voice hoarse with terror: “Nooooooo!” 

The dark figure swept closer. 

Closer. 

And then the kitchen door swung open, throwing a long rectangle of light 
over the yard. 

“Hannah—is that you? What’s going on?” 

Her father stepped into the light, his features knotted with concern, his eyes 
peering into the darkness through his square eyeglasses. 

“Dad—!” Hannah’s voice caught in her throat. “Look out, Dad—he—he—” 
Hannah pointed. 

Pointed to empty air. 

Pointed to the empty rectangle of light from the kitchen door. 

Pointed to nothing. 

The shadow figure had disappeared once again. 

Her mind spinning in confusion, feeling dazed and terrified, she hurried 
past her father, into the house. 

She had told her parents about the frightening dark figure with the glowing red 
eyes. Her father carefully searched the back yard, his flashlight playing over the 
lawn. He found no footprints in the soft, wet ground, no sign at all of an intruder. 

Hannah’s mother had gazed intently at her, studying her, as if trying to find 
some kind of answer in Hannah’s eyes. 

“I—I’m not crazy,” Hannah stammered angrily. 

Mrs. Fairchild’s cheeks turned pink. “I know that,” she replied tensely. 

“Should I call the police? There’s nothing back there,” Mr. Fairchild said, 
scratching his thinning brown hair, his eyeglasses reflecting the light from the 
kitchen ceiling. 

“I’ll just go to bed,” Hannah told them, moving abruptly to the door. “I’m 
really tired.” 

Her legs felt trembly and weak as she hurried down the hall to her room. 

Sighing wearily, she pushed open her bedroom door. 

The dark shadow figure was waiting for her by her bed. 

17 

Hannah gasped and started to back away. 

But as the hall light fell into the bedroom, she realized she wasn’t staring at 
the frightening figure after all. 

She was staring at a longsleeved, dark sweater she had tossed over the 
bedpost at the foot of her bed. 

Hannah gripped the sides of the doorway. She couldn’t decide whether to 
laugh or cry. 

“What a night!” she exclaimed out loud. 

She clicked on the bedroom ceiling light, then closed the door behind her. 
As she made her way over to the bed to pull the sweater off the bedpost, she was 
shaking all over. 

She pulled off her clothes quickly, tossing them onto the floor, and put on a 
nightshirt. Then she climbed under the covers, eager to get to sleep. 

But she couldn’t stop her mind from whirring over all that had happened. 
She couldn’t stop the frightening pictures from playing in her head, over and 
over. 

The shadows of tree limbs from the front yard shifted and bobbed across 
the ceiling. Normally, she found their silent dance soothing. But tonight the 
moving shadows frightened her, reminded her of the menacing dark figure that 
had called her name. 

She tried to think about Danny instead. But those thoughts were just as 
troubling. 

Danny is a ghost. Danny is a ghost. 

The phrase repeated again and again in her mind. 

He had to be lying about his mother, Hannah decided. He made up the story 
about her being deaf because he doesn’t want me to figure out that she’s a ghost, 
too. 

Questions, questions. 

Questions she couldn’t answer. 

If Danny is a ghost, what is he doing here? Why did he move in next door to 

me? 

Why does he hang out with Alan and Fred? Are they ghosts, too? 

Is that why I’ve never seen them at school or in town before? Is that why 
I’ve never seen any of them? They’re all ghosts? 

Hannah shut her eyes, trying to force all the questions from her mind. But 
she couldn’t stop thinking about Danny—and the dark shadow figure. 

Why did the dark figure tell me to stay away from Danny? Is it trying to 
keep me from proving that Danny is a ghost? 

Finally, Hannah fell asleep. But even in sleep, her troubled thoughts 
pursued her. 

The sinewy black shadow followed her into her dreams. In the dream, she 
was standing in a gray cave. A fire burned brightly, far in the distance at the 
mouth of the cave. 

The black figure, its red eyes glowing brighter than the fire, moved toward 
Hannah. Closer. And closer. 

And when the black figure came so close, close enough for Hannah to reach 
out and touch it, the shadow figure reached up with its sticklike arms and pulled 
itself apart. 

It reached up with its ebony hands and with bonelike fingers, pulled away 
the darkness where its face should be—revealing Danny underneath. 

Danny, leering at her with glowing red eyes that burned into hers—until she 
woke up gasping for breath. 

No, she thought, staring out the window at the gray dawn. No. Danny isn’t 
the black shadow. 

No way. 

It isn’t Danny. 

It can’t be Danny. The dream makes no sense. 

Hannah sat up. Her bedclothes were damp from perspiration. The air in the 
room hung heavy and sour. 

She kicked off the covers and lowered her feet to the floor. 

She knew only one thing for certain after her long night of frightening 
thoughts. 

She had to talk to Danny. 

She couldn’t spend another night like this. 

She had to find out the truth. 

The next morning, after breakfast, she saw him kicking a soccer ball around 
in his back yard. She pulled open the kitchen door and ran outside. The screen 
door slammed loudly behind her as she began to run to him. 

“Hey, Danny—” she called. “Are you a ghost?” 

18 

“Huh?” Danny glanced at her, then kicked the black-and-white soccer ball 
against the side of the garage. He was wearing a navy-blue T-shirt over denim 
shorts. He had a blue-and-red Cubs cap pulled down over his red hair. 

Hannah ran full speed across the driveway and stopped a few feet from him. 
“Are you a ghost?” she repeated breathlessly. 

He wrinkled his forehead, squinting at her. The ball bounced across the 
grass. He stepped forward and kicked it. “Yeah. Sure,” he said. 

“No. Really,” Hannah insisted, her heart pounding. 

The ball bounced high off the garage, and he caught it against his chest. 
“What did you say?” He scratched the back of a knee. 

He’s staring at me as if I’m nuts, Hannah realized. 

Maybe I am. 

“Never mind,” she said, swallowing hard. “Can I play?” 

“Yeah.” He dropped the ball to the grass. “How ya doing?” he asked. “You 
okay today?” 

Hannah nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” 

“That was pretty wild last night,” Danny said, kicking the ball gently to her. 
“I mean, at Mr. Chesney’s.” 

The ball got by Hannah. She chased after it and kicked it back. Normally, 
she was a good athlete. But this morning she was wearing sandals, not the best 
for kicking a soccer ball. 

“I really got scared,” Hannah admitted. “I thought that car that stopped was 
the police and—” 

“Yeah. It was kind of scary,” Danny said. He picked the ball up and hit it 
back to her with his head. 

“Do Alan and Fred really go to Maple Avenue School?” Hannah asked. The 
ball hit her ankle and rolled toward the driveway. 

“Yeah. They’re going to be in ninth grade,” Danny told her, waiting for her 
to kick the ball back. 

“They’re not new kids? How come I’ve never seen them?” She kicked the 
ball hard. 

Danny moved to his right to get behind it. He snickered. “How come 

they’ve never seen you?” 

He isn’t giving me any straight answers, Hannah realized. I think my 
questions are making him nervous. He knows I’m starting to suspect the truth 
about him. 

“Alan and Fred want to go back to Chesney’s,” Danny told her. 

“Huh? They what?” She missed the ball and kicked up a clod of grass. “Ow. 
I can’t play soccer in sandals!” 

“They want to go back tonight. You know. To pay Chesney back for scaring 
us. He really hurt my shoulder.” 

“I think Alan and Fred are really looking for trouble,” Hannah warned. 

Danny shrugged. “Nothing else to do in this town,” he muttered. 

The ball rolled between them. 

“I’ve got it!” they both yelled in unison. 

They both chased after the ball. Danny got to it first. He tried to kick it 
away from her. But his foot landed on top of the ball. He stumbled over it and 
went sprawling onto the grass. 

Hannah laughed and jumped over him to get to the ball. She kicked it 
against the side of the garage, then turned back to him, smiling triumphantly. 
“One for me!” she declared. 

He sat up slowly, grass stains smearing the chest of his T-shirt. “Help me 
up.” He reached up his hands to hers. 

Hannah reached to pull Danny up—and her hands went right through him! 

19 

They both uttered startled cries. 

“Hey, come on! Help me up,” Danny said. 

Her heart pounding, Hannah tried to grab his hands again. 

But again her hands went right through his. 

“Hey—!” Danny cried, his eyes wide with alarm. He jumped to his feet, 
staring at her hard. 

“I knew it,” Hannah said softly, raising her hands to her cheeks. She took a 
step back, away from him. 

“Knew it? Knew what?” He continued to stare at her, his face filled with 
confusion. “What’s going on, Hannah?” 

“Stop pretending,” Hannah told him, suddenly feeling cold all over despite 
the bright morning sunshine. “I know the truth, Danny. You’re a ghost.” 

“Huh?” His mouth dropped open in disbelief. He pulled off his Cubs cap 
and scratched his hair, staring hard at her all the while. 

“You’re a ghost,” she repeated, her voice trembling. 

“Me?” he cried. “No way! Are you crazy? I’m not a ghost!” 

Without warning, he stepped in front of her and shot his hand out at her 
chest. 

Hannah gasped as his hand went right through her body. 

She didn’t feel a thing. It was as if she weren’t there. 

Danny cried out and jerked his hand back as if he had burned it. He 
swallowed hard, his expression tight with horror. “Y-you—” he stammered. 

Hannah tried to reply, but the words caught in her throat. 

Giving her one last horrified glance, Danny turned and began running at 
full speed toward his house. 

Hannah stared helplessly after him until he disappeared through the back 
door. The door slammed hard behind him. 

Dazed, Hannah turned and began to run home. 

She felt dizzy. The ground seemed to spin beneath her. The blue sky 
shimmered and became blindingly bright. Her house tilted and swayed. 

“Danny’s not the ghost,” Hannah said out loud. “I finally know the truth. 

Danny’s not the ghost. I am!” 

20 

Hannah stepped up to the back door, then hesitated. 

I can’t go back in now, she thought. I have to think. 

Maybe I’ll take a walk or something. 

She closed her eyes, trying to force her dizziness away. When she opened 
them, everything seemed brighter, too bright to bear. 

Stepping carefully off the back stoop, she headed toward the front, her head 
spinning. 

I’m a ghost. 

I’m not a real person anymore. 

I’m a ghost. 

Voices broke into Hannah’s confused thoughts. Someone was approaching. 

She ducked out of sight behind the big maple tree and listened. 

“It’s a perfectly lovely house.” Hannah recognized Mrs. Quilty’s voice. 

“My cousin from Detroit looked at it last week,” another woman said. 
Hannah didn’t recognize her. Peering out from behind the tree trunk, Hannah 
saw that it was a thin, haggard-looking woman wearing a yellow sundress. She 
and Mrs. Quilty were standing halfway up the drive, admiring Hannah’s house. 

Afraid she might be seen, Hannah ducked back behind the tree. 

“Did your cousin like the house?” Mrs. Quilty asked her companion. 

“Too small,” was the curt reply. 

“What a shame,” Mrs. Quilty said with a loud sigh. “I just hate having an 
empty house on the block.” 

But it’s not empty! Hannah thought angrily. I live here! My whole family 
lives here—don’t we? 

“How long has it been vacant?” the other woman asked. 

“Ever since it was rebuilt,” Hannah heard Mrs. Quilty reply. “You know. 
After that dreadful fire. I guess it was five years ago.” 

“Fire?” Mrs. Quilty’s friend asked. “That was before I moved here. Did the 
whole house burn down?” 

“Pretty much,” Mrs. Quilty told her. “It was so dreadful, Beth. Such a 
tragedy. The family trapped inside. Such a beautiful family. A young girl. Two 

little boys. They all died that night.” 

My dream! Hannah thought, gripping the tree trunk to hold herself up. It 
wasn’t a dream. It was a real fire. I really died that night. 

Tears streamed down Hannah’s face. Her legs felt weak and trembly. She 
leaned against the rough bark of the tree and listened. 

“How did it happen?” Beth, Mrs. Quilty’s friend, asked. “Do they know 
what started the fire?” 

“Yes. The kids had some kind of campfire out back. Behind the garage,” 
Mrs. Quilty continued. “When they went inside, they didn’t put it out 
completely. The house caught fire after they’d gone to sleep. It spread so 
quickly.” 

Hannah saw the two women peering thoughtfully at the house from their 
position on the driveway. They were shaking their heads. 

“The house was gutted, then completely rebuilt,” Mrs. Quilty was saying. 
“But no one ever moved in. It’s been five years. Can you imagine?” 

I’ve been dead for five years, Hannah thought, letting the tears roll down 
her cheeks. No wonder I didn’t know Danny or his friends. 

No wonder I haven’t gotten any letters from Janey. No wonder I haven’t 
heard from any of my friends. 

I’ve been dead for five years. 

Now, Hannah understood why sometimes time seemed to stand still, and 
sometimes it floated by so quickly. 

Ghosts come and go, she thought sadly. Sometimes I’m solid enough to ride 
a bike or kick a soccer ball. And sometimes I’m so flimsy, someone’s hand goes 
right through me. 

Hannah watched the two women make their way down the block until they 
disappeared from view. Clinging to the tree trunk, she made no attempt to move. 

It was all beginning to make sense to Hannah. The dreamlike summer days. 
The loneliness. The feeling that something wasn’t right. 

But what about Mom and Dad? she asked herself, pushing herself away 
from the tree. What about the twins? Do they know ? Do they know that we’re all 
ghosts? 

“Mom!” she shouted, running to the front door. “Mom!” 

She burst into the house and ran through the hall to the kitchen. “Mom! 
Mom! Where are you? Bill? Herb?” 

Silence. 

No one there. 

They were all gone. 

21 

“Where are you?” Hannah cried aloud. “Mom! Bill! Herb!” 

Were they gone forever ? 

We’re all ghosts, she thought miserably. All. 

And now they’ve left me here by myself. 

Her heart pounding, she gazed around the kitchen. 

It was bare. Empty. 

No cereal boxes on the counter where they were usually kept. No funny 
magnets on the refrigerator. No curtains on the window. No clock on the wall. 
No kitchen table. 

“Where are you?” Hannah called desperately. 

She pushed away from the counter and went running through the house. 

All empty. All bare. 

No clothing. No furniture. No lamps or posters on the wall or books in the 
bookshelves. 

Gone. Everything gone. 

They’ve left me here. A ghost. A ghost all by myself. 

“I’ve got to talk to someone,” she said aloud. “Anyone!” 

She searched desperately for a telephone until she found a red one on the 
bare kitchen wall. 

Who can I call ? Who ? 

No one. 

I’m dead. 

I’ve been dead for five years. 

She picked up the receiver and brought it to her ear. 

Silence. The phone was dead, too. 

With a hopeless cry, Hannah let the receiver fall to the floor. Her heart 
thudding, tears once again rolling down her cheeks, she flung herself down onto 
the bare floor. 

Sobbing softly to herself, she buried her head in her arms and let the 
darkness sweep over her. 

When she opened her eyes, the darkness remained. 

She pulled herself up, not sure at first where she was. Feeling shaky and 
tense, she raised her eyes to the kitchen window. Outside, the sky was blue- 
black. 

Night. 

Time floats in and out when you’re a ghost, Hannah realized. That’s why 
the summer has seemed so short and so endless at the same time. She stretched 
her arms toward the ceiling, then wandered from the kitchen. 

“Anyone home?” she called. 

She wasn’t surprised by the silence that greeted her question. 

Her family was gone. 

But where? 

As she made her way through the dark, empty hallway toward the front of 
the house, she had another premonition. Another feeling of dread. 

Something bad was going to happen. 

Now? Tonight? 

She stopped at the open front door and peered through the screen door. 
“Hey—!” Danny was on his bike, pedaling slowly down his driveway. 

Impulsively, Hannah pushed open the screen door and ran outside. “Hey— 
Danny!” 

He slowed his bike and turned to her. 

“Danny—wait!” she called, running across her yard toward him. 

“No—please!” His face filled with fright. He raised both hands as if to 
shield himself. 

“Danny—?” 

“Go away!” he screamed, his voice shrill from terror. “Please—stay 
away! ” He gripped the handlebars and began pedaling furiously away. 

Hannah jumped back, stunned and hurt. “Don’t be afraid of me!” she 
shouted after him, cupping her hands around her mouth to be heard. “Danny, 
please—don’t be afraid!” 

Leaning over the handlebars, he rode away without looking back. 

Hannah uttered a hurt cry. 

As Danny disappeared down the block, the feeling of dread swept over her. 

I know where he’s going, she thought. 

He’s meeting Alan and Fred, and they’re going to Mr. Chesney’s house. 
They’re going to get their revenge on Mr. Chesney. 

And something very bad is going to happen. 

I’m going there, too, Hannah decided. 

I have to go, too. 

She hurried to the garage to get her bike. 

Mr. Chesney had repaired his mailbox, Hannah saw. The hand-carved swan 
wings floated out from the pole, which had been returned to its erect position. 

Crouching behind the same low evergreen, Hannah watched the three boys 
across the street. They hesitated at the edge of Mr. Chesney’s yard, hidden from 
the house by the tall hedge. 

In the pale white light of the streetlamp, Hannah could see them grinning 
and joking. Then she saw Fred shove Danny toward the mailbox. 

Hannah raised her gaze beyond the hedge to Mr. Chesney’s small house. 
Orange light glowed dimly from the living room window. The porch-light was 
on. The rest of the house sat in darkness. 

Was Mr. Chesney home? Hannah couldn’t tell. 

His beat-up old Plymouth wasn’t in the driveway. 

Hannah crouched behind the evergreen. Its prickly branches bobbed in a 
light breeze. 

She watched Danny struggle to pull up the mailbox. Alan and Fred were 
standing behind him, urging him on. 

Danny gripped both jutting wings and pulled. 

Fred slapped him on the back. “Harder!” he cried. 

“What a wimp!” Alan declared, laughing. 

Hannah kept glancing nervously up to the house. The boys were so noisy. 
What made them so sure that Mr. Chesney wasn’t home? 

What made them so sure that Chesney wouldn’t keep his promise and come 
after them with his shotgun? 

Hannah shuddered. She felt a trickle of perspiration slide down her 
forehead. 

She watched Danny tug furiously at the mailbox. With a hard pull, he tilted 
it at an angle. 

Fred and Alan cheered gleefully. 

Danny began to rock the mailbox, pushing it with his shoulder, then pulling 
it back. It was coming loose, tilting farther with each push, each pull. 

Hannah heard Danny’s loud groan as he gave it a final strong push—and 

the mailbox fell onto its side on the ground. He backed away, a triumphant smile 
on his face. 

Fred and Alan cheered again and slapped him high-fives. 

Fred picked up the mailbox, hoisted it on his shoulder, and paraded back 
and forth in front of the hedge with it, as if it were an enemy flag. 

As they celebrated their triumph, Hannah again glanced over the hedge to 
the dimly lit house. 

No sign of Mr. Chesney. 

Maybe he wasn’t home. Maybe the boys would get away without getting 
caught. 

But why did Hannah still have the heavy feeling of dread weighing her 
down, chilling her body? 

She gasped as she saw a shadow slide past the corner of the house. 

Mr. Chesney? 

No. 

Squinting hard into the dim light, Hannah felt her heart begin to thud 
against her chest. 

No one there. But what was that shadow? 

She had definitely seen it, a shape darker than the long night shadows, 
slithering against the grayness of the house. 

The boys’ loud voices interrupted her thoughts, drawing her attention away 
from the house. 

Fred had tossed the mailbox into the hedge. Now they had moved toward 
the driveway. They were discussing something, arguing loudly. Alan laughed. 
Fred gave Alan a playful shove. Danny was saying something, but Hannah 
couldn’t hear his words. 

Get away, Hannah urged them in her mind. Get away from there. You pulled 
your stupid prank, had your stupid revenge. 

Now get away—before you get caught. 

The evergreen limbs bobbed silently in a gust of hot wind. Hannah stepped 
back into the darkness, her eyes on the boys. 

They were huddled together at the bottom of the driveway. They were 
talking excitedly, all three at once. Then Hannah saw a flicker of light. It glowed 
for a moment, then went out. 

It was a match, Hannah realized. 

Alan was holding a large box of kitchen matches. 

Hannah glanced nervously at the house. All was still. No Mr. Chesney. No 
shadows slithering across the wall. 

Go home. Please, go home, she silently urged the boys. 

But to her dismay, they turned and began jogging up the gravel driveway. 
They ducked low as they ran, trying not to be seen from the house. 

What are they doing? Hannah wondered, feeling all of her muscles tighten 
in dread. A shiver of fear ran down her back as she stepped out from behind the 
evergreen. 

What are they going to do? 

She made her way quickly across the street and ducked in front of the 
hedge, her heart pounding. 

She couldn’t hear them. They must be nearly up to the house by now. 

Should she follow them? 

She stood up slowly and raised herself on tiptoes to see over the hedge. 

The three boys, Alan in the lead, followed by Danny and Fred, were bent 
low, running rapidly across the front of the house. Caught in the dim orange 
glow of light from the window, Hannah could see their determined expressions. 

Where are they going? What are they planning? 

Hannah watched them run into the darkness around the side of the house. 

Still no sign of Mr. Chesney. 

Keeping close to the hedge, Hannah made her way to the driveway. Then, 
without thinking about it, without even realizing it, she was running, too. 

She stopped short as she saw Alan shoving Danny up into an open window. 
Then Fred stepped forward, lifted his hands to the window ledge, and allowed 
Alan to give him a boost. 

No — please! Hannah wanted to cry. 

Don’t go into the house! Don ’t go in there! 

But she was too late. 

All three of them had climbed into the house. 

Breathing hard, Hannah began to creep toward the window. 

But halfway there, she felt something grab her leg and hold her in place. 

22 

Hannah uttered a silent cry. 

She struggled to free her leg—and quickly realized she had stepped into a 
coiled garden hose. 

Exhaling loudly, she lifted her foot out of it and crept the rest of the way to 
the open window. 

This side of the house was covered in darkness. The window was too high 
for Hannah to see into the room. 

Standing beneath the window, Hannah could hear the boys’ sneakers 
thudding on bare floorboards. She could hear whispering voices and high- 
pitched, muffled laughter. 

What are they doing in there? she wondered, her entire body tight with fear. 

Don’t they realize how much trouble they could get into? 

Bright lights against the side of the house made Hannah jump back with a 
startled cry. 

She dropped to the ground and spun around. And saw headlights through 
the tall hedge. Car headlights floating toward the driveway. 

Mr. Chesney? 

Was he returning home? Returning home in time to catch the three intruders 
in his house? 

Hannah opened her mouth to call out a warning to the boys. But her voice 
caught in her throat. 

The headlights floated past. The darkness rolled back over the yard. 

The car rumbled silently on. 

It wasn’t Mr. Chesney, Hannah realized. 

She struggled to her feet and returned to her place below the window. She 
decided she had to let the boys know she was there. She had to get them out of 
there! 

“Danny!” she called, wrapping her hands around her mouth as a 
megaphone. “Get out! Come on—get out now!” 

The feeling of dread weighed her down. She shouted up to the window 
again. “Come out. Hurry—please!” 

She could hear their muffled voices inside. And she could hear the scrape of 

sneakers on the floor. 

Staring up at the window, she saw a light come on. Orange light, dim at 
first, then brighter. 

“Are you crazy?” she shouted in to them. “Turn off the lights!” 

Why on earth were they turning on lights? 

Did they want to get caught? 

“Turn off the lights!” she repeated in a high, shrill, frightened voice. 

But the orange light grew brighter, became a bright yellow. 

And as she stared in horror, Hannah realized the light was flickering. 

Not lamp light. 

Fire light. 

Fire! 

They had set a fire! 

“No!” she screamed, raising her hands to the sides of her face. “No! Get 
out! Get out of there!” 

She could smell smoke now. She could see the reflection of the leaping 
flames in the window glass. 

She started to shout to them again—but stopped when she saw the shadow 
move toward her on the wall of the house. 

Hannah stopped and turned her stare. 

And saw the dark figure, blacker than the night, its red eyes glowing 
brightly from the blackness of its face. 

It stepped silently toward her, floating rapidly over the tall, weed-strewn 
grass. Its red eyes appeared to light up as it neared. 

“Hannah—stay away!” the moving shadow called in a voice as dry as dead 
leaves. 

“Hannah—stay away.” 

“Nooooo!” Hannah uttered a frightened wail as it moved toward her. A 
burst of frigid air encircled her body. “Noooo!” 

“Hannah... Hannah...” 

“Who are you?” she demanded. “What do you want?” 

Behind her, she could hear the crackle of flames now. Yellow light flickered 
behind choking waves of black smoke from the open window. 

Its fiery eyes glowing brighter, the shadow figure raised itself up, hovered 
closer, closer, stretching out its arms, preparing to pull her in. 

23 

Gripped with fear, Hannah raised her hands in front of her as if trying to shield 
herself. 

She heard a sudden scrabbling at the window. A muffled cry above her 

head. 

The shadow figure vanished. 

And then she felt someone topple onto her. 

They both fell in a heap to the ground. 

“Alan!” she cried. 

He struggled to his feet, his eyes wide with panic. “The matches!” he cried. 
“The matches! We—we didn’t mean to. We—” 

Another figure came diving out of the window as the crackle of flames 
grew to a roar. Fred landed hard on his elbows and knees. 

Hannah stared at his dazed face in the darting orange light. “Fred—are you 
okay?” 

“Danny,” he muttered, gazing at her with horror. “Danny’s in there. He 
can’t get out.” 

“Huh?” Hannah leapt to her feet. 

“Danny’s trapped in the fire. He’s going to burn!” Alan cried. 

“We have to get help!” Fred said, shouting over the roar of the flames. He 
pulled Alan by the arm. The two boys took off, running unsteadily across the 
yard toward the house next door. 

Bright orange-and-yellow flames licked at the windowsill above Hannah’s 
head. 

I have to save Danny, she thought. 

She took a deep breath, gazing up at the flickering, flashing light of the fire. 
Then she started toward the open window. 

But before she could take a step, the light from the window disappeared. 
The shadow rose in front of her. 

“Hannah—go away.” Its frightening, harsh whisper was so close to her 
face. “Go away.” 

“No!” Hannah screamed, forgetting her fear. “I have to save Danny.” 
“Hannah... you will not save him!” came the raspy reply. 

The dark figure, eyes afire, hovered over her, blocking Hannah’s path to the 
window. 

“Let me go!” she screamed. “I have to save him!” 

The red eyes loomed closer. The darkness fell heavier around her. 

“Who are you?” Hannah shrieked. “What are you? What do you want?” 

The dark figure didn’t reply. The glowing eyes burned into hers. 

Danny is trapped in there, Hannah thought. I have to get in that window. 

“Move out of my way! ” she screamed. And in her desperation, she reached 
out with both hands—grabbed the dark figure by the shoulders—and tried to 
shove it out of the way. 

To Hannah’s shock, the figure felt solid. With a determined cry, she raised 
her hands to its face—and tugged. 

The darkness that cloaked its face fell away—and beneath the darkness, 
Danny’s face was revealed! 

24 

Hannah stared in horror and disbelief, struggling to breathe. The sour odor 
choked her. The darkness continued to wrap around her, holding her prisoner. 

Danny grinned back at her, with the same glowing red eyes as before he’d 
been unmasked. 

“No!” Hannah cried, her voice a hoarse whisper, tight with fear. “It isn’t 
you, Danny. It isn’t!” 

A cruel smile played over the figure’s glowing face. “I am Danny’s ghost!” 
he declared. 

“Ghost?” Hannah tried to pull back. But the darkness held her tightly. 

“I am Danny’s ghost. When he dies in the fire, I will no longer be a shadow. 
I will be BORN—and Danny will go to the shadow world in my place!” 

“No! No!” Hannah shrieked, raising her fists in front of her. “No! Danny 
will not die! I won’t let him!” 

Danny’s ghost opened its mouth and uttered a foul-smelling laugh. “You’re 
too late, Hannah!” he sneered. “Too late.” 

25 

“Nooooooo!” 

Hannah’s wail echoed in the darkness that surrounded her. 

The ghost-Danny’s red eyes flared angrily as Hannah burst right through 

him. 

A second later, she was raising her hands to the window ledge. “Oh!” The 
sill was hot from the fire. 

Using all her strength, she pulled herself up toward the darting flames—and 
into the house. A curtain of thick, sour smoke rose up to greet her. 

Ignoring the smoke and the bright wall of fire, Hannah lowered herself 
heavily onto the floor. 

I’m a ghost, she told herself, stepping into the blazing room. 

I’m a ghost. I can’t die again. 

She rubbed her eyes with the sleeve of her T-shirt, struggling to see. 
“Danny?” she called, shouting as loudly as she could. “Danny—I can’t see you! 
Where are you?” 

Shielding her eyes with one hand, Hannah took another step into the room. 
Flames shot up like bright geysers. Wallpaper on one wall had curled down, the 
blackened corner covered with leaping flames. 

“Danny—where are you?” 

She heard a muffled shout from the next room. Dashing through the flame- 
encircled doorway, she saw him—trapped behind a tall wall of flames. 
“Danny—!” 

He was backed into a corner, his hands raised together in front of him, 
shielding his face from the smoke. 

I can’t get through those thick flames, Hannah realized to her horror. 

She took another step into the room, then held back. 

No way. 

No way I can save him. 

But once again, she reminded herself: I am a ghost. I can do things that 
living people cannot do. 

“Help me! Help me!” 

Danny’s voice sounded tiny and far away behind the leaping waves of 
flame. 

Without another second’s hesitation, Hannah sucked in a deep breath, held 
it—and leapt into the flames. 

“Help me!” He stared at her, his eyes blank. He didn’t seem to see her. 
“Help!” 

“Come on!” She grabbed his hand and tugged. “Let’s go!” 

The flames bent toward them, like fiery arms reaching to grab them. 

“Come on!” 

She tugged again, but he held back. “We can’t make it!” 

“Yes—we have to!” she shouted. 

The heat burned her nostrils. She shut her eyes against the blinding yellow 
brightness. “We have to!” 

She grabbed his hand with both of hers and pulled. 

Black smoke swirled around them. Choking, she shut her eyes and pulled 
him, pulled him into the searing, blistering heat of the flames. 

Into the flames. 

Through them. 

Coughing and choking. Dripping with perspiration from the furnacelike 

heat. 

Pulled him. Pulled blindly. Pulled with all her might. 

She didn’t open her eyes until they were at the window. 

She didn’t breathe until they had tumbled to the cool darkness of the 
ground. 

Then, on her hands and knees, panting so loudly, gasping for clean air, she 
gazed up. 

There was the shadow figure near the house, twisting in flames. As the fire 
consumed it, it raised its dark arms toward the sky—and vanished without 
making a sound. 

With a relieved sigh, Hannah lowered her gaze to Danny. 

He was lying sprawled on his back, a dazed expression on his face. 
“Hannah,” he whispered hoarsely. “Hannah, thanks.” 

She felt a smile start to cross her face. 

Everything turned bright, as bright as the wall of flames. 

Then everything went black. 

26 

Danny’s mother leaned over him, pulling the light blanket up to his chest. “How 
are you feeling?” she asked softly. 

It was two hours later. Danny had been treated by the paramedics who 
arrived shortly after the firefighters. They told his worried mother that he was 
suffering from smoke inhalation and had a few minor burns. 

After treating the burns, they drove Danny and Mrs. Anderson home in an 
ambulance. 

Now Danny lay in bed, staring up at her, still feeling groggy and dazed. 
Mrs. Quilty stood anxiously in the corner, her arms clasped tensely in front of 
her, looking on in silence. She had hurried over to see what the commotion was. 

“I—I’m okay, I guess,” Danny said, pulling himself up a bit on the pillow. 
“I’m just a little tired.” 

His mother pushed a lock of blond hair off her forehead as she stared down 
at him, reading his lips. “How did you ever get out? How did you get out of the 
house?” 

“It was Hannah,” Danny told her. “Hannah pulled me out.” 

“Who?” Mrs. Anderson knotted her face in confusion. “Who is Hannah?” 

“You know,” Danny replied impatiently. “The girl next door.” 

“There’s no girl next door,” his mother said. “Is there, Molly?” She turned 
to read Mrs. Quilty’s lips. 

Mrs. Quilty shook her head. “The house is empty.” 

Danny sat up straight. “Her name is Hannah Fairchild. She saved my life, 
Mom.” 

Mrs. Quilty tsk-tsked sympathetically. “Hannah Fairchild is the girl who 
died five years ago,” she said quietly. “Poor Danny is a bit delirious, I’m afraid.” 

“Just lie back,” Danny’s mother said, gently pushing him back onto the 
pillow. “Get some rest. You’ll be fine.” 

“But where is Hannah? Hannah is my friend!” Danny insisted. 

Hannah watched the scene from the doorway. 

The three people in the room couldn’t see her, she realized. 

She had saved Danny’s life, and now the room and the people in it were 
growing faint, fading to gray. 

Maybe that’s why my family and I came back after five years, Hannah 
thought. Maybe we came back to save Danny from dying in a fire as we did. 

“Hannah... Hannah...” A voice called to her. A sweet, familiar voice from 
far away. 

“Is that you, Mom?” Hannah called. 

“Time to come back,” Mrs. Fairchild whispered. “You must leave now, 
Hannah. It’s time to come back.” 

“Okay, Mom.” 

She gazed into the bedroom at Danny, lying peacefully on his pillow. He 
was fading away now, fading to gray. 

Hannah squinted into the solid grayness. The house, she knew, was fading. 
The earth was fading from her sight. 

“Come back, Hannah,” her mother whispered. “Come back to us now.” 

Hannah could feel herself floating now. And as she floated, she gazed down 
—her last look at earth. 

“I can see him, Mom,” she said excitedly, brushing the tears off her cheeks. 
“I can see Danny. In his room. But the light is getting faint. So faint.” 

“Hannah, come back. Come back to us,” her mother whispered, calling her 
home. 

“Danny—remember me!” Hannah cried, as Danny’s face appeared clearly 
in the misty gray. Could he hear her? Could he hear her calling to him? She 
hoped so. 


THE HAUNTED MASK 

1 

“What are you going to be for Halloween?” Sabrina Mason asked. She moved 
her fork around in the bright yellow macaroni on her lunch tray, but didn’t take a 
bite. 

Carly Beth Caldwell sighed and shook her head. The overhead light on the 
lunchroom ceiling made her straight brown hair gleam. “I don’t know. A witch, 
maybe.” 

Sabrina’s mouth dropped open. “You? A witch?” 

“Well, why not?” Carly Beth demanded, staring across the long table at her 
friend. 

“I thought you were afraid of witches,” Sabrina replied. She raised a forkful 
of macaroni to her mouth and started to chew. “This macaroni is made of 
rubber,” she complained, chewing hard. “Remind me to start packing a lunch.” 

“I am not afraid of witches!” Carly Beth insisted, her dark eyes flashing 
angrily. “You just think I’m a big scaredy-cat, don’t you?” 

Sabrina giggled. “Yes.” She flipped her black ponytail behind her shoulders 
with a quick toss of her head. “Hey, don’t eat the macaroni. Really, Carly Beth. 
It’s gross.” She reached across the table to keep Carly Beth from raising her fork. 

“But I’m starving !” Carly Beth complained. 

The lunchroom grew crowded and noisy. At the next table, a group of fifth- 
grade boys were tossing a half-full milk carton back and forth. Carly Beth saw 
Chuck Greene ball up a bright red fruit rollup and shove the whole sticky thing 
in his mouth. 

“Yuck!” She made a disgusted face at him. Then she turned back to 
Sabrina. “I am not a scaredy-cat, Sabrina. Just because everyone picks on me 
and—” 

“Carly Beth, what about last week? Remember? At my house?” Sabrina 
ripped open a bag of tortilla chips and offered some across the table to her 
friend. 

“You mean the ghost thing?” Carly Beth replied, frowning. “That was really 
stupid.” 

“But you believed it,” Sabrina said with a mouthful of chips. “You really 
believed my attic was haunted. You should have seen the look on your face when 

the ceiling started to creak, and we heard the footsteps up there.” 

“That was so mean,” Carly Beth complained, rolling her eyes. 

“Then when you heard footsteps coming down the stairs, your face went all 
white and you screamed,” Sabrina recalled. “It was only Chuck and Steve.” 

“You know I’m afraid of ghosts,” Carly Beth said, blushing. 

“And snakes and bugs and loud noises and dark rooms and—and witches!” 
Sabrina declared. 

“I don’t see why you have to make fun of me,” Carly Beth pouted. She 
shoved her lunch tray away. “I don’t see why everyone always thinks it’s so 
much fun to try to scare me. Even you, my best friend.” 

“I’m sorry,” Sabrina said sincerely. She reached across the table and 
squeezed Carly Beth’s wrist reassuringly. “You’re just so easy to scare. It’s hard 
to resist. Here. Want some more chips?” She shoved the bag toward Carly Beth. 

“Maybe I’ll scare you some day,” Carly Beth threatened. 

Her friend laughed. “No way!” 

Carly Beth continued to pout. She was eleven. But she was tiny. And with 
her round face and short stub of a nose (which she hated and wished would grow 
longer), she looked much younger. 

Sabrina, on the other hand, was tall, dark, and sophisticated-looking. She 
had straight black hair tied behind her head in a ponytail, and enormous, dark 
eyes. Everyone who saw them together assumed that Sabrina was twelve or 
thirteen. But, actually, Carly Beth was a month older than her friend. 

“Maybe I won’t be a witch,” Carly Beth said thoughtfully, resting her chin 
on her hands. “Maybe I’ll be a disgusting monster with hanging eyeballs and 
green slime dripping down my face and—” 

A loud crash made Carly Beth scream. 

It took her a few seconds to realize that it was just a lunch tray hitting the 
floor. She turned to see Gabe Moser, his face bright red, drop to his knees and 
start scooping his lunch off the floor. The lunchroom rang out with cheers and 
applause. 

Carly Beth hunched down in her seat, embarrassed that she had screamed. 

Her breathing had just returned to normal when a strong hand grabbed her 
shoulder from behind. 

Carly Beth’s shriek echoed through the room. 

2 

She heard laughter. At another table, someone yelled, “Way to go, Steve!” 

She whipped her head around to see her friend Steve Boswell standing 
behind her, a mischievous grin on his face. “Gotcha,” he said, letting go of her 
shoulder. 

Steve pulled out the chair next to Carly Beth’s and lowered himself over its 
back. His best friend, Chuck Greene, slammed his bookbag onto the table and 
then sat down next to Sabrina. 

Steve and Chuck looked so much alike, they could have been brothers. Both 
were tall and thin, with straight brown hair, which they usually hid under 
baseball caps. Both had dark brown eyes and goofy grins. Both wore faded blue 
jeans and dark-colored, long-sleeved T-shirts. 

And both of them loved to scare Carly Beth. They loved to startle her, to 
make her jump and shriek. 

They spent hours dreaming up new ways to frighten her. 

She vowed every time that she would never— never —fall for one of their 
stupid tricks again. 

But so far, they had won every time. 

Carly Beth always threatened to pay them back. But in all the time they’d 
been friends, she hadn’t been able to think of anything good enough. 

Chuck reached for the few remaining chips in Sabrina’s bag. She playfully 
slapped his hand away. “Get your own.” 

Steve held a crinkled hunk of aluminum foil under Carly Beth’s nose. 
“Want a sandwich? I don’t want it.” 

Carly Beth sniffed it suspiciously. “What kind is it? I’m starving !” 

“It’s a turkey sandwich. Here,” Steve said, handing it to Carly Beth. “It’s 
too dry. My mom forgot the mayo. You want it?” 

“Yeah, sure. Thanks!” Carly Beth exclaimed. She took the sandwich from 
him and peeled back the aluminum foil. Then she took a big bite of the 
sandwich. 

As she started to chew, she realized that both Steve and Chuck were staring 
at her with big grins on their faces. 

Something tasted funny. Kind of sticky and sour. 

Carly Beth stopped chewing. 

Chuck and Steve were laughing now. Sabrina looked confused. 

Carly Beth uttered a disgusted groan and spit the chewed-up sandwich hunk 
into a napkin. Then she pulled the bread apart—and saw a big brown worm 
resting on top of the turkey. 

“Ohh!” With a moan, she covered her face with her hands. 

The room erupted with laughter. Cruel laughter. 

“I ate a worm. I-I’m going to be sick!” Carly Beth groaned. She jumped to 
her feet and stared angrily at Steve. “How could you?” she demanded. “It isn’t 
funny. It’s—it’s—” 

“It isn’t a real worm,” Chuck said. Steve was laughing too hard to talk. 

“Huh?” Carly Beth gazed down at it and felt a wave of nausea rise up from 
her stomach. 

“It isn’t real. It’s rubber. Pick it up,” Chuck urged. 

Carly Beth hesitated. 

Kids all through the vast room were whispering and pointing at her. And 
laughing. 

“Go ahead. It isn’t real. Pick it up,” Chuck said, grinning. 

Carly Beth reached down with two fingers and reluctantly picked the brown 
worm from the sandwich. It felt warm and sticky. 

“Gotcha again!” Chuck said with a laugh. 

It was real! A real worm! 

With a horrified cry, Carly Beth tossed the worm at Chuck, who was 
laughing wildly. Then she leapt away from the table, knocking the chair over. As 
the chair clattered noisily against the hard floor, Carly Beth covered her mouth 
and ran gagging from the lunchroom. 

I can still taste it! she thought. 

I can still taste the worm in my mouth! 

I’ll pay them back for this, Carly Beth thought bitterly as she ran. 

I’ll pay them back. I really will. 

As she pushed through the double doors and hurtled toward the girls’ room, 
the cruel laughter followed her across the hall. 

3 

After school, Carly Beth hurried through the halls without talking to anyone. She 
heard kids laughing and whispering. She knew they were laughing at her. 

Word had spread all over school that Carly Beth Caldwell had eaten a worm 
at lunch. 

Carly Beth, the scaredy-cat. Carly Beth, who was frightened of her own 
shadow. Carly Beth, who was so easy to trick. 

Chuck and Steve had sneaked a real worm, a fat brown worm, into a 
sandwich. And Carly Beth had taken a big bite. 

What a jerk! 

Carly Beth ran all the way home, three long blocks. Her anger grew with 
every step. 

How could they do that to me? They’re supposed to be my friends! 

Why do they think it’s so funny to scare me? 

She burst into the house, breathing hard. “Anybody home?” she called, 
stopping in the hallway and leaning against the banister to catch her breath. 

Her mother hurried out from the kitchen. “Carly Beth! Hi! What’s wrong?” 

“I ran all the way,” Carly Beth told her, pulling off her blue windbreaker. 

“Why?” Mrs. Caldwell asked. 

“Just felt like it,” Carly Beth replied moodily. 

Her mother took Carly Beth’s windbreaker and hung it in the front closet 
for her. Then she brushed a hand affectionately through Carly Beth’s soft brown 
hair. “Where’d you get the straight hair?” she muttered. Her mother was always 
saying that. 

We don’t look like mother and daughter at all, Carly Beth realized. Her 
mother was a tall, chubby woman with thick curls of coppery hair, and lively 
gray-green eyes. She was extremely energetic, seldom stood still, and talked as 
rapidly as she moved. 

Today she was wearing a paint-stained gray sweatshirt over black Lycra 
tights. “Why so grumpy?” Mrs. Caldwell asked. “Anything you’d care to talk 
about?” 

Carly Beth shook her head. “Not really.” She didn’t feel like telling her 
mother that she had become the laughingstock of Walnut Avenue Middle School. 

“Come here. I have something to show you,” 

Mrs. Caldwell said, tugging Carly Beth toward the living room. 

“I—I’m really not in the mood, Mom,” Carly Beth told her, hanging back. 
“I just—” 

“Come on!” her mother insisted, and pulled her across the hallway. Carly 
Beth always found it impossible to argue with her mother. She was like a 
hurricane, sweeping everything in her direction. 

“Look!” Mrs. Caldwell declared, grinning and gesturing to the mantelpiece. 

Carly Beth followed her mother’s gaze to the mantel—and cried out in 
surprise. “It’s—a head!” 

“Not just any head,” Mrs. Caldwell said, beaming. “Go on. Take a closer 
look.” 

Carly Beth took a few steps toward the mantelpiece, her eyes on the head 
staring back at her. It took her a few moments to recognize the straight, brown 
hair, the brown eyes, the short snip of a nose, the round cheeks. “It’s me!” she 
cried, walking up to it. 

“Yes. Life size!” Mrs. Caldwell declared. “I just came from my art class at 
the museum. I finished it today. What do you think?” 

Carly Beth picked it up and studied it closely. “It looks just like me, Mom. 
Really. What’s it made of?” 

“Plaster of Paris,” her mother replied, taking it from Carly Beth and holding 
it up so that Carly Beth was face to face, eye to eye with herself. “You have to be 
careful. It’s delicate. It’s hollow, see?” 

Carly Beth stared intently at the head, peering into her own eyes. “It—it’s 
kind of creepy,” she muttered. 

“You mean because I did such a good job?” her mother demanded. 

“It’s just creepy, that’s all,” Carly Beth said. She forced herself to look 
away from the replica of herself, and saw that her mother’s smile had faded. 

Mrs. Caldwell looked hurt. “Don’t you like it?” 

“Yeah. Sure. It’s really good, Mom,” Carly Beth answered quickly. “But, I 
mean, why on earth did you make it?” 

“Because I love you,” Mrs. Caldwell replied curtly. “Why else? Honestly, 
Carly Beth, you have the strangest reactions to things. I worked really hard on 
this sculpture. I thought—” 

“I’m sorry, Mom. I like it. Really, I do,” Carly Beth insisted. “It was just a 
surprise, that’s all. It’s great. It looks just like me. I—I had a bad day, that’s all.” 

Carly Beth took another long look at the sculpture. Its brown eyes —her 
brown eyes—stared back at her. The brown hair shimmered in the afternoon 
sunlight through the window. 

It smiled at me! Carly Beth thought, her mouth dropping open. I saw it! I 
just saw it smile! 

No. It had to be a trick of the light. 

It was a plaster of Paris head, she reminded herself. 

Don’t go scaring yourself over nothing, Carly Beth. Haven’t you made a 
big enough fool of yourself today? 

“Thanks for showing it to me, Mom,” she said awkwardly, pulling her eyes 
away. She forced a smile. “Two heads are better than one, right?” 

“Right,” Mrs. Caldwell agreed brightly. “Incidentally, Carly Beth, your 
duck costume is all ready. I put it on your bed.” 

“Huh? Duck costume?” 

“You saw a duck costume at the mall, remember?” Mrs. Caldwell carefully 
placed the sculpted head on the mantel. “The one with all the feathers and 
everything. You thought it would be funny to be a duck this Halloween? So I 
made you a duck costume.” 

“Oh. Right,” Carly Beth said, her mind spinning. Do I really want to be a 
stupid duck this Halloween? she thought. “I’ll go up and take a look at it, Mom. 
Thanks.” 

Carly Beth had forgotten all about the duck costume. I don’t want to be cute 
this Halloween, she thought as she climbed the stairs to her room. I want to be 
scary. 

She had seen some really scary-looking masks in the window of a new 
party store that had opened a few blocks from school. One of them, she knew, 
would be perfect. 

But now she’d have to walk around in feathers and have everyone quack at 
her and make fun of her. 

It wasn’t fair. Why did her mother have to listen to every word she said? 

Just because Carly Beth had admired a duck costume in a store didn’t mean 
she wanted to be a stupid duck for Halloween! 

Carly Beth hesitated outside her bedroom. The door had been pulled closed 
for some reason. She never closed the door. 

She listened carefully. She thought she heard someone breathing on the 
other side of the door. Someone or something. 

The breathing grew louder. 

Carly Beth pressed an ear to the door. 

What was in her room? 

There was only one way to find out. 

Carly Beth pulled open the door—and uttered a startled cry. 

4 

“QUAAAAAAACCCK! ” 

With a hideous cry, an enormous white-feathered duck, its eyes wild and 
frenzied, leapt at Carly Beth. 

As she staggered backwards in astonishment, the duck knocked her over 
and pinned her to the hallway floor. 

“QUAAACCCK! QUAAAACK!” 

The costume has come alive! 

That was Carly Beth’s first frightened thought. 

Then she quickly realized the truth. “Noah—get off me!” she demanded, 
trying to push the big duck off her chest. 

The white feathers brushed against her nose. “Hey—that tickles!” 

She sneezed. 

“Noah—come on!” 

“QUAAAAACCCK! ” 

“Noah, I mean it!” she told her eight-year-old brother. “What are you doing 
in my costume? It’s supposed to be my costume.” 

“I was just trying it on,” Noah said, his blue eyes staring down at her 
through the white-and-yellow duck mask. “Did I scare you?” 

“Not a bit,” Carly Beth lied. “Now get up! You’re heavy!” 

He refused to budge. 

“Why do you always want everything that’s mine?” Carly Beth demanded 
angrily. 

“I don’t,” he replied. 

“And why do you think it’s so funny to try to scare me all the time?” she 
asked. 

“I can’t help it if you get scared every time I say boo,” he replied nastily. 

“Get up! Get up!” 

He quacked a few more times, flapping the feathery wings. Then he 
climbed to his feet. “Can I have this costume? It’s really neat.” 

Carly Beth frowned and shook her head. “You got feathers all over me. 
You’re molting!” 

“Molting? What’s that mean?” Noah demanded. He pulled off the mask. 
His blond hair was damp from sweat and matted against his head. 

“It means you’re going to be a bald duck!” Carly Beth told him. 

“I don’t care. Can I have this costume?” Noah asked, examining the mask. 
“It fits me. Really!” 

“I don’t know,” Carly Beth told him. “Maybe.” 

The phone rang in her room. “Get lost, okay? Go fly south for the winter or 
something,” she said, and hurried to answer the phone. 

As she ran to her desk, she saw white feathers all over her bed. That 
costume will never survive till Halloween! she thought. 

She picked up the receiver. “Hello? Oh, hi, Sabrina. Yeah. I’m okay.” 

Sabrina had called to remind Carly Beth that the school Science Fair was 
tomorrow. They had to finish their project, a model of the solar system 
constructed with Ping-Pong balls. 

“Come over after dinner,” Carly Beth told her. “It’s almost finished. We just 
have to paint it. My mom said she’d help us take it to school tomorrow.” 

They chatted for a while. Then Carly Beth confided, “I was so mad, 
Sabrina. At lunch today. Why do Chuck and Steve think it’s so funny to do 
things like that to me?” 

Sabrina was silent for a moment. “I guess it’s because you’re so scare-able, 
Carly Beth.” 

“Scare-able?” 

“You scream so easily,” Sabrina said. “Other people get scared. But they’re 
more quiet about it. You know Chuck and Steve. They don’t really mean to be 
mean. They just think it’s funny.” 

“Well, I don’t think it’s funny at all,” Carly Beth replied unhappily. “And 
I’m not going to be scare-able anymore. I mean it. I’m not ever going to scream 
or get frightened again.” 

The science projects were all set up for judging on the stage in the 
auditorium. Mrs. Armbruster, the principal, and Mr. Smythe, the science teacher, 
walked from display to display, making notes on their clipboards. 

The solar system, as designed by Carly Beth and Sabrina, had survived the 
trip to school in pretty good shape. Pluto had a slight dent in it, which the girls 
had struggled unsuccessfully to straighten out. And Earth kept coming loose 
from its string and bouncing across the floor. But both girls agreed the display 

looked pretty good. 

Maybe it wasn’t as impressive as Martin Goodman’s project. Martin had 
built a computer from scratch. But Martin was a genius. And Carly Beth figured 
the judges didn’t expect everyone else to be geniuses, too. 

Looking around the crowded, noisy stage, Carly Beth saw other interesting 
projects. Mary Sue Chong had built some kind of electronic robot arm that could 
pick up a cup or wave to people. And Brian Baldwin had several glass bottles 
filled with brown gunky stuff that he claimed was toxic waste. 

Someone had done a chemical analysis of the town’s drinking water. And 
someone had built a volcano that would erupt when the two judges came by. 

“Our project is kind of boring,” Sabrina whispered nervously to Carly Beth, 
her eyes on the two judges who were oohing and aahing over Martin Goodman’s 
homemade computer. “I mean, it’s just painted Ping-Pong balls on strings.” 

“I like our project,” Carly Beth insisted. “We worked hard on it, Sabrina.” 

“I know,” Sabrina replied fretfully. “But it’s still kind of boring.” 

The volcano erupted, sending up a gusher of red liquid. The judges 
appeared impressed. Several kids cheered. 

“Uh-oh. Here they come,” Carly Beth whispered, jamming her hands into 
her jeans pockets. Mrs. Armbruster and Mr. Smythe, smiles plastered across 
their faces, were coming closer. 

They stopped to examine a display of light and crystals. 

Suddenly, Carly Beth heard an excited shout from somewhere behind her 
on the stage. “My tarantula! Hey—my tarantula got out!” 

She recognized Steve’s voice. 

“Where’s my tarantula?” he called. 

Several kids uttered startled cries. Some kids laughed. 

I’m not going to get scared, Carly Beth told herself, swallowing hard. 

She knew she was terrified of tarantulas. But this time she was determined 
not to show it. 

“My tarantula—it got away!” Steve shouted over the roar of excited voices. 

I’m not going to get scared. I’m not going to get scared, Carly Beth 
repeated to herself. 

But then she felt something pinch the back of her leg and dig its spiny 
pincer into her skin—and Carly Beth uttered a shrill scream of terror that rang 
out through the auditorium. 

5 

Carly Beth screamed and knocked over the solar system. 

She kicked her leg wildly, trying to toss off the tarantula. Ping-Pong ball 
planets bounced over the floor. 

She screamed again. “Get it off me! Get it off!” 

“Carly Beth—stop!” Sabrina pleaded. “You’re okay! You’re okay!” 

It took Carly Beth a long while to realize that everyone was laughing. Her 
heart pounding, she spun around to find Steve down on his hands and knees 
behind her. 

He made a pinching motion with his thumb and finger. “Gotcha again,” he 
said, grinning up at her. 

“Noooo!” Carly Beth cried. 

There was no tarantula, she realized. Steve had pinched her leg. 

She raised her head and saw that kids all over the stage were laughing. Mrs. 
Armbruster and Mr. Smythe were laughing, too. 

With a cry of anger, Carly Beth tried to kick Steve in the side. But he spun 
away. She missed. 

“Help me pick up the planets,” she heard Sabrina say. 

But Sabrina seemed far, far away. 

All Carly Beth could hear was the pounding of her heart and the laughter of 
the kids all around her. Steve had climbed to his feet. He and Chuck were side by 
side, grinning at her, slapping each other high-fives. 

“Carly Beth—help me,” Sabrina pleaded. 

But Carly Beth spun away, jumped off the stage, and ran, escaping up the 
dark auditorium aisle. 

I’m going to pay Steve and Chuck back, she vowed angrily, her sneakers 
thudding loudly up the concrete aisle. I’m going to scare them, REALLY scare 
them! 

But how? 

6 

“Okay. What time should I meet you?” Carly Beth asked, cradling the phone 
between her chin and shoulder. 

On the other end of the line, Sabrina considered for a moment. “How about 
seven-thirty?” 

It was Halloween. The plan was to meet at Sabrina’s house, then go trick- 
or-treating through the entire neighborhood. 

“The earlier the better. We’ll get more candy,” Sabrina said. “Did Steve call 
you?” 

“Yeah. He called,” Carly Beth replied bitterly. 

“Did he apologize?” 

“Yeah, he apologized,” Carly Beth muttered, rolling her eyes. “Big deal. I 
mean, he already made me look like a jerk in front of the entire school. What 
good is an apology?” 

“I think he felt bad,” Sabrina replied. 

“I hope he felt bad!” Carly Beth exclaimed. “It was so mean!” 

“It was a dirty trick,” Sabrina agreed. And then she added, “But you’ll have 
to admit it was kind of funny.” 

“I don’t have to admit anything!” Carly Beth snapped. 

“Has it stopped raining?” Sabrina asked, changing the subject. 

Carly Beth pulled back the curtain to glance out her bedroom window. The 
evening sky was charcoal-gray. Dark clouds hovered low. But the rain had 
stopped. The street glistened wetly under the light of a streetlamp. 

“No rain. I’ve got to go. See you at seven-thirty,” Carly Beth said, speaking 
rapidly. 

“Hey, wait. What’s your costume?” Sabrina demanded. 

“It’s a surprise,” Carly Beth told her, and hung up. 

It’ll be a surprise to me, too, she told herself, glancing unhappily at the 
feathery duck costume, rolled up on the chair in the corner. 

Carly Beth’s plan had been to go to the new party store after school and 
pick out the ugliest, most disgusting, scariest mask they had. But her mother had 
picked her up after school and insisted that she stay home and watch Noah for a 
couple of hours. 

Mrs. Caldwell hadn’t returned home until five-fifteen. Now it was nearly a 
quarter till six. There was no way the party store would still be open, Carly Beth 
thought, frowning at the duck costume. 

“Quack quack,” she said miserably. 

She walked to the mirror and ran a hairbrush through her hair. Maybe it’s 
worth a try, she thought. Maybe that store stays open late on Halloween. 

She pulled open her top dresser drawer and took out her wallet. Did she 
have enough money for a good, scary mask? 

Thirty dollars. Her life savings. 

She wadded up the bills and stuffed them back into the wallet. Then, 
jamming the wallet into her jeans pocket, she grabbed her coat and hurried 
downstairs and out the front door. 

The evening air was cold and damp. Carly Beth struggled to zip her coat as 
she jogged toward the party store. The house next door had a glowing jack-o’- 
lantern in the front window. The house on the corner had paper skeletons strung 
up across the front porch. 

The wind howled through the bare trees. The branches above her head 
shook and rattled like bony arms. 

What a creepy night, Carly Beth thought. 

She started running a little faster. A car rolled silently by, sending harsh 
white light floating across the sidewalk like a bright ghost. 

Glancing across the street, Carly Beth saw the old Carpenter mansion 
looming over its dark, weed-choked lawn. Everyone said the ramshackle old 
house was haunted by people who had been murdered inside it a hundred years 
ago. 

Once, Carly Beth had heard frightening howls coming from the old 
mansion. When she was Noah’s age, Steve and Chuck and some other kids had 
dared each other to go up to the house and knock on the door. Carly Beth had run 
home instead. She never did find out if the other kids were brave enough to do it. 

Now Carly Beth felt a chill of fear as she hurried past the old house. She 
knew this neighborhood really well. She had lived in it her entire life. But 
tonight it looked different to her. 

Was it just the wet glow left by the rain? 

No. It was a heavy feeling in the air. A heavier darkness. The eerie orange 
glow of grinning pumpkins in windows. The silent cries of ghouls and monsters 

waiting to float free on their night to celebrate. Halloween. 

Trying to force all the scary thoughts from her mind, Carly Beth turned the 
corner. The little party store came into view. The window was lighted, revealing 
two rows of Halloween masks, staring out at the street. 

But was the store still open? 

Crossing her fingers, Carly Beth waited for a truck to rumble past, then 
eagerly jogged across the street. She stopped for a second to examine the masks 
in the window. There were gorilla masks, monster masks, some sort of blue¬ 
haired alien mask. 

Pretty good, she thought. These are pretty ugly. But they probably have 
even scarier ones inside. 

The lights were on in the store. She peered through the glass door. Then she 
tried turning the knob. 

It didn’t move. 

She tried again. She tried pulling the door open. Then she tried pushing. 

No. No way. 

She was too late. The store was closed. 

7 

Carly Beth sighed and peered in through the glass. The walls of the tiny store 
were covered with masks. The masks seemed to stare back at her. 

They’re laughing at me, she thought unhappily. Laughing at me because 
I’m too late. Because the store is closed, and I’m going to have to be a stupid 
duck for Halloween. 

Suddenly, a dark shadow moved over the glass, blocking Carly Beth’s view. 
She gasped and took a step back. 

It took her a moment to realize that the shadow was a man. A man in a 
black suit, staring out at her, a look of surprise on his face. 

“Are you—are you closed?” Carly Beth shouted through the glass. 

The man gestured that he couldn’t hear her. He turned the lock and pulled 
the door open an inch. “Can I help you?” he asked curtly. He had shiny black 
hair, parted in the middle and slicked down on his head, and a pencil-thin black 
mustache. 

“Are you open?” Carly Beth asked timidly. “I need a Halloween mask.” 

“It’s very late,” the man replied, not answering her question. He pulled the 
door open another few inches. “We normally close at five.” 

“I really would like to buy a mask,” Carly Beth told him in her most 
determined voice. 

The man’s tiny, black eyes peered into hers. His expression remained blank. 
“Come in,” he said quietly. 

As Carly Beth stepped past him into the store, she saw that he wore a black 
cape. It must be a Halloween costume, she told herself. I’m sure he doesn’t wear 
that all the time. 

She turned her attention to the masks on the two walls. 

“What kind of mask are you looking for?” the man asked, closing the door 
behind him. 

Carly Beth felt a stab of fear. His black eyes glowed like two burning coals. 
He seemed so strange. And here she was, locked in this closed store with him. 

“A s-scary one,” she stammered. 

He rubbed his chin thoughtfully. He pointed to the wall. “The gorilla mask 
has been very popular. It has real hair. I believe I may have one left in stock.” 

Carly Beth stared up at the gorilla mask. She didn’t really want to be a 
gorilla. It was too ordinary. It wasn’t scary enough. “Hmmm... do you have 
anything scarier?” she asked. 

He flipped his cape back over the shoulder of his black suit. “How about 
that yellowish one with the pointy ears?” he suggested, pointing. “I believe it’s 
some sort of Star Trek character. I still have a few of them, I believe.” 

“No.” Carly Beth shook her head. “I need something really scary.” 

A strange smile formed under the man’s thin mustache. His eyes burned 
into hers, as if trying to read her thoughts. “Look around,” he said, with a sweep 
of his hand. “Everything I have left in stock is up on the walls.” 

Carly Beth turned her gaze to the masks. A pig mask with long, ugly tusks 
and blood trickling from the snout caught her eye. Pretty good, she thought. But 
not quite right. 

A hairy werewolf mask with white, pointy fangs was hung beside it. Again, 
too ordinary, Carly Beth decided. 

Her eyes glanced over a green Frankenstein mask, a Freddy Krueger mask 
that came with Freddy’s hand—complete with long, silvery blades for fingers— 
and an E.T. mask. 

Just not scary enough, Carly Beth thought, starting to feel a little desperate. 
I need something that will really make Steve and Chuck die of fright! 

“Young lady, I am afraid I must ask you to make your choice,” the man in 
the cape said softly. He had moved behind the narrow counter at the front and 
was turning a key in the cash register. “We really are closed, after all.” 

“I’m sorry,” Carly Beth started. “It’s just that—” 

The phone rang before she could finish explaining. 

The man picked it up quickly and began talking in a low voice, turning his 
back to Carly Beth. 

She wandered toward the back of the store, studying the masks as she 
walked. She passed a black cat mask with long, ugly yellow fangs. A vampire 
mask with bright red blood trickling down its lips was hung next to a grinning, 
bald mask of Uncle Fester from The Addams Family. 

Not right, not right, not right, Carly Beth thought, frowning. 

She hesitated when she spotted a narrow door slightly opened at the back of 
the store. Was there another room? Were there more masks back there? 

She glanced to the front. The man, hidden behind his cape, still had his 
back to her as he talked on the phone. 

Carly Beth gave the door a hesitant push to peek inside. The door creaked 
open. Pale orange light washed over the small, shadowy back room. 

Carly Beth stepped inside—and gasped in amazement. 

8 

Two dozen empty eye sockets stared blindly at Carly Beth. 

She gaped in horror at the distorted, deformed faces. 

They were masks, she realized. Two shelves of masks. But the masks were 
so ugly, so grotesque—so real —they made her breath catch in her throat. 

Carly Beth gripped the doorframe, reluctant to enter the tiny back room. 
Staring into the dim orange light, she studied the hideous masks. 

One mask had long, stringy yellow hair falling over its bulging, green 
forehead. A hairy black rat’s head poked up from a knot in the hair, the rat’s eyes 
gleaming like two dark jewels. 

The mask beside it had a large nail stuck through an eyehole. Thick, wet¬ 
looking blood poured from the eye, down the cheek. 

Chunks of rotting skin appeared to be falling off another mask, revealing 
gray bone underneath. An enormous black insect, some kind of grotesque beetle, 
poked out from between the green-and-yellow decayed teeth. 

Carly Beth’s horror mixed with excitement. She took a step into the room. 
The wooden floorboards creaked noisily beneath her. 

She took another step closer to the grotesque, grinning masks. They seemed 
so real, so horribly real. The faces had such detail. The skin appeared to be made 
of flesh, not rubber or plastic. 

These are perfect! she thought, her heart pounding. These are just what I 
was looking for. They look terrifying just propped up on these shelves! 

She imagined Steve and Chuck seeing one of these masks coming at them 
in the dark of night. She pictured herself uttering a bloodcurdling scream and 
leaping out from behind a tree in one of them. 

She imagined the horrified expressions on the boys’ faces. She pictured 
Steve and Chuck shrieking in terror and running for their lives. 

Perfect. Perfect! 

What a laugh that would be. What a victory! 

Carly Beth took a deep breath and stepped up to the shelves. Her eyes 
settled on an ugly mask on the lower shelf. 

It had a bulging, bald head. Its skin was a putrid yellow-green. Its 
enormous, sunken eyes were an eerie orange and seemed to glow. It had a broad, 

flat nose, smashed in like a skeleton’s nose. The dark-lipped mouth gaped wide, 
revealing jagged animal fangs. 

Staring hard at the hideous mask, Carly Beth reached out a hand toward it. 
Reluctantly, she touched the broad forehead. 

And as she touched it, the mask cried out. 

9 

“Ohh!” 

Carly Beth shrieked and jerked back her hand. 

The mask grinned at her. Its orange eyes glowed brightly. The lips appeared 
to curl back over the fangs. 

She suddenly felt dizzy. What is going on here? 

As she staggered back, away from the shelves, she realized that the angry 
cry hadn’t come from the mask. 

It had come from behind her. 

Carly Beth spun around to see the black-caped store owner glaring at her 
from the doorway. His dark eyes flashed. His mouth was turned down into a 
menacing frown. 

“Oh. I thought—” Carly Beth started, glancing back at the mask. She still 
felt confused. Her heart pounded loudly in her chest. 

“I am sorry you saw these,” the man said in a low, threatening voice. He 
took a step toward her, his cape brushing the doorway. 

What is he going to do? Carly Beth wondered, uttering a horrified gasp. 
Why is he coming at me like that? 

What is he going to do to me? 

“I am so sorry,” he repeated, his small, dark eyes burning into hers. He took 
another step closer. 

Carly Beth backed away from him. Then she uttered a startled cry as she 
backed into the display shelves. 

The hideous masks jiggled and quaked, as if alive. 

“What—what do you mean?” she managed to choke out. “I—I was just—” 

“I am sorry you saw these because they are not for sale,” the man said 
softly. 

He stepped past her and straightened one of the masks on its stand. 

Carly Beth breathed a loud sigh of relief. He didn’t mean to scare me, she 
told herself. I am scaring myself. 

She crossed her arms in front of her coat and tried to force her heartbeat to 
return to normal. She stepped to the side as the store owner continued to arrange 
the masks, handling them carefully, brushing their hair with one hand, tenderly 

dusting off their bulging, blood-covered foreheads. 

“Not for sale? Why not?” Carly Beth demanded. Her voice came out tiny 
and shrill. 

“Too scary,” the man replied. He turned to smile at her. 

“But I want a really scary one,” Carly Beth told him. “I want that one.” She 
pointed to the mask she had touched, the mask with the open mouth and its 
terrifying, jagged fangs. 

“Too scary,” the man repeated, pushing his cape behind his shoulder. 

“But it’s Halloween!” Carly Beth protested. 

“I have a really scary gorilla mask,” the man said, motioning for Carly Beth 
to go back to the front room. “Very scary. Looks like it’s growling. I will give 
you a good price on it since it’s so late.” 

Carly Beth shook her head, her arms crossed defiantly in front of her. “A 
gorilla mask won’t scare Steve and Chuck,” she said. 

The man’s expression changed. “Who?” 

“My friends,” she told him. “I have to have that one,” she insisted. “It’s so 
scary, I’m almost afraid to touch it. It’s perfect.” 

“It’s too scary,” the man repeated, lowering his eyes to it. He ran his hand 
over the green forehead. “I can’t take the responsibility.” 

“It’s so real looking!” Carly Beth gushed. “They’ll both faint. I know they 
will. Then they’ll never try to scare me again.” 

“Young lady—” the store owner started, glancing impatiently at his watch. 
“I really must insist that you make up your mind. I am a patient man, but—” 

“Please!” Carly Beth begged. “Please sell it to me! Here. Look.” She dug 
into her jeans pocket and pulled out the money she had brought. 

“Young lady, I—” 

“Thirty dollars,” Carly Beth said, shoving the wadded-up bills into the 
man’s hand. “I’ll give you thirty dollars for it. That’s enough, isn’t it?” 

“It’s not a matter of money,” he told her. “These masks are not for sale.” 
With an exasperated sigh, he started toward the doorway that led to the front of 
the store. 

“Please! I need it. I really need it!” Carly Beth begged, chasing after him. 

“These masks are too real,” he insisted, gesturing to the shelves. “I’m 
warning you—” 

“Please? Please?” 

He shut his eyes. “You will be sorry.” 

“No, I won’t. I won’t. I know I won’t!” Carly Beth exclaimed gleefully, 
seeing that he was about to give in. 

He opened his eyes. He shook his head. She could see that he was debating 
with himself. 

With a sigh, he tucked the money into his coat pocket. Then he carefully 
lifted the mask from the shelf, straightening the pointed ears, and started to hand 
it to her. 

“Thanks!” she cried, eagerly snatching the mask from his hands. “It’s 
perfect! Perfect!” 

She held the mask by the flat nose. It felt soft and surprisingly warm. 
“Thanks again!” she cried, hurrying to the front, the mask gripped tightly in her 
hand. 

“Can I give you a bag for it?” the man called after her. 

But Carly Beth was already out of the store. 

She crossed the street and started to run toward home. The sky was black. 
No stars poked through. The street still glistened wetly from the afternoon’s rain. 

This is going to be the best trick-or-treat night ever, Carly Beth thought 
happily. Because this is the night I get my revenge. 

She couldn’t wait to spring out at Steve and Chuck. She wondered what 
their costumes would be. They had both talked about painting their faces blue 
and dyeing their hair blue and being Smurfs. 

Lame. Really lame. 

Carly Beth stopped under a streetlight and held up the mask, gripping it 
with both hands by its pointed ears. It grinned up at her, the two crooked rows of 
fangs hanging over its thick, rubbery lips. 

Then, tucking it carefully under one arm, she ran the rest of the way home. 

Stopping at the bottom of the driveway, she gazed up at her house, the front 
windows all glowing brightly, the porchlight sending white light over the lawn. 

I’ve got to try this mask out on someone, she thought eagerly. I’ve got to 
see just how good it is. 

Her brother’s grinning face popped into her mind. 

“Noah. Of course,” she said aloud. “Noah has really been asking for it.” 

Grinning gleefully, Carly Beth hurried up the drive, eager to make Noah her 
first victim. 

10 

Carly Beth crept silently through the front door and tossed her coat onto the 
entryway floor. The house felt stuffy and hot. A sweet smell, the aroma of hot 
cider on the stove, greeted her. 

Mom really gets into holidays, she thought with a smile. 

Tiptoeing through the front hallway, holding the mask in front of her, Carly 
Beth listened hard. 

Noah, where are you? 

Where are you, my little guinea pig? 

Noah was always bragging about how he was so much braver than Carly 
Beth. He was always putting bugs down her back and planting rubber snakes in 
her bed—anything he could think of to make her scream. 

She heard footsteps above her head. Noah must be up in his room, she 
realized. He’s probably putting on his Halloween costume. 

At the last minute, Noah had decided he wanted to be a cockroach. Mrs. 
Caldwell had dashed frantically all over the house, finding the materials to build 
pointy feelers and a hard shell for his back. 

Well, the little bug is in for a surprise, Carly Beth thought evilly. She 
examined her mask. This should send that cockroach scampering under the sink! 

She stopped at the bottom of the stairs. She could hear loud music coming 
from Noah’s room. An old heavy-metal song. 

Gripping the mask by the rubbery neck, she raised it carefully over her 
head, then pulled it slowly down. 

It was surprisingly warm inside. The mask fit tighter than Carly Beth had 
imagined. It had a funny smell, kind of sour, kind of old, like damp newspapers 
that have been left for years in an attic or garage. 

She slid it all the way down until she could see through the eyeholes. Then 
she smoothed the bulging, bald head over her head and tugged the neck down. 

I should have stopped in front of a mirror, she fretted. I can’t see if it looks 
right. 

The mask felt very tight. Her breathing echoed noisily in the flat nose. She 
forced herself to ignore the sour smell that invaded her nose. 

She held on tightly to the banister as she crept up the stairs. It was hard to 

see the steps through the eyeholes. She had to take the climb slowly, one step at 
a time. 

The heavy-metal music ended as she stepped onto the landing. She crept 
silently down the hall and stopped outside Noah’s door. 

Carly Beth edged her head into the doorway and peeked into the brightly lit 
room. Noah was standing in front of the mirror, adjusting the two long 
cockroach feelers above his head. 

“Noah—I’m coming for you!” Carly Beth called. 

To her surprise, her voice came out gruff and low. It wasn’t her voice at all! 

“Huh?” Startled, Noah spun around. 

“Noah—I’ve got you!” Carly Beth shrieked, her voice deep, raspy, evil. 

“No!” her brother uttered a hushed cry of protest. Even under his bug 
makeup, Carly Beth could see him go pale. 

She darted into the room, her arms outstretched as if ready to grab him. 

“No— please !” he cried, his expression terrified. “Who are you? How— 
how did you get in?” 

He doesn’t even recognize me! Carly Beth thought gleefully. 

And he’s scared to death! 

Was it the hideous face? The deep rumble of a voice? Or both? 

Carly Beth didn’t care. The mask was definitely a success! 

“I’ve GOT you!” she screamed, surprising herself at how scary her voice 
sounded from inside the mask. 

“No! Please!” Noah begged. “Mom! Mom!” He backed toward the bed, 
trembling all over, his feelers quivering in fright. “Mom! Hellllpl” 

Carly Beth burst out laughing. The laughter came out in a deep rumble. 
“It’s me, stupid!” she cried. “What a yellow-bellied scaredy-cat!” 

“Huh?” Still huddled by the bed, Noah stared hard at her. 

“Don’t you recognize my jeans? My sweater? It’s me, you idiot!” Carly 
Beth declared in the gruff voice. 

“But your face—that mask!” Noah stammered. “It—it really scared me. I 
mean—” He gaped at her, studying the mask. “It didn’t sound like you, Carly 
Beth,” he muttered. “I thought—” 

Carly Beth tugged at the bottom of the mask, trying to lift it off. It felt hot 
and sticky. She was panting noisily. 

She tried pulling the bottom with both hands. The mask didn’t budge. 

She raised her hands to the pointed ears and tried lifting it off. She tugged. 

Tugged harder. 

She tried pulling the mask off by the top of the head. It didn’t move. 
“Hey—it won’t come off!” she cried. “The mask—it won’t come off!” 

11 

“What’s going on here?” Carly Beth cried, tugging at the mask with both hands. 

“Stop it!” Noah cried. His voice sounded angry, but his eyes revealed fear. 
“Stop kidding around, Carly Beth. You’re scaring me!” 

“I’m not kidding around,” Carly Beth insisted in her harsh, raspy voice. “I 
really can’t—get—this—off!” 

“Take it off! You’re not funny!” her brother shouted. 

With great effort, Carly Beth managed to slip her fingers under the neck of 
the mask. Then, she pulled it away from her skin and lifted it off her head. 

“Whew!” 

The air felt so cool and sweet. She shook her hair free. Then she playfully 
tossed the mask at Noah. “Good mask, huh?” She grinned at him. 

He let the mask bounce onto the bed. Then he picked it up hesitantly and 
examined it. “Where’d you get it?” he asked, poking a finger against the ugly 
fangs. 

“At that new party store,” she told him, wiping perspiration from her 
forehead. “It’s so hot inside it.” 

“Can I try it on?” Noah asked, pushing his fingers through the eyeholes. 

“Not now. I’m late,” she replied sharply. She laughed. “You sure looked 
scared.” 

He tossed the mask back at her, frowning. “I was just pretending,” he said. 
“I knew it was you.” 

“For sure!” she replied, rolling her eyes. “That’s why you screamed like a 
maniac.” 

“I did not scream,” Noah protested. “I was just putting on an act. For you.” 

“Yeah. Right,” Carly Beth muttered. She turned and headed toward the 
door, rolling the mask over her hand. 

“How’d you change your voice like that?” Noah called after her. 

Carly Beth stopped at the doorway and turned back to him. Her smile gave 
way to a puzzled expression. 

“That deep voice was the scariest part,” Noah said, staring at the mask in 
her hand. “How did you do that?” 

“I don’t know,” Carly Beth replied thoughtfully. “I really don’t know.” 

* * * 

By the time she got to her room, she was grinning again. The mask had 
worked. It had been a wonderful success. 

Noah might not want to admit it, but when Carly Beth burst in on him, 
growling through the hideous mask, he nearly jumped out of his cockroach shell. 

Look out, Chuck and Steve! she thought gleefully. You’re next! 

She sat down on her bed and glanced at the clock radio on her bed table. 
She had a few minutes until it was time to meet everyone in front of Sabrina’s 
house. 

Time enough to think of the best possible way to give them the scare of 
their lives. 

I don’t want to just jump out at them, Carly Beth thought, playing her 
fingers over the sharp fangs. That’s too boring. 

I want to do something they’ll remember. 

Something they’ll never forget. 

She ran her hands over the mask’s pointy ears. Suddenly she had an idea. 

12 

Carly Beth pulled the old broom handle from the closet. She brushed off a thick 
ball of dust and examined the long, wooden pole. 

Perfect, she thought. 

She checked to make sure her mother was still in the kitchen. She was sure 
that her mother wouldn’t approve of what Carly Beth was about to do. Mrs. 
Caldwell still thought that Carly Beth was going to wear the duck costume. 

Tiptoeing silently into the living room, Carly Beth stepped up to the mantel 
and pulled down the plaster of Paris head her mother had sculpted. 

It really does look just like me, Carly Beth thought, holding the sculpture 
waist high and studying it carefully. It’s so lifelike. Mom is really talented. 

Carefully, she placed the head on the broomstick. It balanced easily. 

She carried it over to the hallway mirror. It looks like I’m carrying my real 
head on a stick, Carly Beth thought, admiring it. A wide grin broke out across 
her face. Her eyes sparkled gleefully. 

Excellent! 

She leaned the head and stick against the wall and pulled on the mask. Once 
again, the sour aroma rushed into her nostrils. The heat of the mask seemed to 
wrap around her. 

The mask tightened against her skin as she pulled it down. 

Raising her eyes to the mirror, she nearly frightened herself ! It’s like a real 
face, she thought, unable to take her eyes away. My eyes seem a part of it. It 
doesn’t look as if I’m peering out of eyeholes. 

She moved the gmesome mouth up and down a few times. It moves like a 
real mouth, she realized. 

It doesn’t look like a mask at all. 

It looks like a gross, deformed face. 

Working with both hands, she flattened the bulging forehead, smoothing it 
over her hair. 

Excellent! she repeated to herself, feeling her excitement grow. Excellent! 

The mask is perfect! she decided. She couldn’t believe the man in the party 
store didn’t want to sell it to her. It was the scariest, realest, ugliest mask she had 

ever seen. 

I will be the terror of Maple Avenue tonight! Carly Beth decided, admiring 
herself in the mirror. Kids will be having nightmares about me for weeks! 

Especially Chuck and Steve, she told herself. 

“Boo!” she muttered to herself, pleased to hear that the gruff voice had 
returned. “I’m ready.” 

She picked up the broomstick, carefully balanced her sculpted head on top 
of it, and started to the door. 

Her mother’s voice stopped her. “Carly Beth—wait up,” Mrs. Caldwell 
called from the kitchen. “I want to see how you look in that duck costume!” 

“Uh-oh,” Carly Beth groaned out loud. “Mom isn’t going to like this.” 

13 

Carly Beth froze in the doorway. She could hear her mother’s footsteps 
approaching in the hallway. 

“Let me see you, dear,” Mrs. Caldwell called. “Did the costume fit?” 

Maybe I should’ve told her about my change of plans, Carly Beth thought 
guiltily. I would’ve said something, but I didn’t want to hurt Mom’s feelings. 

Now she’s in for a shock. And she’s going to be really angry when she sees 
I’ve borrowed her sculpture. 

She’s going to make me put it back on the mantel. 

She’s going to ruin everything. 

“I’m kind of in a hurry, Mom,” Carly Beth called, her voice deep and raspy 
inside the mask. “I’ll see you later, okay?” She pulled open the front door. 

“You can wait one second while I see my costume on you,” her mother 
called. She rounded the corner and came into view. 

I’m sunk, Carly Beth thought with a groan. 

I’m caught. 

The phone rang. The sound echoed loudly inside Carly Beth’s mask. 

Her mother stopped and turned back to the kitchen. “Oh, darn. I’d better 
answer that. It’s probably your father calling from Chicago.” She disappeared 
back to the kitchen. “I’ll have to see you later, Carly Beth. Be careful, okay?” 

Carly Beth breathed a sigh of relief. Saved by the bell, she thought. 

Balancing the head on the broomstick, she hurried out the door. She closed 
the door behind her and jogged down the front yard. 

It had become a clear, cool night. A pale half-moon rose low over the bare 
trees. Fat brown leaves swirled around her ankles as she headed to the sidewalk. 

The plan was to meet Chuck and Steve in front of Sabrina’s house. Carly 
Beth couldn’t wait. 

Her head bobbed and bounced on the broomstick as she ran. The house on 
the corner had been decorated for Halloween. Orange lights ran along the top of 
the stoop. Two large, smiling pumpkin cutouts stood beside the doorway. A 
cardboard skeleton had been propped up at the end of the front walk. 

I love Halloween! Carly Beth thought happily. She crossed the street onto 
Sabrina’s block. 

On other Halloween nights, she had been frightened. Her friends were 
always playing mean tricks on her. Last year, Steve had slipped a very real- 
looking rubber rat into her trick-or-treat bag. 

When Carly Beth had reached into the bag, she felt something soft and 
hairy. She pulled out the rat and shrieked at the top of her lungs. She was so 
scared, she spilled her candy all over the driveway. 

Chuck and Steve thought it was a riot. So did Sabrina. They always spoiled 
Halloween for her. They thought it was so hilarious to scare Carly Beth and 
make her scream. 

Well, this year I won’t be the one screaming, she thought. This year, I’ll be 
the one making everyone else scream. 

Sabrina’s house was at the end of the block. As Carly Beth hurried toward 
it, bare tree limbs shivered above her. The half-moon disappeared behind a 
heavy cloud, and the ground darkened. 

The head on the broom handle bounced and nearly fell off. Carly Beth 
slowed her pace. She glanced up at the head, shifting her grip on the broomstick. 

The eyes on the sculpted head stared straight ahead, as if watching out for 
trouble. In the darkness, the head looked real. The shadows moving over it as 
Carly Beth walked under the bare tree limbs made the eyes and mouth appear to 
move. 

Hearing laughter, Carly Beth turned. Across the street, a group of trick-or- 
treaters was invading a brightly lit front porch. In the yellow porchlight, Carly 
Beth saw a ghost, a Mutant Ninja Turtle, a Freddy Krueger, and a princess in a 
pink ballgown and a tinfoil crown. The kids were little. Two mothers watched 
them from the foot of the driveway. 

Carly Beth watched them get their candy. Then she walked the rest of the 
way to Sabrina’s house. She climbed the front stoop, stepping into a white 
triangle of light from the porchlight. She could hear voices inside the house, 
Sabrina shouting something to her mother, a TV on in the living room. 

Carly Beth adjusted her mask with her free hand. She straightened the 
gaping, fanged mouth. Then she checked to make sure the head was balanced on 
the broomstick. 

She reached to ring Sabrina’s doorbell—then stopped. 

Voices behind her. 

She turned and squinted into the darkness. Two costumed boys were 
approaching, shoving each other playfully on the sidewalk. 

Chuck and Steve! 

I’m just in time, Carly Beth thought happily. She leapt off the stoop and 
crouched behind a low evergreen shrub. 

Okay, guys, she thought eagerly, her heart pounding. Get ready for a scare. 

14 

Carly Beth peered over the top of the shrub. The two boys were halfway up the 
drive. 

It was too dark to get a good look at their costumes. One of them wore a 
long overcoat and a wide-brimmed, Indiana Jones fedora. She couldn’t really see 
the other one. 

Carly Beth took a deep breath and prepared to leap out at them. She gripped 
the broomstick tightly. 

My whole body is trembling, she realized. The mask suddenly felt hot, as if 
her excitement had heated it up. Her breath rattled noisily in the flat nose. 

Walking slowly, playfully blocking each other with their shoulders like 
football linemen, the boys made their way up the driveway. One of them said 
something Carly Beth couldn’t hear. The other one laughed loudly, a high- 
pitched giggle. 

Peering into the darkness, Carly Beth watched them until they were nearly 
right in front of the shrub. 

Okay—now! she declared silently. 

Raising the broomstick with its staring head on the top, she leapt out. 

The boys shrieked, startled. 

She could see their dark eyes go wide as they gaped at her mask. 

A ferocious roar escaped her throat. A deep, rumbling howl that frightened 
even her. 

At the terrifying sound, both boys cried out again. One of them actually 
dropped to his knees on the driveway. 

They both stared up at the head, bobbing on the broomstick. It seemed to 
glare down at them. 

Another howl escaped Carly Beth’s throat. It started low, as if coming from 
far away, and then pierced the air, raspy and deep, like the roar of an angry 
creature. 

“Noooo!” one of the boys cried. 

“Who are you?” the other cried. “Leave us alone!” 

Carly Beth heard rapid footsteps crunching over the dead leaves on the 
driveway. Looking up, she saw a woman in a bulky down coat running up the 

drive. 

“Hey—what are you doing?” the woman demanded, her voice shrill and 
angry. “Are you scaring my kids?” 

“Huh?” Carly Beth swallowed hard. She turned her eyes back to the two 
frightened boys. 

“Wait!” she cried, realizing they weren’t Chuck and Steve. 

“What are you doing?” the woman repeated breathlessly. She stepped up to 
the two boys and put a hand on each of their shoulders. “Are you two okay?” 

“Yeah. We’re okay, Mom,” the one in the overcoat and fedora replied. 

The other boy wore white makeup and a red clown nose. “She—she jumped 
out at us,” he told his mother, avoiding Carly Beth’s stare. “She kind of scared 
us.” 

The woman turned angrily to Carly Beth and shook her finger at her 
accusingly. “Don’t you have anything better to do than to scare two young boys? 
Why don’t you pick on someone your own age?” 

Normally Carly Beth would have apologized. She would have explained to 
the woman that she made a mistake, that she meant to scare two different boys. 

But hidden behind the ugly mask, still hearing the strange howl that had 
burst so unexpectedly from her throat, she didn’t feel like apologizing. 

She felt... anger. And she wasn’t sure why. 

“Go away!” she rasped, waving the broomstick menacingly. The head —her 
head—stared down at the two startled boys. 

“What did you say?” their mother demanded, her voice tight with growing 
outrage. “What did you say?” 

“I said go away!” Carly Beth snarled in a voice so deep, so terrifying, that it 
frightened even her. 

The woman crossed her arms in front of the heavy, down coat. Her eyes 
narrowed on Carly Beth. “Who are you? What is your name?” she demanded. 
“Do you live around here?” 

“Mom—let’s just go,” the boy with the clown face urged, tugging at her 
coat sleeve. 

“Yeah. Come on,” his brother pleaded. 

“Go away. I’m WARNINGyou\” Carly Beth growled. 

The woman stood her ground, her arms tightly crossed, her eyes narrowed 
at Carly Beth. “Just because it’s Halloween doesn’t give you the right—” 

“Mom, we want to get some candy!” the clown pleaded, tugging his 

mother’s sleeve harder. “Come on!” 

“We’re wasting the whole night!” his brother complained. 

Carly Beth was breathing hard, her breath escaping the mask in low, noisy 
gmnts. I sound like an animal, she thought, puzzled. What is happening to me? 

She could feel her anger growing. Her breathing rattled noisily in the tight 
mask. Her face felt burning hot. 

Her anger raged through her chest. Her entire body was trembling. She felt 
about to burst. 

I’m going to tear this woman apart! Carly Beth decided. 

15 

I’ll chew her to bits! I’ll tear her skin off her bones! Furious thoughts raged 
through Carly Beth’s mind. 

She tensed her muscles, crouched low, and prepared to pounce. 

But before she could make her move, the two boys pulled their mother 
away. 

“Let’s go, Mom.” 

“Yeah. Let’s go. She’s crazy!” 

Yeah. I’m crazy. Crazy, crazy, CRAZY. The word repeated, roaring through 
Carly Beth’s mind. The mask grew hotter, tighter. 

The woman gave Carly Beth one last cold stare. Then she turned and led 
the two boys down the driveway. 

Carly Beth stared after them, panting loudly. She had a strong urge to chase 
after them—to really scare them! 

But a loud cry made her stop and spin around. 

Sabrina stood on the front stoop, leaning on the storm door, her mouth open 
in a wide O of surprise. “Who’s there?” she cried, squinting into the darkness. 

Sabrina was dressed as Cat Woman, with a silver-and-gray catsuit beneath a 
silver mask. Her black hair was pulled tightly behind her head. Her dark eyes 
stared intently at Carly Beth. 

“Don’t you recognize me?” Carly Beth rasped, stepping closer. 

She could see the fright in Sabrina’s eyes. Sabrina gripped the door handle 
tightly, standing half in and half out of her house. 

“Don’t you recognize me, Sabrina?” She waved the head on the broomstick, 
as if giving her friend a clue. 

Sabrina gasped and raised her hand to her mouth as she noticed the head on 
the pole. “Carly Beth—is that—is that you?” she stammered. Her eyes darted 
from the mask to the head, then back again. 

“Hi, Sabrina,” Carly Beth growled. “It’s me.” 

Sabrina continued to study her. “That mask!” she cried finally. “It’s 
excellent ! Really. Excellent. It’s so scary.” 

“I like your catsuit,” Carly Beth told her, stepping closer, into the light. 

Sabrina’s eyes were raised to the top of the broomstick. “That head—it’s so 

real! Where did you get it?” 

“It’s my real head!” Carly Beth joked. 

Sabrina continued to stare at it. “Carly Beth, when I first saw it, I—” 

“My mom made it,” Carly Beth told her. “In her art class.” 

“I thought it was a real head,” Sabrina said. She shivered. “The eyes. The 
way they stare at you.” 

Carly Beth shook the broomstick, making the head nod. 

Sabrina studied Carly Beth’s mask. “Wait till Chuck and Steve see your 
costume.” 

I can’t wait! Carly Beth thought darkly. “Where are they?” she demanded, 
glancing back to the street. 

“Steve called,” Sabrina replied. “He said they’d be late. He has to take his 
little sister trick-or-treating before he can meet us.” 

Carly Beth sighed, disappointed. 

“We’ll start without them,” Sabrina suggested. “They can catch up to us 
later.” 

“Yeah. Okay,” Carly Beth replied. 

“I’ll get my coat and we can go,” Sabrina said. She took one last, lingering 
look at the head on the broomstick, then the storm door slammed shut with a 
bang as she disappeared inside to get her coat. 

The wind picked up as the two girls made their way down the block. Dead 
leaves swirled at their feet. The bare trees bent and shivered. Above the dark, 
sloping roofs, the pale half-moon slipped in and out of the clouds. 

Sabrina chattered about all the problems she’d had with her costume. The 
first catsuit she’d bought had a long run in one leg and had to be returned. Then 
Sabrina couldn’t find a cat-eyed mask that looked right. 

Carly Beth remained quiet. She couldn’t hide her disappointment that 
Chuck and Steve hadn’t met them as planned. 

What if they never catch up to us? she wondered. What if we don’t see 
them at all? 

The whole point of the night, as far as Carly Beth was concerned, was 
meeting the two boys and scaring the living daylights out of them. 

Sabrina had given her a shopping bag to put her candy in. As they walked, 
Carly Beth gripped the bag in one hand, struggling to keep the head balanced on 
the pole in her other hand. 

“So where did you buy your mask? Your mother didn’t make it, did she? 
Did you go to that new party store? Can I touch it?” 

Sabrina always talked a lot. But tonight she was going for a world’s record 
of nonstop chatter. 

Carly Beth obediently stopped so that her friend could touch the mask. 
Sabrina pressed her fingers against the cheek, then instantly jerked them back. 
“Oh! It feels like skin!” 

Carly Beth laughed, a scornful laugh she had never heard before. 

“Yuck! What’s it made of?” Sabrina demanded. “It isn’t skin —is it? It’s 
some kind of rubber, right?” 

“I guess,” Carly Beth muttered. 

“Then how come it’s so warm?” Sabrina asked. “Is it uncomfortable to 
wear? You must be sweating like a pig.” 

Feeling a surge of rage, Carly Beth dropped the bag and the broomstick. 
“Shut up! Shut up! Shut up!” she snarled. 

Then with an angry howl, she grabbed Sabrina’s throat with both hands and 
began to choke her. 

16 

Sabrina uttered a shocked cry and staggered back, pulling herself from Carly 
Beth’s grip. “C-Carly Beth!” she sputtered. 

What is happening to me? Carly Beth wondered, gaping in horror at her 
friend. Why did I do that? 

“Uh... gotcha!” Carly Beth exclaimed. She laughed. “You should have seen 
the look on your face, Sabrina. Did you think I was really choking you?” 

Sabrina rubbed her neck with one silver-gloved hand. She frowned at her 
friend. “That was a joke? You scared me to death!” 

Carly Beth laughed again. “Just keeping in character,” she said lightly, 
pointing to her mask. “You know. Trying to get in the right mood. Ha-ha. I like 
scaring people. You know. Usually I’m the one who’s trembling in fright.” 

She picked up the bag and broomstick, fixing the plaster of Paris head on 
the top. Then she hurried up the nearest driveway toward a well-lighted house 
with a HAPPY HALLOWEEN banner in the front window. 

Does Sabrina believe it was just a joke? Carly Beth asked herself as she 
raised her shopping bag and rang the doorbell. What on earth was I doing? 

Why did I suddenly get so angry? Why did I attack my best friend like that? 

Sabrina stepped up beside her as the front door was pulled open. Two little 
blonde kids, a boy and a girl, appeared in the doorway. Their mother stepped up 
behind them. 

“Trick or Treat!” Carly Beth and Sabrina called out in unison. 

“Ooh, that’s a scary mask!” the woman said to her two children, grinning at 
Carly Beth. 

“What are you supposed to be? A cat?” the little boy asked Sabrina. 

Sabrina meowed at him. “I’m Cat Woman,” she told him. 

“I don’t like the other one!” the little girl exclaimed to her mother. “It’s too 
scary.” 

“It’s just a funny mask,” the mother assured her daughter. 

“Too scary. It’s scaring me!” the little girl insisted. 

Carly Beth leaned into the entryway of the house, bringing her grotesque 
face up close to the little girl. “I’ll eat you up!” she growled nastily. 

The little girl screamed and disappeared into the house. Her brother stared 

wide-eyed at Carly Beth. The mother quickly dropped candy bars into the girls’ 
bags. “You shouldn’t have scared her,” she said softly. “She has nightmares.” 

Instead of apologizing, Carly Beth turned to the little boy. “I’ll eat you up 
too!” she snarled. 

“Hey—stop!” the woman protested. 

Carly Beth laughed a deep-throated laugh, jumped off the porch, and took 
off across the front lawn. 

“Why’d you do that?” Sabrina asked as they made their way across the 
street. “Why’d you scare those kids like that?” 

“The mask made me do it,” Carly Beth replied. She meant it as a joke. But 
the thought troubled her mind. 

At the next few houses, Carly Beth hung back and let Sabrina do the 
talking. At one house, a middle-aged man in a torn blue sweater pretended to be 
scared of Carly Beth’s mask. His wife insisted that the girls come inside so that 
they could show their elderly mother the great costumes. 

Carly Beth groaned loudly, but followed Sabrina into the house. The old 
woman gazed at them blankly from her wheelchair. Carly Beth growled at her, 
but it didn’t appear to make any impression. 

On their way out the door, the man in the torn sweater handed each girl a 
green apple. Carly Beth waited till they were down on the sidewalk. Then she 
turned, pulled back her arm, and heaved the apple at the man’s house with all her 
might. 

It made a loud thunk as it smacked against the shingled front wall near the 
front door. 

“I really hate getting apples on Halloween!” Carly Beth declared. 
“Especially green ones!” 

“Carly Beth—I’m worried about you!” Sabrina cried, eyeing her friend 
with concern. “You’re not acting like you at all.” 

No. I’m not a pitiful, frightened little mouse tonight, Carly Beth thought 
bitterly. 

“Give me that,” she ordered Sabrina, and grabbed Sabrina’s apple from her 

bag. 

“Hey—stop!” Sabrina protested. 

But Carly Beth arched her arm and tossed Sabrina’s apple at the house. It 
clanged noisily as it hit the aluminum gutter. 

The man in the torn sweater poked his head out the door. “Hey—what’s the 
big idea?” 

“Run!” Carly Beth screamed. 

The two girls took off, running at full speed down the block. They didn’t 
stop until the house was out of sight. 

Sabrina grabbed Carly Beth’s shoulders and held on, struggling to catch her 
breath. “You’re crazy!” she gasped. “You’re really crazy!” 

“It takes one to know one,” Carly Beth said playfully. 

They both laughed. 

Carly Beth searched the block, looking for Chuck and Steve. She saw a 
small group of costumed kids huddled together at the corner. But no sign of the 
two boys. 

Smaller houses, jammed closer together, lined the two sides of this block. 
“Let’s split up,” Carly Beth suggested, leaning against the broomstick. “We’ll 
get more candy that way.” 

Sabrina frowned at her friend, eyeing her suspiciously. “Carly Beth, you 
don’t even like candy!” she exclaimed. 

But Carly Beth was already running up the driveway to the first house, her 
sculpted head bobbing wildly above her on its broomstick. 

This is my night, Carly Beth thought, accepting a candy bar from the 
smiling woman who answered the door. My night! 

She felt a tingle of excitement she’d never felt before. And a strange feeling 
she couldn’t describe. A hunger... 

A few minutes later, her shopping bag starting to feel heavy, she came to the 
end of the block. She hesitated on the corner, trying to decide whether to do the 
other side of the street or go on to the next block. 

It was very dark there, she realized. The moon had once again disappeared 
behind dark clouds. The corner streetlight was out, probably burned out. 

Across the street, four very young trick or treaters were giggling as they 
approached a house with a jack-o’-lantern on the porch. 

Carly Beth sank back into the darkness. She heard voices, boys’ voices. 

Chuck and Steve? 

No. The voices were unfamiliar. They were arguing about where to trick-or- 
treat next. One of them wanted to go home and call a friend. 

How about a little scare for you guys? Carly Beth thought, a smile 
spreading across her face. How about something to remember this Halloween 

night? 

She waited, listening, until they were a few feet away. She could see them 
now. Two mummies, their faces wrapped in gauze. 

Closer, closer. She waited for the perfect moment. 

Then she burst from the shadows, uttering an angry animal howl that 
shattered the air. 

The two boys gasped and jumped back. 

“Hey—!” One of them tried to shout, but his voice caught in his throat. 

The other one dropped his bag of candy. 

As he started to pick it up, Carly Beth moved quickly. She grabbed the bag 
from his hand, jerked it away from him, and started to run. 

“Come back!” 

“That’s minel” 

“Hey—” 

Their voices were high and shrill, filled with fear and surprise. As she ran 
across the street, Carly Beth glanced back to see if they were following her. 

No. They were too frightened. They stood huddled together on the corner, 
shouting after her. 

Holding the stolen candy bag tightly in her free hand, Carly Beth tossed 
back her head and laughed. A cruel laugh, a triumphant laugh. A laugh she had 
never heard before. 

She emptied the boy’s candy into her own bag, then tossed his bag onto the 
ground. 

She felt good, really good. Really strong. And ready for more fun. 

Come on, Chuck and Steve, she thought. It’s YOUR turn next! 

17 

Carly Beth found Chuck and Steve a few minutes later. 

They were across the street from her, standing in the light of someone’s 
driveway, examining the contents of their trick-or-treat bags. 

Carly Beth ducked behind the wide trunk of an old tree near the sidewalk. 
Her heart began to pound as she spied on them. 

Neither boy had bothered to put on a real costume. Chuck had a red 
bandanna tied around his head and a black mask over his eyes. Steve had 
blackened his cheeks and forehead with big smudges and wore an old tennis hat 
and a torn raincoat. 

Is he supposed to be a bum? Carly Beth wondered. 

She watched them sift through their bags. They had been out for quite a 
while, she saw. Their bags appeared pretty full. 

Suddenly, Steve glanced up in her direction. 

Carly Beth jerked her head back behind the tree trunk. 

Had he seen her? 

No. 

Don’t blow it now, she told herself. You’ve waited so long for this moment. 
You’ve waited so long to pay them back for all the scares. 

Carly Beth watched the two boys make their way up to the front porch of 
the next house. Nearly tripping over the broomstick, she darted away from the 
tree. She ran across the street and ducked low behind a hedge. 

When they come back down the drive, I’ll leap out. I’ll pounce on them. I’ll 
scare them to death, she thought. 

The low hedge smelled piney and sweet. It was still wet from the morning’s 
rain. The wind made the leaves tremble. What was that strange whistling sound? 

It took Carly Beth a while to realize it was her own breathing. 

She suddenly began to have doubts. 

This isn’t going to work, she thought, crouching lower behind the trembling 
hedge. 

I am a complete jerk. Chuck and Steve aren’t going to be scared by a stupid 
mask. 

I’m going to jump out at them, and they’re going to laugh at me. As they 

always do. 

They’re going to laugh and say, “Oh, hi, Carly Beth. Looking good!” Or 
something like that. 

And then they’ll tell everyone in school how I thought I was so scary and 
how they recognized me immediately and what a total jerk I am. And everyone 
will have a good laugh at my expense. 

Why did I ever think this would work? What made me think it was such a 
hot idea? 

Crouched behind the hedge, Carly Beth could feel her anger grow. Anger at 
herself. Anger at the two boys. 

Her face felt burning hot inside the ugly mask. Her heart thudded loudly. 
Her rapid breaths whistled against the flat nose. 

Chuck and Steve were approaching. She could hear their sneakers crunch 
over the gravel driveway. 

Carly Beth tensed her leg muscles and prepared to pounce. 

Okay, she thought, taking a deep breath, here goes! 

18 

It all seemed to happen in slow motion. 

The two boys moved slowly past the hedge. They were talking excitedly to 
each other. But to Carly Beth, their voices seemed low and far away. 

She pulled herself up, stepped out from the hedge, and screamed at the top 
of her lungs. 

Even in the dim light, she could see their reactions clearly. 

Their eyes went wide. Their mouths dropped open. Their hands shot up 
above their heads. 

Steve cried out. Chuck grabbed the sleeve of Steve’s coat. 

Carly Beth’s scream echoed over the dark front lawn. The sound seemed to 
hover in the air. 

Everything moved so slowly. So slowly, Carly Beth could see Chuck’s 
eyebrows quiver. She could see his chin tremble. 

She could see the fear shimmer in Steve’s eyes as they moved from her 
mask up to the head on the broomstick. 

She waved the broomstick menacingly. 

Steve uttered a frightened whimper. 

Chuck gaped at Carly Beth, his frightened eyes locked on hers. “Carly Beth 
—is that you?” he finally managed to choke out. 

Carly Beth uttered an animal growl, but didn’t reply. 

“Who are you?” Steve demanded, his voice trembling. 

“It—it’s Carly Beth—I think!” Chuck told him. “Is it you in there, Carly 
Beth?” 

Steve let out a tense laugh. “You—scared us!” 

“Carly Beth—is it you?” Chuck demanded again. 

Carly Beth waved the broomstick. She pointed up to the head. “That’s Carly 
Beth’s head,” she told them. Her voice was a deep, throaty rasp. 

“Huh?” Both boys gazed up at it uncertainly. 

“That’s Carly Beth’s head,” she repeated slowly, waving it toward them. 
The painted eyes of the sculpted face appeared to glare down at them. “Poor 
Carly Beth didn’t want to give up her head tonight. But I took it anyway.” 

Both boys stared up at the head. 

Chuck continued to grip Steve’s coat sleeve. 

Steve uttered another tense laugh. He stared at Carly Beth, his expression 
confused. “You’re Carly Beth, right? How are you making that weird voice?” 

“That’s your friend Carly Beth,” she growled, pointing up to the head on 
the broomstick. “That’s all that’s left of her!” 

Chuck swallowed hard. His eyes were trained on the bobbing head. Steve 
stared intently at Carly Beth’s mask. 

“Hand over your candy,” Carly Beth snarled, surprised by the vicious tone 
in her voice. 

“Huh?” Steve cried. 

“Hand it over. Now. Or I’ll put your heads on the stick.” 

Both boys laughed, shrill giggles. 

“I’m not joking!” Carly Beth roared. 

Her angry words cut their laughter short. 

“Carly Beth—give us a break,” Chuck muttered uncertainly, his eyes still 
narrowed in fear. 

“Yeah. Really,” Steve said softly. 

“Hand over your bags,” Carly Beth insisted coldly. “Or your heads will 
adorn my stick.” 

She lowered the broomstick toward them menacingly. 

And as she lowered it, all three of them stared up at the dark-eyed face. All 
three of them studied the frozen face, the face that looked so real, that looked so 
much like Carly Beth Caldwell. 

A sudden breeze swirled around them, making the head bob on the stick. 

And then, all three of them saw the eyes blink. 

Once. Twice. 

The brown eyes blinked. 

And the lips on the head parted, making a dry scraping sound. 

Frozen in horror, Carly Beth stared up at the face along with the two boys. 

And all three of them saw the lips move. And heard the dry, crackling 
sound. 

All three of them saw the dark lips squeeze together, then part. 

All three of them saw the bobbing head form the silent words: “Help me. 
Help me. ” 

19 

In her horror, Carly Beth let go of the broomstick. It hit the ground beside 
Chuck. The head rolled under the hedge. 

“It—it talked !” Steve cried. 

Chuck uttered a low whimper. 

Without another word, both boys dropped their candy bags and took off, 
their sneakers thudding loudly on the sidewalk. 

The wind swirled around Carly Beth as if holding her in place. 

She felt like tossing her head back and howling. 

She felt like tearing off her coat and flying through the night. 

She felt like climbing a tree, leaping onto a roof, roaring up at the starless, 
black sky. 

She stood frozen for a long moment, letting the wind sweep around her. The 
boys were gone. They had fled in terror. 

Terror! 

Carly Beth had succeeded. She had scared them nearly to death. 

She knew she’d never forget the horrified looks on their faces, the fear and 
disbelief that glowed in their dark eyes. 

And she would never forget her feeling of triumph. The thrilling sweetness 
of revenge. 

For a brief moment, she realized, she had felt the fear, too. 

She had imagined that the head on the stick had come to life, had blinked its 
eyes, had spoken silently to them. 

For a brief moment, she had caught the fear. She had fallen under the spell 
of her own trickery. 

But, of course, the head hadn’t come alive, she assured herself now. Of 
course the lips hadn’t moved, hadn’t made their silent plea: “Help me. Help me. ” 

It had to be shadows, she knew. Shadows cast by the light of the moon, 
floating out from behind the shifting, black clouds. 

Where was the head? 

Where was the broomstick she had dropped? 

It didn’t matter now. They were no longer of any use to her. 

Carly Beth had won her victory. 

And now she was running. Running wildly over the front lawns. Jumping 
over shrubs and hedges. Flying over the dark, hard ground. 

She was running blindly, the houses whirring past on both sides. The 
blustery wind swirled, and she swirled with it, rising over the sidewalks, rushing 
through tall weeds, blowing with the wind like a helpless leaf. 

Holding her bulging candy bag, she ran past startled trick or treaters, past 
glowing pumpkins, past rattling skeletons. 

She ran until her breath gave out. 

Then she stopped, panting loudly, and shut her eyes, waiting for her heart to 
stop pounding, for the blood to stop pulsing at her temples. 

And a hand grabbed her shoulder roughly from behind. 

20 

Startled, Carly Beth shrieked and spun around. “Sabrina!” she cried breathlessly. 

Grinning, Sabrina let go of her shoulder. “I’ve been looking for you for 
hours,” Sabrina scolded. “Where’d you go?” 

“I—I guess I got lost,” Carly Beth replied, still struggling to catch her 
breath. 

“One minute you were there. The next minute, you disappeared,” Sabrina 
said, adjusting her mask over her dark hair. 

“How’d you do?” Carly Beth asked, trying to speak in her normal voice. 

“I ripped my catsuit,” Sabrina complained, frowning. She pulled at the 
Lycra material on one leg to show Carly Beth. “Snagged it on a stupid mailbox.” 

“Bad news,” Carly Beth sympathized. 

“Did you scare anyone with that mask?” Sabrina demanded, still fingering 
the tear in the catsuit leg. 

“Yeah. A few kids,” Carly Beth replied casually. 

“It’s really gross,” Sabrina said. 

“That’s why I picked it.” 

They both laughed. 

“Did you get a lot of candy?” Sabrina asked. She picked up Carly Beth’s 
bag and looked inside. “Wow! What a haul!” 

“I hit a lot of houses,” Carly Beth said. 

“Let’s go back to my house and check out the loot,” Sabrina suggested. 

“Yeah. Okay.” Carly Beth followed her friend across the street. 

“Unless you want to trick-or-treat some more,” Sabrina offered, stopping in 
the middle of the street. 

“No. I’ve done enough,” Carly Beth said. She laughed to herself. I did 
everything I wanted to do tonight. 

They started walking again. They were walking against the wind, but Carly 
Beth didn’t feel at all chilled. 

Two girls in frilly dresses, their faces brightly made up, funny, blonde, 
moplike wigs on their heads, ran by. One of them slowed when she caught sight 
of Carly Beth’s mask. She uttered a soft gasp, then hurried after her friend. 

“Did you see Steve and Chuck?” Sabrina asked. “I searched everywhere for 
them.” She groaned. “That’s all I did tonight. I spent the whole night looking for 
everybody. You. Steve and Chuck. How come we never got together?” 

Carly Beth shrugged. “I saw them,” she told her friend. “A few minutes 
ago. Back there.” She motioned with her head. “They’re such scaredy-cats.” 

“Huh? Steve and Chuck?” Sabrina’s expression turned to surprise. 

“Yeah. They got one look at my mask and they took off,” Carly Beth told 
her, laughing. “They were screaming like babies.” 

Sabrina joined in the laughter. “I don’t believe it!” she exclaimed. “They 
always act so tough. And—” 

“I called after them, but they just kept running,” Carly Beth told her, 
grinning. 

“Weird!” Sabrina declared. 

“Yeah. Weird,” Carly Beth agreed. 

“Did they know it was you?” Sabrina asked. 

Carly Beth shrugged. “I don’t know. They took one look at me, and they ran 
like rabbits.” 

“They told me they planned to scare you,” Sabrina revealed. “They were 
going to sneak up behind you and make scary noises or something.” 

Carly Beth snickered. “It’s hard to sneak up behind someone when you’re 
running for your life!” 

Sabrina’s house came into view. Carly Beth shifted the candy bag to her 
other hand. 

“I got some good stuff,” Sabrina said, peering into her bag as she walked. “I 
had to get a lot. I have to share it with my cousin. She has the flu and couldn’t 
trick-or-treat tonight.” 

“I’m not sharing any of mine,” Carly Beth said. “Noah went out with his 
pals. He’ll probably come home with a year’s supply.” 

“Mrs. Connelly gave cookies and popcorn again this year,” Sabrina said, 
sighing. “I’ll just have to throw it all out. Mom won’t let me eat anything that 
isn’t wrapped. She’s afraid some ghoul will put poison in it. I had to throw out a 
lot of good stuff last year.” 

Sabrina knocked on her front door. A few seconds later, her mother opened 
it and the girls entered. “That’s some mask, Carly Beth,” she said, studying it. 
“How’d you girls do?” 

“Okay, I think,” Sabrina replied. 

“Well, just remember—” 

“I know. I know, Mom,” Sabrina interrupted impatiently. “Throw out 
everything that isn’t wrapped. Even the fruit.” 

As soon as Mrs. Mason had gone back to the den, the two girls turned over 
their bags and dumped all the candy onto the living room rug. 

“Hey, look—a big Milky Way!” Sabrina declared, pulling it out of the pile. 
“My favorite!” 

“I hate these!” Carly Beth said, holding up an enormous blue jawbreaker. 
“The last time I tried sucking one of these, I cut my tongue to pieces.” She 
tossed it onto Sabrina’s pile. 

“Thanks a bunch,” Sabrina said sarcastically. She tugged off her mask and 
dropped it onto the carpet. Her face was flushed. She shook out her black hair. 

“There. That feels better,” Sabrina said. “Wow. That mask was hot.” She 
raised her eyes to Carly Beth. “Don’t you want to take off your mask? You must 
be boiling inside it!” 

“Yeah. Good idea.” Carly Beth had actually forgotten she was wearing a 
mask. 

She reached up with both hands and tugged at the ears. “Ouch!” The mask 
didn’t budge. 

She pulled it by the top of the head. Then she tried stretching it out and 
tugging it from the cheeks. 

“Ouch!” 

“What’s wrong?” Sabrina asked, concentrating on sorting her candy into 
piles. 

Carly Beth didn’t reply. She tried prying the mask off at the neck. Then she 
tugged it up by the ears again. 

“Carly Beth—what’s wrong?” Sabrina asked, looking up from her candy. 

“Help me!” Carly Beth pleaded in a shrill, frightened voice. “Please—help 
me! The mask—it won’t come off!” 

21 

On her knees on the carpet, Sabrina glanced up from her piles of candy bars. 
“Carly Beth, stop clowning around.” 

“I’m not!” Carly Beth insisted, her voice shrill with panic. 

“Aren’t you tired of scaring people tonight?” Sabrina demanded. She 
picked up a clear plastic bag of candy corn. “Wonder if Mom will let me keep 
this. It’s wrapped.” 

“I’m not trying to scare you. I’m serious!” Carly Beth cried. She tugged at 
the ears of the mask, but couldn’t get a good grip. 

Sabrina tossed down the bag of candy corn and climbed to her feet. “You 
really can’t get the mask off?” 

Carly Beth pulled hard on the chin. “Ouch!” She cried out in pain. “It—it’s 
stuck to my skin or something. Help me.” 

Sabrina laughed. “We’re going to look pretty stupid if we have to call the 
fire department to get you out of your mask!” 

Carly Beth didn’t find it funny. She gripped the top of the mask with both 
hands and pulled with all her strength. The mask didn’t budge. 

Sabrina’s grin faded. She stepped over to her friend. “You’re not goofing 
—are you. You’re really stuck.” 

Carly Beth nodded. “Well, come on,” she urged impatiently. “Help me pull 
it off.” 

Sabrina grabbed the mask top. “It’s so warm!” she exclaimed. “You must be 
suffocating in there.” 

“Just pull!” Carly Beth wailed. 

Sabrina pulled. 

“Ouch! Not so hard!” Carly Beth cried. “It really hurts!” 

Sabrina pulled more gently, but the mask didn’t budge. She lowered her 
hands to the cheeks and pulled. 

“Ouch!” Carly Beth shrieked. “It’s really stuck to my face.” 

“What’s this thing made of?” Sabrina asked, staring intently at the mask. “It 
doesn’t feel like rubber. It feels like skin.” 

“I don’t know what it’s made of, and I don’t care,” Carly Beth grumbled. “I 
just want it off. Maybe we should cut it off. You know. With scissors.” 

“And wreck the mask?” Sabrina asked. 

“I don’t care!” Carly Beth exclaimed, tugging furiously on it. “I really 
don’t! I just want out! If I don’t get this thing off me, I’m going to freak out. I’m 
serious!” 

Sabrina put a calming hand on her friend’s shoulder. “Okay. Okay. One 
more try. Then we’ll cut it off.” 

She narrowed her eyes as she examined the mask. “I should be able to reach 
underneath it and pull it away,” she said, thinking out loud. “If I slip my hands 
up through the neck, I can stretch it out and then push it up.” 

“Well, go ahead. Just hurry!” Carly Beth pleaded. 

But Sabrina didn’t move. Her dark eyes grew wide, and her mouth dropped 
open as she studied the mask. She uttered a soft gasp of surprise. 

“Sabrina? What’s the matter?” Carly Beth demanded. 

Sabrina didn’t reply. Instead, she ran her fingers over Carly Beth’s throat. 

Her astonished expression remained frozen on her face. She moved behind 
Carly Beth and ran her fingers along the back of Carly Beth’s neck. 

“What is it? What’s the matter?” Carly Beth demanded shrilly. 

Sabrina ran a hand back through her black hair. Her forehead wrinkled in 
concentration. “Carly Beth,” she said finally, “there’s something very weird 
going on here.” 

“What? What are you talking about?” Carly Beth demanded. 

“There’s no bottom to the mask.” 

“Huh?” Carly Beth’s hands shot up to her neck. She felt around frantically. 
“What do you mean?” 

“There’s no line,” Sabrina told her in a trembling voice. “There’s no line 
between the mask and your skin. No place to slip my hand in.” 

“But that’s crazy!” Carly Beth cried. She moved her hands to her throat, 
pushing up the skin, feeling for the bottom of the mask. “That’s crazy! Just 
crazy!” 

Sabrina raised her hands to her face, her features tight with horror. 

“That’s crazy! Crazy!” Carly Beth repeated in a high-pitched, frightened 
voice. 

But as her trembling fingers desperately explored her neck, Carly Beth 
realized that her friend was right. 

There was no longer a bottom to the mask. No place where the mask ended. 
No opening between the mask and Carly Beth’s skin. 

The mask had become her face. 

22 

Carly Beth’s legs trembled as she made her way to the mirror in the front 
entryway. Her hands still frantically searched her throat as she stepped up to the 
large, rectangular wall mirror and brought her face close to the glass. 

“No line!” she cried. “No mask line!” 

Sabrina stood a few feet back, her expression troubled. “I—I don’t 
understand it,” she muttered, staring at Carly Beth’s reflection. 

Carly Beth uttered a sharp gasp. “Those aren’t my eyes!” she screamed. 

“Huh?” Sabrina stepped up beside her, still staring into the mirror. 

“Those aren’t my eyes!” Carly Beth wailed. “My eyes don’t look like that.” 

“Try to calm down,” Sabrina urged softly. “Your eyes—” 

“They’re not mine! Not mine!” Carly Beth cried, ignoring her friend’s plea 
for calm. “Where are my eyes? Where am /? Where am I, Sabrina? This isn’t me 
in here!” 

“Carly Beth—please calm down!” Sabrina urged. But her voice came out 
choked and frightened. 

“It isn’t me!” Carly Beth declared, gaping in open-mouthed horror at her 
reflection, her hands pressed tightly against the grotesquely wrinkled cheeks of 
the mask. “It isn’t me!” 

Sabrina reached out to her friend. But Carly Beth pulled away. With a high- 
pitched wail, a cry of horror and despair, she flung herself through the hallway. 
She pulled open the front door, struggling with the lock, sobbing loudly. 

“Carly Beth—stop! Come back!” 

Ignoring Sabrina’s pleas, Carly Beth plunged back into the darkness. The 
storm door slammed behind her. 

As she began to run, she could hear Sabrina’s frantic cries from the 
doorway: “Carly Beth—your coat! Come back! You forgot your coat!” 

Carly Beth’s sneakers thudded over the hard ground. She ran into the 
darkness beneath the trees, as if trying to hide, as if trying to keep her hideous 
face from view. 

She reached the sidewalk, turned right, and kept running. 

She had no idea where she was going. She only knew she had to run away 
from Sabrina, away from the mirror. 

She wanted to run away from herself, away from her face, the hideous face 
that had stared back at her in the mirror with those frightening, unfamiliar eyes. 

Someone else’s eyes. Someone else’s eyes in her head. 

Only it was no longer her head. It was an ugly green monster head that had 
attached itself to hers. 

Uttering another cry of panic, Carly Beth crossed the street and kept 
running. The dark trees, black against the starless night sky, swayed and shivered 
overhead. Houses whirred past, a blur of orange light from their windows. 

Into the darkness she ran, breathing noisily through the ugly, flat nose. She 
lowered her smooth, green head against the wind and stared at the ground as she 
ran. 

But no matter where she turned her gaze, she saw the mask. She saw the 
face staring back at her, the ugly, puckered skin, the glowing orange eyes, the 
rows of jagged animal teeth. 

My face... my face... 

High-pitched screams startled her from her thoughts. 

Carly Beth glanced up to see that she had run into a group of trick or 
treaters. There were six or seven of them, all turned toward her, screaming and 
pointing. 

She opened her mouth wide, revealing the sharp fangs, and growled at 
them, a deep animal growl. 

The growl made them grow silent. They stared hard at her, trying to decide 
if she was threatening them or only kidding. 

“What are you supposed to be?” a girl in a red-and-white mffled clown 
costume called to her. 

I’m supposed to be ME, but I’m not! Carly Beth thought bitterly. 

She ignored the question. Lowering her head, turning away from them, she 
started to run again. 

She could hear them laughing now. They were laughing in relief, she knew, 
glad she was leaving them. 

With a bitter sob, she turned the corner and kept running. 

Where am I going? What am I doing? Am I going to keep running forever? 

The questions roared through her mind. 

She stopped short when the party store came into view. 

Of course, she thought. The party store. 

The strange man in the cape. He will help me. He will know what to do. 

The man in the cape will know how to get this mask off. 

Feeling a surge of hope, Carly Beth jogged toward the store. 

But as she neared it, her hope dimmed as dark as the store window. 
Through the glass she could see that all the lights were out. The store was as 
dark as the night. It was closed. 

23 

As she stared into the darkened store, a wave of despair swept over Carly Beth. 

Her hands raised against the window, she pressed her head against the glass. 
It felt cool against her hot forehead. The mask’s hot forehead. 

She closed her eyes. 

What do I do now? What am I going to do? 

“It’s all a bad dream,” she murmured out loud. “A bad dream. I’m going to 
open my eyes now, and wake up.” 

She opened her eyes. She could see her eyes, her glowing orange eyes, 
reflected in the dark window glass. 

She could see her grotesque face, staring darkly back at her. 

“Noooo!” With a shudder that shook her entire body, Carly Beth slammed 
her fists against the window. 

Why didn’t I wear my mother’s duck costume? 

she asked herself angrily. Why was I so determined to be the scariest 
creature that ever roamed on Halloween? Why was I so determined to terrify 
Chuck and Steve? 

She swallowed hard. Now I’m going to scare people for the rest of my life. 

As the bitter thoughts rolled through her mind, Carly Beth suddenly became 
aware of movement inside the store. She saw a dark shadow roll over the floor. 
She heard footsteps. 

The door rattled, then opened a few inches. 

The store owner poked his head out. His eyes narrowed as they studied 
Carly Beth. “I stayed late,” he said quietly. “I expected to see you again.” 

Carly Beth was startled by his calmness. “I—I can’t get it off!” she 
sputtered. She tugged at the top of her head to demonstrate. 

“I know,” the man said. His expression didn’t change. “Come inside.” He 
pushed the door open the rest of the way, then stepped back. 

Carly Beth hesitated, then walked quickly into the dark store. It was very 
warm inside. 

The owner turned on a single light above the front counter. He was no 
longer wearing the cape, Carly Beth saw. He wore black suit pants and a white 
dress shirt. 

“You knew I’d come back?” Carly Beth demanded shrilly. The raspy voice 
she had acquired inside the mask revealed both anger and confusion. “How did 
you know?” 

“I didn’t want to sell it to you,” he replied, staring at the mask. He shook his 
head, frowning. “You remember, don’t you? You remember that I didn’t want to 
sell it to you?” 

“I remember,” Carly Beth replied impatiently. “Just help me take it off. 
Okay? Help me.” 

He stared hard at her. He didn’t reply. 

“Help me take it off,” Carly Beth insisted, shouting. “I want you to take it 

off!” 

He sighed. “I can’t,” he told her sadly. “I can’t take it off. I’m really sorry.” 

24 

“Wh-what do you mean?” Carly Beth stammered. 

The store owner didn’t reply. He turned toward the back of the store and 
motioned for her to follow him. 

“Answer me!” Carly Beth shrieked. “Don’t walk away! Answer me! What 
do you mean the mask can’t be taken off?” 

She followed him into the back room, her heart pounding. He clicked on the 

light. 

Carly Beth blinked in the sudden brightness. The two long shelves of 
hideous masks came into focus. She saw a bare spot on the shelf where hers had 
stood. 

The grotesque masks all seemed to stare at her. She forced herself to look 
away from them. “Take this mask off—now!” she demanded, moving to block 
the store owner’s path. 

“I can’t remove it,” he repeated softly, almost sadly. 

“Why not?” Carly Beth demanded. 

He lowered his voice. “Because it isn’t a mask.” 

Carly Beth gaped at him. She opened her mouth, but no sound came out. 

“It isn’t a mask,” he told her. “It’s a real face.” 

Carly Beth suddenly felt dizzy. The floor tilted. The rows of ugly faces 
glared at her. All of the bulging, bloodshot, yellow and green eyes seemed to be 
trained on her. 

She pressed her back against the wall and tried to steady herself. 

The store owner walked over to the display shelf and gestured to the ugly, 
staring heads. “The Unloved,” he said sadly, his voice lowered to a whisper. 

“I—I don’t understand,” Carly Beth managed to choke out. 

“These are not masks. They are faces,” he explained. “Real faces. I made 
them. I created them in my lab—real faces.” 

“But—but they are so ugly—” Carly Beth started. “Why—?” 

“They weren’t ugly in the beginning,” he intermpted, his voice bitter, his 
eyes angry. “They were beautiful. And they were alive. But something went 
wrong. When they were taken out of the lab, they changed. My experiments— 
my poor heads—were a failure. But I had to keep them alive. I had to.” 

“I—I don’t believe it!” Carly Beth exclaimed breathlessly, raising her hands 
to the sides of her face, her green, distorted face. “I don’t believe any of it.” 

“I am telling the truth,” the store owner continued, running a finger over 
one side of his narrow mustache, his eyes burning into Carly Beth’s. “I keep 
them here. I call them The Unloved because no one will ever want to see them. 
Occasionally, someone wanders into the back room—you, for example—and 
one of my faces finds a new home....” 

“Nooooo!” Carly Beth uttered a cry of protest, more an animal wail than a 
human cry. 

She stared at the gnarled, twisted faces on the shelf. The bulging heads, the 
open wounds, the animal fangs. Monsters! All monsters! 

“Take this off!” she screamed, losing control. “Take this off! Take it off!” 

She began tearing frantically at her face, trying to pull it off, trying to rip it 
off in pieces. 

“Take it off! Take it off!” 

He raised a hand to quiet her. “I am sorry. The face is your face now,” he 
said without expression. 

“No!” Carly Beth shrieked again in her new, raspy voice. “Take it off! Take 
it off—NOW!” 

She tore at the face. But even in her anger and panic, she knew her actions 
were useless. 

“The face can be removed,” the store owner told her, speaking softly. 

“Huh?” Carly Beth lowered her hands. She stared hard at him. “What did 
you say?” 

“I said there is one way the face can be removed.” 

“Yes?” Carly Beth felt a powerful chill run down her back, a chill of hope. 
“Yes? How? Tell me!” she pleaded. “Please—tell me!” 

“I cannot do it for you,” he replied, frowning. “But I can tell you how. 
However, if it ever again attaches itself to you or to another person, it will be 
forever.” 

“How do I get it off? Tell me! Tell me!” Carly Beth begged. “How do I get 
it off?” 

25 

The light flickered overhead. The rows of bloated, distorted faces continued to 
stare at Carly Beth. 

Monsters, she thought. 

It’s a room full of monsters, waiting to come alive. 

And now I’m one of them. 

Now I’m a monster, too. 

The floorboards creaked as the store owner moved away from the display 
shelves and came up close to Carly Beth. 

“How do I get this off me?” she pleaded. “Tell me. Show me—now!” 

“It can only be removed once,” he repeated softly. “And it can only be 
removed by a symbol of love.” 

She stared at him, waiting for him to continue. 

The silence filled the room. Heavy silence. 

“I—I don’t understand,” Carly Beth stammered finally. “You’ve got to help 
me. I don’t understand you! Tell me something that makes sense! Help me!” 

“I can say no more,” he said, lowering his head, shutting his eyes, and 
wearily rubbing his eyelids with his fingers. 

“But—what do you mean by a symbol of love?” Carly Beth demanded. She 
grabbed the front of his shirt with both hands. “What do you mean? What do you 
mean?” 

He made no attempt to remove her hands. “I can say no more,” he repeated 
in a whisper. 

“No!” she shouted. “No! You have to help me! You have to!” 

She could feel her rage explode, could feel herself burst out of control—but 
she couldn’t stop herself. 

“I want my face back!” she shrieked, pounding on his chest with both fists. 
“I want my face back! I want myself back!” 

She was screaming at the top of her lungs now, but she didn’t care. 

The store owner backed away, motioning with both hands for her to be 
quiet. Then, suddenly, his eyes opened wide in fear. 

Carly Beth followed his gaze to the display shelves. 

“Ohh!” She uttered a startled cry of horror as she saw the rows of faces all 
begin to move. 

Bulging eyes blinked. Swollen tongues licked at dry lips. Dark wounds 
began to pulsate. 

The heads were all bobbing, blinking, breathing. 

“What—what is happening?” Carly Beth cried in a trembling whisper. 
“You’ve awakened them all!” he cried, his expression as frightened as hers. 
“But—but—” 

“Run!” he screamed, giving her a hard shove toward the doorway. “Run!” 

26 

Carly Beth hesitated. She turned back to stare at the heads bobbing on the 
shelves. 

Fat, dark lips began to move, making wet sucking sounds. Crooked fangs 
clicked up and down. Ugly, inhuman noses twitched and gasped air noisily. 

The heads, two long rows of them, throbbed to life. 

And the eyes—the blood-veined, bulging eyes—the green eyes, the sickly 
yellow eyes, the bright scarlet eyes, the disgusting eyeballs hanging by threads 
—they were all on her! 

“Run! You’ve awakened them!” the store owner screamed, his voice 
choked with fear. “Run! Get away from here!” 

Carly Beth wanted to run. But her legs wouldn’t cooperate. Her knees felt 
wobbly and weak. She suddenly felt as if she weighed a thousand pounds. 

“Run! Runl” The store owner repeated his frantic cry. 

But she couldn’t take her eyes off the throbbing, twitching heads. 

Carly Beth gaped at the hideous scene, frozen in terror, feeling her legs turn 
to Jell-O, feeling her breath catch in her throat. And as she watched, the heads 
rose up and floated into the air. 

“Run! Hurry! Run!” 

The store owner’s voice seemed far away now. 

The heads began to jabber in rumbling, deep voices, drowning out his 
frantic cries. They murmured excitedly, making only sounds, no words, like a 
chorus of frogs. 

Up, up, they floated, as Carly Beth stared in silent horror. 

“Run! Run!” 

Yes. 

She turned. She forced her legs to move. 

And with a burst of energy, she began to run. 

She ran through the dimly lit front room of the store. Her hands grabbed for 
the doorknob, and she pulled open the door. 

A second later, she was out on the sidewalk, running through the darkness. 
Her sneakers thudded loudly on the pavement. She felt a shock of cold air 
against her hot face. 

Her hot, green face. 

Her monster face. 

The monster face she could not remove. 

She crossed the street and kept running. 

What was that sound? That deep, gurgling sound? That low murmur that 
seemed to be following her? 

Following her? 

“Oh, no!” Carly Beth cried out as she glanced back—and saw the gruesome 
heads flying after her. 

A ghoulish parade. 

They flew in single file, one long chain of throbbing, jabbering heads. Their 
eyes glowed brightly, as bright as car headlights, and they were all trained on 
Carly Beth. 

Choked with fear, Carly Beth stumbled over the curb. 

Her arms shot forward as she struggled to regain her balance. Her legs 
wanted to collapse, but she forced them to move again. 

Bent into the wind, she ran, past dark houses and empty lots. 

It must be late, she realized. It must be very late. 

Too late. 

The words flashed into her mind. 

Too late for me. 

The hideous, glowing heads flew after her. Getting closer. Closer. The 
rumbling of their animal murmurs grew louder in her ears until the frightening 
sound seemed to surround her. 

The wind roared, gusting hard, as if deliberately pushing her back. 

The murmuring heads floated closer. 

I’m running through a dark nightmare, she thought. 

I may run forever. 

Too late. Too late for me. 

Or was it? 

An idea formed its way through her nightmarish panic. As she ran, her arms 
thrashing the air in front of her as if reaching for safety, her mind struggled for a 
solution, an escape. 

A symbol of love. 

She heard the store owner’s words over the rumble of ugly voices behind 

her. 

A symbol of love. 

That’s what it would take to rid her of the monster head that had become 
her own. 

Would it also stop the throbbing, glowing heads that pursued her? Would it 
send the faces of The Unloved back to where they came from? 

Gasping loudly for breath, Carly Beth turned the corner and kept running. 
Glancing back, she could see her chattering pursuers turn, too. 

Where am I? she wondered, turning her eyes to the houses she was passing. 

She had been too frightened to care where she ran. 

But, now, Carly Beth had an idea. A desperate idea. 

And she had to get there before the gruesome parade of heads caught up 
with her. 

She had a symbol of love. 

It was her head. The plaster of Paris head her mother had sculpted of her. 

Carly Beth remembered asking her mother why she had sculpted it. And her 
mother had replied, “Because I love you.” Maybe it could save her. Maybe it 
could help her out of this nightmare. 

But where was it? 

She had tossed it aside. She had let it fall behind a hedge. She had left it in 
someone’s yard, and— 

And now she was back on the block. 

She recognized the street. She recognized the houses. 

This was where she had met up with Chuck and Steve. This is where she 
had sent them running off in terror. 

But where was the house? Where was the hedge? 

Her eyes darted frantically from yard to yard. 

Behind her, she saw, the heads had swarmed together. Like buzzing bees, 
they had bunched together, grinning now, grinning hideous, wet grins as they 
prepared to close in on her. 

I’ve got to find the head! Carly Beth told herself, struggling to breathe, 
struggling to keep her aching legs moving. 

I’ve got to find my head. 

The rumbling, jabbering voices grew louder. The heads swarmed closer. 

“Where? Where?” she screamed aloud. 

And then she saw the tall hedge. Across the street. 

The yard across the street. 

The head, the beautiful head—she had let it fall behind that hedge. 

Could she get to it before the ugly heads swarmed over her? 

Yes! 

Sucking in a deep breath of air, her arms reaching out desperately in front 
of her, she turned and ran across the street. 

And dove behind the hedge. Onto her hands and knees. Her chest heaving. 
Her breath rasping. Her head pounding. 

She reached for the head. 

It was gone. 

27 

Gone. 

The head was gone. 

My last chance, Carly Beth thought, searching blindly, her hand thrashing 
frantically through the bottom of the hedge. 

Gone. 

Too late for me. 

Still on her knees, she turned to face her ghoulish pursuers. The heads, 
jabbering their mindless sounds, rose up in front of her, forming a wall. 

Carly Beth started to her feet. 

The throbbing wall of monster heads inched closer. 

She turned, searching for an escape route. 

And saw it. 

Saw her head. 

Saw the plaster of Paris head staring up at her from between two upraised 
roots on the big tree near the driveway. 

The wind must have blown it over there, she realized. 

And as the ugly heads bobbed closer, she dove for the tree. And grabbed the 
head with both hands. 

With a cry of triumph, she turned the sculpted face toward the jabbering 
heads and raised it high. 

“Go away! Go away!” Carly Beth screamed, holding the head up so they 
could all see it. “This is a symbol of love! This is a symbol of love! Go away!” 

The heads bobbed together. The glowing eyes stared at the sculpted head. 

They murmured excitedly. Wet smiles formed on their distorted lips. 

“Go away! Go away!” 

Carly Beth heard them laugh. Low, scornful laughter. 

Then they moved quickly, surrounding her, eager to swallow her up. 

28 

Too late for me. 

The words repeated in Carly Beth’s mind. 

Her idea had failed. 

The heads swarmed around her, drooled over her, eyes bulging gleefully in 
triumph. 

Their rumbling murmurs became a roar. She felt herself being swallowed 
up in their foul-smelling heat. 

Without thinking, she lowered the sculpted head. And pulled it down hard 
over her hideous monster head. 

To her surprise, it slid over her like a mask. 

I’m wearing my own face like a mask, she thought bitterly. 

As she pulled it over her, darkness descended. 

There were no eyeholes. She couldn’t see out. 

She couldn’t hear. 

What will the gruesome heads do to me? she wondered, alone with her fear. 

Will I become one of The Unloved now? 

Will I end up on display on a shelf along with them? 

Surrounded by the tight, silent darkness, Carly Beth waited. 

And waited. 

She could feel the blood pulsing at her temples. She could feel the throb of 
fear in her chest, the ache of her dry throat. 

What are they going to do? 

What are they doing ? 

She couldn’t bear being alone, shut in with her fear, surrounded by silence 
and the dark. 

With a hard tug, she pulled off the sculpted head. 

The gruesome heads were gone. 

Vanished. 

Carly Beth stared straight ahead in disbelief. Then her eyes darted around 
the shadowy lawn. She searched the trees and shrubs. She squinted into the dark 
spaces between the houses. 

Gone. 

They were gone. 

For a long moment, Carly Beth sat in the cold, wet grass, the sculpted head 
in her lap, breathing hard, staring across the silent, empty front yards. 

Soon her breathing returned to normal. She climbed to her feet. 

The wind had gentled. The pale half-moon slipped out from behind the dark 
clouds that had covered it. 

Carly Beth felt something flap against her throat. 

Startled, she reached up and felt the bottom of the mask. 

The bottom of the mask? 

Yes! 

There was a gap between the mask and her neck. 

“Hey!” she cried aloud. Setting the sculpted head down gently at her feet, 
she raised both hands to the bottom of the mask and pulled up. 

The mask came off easily. 

Stunned, she lowered it and held it in front of her. She folded it up, then 
unfolded it. 

The orange eyes that had glowed like fire had faded. The pointed animal 
fangs had become rubbery and limp. 

“You’re just a mask!” she cried aloud. “Just a mask again!” 

Laughing gleefully, she tossed it up in the air and caught it. 

It can be removed only once, the store owner had told her. 

Only once by a symbol of love. 

Well, I’ve done it! Carly Beth told herself happily. I’ve removed it. And 
don’t worry—I’ll never put it on again! 

Never! 

She suddenly felt exhausted. 

I’ve got to get home, she told herself. It’s probably close to midnight. 

Most of the houses were dark. There were no cars moving on the streets. 
The trick or treaters had all gone home. 

Carly Beth bent to pick up the sculpted head. Then, carrying the mask and 
the plaster head, she began walking quickly toward her house. 

Halfway up the driveway, she stopped. 

She reached up and examined her face with one hand. 

Do I have my old face back? she wondered. 

She rubbed her cheeks, then ran her fingers over her nose. 

Is it my old face? Do I look like me? 

She couldn’t tell just by touching. 

“I’ve got to get to a mirror!” she exclaimed out loud. 

Desperate to see if her face had returned to normal, she ran up to her front 
door and rang the bell. 

After a few seconds the door swung open, and Noah appeared. He pushed 
open the storm door. 

Then he raised his eyes to her face—and started to scream. 

“Take off that mask! Take it off! You’re so ugly!!” 

29 

“No!” Carly Beth cried in horror. 

The mask must have changed her face, she realized. 

“No! Oh, no!” 

She pushed past her brother, tossed down the head and the mask, and ran to 
the hallway mirror. 

Her face stared back at her. 

Perfectly normal. Her old face. Her good old face. 

Her dark brown eyes. Her broad forehead. Her snip of a nose, which she 
had always wished was longer. 

I’ll never complain about my nose again, she thought happily. 

Her face was normal again. All normal. 

As she stared at herself, she could hear Noah laughing at the doorway. 

She spun around angrily. “Noah—how could you?” 

He laughed harder. “It was just a joke. I can’t believe you fell for it.” 

“It was no joke to me!” Carly Beth exclaimed angrily. 

Her mother appeared at the end of the hall. “Carly Beth, where have you 
been? I expected you back an hour ago.” 

“Sorry, Mom,” Carly Beth replied, grinning. 

I’m so happy, I may never stop grinning! she thought. 

“It’s sort of a long story,” she told her mother. “Sort of a long, weird story.” 

“But you’re okay?” Mrs. Caldwell’s eyes narrowed as she studied her 
daughter. 

“Yeah. I’m okay,” Carly Beth said. 

“Come into the kitchen,” Mrs. Caldwell instructed her. “I have some nice 
hot cider for you.” 

Carly Beth obediently followed her mother to the kitchen. The kitchen was 
warm and bright. The sweet cider aroma filled the room. 

Carly Beth had never been so glad to be home in all her life. She hugged 
her mother, then took a seat at the counter. 

“Why didn’t you wear your duck costume?” Mrs. Caldwell asked, pouring 
out a cup of steaming cider. “Where have you been? Why weren’t you with 

Sabrina? Sabrina has called twice already, wondering what happened to you.” 
“Well...” Carly Beth began. “It’s sort of a long story, Mom.” 

“I’m not going anywhere,” her mother said, setting the cup of cider down in 
front of Carly Beth. She leaned against the counter, resting her chin in one hand. 
“Go ahead. Talk.” 

“Well...” Carly Beth hesitated. “Everything is fine now, Mom. Perfectly 
fine. But—” 

Before she could say another word, Noah burst into the room. 

“Hey, Carly Beth—” he called in a deep, raspy voice. “Look at me! How do 
I look in your mask?” 


BE CAREFUL WHAT 
YOU WISH FOR... 

1 

Judith Bellwood deliberately tripped me in math class. 

I saw her white sneaker shoot out into the aisle. Too late. 

I was carrying my notebook up to the chalkboard to put a problem on the 
board. My eyes were on the scrawls in my notebook. I’m not the neatest writer 
in the world. 

And before I could stop, I saw the white sneaker shoot out. I tripped over it 
and went sprawling to the floor, landing hard on my elbows and knees. Of course 
all the papers flew out of my notebook and scattered everywhere. 

And the whole class thought it was a riot. Everyone was laughing and 
cheering as I struggled to pull myself up. Judith and her pal, Anna Frost, laughed 
hardest of all. 

I landed on my funny bone, and the pain vibrated up and down my whole 
body. As I climbed to my feet and then bent to pick up my notebook papers, I 
knew my face was as red as a tomato. 

“Nice move, Sam!” Anna called, a big grin on her face. 

“Instant replay!” someone else shouted. 

I glanced up to see a triumphant glow in Judith’s green eyes. 

I’m the tallest girl in my seventh-grade class. No. Correct that. I’m the 
tallest kid in my seventh-grade class. I’m at least two inches taller than my 
friend, Cory Blinn, and he’s the tallest guy. 

I’m also the biggest klutz who ever stumbled over the face of the earth. I 
mean, just because I’m tall and slender doesn’t mean I have to be graceful. And 
believe me, I’m not. 

But why is it such a riot when I stumble over a wastebasket or drop my tray 
in the lunchroom or trip over someone’s foot in math class? 

Judith and Anna are just cruel, that’s all. 

I know they both call me “Stork” behind my back. Cory told me they do. 

And Judith is always making fun of my name, which is Byrd. Samantha 
Byrd. “Why don’t you fly away, Byrd!” That’s what she’s always saying to me. 
Then she and Anna laugh as if that’s the funniest joke they’ve ever heard. 

“Why don’t you fly away, Byrd!” 

Ha-ha. Big joke. 

Cory says that Judith is just jealous of me. But that’s stupid. I mean, why 
should Judith be jealous? She’s not nine feet tall. She’s about five-two, perfect 
for a twelve-year-old. She’s graceful. She’s athletic. And she’s really pretty, with 
pale, creamy skin, big green eyes, and wavy, copper-colored hair down to her 
shoulders. 

So what’s to be jealous about? 

I think Cory is just trying to make me feel better—and doing a lousy job of 
it. 

Anyway, I gathered all my papers together and shoved them back into the 
notebook. Sharon asked if I was okay. (Sharon is my teacher. We call all the 
teachers by their first names here at Montrose Middle School.) 

I muttered that I was fine, even though my elbow was throbbing like crazy. 
And I copied the problem onto the board. 

The chalk squeaked, and everyone groaned and complained. I can’t help it. 
I’ve never been able to write on the board without squeaking the chalk. 

It isn’t such a big deal —is it? 

I heard Judith whisper some crack about me to Anna, but I couldn’t hear 
what it was. I glanced up from the problem to see the two of them snickering and 
smirking at me. 

And wouldn’t you know it—I couldn’t solve the problem. I had something 
wrong with the equation, and I couldn’t figure out what. 

Sharon stepped up behind me, her skinny arms crossed over her ugly 
chartreuse sweater. She moved her lips as she read what I had written, trying to 
see where I had gone wrong. 

And of course Judith raised her hand and called out, “I see the problem, 
Sharon. Byrd can’t add. Four and two is six, not five.” 

I could feel myself blushing again. 

Where would I be without Judith to point out my mistakes to the whole 
class? 

Everyone was laughing again. Even Sharon thought it was funny. 

And I had to stand there and take it. Good old Samantha, the class klutz. 
The class idiot. 

My hand was shaking as I erased my stupid mistake and wrote in the right 
numbers. 

I was so angry. At Judith. And at myself. 

But I kept it together as I walked—carefully—back to my seat. I didn’t 

even glance at Judith as I walked past her. 

I kept it together until Home Ec. class that afternoon. 
Then it got ugly. 

2 

Daphne is our teacher in Home Ec. I like Daphne. She is a big, jolly woman with 
several chins and a great sense of humor. 

The rumor is that Daphne always makes us bake cakes and pies and 
brownies so that she can eat them all after we leave the class. 

That’s kind of mean, I think. But it’s probably a little bit true. 

We have Home Ec. right after lunch, so we’re never very hungry. Most of 
what we make wouldn’t make good dog food, anyway. So it mostly gets left in 
the Home Ec. room. 

I always look forward to the class. Partly because Daphne is a fun teacher. 
And partly because it’s the one class where there’s no homework. 

The only bad thing about Home Ec. class is that Judith is in it, too. 

Judith and I had a little run-in in the lunchroom. I sat down at the far end of 
the table, as far away from her as I could get. But I still heard her telling a couple 
of eighth-graders, “Byrd tried to fly in math class.” 

Everyone laughed and stared at me. 

“You tripped me, Judith!” I shouted angrily. My mouth was full of egg 
salad, which dribbled down my chin when I shouted. 

And everyone laughed at me again. 

Judith said something, which I couldn’t hear over all the noise in the 
lunchroom. She smirked at me and tossed her red hair behind her shoulders. 

I started to get up and go over to her. I don’t know what I was thinking of 
doing. But I was so angry, I wasn’t thinking too clearly. 

Luckily, Cory appeared across the table. He dropped his lunch down on the 
table, turned the chair around backwards the way he always does, and sat down. 

“What’s four plus two?” he teased. 

“Forty-two,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “Do you believe Judith?” I asked 
bitterly. 

“Of course I believe Judith,” he said, pulling open his brown lunchbag. 
“Judith is Judith.” 

“What’s that supposed to mean?” I snapped. 

He shrugged. A grin broke out across his face. “I don’t know.” 

Cory is kind of cute. He has dark brown eyes that sort of crinkle up in the 

comers, a nose that’s a little too long, and a funny, crooked smile. 

He has great hair, but he never brushes it. So he never takes off his cap. It’s 
an Orlando Magic cap, even though he doesn’t know or care about the team. He 
just likes the cap. 

He peeked into his lunchbag and made a face. 

“Again?” I asked, wiping egg salad off the front of my T-shirt with a 
napkin. 

“Yeah. Again,” he replied glumly. He pulled out the same lunch his father 
packed for him every single morning. A grilled cheese sandwich and an orange. 
“Yuck!” 

“Why does your dad give you grilled cheese every day?” I asked. “Didn’t 
you tell him it gets cold and slimy by lunchtime?” 

“I told him,” Cory groaned, picking up one half of the sandwich in one 
hand and examining it as if it were some sort of science lab specimen. “He said 
it’s good protein.” 

“How can it be good protein if you throw it in the trash every day?” I asked. 

Cory grinned his crooked grin. “I didn’t tell him that I throw it in the trash 
every day.” He shoved the rubbery sandwich back into the bag and started to 
peel the orange. 

“It’s a good thing you came by,” I said, swallowing the last bite of my egg 
salad sandwich. “I was about to get up and go murder Judith over there.” 

We both glanced down the table. Judith and the two eighth-graders had their 
chairs tilted back and were laughing about something. One of the eighth-graders 
had a magazine, People magazine, I think, and she was showing a picture in it to 
the others. 

“Don’t murder Judith,” Cory advised, still peeling the orange. “You’ll get 
into trouble.” 

I laughed, scornful laughter. “You kidding? I’d get an award.” 

“If you murder Judith, your basketball team will never win another game,” 
Cory said, concentrating on the orange. 

“Ooh, that’s cruel!” I exclaimed. I tossed my balled-up aluminum foil at 
him. It bounced off his chest and dropped to the floor. 

He was right, of course. Judith was the best player on our team, the 
Montrose Mustangs. She was the only good player. She could dribble really well 
without getting the ball tangled up in her legs. And she had a great shooting eye. 

I, of course, was the worst player on the team. 

I admit it. I’m a total klutz, as I’ve said, which doesn’t get you very far on 
the basketball court. 

I really hadn’t wanted to be on the Mustangs. I knew I’d stink. 

But Ellen insisted. Ellen is the girls’ basketball coach. Ellen insisted I be on 
the team. 

“Sam, you’re so tall!” she told me. “You’ve got to play basketball. You’re a 
natural!” 

Sure, I’m a natural. A natural klutz. 

I can’t shoot at all, not even foul shots. Especially not foul shots. 

And I can’t run without tripping over my own Reeboks. And my hands are 
small, even though the rest of me isn’t, so I’m not too good at passing or 
catching the ball. 

I think Ellen has learned her lesson: Tall ain’t all. 

But now she’s too embarrassed to take me off the team. And I keep at it. I 
work hard at practice. I mean, I keep thinking I’ll get better. I couldn’t get any 
worse. 

If only Judith wasn’t such a hotshot. 

And if only she was nicer to me. 

But, as Cory put it, “Judith is Judith.” She’s always yelling at me during 
practice, and making fun of me, and making me feel two feet tall (which I 
sometimes wish I were)! 

“Byrd, why don’t you give us a break and fly away!” 

If she says that one more time, I’ll punch out her lights. I really will. 

“What are you thinking about, Sam?” Cory’s voice broke into my bitter 
thoughts. 

“About Judith, of course,” I muttered. “Miss Perfect.” 

“Hey, stop,” he said, pulling apart the orange sections. “You have good 
qualities, too, you know.” 

“Oh, really?” I snapped. “What are my good qualities? That I’m tall?” 

“No.” He finally popped an orange section into his mouth. I never saw 
anyone take so long to eat an orange! “You’re also smart,” he said. “And you’re 
funny.” 

“Thanks a bunch,” I replied, frowning. 

“And you’re very generous,” he added. “You’re so generous, you’re going 
to give me that bag of potato chips, right?” He pounced on it before I could grab 
it away from him. 

I knew there was a reason for his compliments. 

I watched Cory stuff down my potato chips. He didn’t even offer me one. 

Then the bell rang, and I hurried to Home Ec. 

Where I totally lost it. 

What happened was this: We were making tapioca pudding. And it was 
really messy. 

We all had big orange mixing bowls, and the ingredients were spread out on 
the long table next to the stove. 

I was busily stirring mine. It was nice and gloppy, and it made this great 
glop glop sound as I stirred it with a long wooden spoon. 

My hands were sticky for some reason. I had probably spilled some of the 
pudding on them. So I stopped to wipe them on my apron. 

I was being pretty neat—for me. There were only a few yellow puddles of 
pudding on my table. Most of it was actually in the mixing bowl. 

I finished stirring and, when I looked up, there was Judith. 

I was a little surprised because she had been working on the other side of 
the room by the windows. We generally keep as far apart from each other as 
possible. 

Judith had this odd smile on her face. And as she approached me, she 
pretended to trip. 

I swear she only pretended to trip! 

And she spilled her whole mixing bowl of tapioca onto my shoes. 

My brand-new blue Doc Martens. 

“Oops!” she said. 

That’s all. Just “Oops.” 

I looked down at my brand-new shoes covered in gloppy yellow pudding. 

And that’s when I lost it. 

I uttered an angry roar and went for Judith’s throat. 

I didn’t plan it or anything. I think it was temporary insanity. 

I just reached out both hands and grabbed Judith by the throat, and began to 
strangle her. 

I mean, they were brand-new shoes ! 

Judith started struggling and tried to scream. She pulled my hair and tried to 
scratch me. 

But I held onto her throat and roared some more, like an angry tiger. 

And Daphne had to pull us apart. 

She pulled me away by the shoulders, then thrust her wide body between 
us, blocking our view of each other. 

I was panting loudly. My chest was heaving up and down. 

“Samantha! Samantha! What were you doing?” I think that’s what Daphne 
was screaming. 

I couldn’t really hear her. I had this roaring in my ears, loud as a waterfall. I 
think it was just my anger. 

Before I knew it, I had pushed myself away from the table and was running 
out of the room. I ran out into the empty hall—and stopped. 

I didn’t know what to do next. I was so angry. 

If I had three wishes, I told myself, I know what they would be: Destroy 
Judith! Destroy Judith! Destroy Judith! 

Little did I know that I would soon get my wish. 

All three of them. 

3 

Daphne made Judith and me shake hands and apologize to each other after she 
dragged me back into the classroom. I had to do it. It was either that or be tossed 
out of school. 

“It really was an accident,” Judith muttered under her breath. “What’s your 
problem, Byrd?” 

Not much of an apology, if you ask me. 

But I shook hands with her. I didn’t need my parents being called to school 
because their daughter had tried to strangle a classmate. 

And I showed up—reluctantly—for basketball practice after school. I knew 
if I didn’t show, Judith would tell everyone that she had scared me away. 

I showed up because I knew Judith didn’t want me to. Which I think is as 
good a reason as any. 

Also, I needed the exercise. I needed to run back and forth across the court 
a few hundred times to get the anger out. I needed to sweat out the frustration 
from not being able to finish strangling Judith. 

“Let’s do some fast laps,” Ellen suggested. 

Some of the other girls groaned, but I didn’t. I started running before Ellen 
even blew her whistle. 

We were all in shorts and sleeveless T-shirts. Ellen wore gray sweats that 
were baggy in all the wrong places. She had frizzy red hair, and she was so 
straight and skinny, she looked sort of like a kitchen match. 

Ellen wasn’t very athletic. She told us she coached girls’ basketball because 
they paid her extra, and she needed the money. 

After running our laps around the gym, practice went pretty much as usual. 

Judith and Anna passed the ball to each other a lot. And they both took a lot 
of shots—jump shots, lay-ups, even hook shots. 

The others tried to keep up with them. 

I tried not to be noticed. 

I was still simmering about the tapioca pudding disaster and wanted as little 
contact with Judith—or anyone —as possible. I mean, I was really feeling glum. 

And watching Judith sink a twenty-foot jumper, catch her own rebound, and 
scoop a perfect two-handed shovel pass to Anna wasn’t helping to cheer me up 

one bit. 

Of course, things got worse. 

Anna actually passed the ball to me. I muffed it. It bounced off my hands, 
hit me in the forehead, and rolled away. 

“Heads up, Byrd!” I heard Ellen cry. 

I kept running. I tried not to look upset that I had blown my first 
opportunity of the practice. 

A few minutes later, I saw the ball flying toward me again, and I heard 
Judith shout, “Get this one, Stork!” 

I was so startled that she had called me “Stork” to my face that I caught the 
ball. I started to dribble to the basket—and Anna reached a hand in and easily 
stole the ball. She spun around and sent an arching shot to the basket, which 
nearly went in. 

“Nice steal, Anna!” Ellen cried. 

Breathing hard, I turned angrily to Judith. “What did you call me?” 

Judith pretended she didn’t hear me. 

Ellen blew the whistle. “Fast breaks!” she shouted. 

We practiced fast breaks three at a time. Dribbling fast, we’d pass the ball 
back and forth. Then the one under the hoop with the ball was supposed to take 
the shot. 

I need to practice slow breaks! I thought to myself. 

I had no trouble keeping up with the others. I mean, I had the longest legs, 
after all. I could run fast enough. I just couldn’t do anything else while I was 
mnning. 

As Judith, Anna, and I came roaring down the court, I prayed I wouldn’t 
make a total fool of myself. Sweat poured down my forehead. My heart was 
racing. 

I took a short pass from Anna, dribbled under the basket, and took a shot. 
The ball flew straight up in the air, then bounced back to the floor. It didn’t even 
come close to the backboard. 

I could hear girls laughing on the sidelines. Judith and Anna had their usual 
superior smirks on their faces. “Good eye!” Judith called, and everyone laughed 
some more. 

After twenty minutes of fast-break torture, Ellen blew her whistle. 
“Scrimmage,” she called out. That was the signal for us to divide into two teams 
and play each other. 

I sighed, wiping perspiration off my forehead with the back of my hand. I 
tried to get into the game. I concentrated hard, mainly on not messing up. But I 
was pretty discouraged. 

Then, a few minutes into the game, Judith and I both dove for the ball at the 
same time. 

Somehow, as I dove, my arms outstretched, Judith’s knee came up hard— 
and plunged like a knife into my chest. 

The pain shot through my entire body. 

I tried to cry out. But I couldn’t make a sound. 

I uttered a weird, gasping noise, sort of like the honk of a sick seal—and 
realized I couldn’t breathe. 

Everything turned red. Bright, shimmering red. 

Then black. 

I knew I was going to die. 

4 

Having your breath knocked out has to be the worst feeling in the world. It’s just 
so scary. You try to breathe, and you can’t. And the pain just keeps swelling, like 
a balloon being blown up right inside your chest. 

I really thought I was dead meat. 

Of course I was perfectly okay a few minutes later. I still felt a little shaky, 
a little dizzy. But I was basically okay. 

Ellen insisted that one of the girls walk me to the locker room. Naturally, 
Judith volunteered. As we walked, she apologized. She said it had been an 
accident. Totally an accident. 

I didn’t say anything. I didn’t want her to apologize. I didn’t want to talk to 
her at all. I just wanted to strangle her again. 

This time for good. 

I mean, how much can one girl take in a day? Judith had tripped me in math 
class, dumped her disgusting tapioca pudding all over my new Doc Martens in 
Home Ec, and kicked me unconscious in basketball practice. 

Did I really have to smile and accept her apology now? 

No way! No way in a million years. 

I trudged silently to the locker room, my head bent, my eyes on the floor. 

When she saw that I wasn’t going to buy her cheap apology, Judith got 
angry. Do you believe that? She shoves her knee through my chest—then she 
gets angry! 

“Why don’t you just fly away, Byrd!” she muttered. Then she went trotting 
back to the gym floor. 

I got changed without showering. Then I collected my stuff, and slunk out 
of the building, and got my bike. 

That’s really the last straw, I thought, walking my bike across the parking 
lot in back of school. 

It was about half an hour later. The late afternoon sky was gray and 
overcast. I felt a few light drops of rain on my head. 

The last straw, I repeated to myself. 

I live two blocks from the school, but I didn’t feel like going home. I felt 
like riding and riding and riding. I felt like just going straight and never turning 

back. 

I was angry and upset and shaky. But mainly angry. 

Ignoring the raindrops, I climbed onto my bike and began pedaling in the 
direction away from my house. Front yards and houses went by in a whir. I 
didn’t see them. I didn’t see anything. 

I pedaled harder and harder. It felt so good to get away from school. To get 
away from Judith. 

The rain started to come down a little harder. I didn’t mind. I raised my face 
to the sky as I pedaled. The raindrops felt cold and refreshing on my hot skin. 

When I looked down, I saw that I had reached Jeffers’ Woods, a long stretch 
of trees that divides my neighborhood from the next. 

A narrow bike path twisted through the tall, old trees, which were winter 
bare and looked sort of sad and lonely without their leaves. Sometimes I took the 
path, seeing how fast I could ride over its curves and bumps. 

But the sky was darkening, the black clouds hovering lower. And I saw a 
glimmering streak of lightning in the sky over the trees. 

I decided I’d better turn around and ride home. 

But as I turned, someone stepped in front of me. 

A woman! 

I gasped, startled to see someone on this empty road by the woods. 

I squinted at her as the rain began to fall harder, pattering on the pavement 
around me. She wasn’t young, and she wasn’t old. She had dark eyes, like two 
black coals, on a pale, white face. Her thick, black hair flowed loosely behind 
her. 

Her clothing was sort of old-fashioned. She had a bright red, heavy woolen 
shawl pulled around her shoulders. She wore a long black skirt down to her 
ankles. 

Her dark eyes seemed to light up as she met my stare. 

She looked confused. 

I should have run. 

I should have pedaled away from her as fast as I could. 

If only I had known... 

But I didn’t flee. I didn’t escape. 

Instead, I smiled at her. “Can I help you?” I asked. 

5 

The woman’s eyes narrowed. I could see she was checking me out. 

I lowered my feet to the ground, balancing the bike between my legs. The 
rain pattered on the pavement, big cold drops. 

I suddenly remembered I had a hood on my windbreaker. So I reached up 
behind my head and slipped it over my hair. 

The sky darkened to an eerie olive color. The bare trees in the woods 
shivered in a swirling breeze. 

The woman took a few steps closer. She was so pale, I thought. Almost 
ghostlike, except for the deep, dark eyes that were staring so hard at me. 

“I—I seem to have lost my way,” she said. To my surprise, she had an old 
woman’s voice, sort of shaky and frail. 

I squinted at her from under my hood. The rain was matting her thick, black 
hair to her head. It was impossible to tell how old she was. She could have been 
twenty or sixty! 

“This is Montrose Avenue,” I told her, speaking loudly because of the 
drumming of the raindrops. “Actually, Montrose ends here. At the woods.” 

She nodded thoughtfully, pursing her pale lips. “I am trying to get to 
Madison,” she said. “I think I have completely lost my direction.” 

“You’re pretty far from Madison,” I said. “It’s way over there.” I pointed. 

She chewed at her lower lip. “I’m usually pretty good at directions,” she 
said fretfully in her shaky voice. She adjusted the heavy red shawl over her 
slender shoulders. 

“Madison is way over on the east side,” I said with a shiver. The rain was 
cold. I was eager to go home and get into some dry clothes. 

“Can you take me there?” the woman asked. She grabbed my wrist. 

I almost gasped out loud. Her hand was as cold as ice! 

“Can you take me there?” she repeated, bringing her face close to mine. “I 
would be ever so grateful.” 

She had taken her hand away. But I could still feel the icy grip on my wrist. 

Why didn’t I run away? 

Why didn’t I raise my feet to the pedals and ride out of there as fast as I 
could? 

“Sure. I’ll show you where it is,” I said. 

“Thank you, dear.” She smiled. She had a dimple in one cheek when she 
smiled. I realized she was kind of pretty, in an old-fashioned way. 

I climbed off my bike and, holding onto the handlebars, began to walk it. 
The woman stepped beside me, adjusting her shawl. She walked in the middle of 
the street, her eyes trained on me. 

The rain continued to come down. I saw another jagged bolt of lightning far 
away in the olive sky. The swirling wind made my windbreaker flap against my 
legs. 

“Am I going too fast?” I asked. 

“No, dear. I can keep up,” she replied with a smile. She had a small purple 
bag slung over her shoulder. She protected the bag by tucking it under her arm. 

She wore black boots under the long skirt. The boots, I saw, had tiny 
buttons running up the sides. The boots clicked on the wet pavement as we 
walked. 

“I am sorry to be so much trouble,” the woman said, again pursing her lips 
fretfully. 

“No trouble,” I replied. My good deed for the day, I thought, brushing a 
drop of rain off my nose. 

“I love the rain,” she said, raising her hands to it, letting the raindrops 
splash her open palms. “Without the rain, what would wash the evil away?” 

That’s a weird thing to say, I thought. I muttered a reply. I wondered what 
evil she was talking about. 

Her long, black hair was completely soaked, but she didn’t seem to mind. 
She walked quickly with long, steady strides, swinging one hand as she walked, 
protecting the purple bag under the other arm. 

A few blocks later, the handlebars slipped out of my hands. My bike 
toppled over, and the pedal scraped my knee as I tried to grab the bike before it 
fell. 

What a klutz! 

I pulled the bike up and began walking it again. My knee throbbed. I 
shivered. The wind blew the rain into my face. 

What am I doing out here? I asked myself. 

The woman kept walking quickly, a thoughtful expression on her face. “It’s 
quite a rain,” she said, gazing up at the dark clouds. “This is so nice of you, 
dear.” 

“It isn’t too far out of my way,” I said politely. Just eight or ten blocks! 

“I don’t know how I could have gone so far astray,” she said, shaking her 
head. “I was sure I was headed in the right direction. Then when I came to those 
woods...” 

“We’re almost there,” I said. 

“What is your name?” she asked suddenly. 

“Samantha,” I told her. “But everyone calls me Sam.” 

“My name is Clarissa,” she offered. “I’m the Crystal Woman.” 

I wasn’t sure I’d heard that last part correctly. I puzzled over it, then let it 
slip from my mind. 

It was late, I realized. Mom and Dad might already be home from work. 
Even if they weren’t, my brother, Ron, was probably home, wondering where I 
was. 

A station wagon rolled toward us, its headlights on. I shielded my eyes from 
the bright lights and nearly dropped my bike again. 

The woman was still walking in the center of the street. I moved toward the 
curb so she could move out of the station wagon’s path. But she didn’t seem to 
care about it. She kept walking straight, her expression not changing, even 
though the bright headlights were in her face. 

“Look out!” I cried. 

I don’t know if she heard me. 

The station wagon swerved to avoid her and honked its horn as it rolled by. 

She smiled warmly at me as we kept walking. “So good of you to care 
about a total stranger,” she said. 

The streetlights flashed on suddenly. They made the wet street glow. The 
bushes and hedges, the grass, the sidewalks—everything seemed to glow. It all 
looked unreal. 

“Here we are. This is Madison,” I said, pointing to the street sign. Finally! I 
thought. 

I just wanted to say good-bye to this strange woman and pedal home as fast 
as I could. 

Lightning flickered. Closer this time. 

What a dreary day, I thought with a sigh. 

Then I remembered Judith. 

The whole miserable day suddenly rolled through my mind again. I felt a 
wave of anger sweep over me. 

“Which way is east?” the woman asked, her shaky voice breaking into my 
bitter thoughts. 

“East?” I gazed both ways on Madison, trying to clear Judith from my 
mind. I pointed. 

The wind picked up suddenly, blowing a sheet of rain against me. I 
tightened my grip on the handlebars. 

“You are so kind,” the woman said, wrapping the shawl around her. Her 
dark eyes stared hard into mine. “So kind. Most young people aren’t kind like 
you.” 

“Thank you,” I replied awkwardly. The cold made me shiver again. 
“Well... good-bye.” I started to climb onto my bike. 

“No. Wait,” she pleaded. “I want to repay you.” 

“Huh?” I uttered. “No. Really. You don’t have to.” 

“I want to repay you,” the woman insisted. She grabbed my wrist again. 
And again I felt a shock of cold. 

“You’ve been so kind,” the woman repeated. “So kind to a total stranger.” 

I tried to free my wrist, but her grip was surprisingly tight. “You don’t have 
to thank me,” I said. 

“I want to repay you,” she replied, bringing her face close to mine, still 
holding onto my wrist. “Tell you what. I’ll grant you three wishes.” 

6 

She’s crazy, I realized. 

I stared into those coal black eyes. Rainwater trickled from her hair, down 
the sides of her pale face. I could feel the coldness of her hand, even through the 
sleeve of my windbreaker. 

The woman is crazy, I thought. 

I’ve been walking through the pouring rain for twenty minutes with a crazy 
person. 

“Three wishes,” the woman repeated, lowering her voice as if not wanting 
to be overheard by anyone. 

“No. Thanks. I’ve really got to get home,” I said. I tugged my wrist from 
her grasp and turned to my bike. 

“I’ll grant you three wishes,” the woman repeated. “Anything you wish 
shall come true.” She moved the purple bag in front of her and carefully pulled 
something from it. It was a glass ball, bright red, the size of a large grapefruit. It 
sparkled despite the darkness around us. 

“That’s nice of you,” I said, wiping water off the bike seat with my hand. 
“But I don’t really have any wishes right now.” 

“Please—let me repay you for your kindness,” the woman insisted. She 
raised the gleaming red ball in one hand. Her hand was small and as pale as her 
face, the fingers bony. “I really do want to repay you.” 

“My—uh—mom will be worried,” I said, glancing up and down the street. 

No one in sight. 

No one to protect me from this lunatic if she turned dangerous. 

Just how crazy was she? I wondered. Could she be dangerous? Was I 
making her angry by not playing along, by not making a wish? 

“It isn’t a joke,” the woman said, reading the doubt in my eyes. “Your 
wishes will come true. I promise you.” She narrowed her gaze. The red ball 
suddenly glowed brighter. “Make your first wish, Samantha.” 

I stared back at her, thinking hard. I was cold and wet and hungry—and a 
little frightened. I just wanted to get home and get dry. 

What if she won’t let me go? 

What if I can’t get rid of her? What if she follows me home? 

Again, I searched up and down the block. Most of the houses had lights on. 
I could probably run to the nearest one and get help if I needed it. 

But, I decided, it might be easier just to play along with the crazy woman 
and make a wish. 

Maybe that would satisfy her, and she’d go on her way and let me go home. 

“What is your wish, Samantha?” she demanded. Her black eyes glowed red, 
the same color as the gleaming ball in her hand. 

She suddenly looked very old. Ancient. Her skin was so pale and tight, I 
thought I could see her skull underneath. 

I froze. 

I couldn’t think of a wish. 

And then I blurted out, “My wish is... to be the strongest player on my 
basketball team!” 

I don’t know why I said that. I guess I was just nervous. And I had Judith 
on my mind and all that had happened that day, ending up with the disaster at 
basketball practice. 

And so that was my wish. Of course I immediately felt like a total jerk. I 
mean, of all the things to wish for in the world, why would anyone pick that? 

But the woman didn’t seem at all surprised. 

She nodded, closing her eyes for a moment. The red ball glowed brighter, 
brighter, until the fiery red radiated around me. Then it quickly faded. 

Clarissa thanked me again, turned, tucked the glass ball back in the purple 
bag, and began walking quickly away. 

I breathed a sigh of relief. I was so glad she was gone! 

I jumped on my bike, turned it around, and began pedaling furiously toward 
home. 

A perfect end to a perfect day, I thought bitterly. 

Trapped in the rain with a crazy woman. 

And the wish? 

I knew it was totally stupid. 

I knew I’d never have to think about it again. 

7 

I found myself thinking about the wish at dinner. 

I couldn’t get over the way the crystal ball had glowed that strange red 
color. 

Mom was trying to get me to take another helping of mashed potatoes, and 
I was refusing. They were the kind from a box—you know, potato flakes, or 
something—and didn’t taste at all like real mashed potatoes. 

“Sam, you’ve got to eat more if you want to grow big and strong,” Mom 
said, holding the potato serving bowl under my nose. 

“Mom, I don’t want to grow anymore!” I exclaimed. “I’m already taller 
than you are, and I’m only twelve!” 

“Please don’t shout,” Dad said, reaching for the string beans. Canned string 
beans. Mom gets home from work late and doesn’t have time to make any real 
food. 

“I was tall when I was twelve,” Mom said thoughtfully. She passed the 
potatoes to Dad. 

“And then you shrunk!” Ron exclaimed, snickering. My older brother 
thinks he’s a riot. 

“I just meant I was tall for my age,” Mom said. 

“Well, I’m too tall for my age,” I grumbled. “I’m too tall for any age!” 

“In a few years you won’t be saying that,” Mom told me. 

When she looked away, I reached under the table and fed some string beans 
to Punkin. Punkin is my dog, a little brown mutt. He’ll eat anything. 

“Are there more meatballs?” Dad asked. He knew there were. He just 
wanted Mom to get up and get them for him. 

Which she did. 

“How was basketball practice?” Dad asked me. 

I made a face and gave a double thumbs-down. 

“She’s too tall for basketball,” Ron mumbled with a mouth full of food. 

“Basketball takes stamina,” Dad said. Sometimes I can’t figure out why 
Dad says half the things he says. 

I mean, what am / supposed to say to that? 

I suddenly thought of the crazy woman and the wish I had made. “Hey, 

Ron, want to shoot a few baskets after dinner?” I asked, poking my string beans 
around on the plate with my fork. 

We have a hoop on the front of the garage and floodlights to light up the 
driveway. Ron and I play a little one-on-one sometimes after dinner. 

You know. To unwind before starting our homework. 

Ron glanced out of the dining room window. “Did it stop raining?” 

“Yeah. It stopped,” I told him. “About half an hour ago.” 

“It’ll still be real wet,” he said. 

“A few puddles won’t ruin your game,” I told him, laughing. 

Ron’s a really good basketball player. He’s a natural athlete. So of course he 
has almost no interest at all in playing with me. He’d rather stay up in his room 
reading a book. Any book. 

“I’ve got a lot of homework,” Ron said, pushing his black-framed glasses 
up on his nose. 

“Just a few minutes,” I pleaded. “Just a little shooting practice.” 

“Help your sister,” Dad urged. “You can give her some pointers.” 

Ron reluctantly agreed. “But only for a few minutes.” He glanced out the 
window again. “We’re going to get soaked.” 

“I’ll bring a towel,” I said, grinning. 

“Don’t let Punkin out,” Mom said. “He’ll get his paws all wet and track 
mud on the floor.” 

“I can’t believe we’re doing this,” Ron grumbled. 

I knew it was stupid, but I had to see if my wish had come true. 

Would I suddenly be a great basketball player? 

Would I suddenly be able to outshoot Ron? To actually throw the basketball 
into the basket? 

Would I be able to dribble without stumbling? To pass the ball in the 
direction I wanted? To catch the ball without it bouncing off my chest? 

I kept scolding myself for even thinking about the wish. 

It was so dumb. So totally dumb. 

Just because a crazy woman offers to grant three wishes, I told myself, 
doesn’t mean that you have to get all excited and think you’re instantly going to 
turn into Michael Jordan! 

Still, I couldn’t wait to play with Ron. 

Was I in for a big surprise? 

8 

Yes. I was in for a surprise. 

My shooting was actually worse ! 

The first two times I tossed the ball at the hoop, I missed the garage entirely 
and had to go chase the ball over the wet grass. 

Ron laughed. “I see you’ve been practicing!” he teased. 

I gave him a hard shove in the stomach with the wet basketball. He 
deserved it. It wasn’t funny. 

I was so disappointed. 

I told myself over and over that wishes don’t come true, especially wishes 
granted by crazy women out wandering in the rain. 

But I couldn’t help but get my hopes up. 

I mean, Judith and Anna and the other girls on the team were so mean to 
me. It would be totally terrific to come to the game against Jefferson Elementary 
tomorrow and suddenly be the star of the team. 

The star. Ha-ha. 

Ron dribbled the ball to the hoop and made an easy lay-up. He caught his 
own rebound and passed the ball to me. 

It sailed through my hands and bounced down the driveway. I started 
running after it, slipped on the wet surface, and fell face down into a puddle. 

Some star. 

I’m playing worse ! I told myself. Much worse! 

He helped me up. I brushed myself off. 

“Remember, this was your idea!” he said. 

With a determined cry, I grabbed the ball, darted past him, and dribbled 
furiously to the basket. 

I had to make this basket. I had to! 

But as I went up for my shot, Ron caught up with me. He leapt high, raised 
his arms, and batted the ball away. 

“Aaaagggh!” 

I let out a frustrated shout. “I wish you were only a foot tall! ” I cried. 

He laughed and ran after the ball. 

But I felt a tremor of fear roll down my body. 

What have I just done? I asked myself, staring into the darkness of the back 
yard, waiting for Ron to return with the ball. Have I just made my second wish? 

I didn’t mean to! I told myself, my heart thudding wildly in my chest. It was 
an accident. It wasn’t a real wish. 

Have I just shrunk my brother down to a foot tall? 

No. No. No. I repeated over and over, waiting for him to reappear. 

The first wish hadn’t come true. There was no reason to expect the second 
wish to come true. 

I squinted into the heavy darkness of the back yard. “Ron—where are 
you?” 

Then I gasped as he came scampering toward me over the grass—a foot tall 
—just as I had wished! 

9 

I froze like a statue. I felt cold as stone. 

Then, as the tiny figure emerged from the darkness, I started to laugh. 

“Punkin!” I cried. “How did you get out?” 

I was so happy to see him—so happy it wasn’t a tiny Ron scampering over 
the grass—I picked up the little dog and hugged him tight. 

Of course his paws got me covered with wet mud. But I didn’t care. 

Sam, you’ve just got to chill, I scolded myself as Punkin struggled free. 
Your wish about Ron couldn’t come true because Clarissa isn’t here with her 
glowing red ball. 

You’ve got to stop thinking about the three wishes, I told myself. It’s just 
dumb. And you’re making yourself crazy over them. 

“What’s going on? How’d he get out?” Ron cried, appearing from the side 
of the garage with the ball. 

“Must’ve sneaked out,” I replied with a shrug. 

We played a few more minutes. But it was cold and wet. And no fun at all, 
especially for me. 

I didn’t sink a single basket. 

We finished with a foul shot competition, a short game of HORSE. Ron 
won easily. I was still on the O. 

As we trotted back to the house, Ron patted me on the back. “Ever think of 
taking up tiddly-winks?” he teased. “Or maybe Parcheesi?” 

I uttered an unhappy wail. I had the sudden urge to tell him why I felt so 
disappointed, to tell him about the weird woman and the three wishes. 

I hadn’t told Mom or Dad about her, either. The whole story was just too 
stupid. 

But I thought maybe my brother would find it funny. “I have to tell you 
about this afternoon,” I said as we pulled off our wet sneakers in the kitchen. 
“You won’t believe what happened to me. I—” 

“Later,” he said, pulling off his wet socks and tucking them into the 
sneakers. “I’ve got to get to that homework.” 

He disappeared up to his room. 

I started to my room, but the phone rang. I picked it up after the first ring. 

It was Cory, calling to ask how my basketball practice had gone after 
school. 

“Great,” I told him sarcastically. “Just great. I was so fabulous, they’re 
going to retire my number.” 

“You don’t have a number,” Cory reminded me. What a friend. 

Judith tried to trip me in the lunchroom the next afternoon. But this time I 
managed to step over her outstretched sneaker. 

I made my way past Judith’s table and found Cory nearly hidden in the 
corner near the trash baskets. He had already unwrapped his lunch and had a 
very unhappy expression on his face. 

“Not grilled cheese again!” I exclaimed, dropping my brown paper 
lunchbag on the table and pulling out the chair across from him. 

“Grilled cheese again,” he muttered. “And look at it. I don’t even think it’s 
American cheese. I think my dad tried to slip in cheddar on me.” 

I opened my chocolate-milk carton, then pulled my chair in closer. Across 
the room, some boys were laughing loudly, tossing a pink-haired Troll doll back 
and forth. It landed in someone’s soup, and the table erupted in wild cheers. 

As I picked up my sandwich, a shadow fell over the table. I realized that 
someone was standing behind me. 

“Judith!” I cried, turning my head. 

She sneered down at me. She was wearing a green-and-white school 
sweater over dark green corduroys. “Are you coming to the game after school, 
Byrd?” she demanded coldly. 

I set down the sandwich. “Yeah. Of course I’m coming,” I replied, puzzled 
by the question. 

“Too bad,” she replied, frowning. “That means we don’t have a chance of 
winning.” 

Judith’s pal, Anna, suddenly appeared beside her. “Couldn’t you get sick or 
something?” she asked me. 

“Hey, give Sam a break!” Cory cried angrily. 

“We really want to beat Jefferson,” Anna said, ignoring him. She had dark 
red lipstick smeared on her chin. Anna wore more lipstick than all the other 
seventh-graders put together. 

“I’ll try my best,” I replied through clenched teeth. 

They both laughed as if I had made a joke. Then they walked off, shaking 

their heads. 

If only my stupid wish would come true! I thought bitterly. 

But of course I knew that it wouldn’t. 

I figured I was in for more embarrassment and humiliation at the game. 
I had no idea just how surprising the game would turn out to be. 

10 

The game felt weird from the beginning. 

The Jefferson team was mostly sixth-graders, and they were pretty small. 
But they were well-coached. They really seemed to know where they were 
going. And they had a lot of energy and team spirit. 

As they came trotting to the center of the gym for the opening tip-off, my 
stomach was fluttery and I felt as if I weighed a thousand pounds. 

I was really dreading this game. I knew I was going to mess up. And I knew 
that Judith and Anna would be sure to let me know just how badly I messed up, 
and how I let the team down. 

So I was really shaky as the game started. And when, in the opening tip-off, 
the ball was slapped right to me, I grabbed it—and started dribbling toward the 
wrong basket! 

Luckily, Anna grabbed me and turned me around before I could shoot a 
basket for Jefferson! But I could hear players on both teams laughing. 

And I glanced at the sidelines and saw that both coaches—Ellen and the 
Jefferson coach—were laughing, too. 

I could feel my face turn beet-red. I wanted to quit right then and go sink 
into a hole in the ground and never come out. 

But—to my amazement—I still had the ball. 

I tried to pass it to Judith. But I threw it too low, and a Jefferson girl stole it 
and started dribbling to our basket. 

The game was ten seconds old, and I’d already made two mistakes! 

I kept telling myself it was just a game, but it didn’t really help. Every time 
I heard someone laugh I knew they were laughing at me, at how I’d started the 
game by running in the wrong direction. 

When I looked up at the score for the first time, it was six to nothing, 
Jefferson. 

The ball suddenly came sailing to me, seemingly from out of nowhere. I 
grabbed for it, but it slipped out of my hands. One of my teammates took it, 
dribbled, then passed it back to me. 

I took my first shot. It hit the backboard—a triumph for me!—but didn’t 
come near the basket. Jefferson took the rebound. A few seconds later, it was 

eight to nothing. 

I’m playing worse than ever! I moaned to myself. I could see Judith glaring 
angrily at me from across the floor. 

I backed up, staying in the corner, away from the basket. I decided to try 
and keep out of the action as much as possible. Maybe that way I wouldn’t 
embarrass myself quite so much. 

After about five minutes into the first quarter, things started to get weird. 

The score was twelve to two, Jefferson. 

Judith threw the ball inbounds. She meant to throw it to Anna. But Judith’s 
toss was weak, and the ball bounced to a short, blonde-haired Jefferson player. 

I saw Judith yawn as she ran after the girl. 

A few seconds later, the ball was loose, bouncing near the center of the 
court. Anna made a weak grab for it. But she seemed to be moving in slow 
motion, and the blonde Jefferson player snatched it from her hands. 

Anna stood watching her, breathing hard, perspiration running down her 
forehead. I had to stop and stare. Anna looked exhausted —and we’d only been 
playing five minutes! 

The Jefferson team dribbled all the way across the floor, passing the ball 
from girl to girl, as our players stood and watched. 

“Let’s go, Mustangs!” Judith cried, trying to rouse everyone. But I saw her 
yawn again as she walked to the sidelines to throw in the ball. 

“Come on, girls! Hustle! Hustle!” Ellen was shouting from the sidelines, 
her hands cupped around her mouth. “Run, Judith—don’t walk! Let’s look 
alive!” 

Judith sent another feeble throw onto the floor. It bounced away from a 
Jefferson player. I scooped it up and started to dribble it, running full speed. 

Just outside the key, I stopped, turned, and looked for someone to pass it to. 

But to my surprise, my teammates were still far behind me, walking slowly, 
exhaustedly, in my direction. 

As the Jefferson players swarmed around me, trying to take the ball away, I 
took a shot. It hit the rim of the basket—and bounced right back into my hands. 

So I took another shot. And missed again. 

Judith raised her hands slowly to catch the rebound. But the ball bounced 
right through her hands. She frowned in surprise, but didn’t make a move to go 
after it. 

I grabbed the ball, dribbled twice, nearly tripped over it—and shot. 

To my amazement, the ball bounced on top of the hoop, landed on the rim, 
and then dropped through. 

“Way to go, Sam!” I heard Ellen shout from the sidelines. 

My teammates uttered weak cheers. I watched them go after the Jefferson 
players, yawning and moving in slow motion, as if in some kind of trance. 

“Pick it up! Pick it up!” Ellen was shouting encouragement. 

But her words didn’t seem to help. 

Judith tripped and fell to her knees. As I stared in bewilderment, she didn’t 
get up. 

Anna was yawning loudly, walking toward the ball, not running. 

My two other Mustang teammates also seemed to be wandering hazily in 
slow motion, making lame attempts to defend our basket. 

Jefferson scored easily. 

Judith was still on her knees, her eyes half shut. 

What on earth is happening? I wondered. 

A long, shrill whistle broke into my thoughts. It took me a while to realize 
that Ellen had called time out. 

“Mustangs—hustle up! Hustle up!” she shouted, motioning for us to cluster 
around her. 

I quickly trotted over to Ellen. Turning back, I saw Judith, Anna, and the 
others trudging over slowly, yawning, pulling their bodies with great effort. 

And as Ellen shouted for everyone to “hustle up,” I watched them wearily 
approach. Then I realized to my amazement that my wish had come true ! 

11 

“What is the matter, girls?” Ellen demanded as we huddled on the sidelines. She 
glanced from player to player, examining each one with concern. 

Anna dropped down wearily to the floor, her shoulders slumped. It looked 
like she could barely keep her eyes open. 

Judith leaned her back against the gym’s tile wall. She was breathing hard, 
and beads of sweat rolled down her pale forehead. 

“Let’s get up some energy,” Ellen urged, clapping her hands. “I thought you 
girls were pumped for this game!” 

“There’s no air in here,” one of the players complained. 

“I feel so tired,” another one said, yawning. 

“Maybe we’re coming down with something,” Anna suggested from down 
on the floor. 

“Do you feel sick, too?” Ellen asked me. 

“No,” I told her. “I feel okay.” 

Behind me, Judith groaned wearily and tried to push herself away from the 

wall. 

The referee, a high school kid wearing a black-and-white-striped shirt about 
five sizes too big for him, blew his whistle. He signaled for us to get back out on 
the floor. 

“I don’t understand it,” Ellen sighed, shaking her head. She helped pull 
Anna to her feet. “I don’t understand it. I really don’t.” 

I understood it. 

I understood it perfectly. 

My wish had come true. I couldn’t believe it! That strange woman really 
did have some kind of magical powers. And she had granted my wish. 

Only not quite the way I had imagined. 

I remembered my words so clearly. I had wished to be the strongest player 
on the basketball team. That meant I wanted the woman to make me a stronger, 
better player. 

Instead, she had made everyone else weaker! 

I was the same klutzy player I’d always been. I still couldn’t dribble, pass, 
or shoot. 

But I was the strongest player on the team ! 

How could I have been such a jerk? I scolded myself angrily as I trotted 
back to the center of the gym floor. Wishes never turn out the way you want 
them to. 

When I reached center court, I turned back and saw Judith, Anna, and the 
others trudging onto the floor. Their shoulders were slumped, and they dragged 
their sneakers over the floor as they walked. 

I have to admit I enjoyed it just a little. 

I mean, I felt perfectly fine. And they looked so weak and pitiful. 

Judith and Anna really deserve it, I told myself. I tried not to grin as they 
slumped into their places. But maybe I was smiling just a little. 

The referee blew his whistle and called for a jump ball to start things off. 
Judith and a Jefferson player faced each other at the center circle. 

The referee tossed the ball up. The Jefferson girl jumped high. Judith made 
a real effort. I could see the strain on her face. 

But her feet didn’t even leave the floor. 

The Jefferson player batted the ball to one of her teammates, and they 
headed down the floor with it. 

I chased after them, running at full speed. But the rest of my team could 
only walk. 

Jefferson scored with an easy lay-up. 

“Come on, Judith—we can catch them!” I shouted, clapping my hands 
cheerfully. 

Judith glared dully at me. Her green eyes looked faded, kind of washed out. 

“Pick it up! Pick it up! Let’s go, Mustangs!” I cheered energetically. 

I was really enjoying rubbing it in. 

Judith could barely bounce the ball inbounds. I picked it up and dribbled all 
the way down the floor. Under the basket, one of the Jefferson players bumped 
me from behind as I tried to shoot. 

Two foul shots for me. 

It took my slow-motion teammates forever to make their way down the 
floor to line up. 

Of course, I missed both of my foul shots. 

But I didn’t care. 

“Let’s go, Mustangs!” I shouted, clapping my hands energetically. 
“Defense! Defense!” 

Suddenly I had become both a player and a cheerleader. I was really 
enjoying being the best player on the team. 

Watching Judith and Anna droop around and drag their bodies back and 
forth like tired losers was the biggest hoot! It was just awesome! 

We lost the game by twenty-four points. 

Judith, Anna, and the others looked glad it was over. I started to trot to the 
locker room to get changed, a big smile on my face. 

I was nearly changed by the time my teammates dragged into the locker 
room. Judith walked up to me and leaned against my locker. She eyed me 
suspiciously. 

“How come you ’re so peppy?” she demanded. 

I shrugged. “I don’t know,” I told her. “I feel okay. Same as ever.” 

Sweat was pouring down Judith’s forehead. Her red hair was matted wetly 
against her head. 

“What’s going on here, Byrd?” she demanded, yawning. “I don’t get it.” 

“Maybe you’re coming down with the flu or something,” I said, trying to 
hide how much I was enjoying this. 

This was great ! 

“Ohhh, I’m so tired,” Anna moaned, coming up behind Judith. 

“I’m sure you’ll both feel better tomorrow,” I chirped. 

“There’s something weird going on here,” Judith murmured weakly. She 
tried to stare hard at me, but her eyes were too tired to focus. 

“See you tomorrow!” I said brightly, picking up my stuff and heading out. 
“Feel better, guys!” 

I stopped outside the locker room door. 

They will feel better tomorrow, I assured myself. They’ll be back to normal 
tomorrow. 

They won’t stay like this—right? 

Right?? 

The next day, the bad news hit me like a ton of bricks. 

12 

Judith and Anna weren’t in school the next morning. 

I stared at their empty seats as I made my way to my seat in the front row. I 
kept turning back, searching for them. But the bell rang, and they weren’t there. 

Absent. Both absent. 

I wondered if the other girls on the team were absent, too. 

I felt a cold shiver run down my back. 

Were they still weak and tired? Too weak and tired to come to school? 

I had a frightening thought: What if they never returned to normal? What if 
the magic never wore off? 

Then I had an even more frightening thought: What if Judith and Anna and 
the others got weaker and weaker? What if they kept getting weaker until they 
died —and it was all my fault? 

All my fault. All my fault. 

I felt cold all over. My stomach felt as if I’d swallowed a rock. I had never 
felt so guilty, so horribly guilty, in all my life. 

I tried to force these thoughts from my mind, but I couldn’t. 

I couldn’t stop thinking that they might die because of my careless wish. 

I’ll be a murderer, I told myself with a shudder. A murderer. 

Sharon, our teacher, was standing right in front of me, talking about 
something. I couldn’t hear a word she said. I kept turning in my seat, staring 
back at the two empty chairs. 

Judith and Anna. What have I done to you ? 

At lunch, I told the whole story to Cory. 

Of course he just laughed at me. He had a mouthful of grilled cheese and 
nearly choked. 

“Do you believe in the Easter Bunny, too?” he asked. 

But I was in no mood for jokes. I was really upset. I stared down at my 
uneaten lunch, and felt sick. 

“Please take me seriously, Cory,” I begged. “I know it sounds dumb—” 

“You mean you’re for real?” he asked, his eyes studying my face. “I 

thought you were kidding, Sam. I thought this was a story for creative writing or 
something.” 

I shook my head. “Listen, Cory—if you had been at the girls’ basketball 
game yesterday afternoon, you’d know I’m not kidding,” I said, leaning across 
the table and whispering. “They were dragging around as if they were 
sleepwalking,” I told him. “It was so eerie!” 

I was so upset, my shoulders started to shake. I covered my eyes to keep 
myself from crying. 

“Okay... let’s think about this,” Cory said softly, his funny, crooked smile 
fading to a thoughtful frown. Finally, he had decided to take me seriously. 

“I’ve been thinking and thinking about it all morning,” I told him, still 
trying to force back the tears. “What if I’m a murderer, Cory? What if they really 
die?” 

“Sam, please,” he said, still frowning, his dark brown eyes studying mine. 
“Judith and Anna are probably not even sick. You’re probably making this all up 
in your mind. They’re probably perfectly okay.” 

“No way,” I muttered glumly. 

“Oh. I know!” Cory’s face brightened. “We can ask Audrey.” 

“Audrey?” Audrey was the school nurse. It took me a while to figure out 
what Cory was thinking. But I finally did. 

He was right. When you were going to be absent, your parents had to call 
Audrey in the morning and tell her why. Most likely, Audrey would be able to 
tell us why Judith and Anna were not in school today. 

I jumped up, nearly knocking my chair over. “Great idea, Cory!” I 
exclaimed. I started running through the lunchroom toward the door. 

“Wait! I’ll come with you!” Cory called, hurrying to catch up. 

Our sneakers pounded against the hard floor as we made our way down the 
long hall to the nurse’s office. We found Audrey locking the door. 

She is a short, sort of chunky woman, about forty or so, I guess, with 
bleached-blonde hair pinned up in a bun on top of her head. She always wears 
baggy jeans and shaggy sweaters, never a nurse’s uniform. 

“Lunchtime,” she said, seeing us stop beside her. “What do they have 
today? I’m starving.” 

“Audrey, can you tell us why Judith and Anna aren’t in school today?” I 
demanded breathlessly, ignoring her question. 

“Huh?” I was talking so fast, so excitedly, I don’t think she understood me. 



“Judith Bellwood and Anna Frost?” I repeated, my heart pounding. “Why 
aren’t they in school today?” 

I saw surprise in Audrey’s pale gray eyes. Then she lowered her gaze. 
“Judith and Anna, they’re gone,” she said sadly. 

13 

I stared at her. My mouth dropped open in horror. “They’re gone?” 

“They’re gone for at least a week,” Audrey said. She bent to lock the office 

door. 

“They—what?” I squeaked. 

She had trouble pulling the key from the lock. “They went to the doctor,” 
she repeated. “Their moms called this morning. They’re very sick. Both girls 
have the flu or something. They felt weak. Too weak to come to school.” 

I breathed a sigh of relief. I was glad Audrey had been concentrating on the 
door lock, so she hadn’t seen the horrified look on my face. 

Audrey hurried off down the hall. As soon as she was out of sight, I 
slumped against the wall. “At least they’re not dead,” I moaned. “She scared me 
to death!” 

Cory shook his head. “Audrey scared me, too,” he confessed. “See? Judith 
and Anna just have the flu. I’m sure the doctors—” 

“They don’t have the flu,” I insisted. “They’re weak because of my wish.” 

“Call them later,” he suggested. “You’ll see. They’ll probably be much 
better.” 

“I can’t wait till later,” I said in a trembling voice. “I have to do something, 
Cory. I have to do something to keep them from getting weaker and weaker until 
they shrivel up and die! ” 

“Calm down, Sam—” 

I started pacing back and forth in front of him. Some kids came hurrying by, 
on their way to their lockers. Someone called to me, but I didn’t reply. 

“We’ve got to get to class,” Cory said. “I think you’re getting all weird over 
nothing, Sam. If you wait till tomorrow—” 

“She said I had three wishes!” I exclaimed, not hearing a word Cory was 
saying. “I only used one.” 

“Sam—” Cory shook his head disapprovingly. 

“I’ve got to find her!” I decided. “I’ve got to find that strange woman. 
Don’t you see? I can wish to have the first wish undone. She said I get three 
wishes. So my second wish can be to erase the first!” 

This idea was starting to make me feel a lot better. 

But then Cory brought me back down into my gloom with one question: 
“How are you going to find her, Sam?” 

14 

I thought about Cory’s question all afternoon. I barely heard a word anyone said 
to me. 

We had a vocab test near the end of the day. I stared at the words as if they 
were in Martian! 

After a while, I heard Lisa, my teacher, calling my name. She was standing 
right in front of me, but I don’t think I heard her until her fifth or sixth try. 

“Are you okay, Samantha?” she asked, leaning over me. I knew she was 
wondering why I hadn’t started my test. 

“I feel a little sick,” I replied quietly. “I’ll be okay.” 

I’ll be okay as soon as I find that weird woman and get her to erase her 
spell! 

But where will I find her? I wondered. Where? 

After school, I reported to the gym for basketball practice. Everyone on my 
team was absent, so practice was canceled. 

Absent because of me .... 

I trudged upstairs to my locker and retrieved my down jacket. As I slammed 
the door and locked it, I had an idea. 

The woods. Jeffers’ Woods. 

That’s where I found Clarissa. 

I’ll bet I can find her there again. 

Maybe it’s her secret meeting place, I thought. 

Maybe she’ll be waiting for me there. 

Of course, she will! I told myself, giving myself a pep talk. Why did it take 
me so long to think of this? It made perfect sense. 

Humming to myself, I started jogging to the door. The hallway was nearly 
empty. 

I stopped when I saw a familiar figure in the doorway. “Mom!” 

“Hi, Sam.” She waved to me, even though I was standing right in front of 
her. She had a red-and-white wool cap pulled over her short blonde hair, and was 
wearing the tattered red ski jacket she always wears. 

She hadn’t been skiing in years. But she liked dressing like a ski bum. 

“Mom—what are you doing here?” I cried, not meaning it to sound as 
unfriendly as it did. I was eager to get to my bike and ride to Jeffers’ Woods. I 
didn’t need her here! 

“You didn’t forget about your appointment with Dr. Stone?” she asked, 
waving her car keys in her hand. 

“The orthodontist? Today?” I cried. “I can’tl” 

“You have to,” she replied sternly, tugging the arm of my jacket. “You 
know how hard it is to get in to see Dr. Stone.” 

“But I don’t want braces!” I cried, realizing I was sounding a little shrill, a 
little babyish. 

“Maybe you won’t need them,” Mom said, pulling me to the door. “Maybe 
you can get by with just a retainer. We’ll do whatever Dr. Stone says.” 

“But, Mom—I—I—” I searched my mind desperately for an excuse. “I 
can’t go with you. I have my bike here!” I cried desperately. 

“Go get it. We’ll put it in the trunk,” she replied without blinking. 

I had no choice. I had to go with her. Sighing loudly, I pushed open the door 
and hurried past her toward the bike racks. 

I found out I’m going to be wearing braces for at least the next six months. I had 
another appointment with Dr. Stone to have them put on the next week. 

I suppose I should have been upset about it. But it was hard to think about 
braces with Judith, Anna, and the other girls on my mind. 

I kept picturing them wasting away, getting thinner and thinner, weaker and 
weaker. I kept seeing this terrifying image in my mind. I was in the gym, 
dribbling the ball back and forth, faster and faster. And Judith, Anna, and the 
others were lying flat on their backs on the bleachers, trying to watch, but too 
weak to hold their heads up. 

That night after dinner, I was feeling so guilty, I called Judith to see how 
she was feeling. I think it was the first time in my life I had ever called her. 

Mrs. Bellwood answered. She sounded tired and tense. “Who is this?” she 
asked. 

I had a sudden impulse to hang up. But I told her, “It’s Samantha Byrd. I’m 
a friend from school.” 

Some friend. 

“I don’t think Judith can come to the phone,” she replied. “She’s just so 
weak.” 

“Did the doctor say what—?” I started. 

“I’ll ask Judith if she wants to talk,” Mrs. Bellwood interrupted. I could 
hear Judith’s little brother shouting something in the background. And I could 
hear cartoon music from their TV. “Don’t stay on too long,” she instructed. 
“Hello?” Judith answered in a faint, little-girl voice. 

“Oh. Hi, Judith. It’s me. Sam,” I said, trying not to sound nervous. 

“Sam?” Again the faint voice, nearly a whisper. 

“Sam Byrd,” I stammered. “I—I just wondered how you were feeling?” 
“Sam, did you cast a spell on us?” Judith asked. 

I gasped. How did she know? 

15 

“Judith—what do you mean?” I sputtered. 

“All the girls are sick except for you,” Judith replied. “Anna is sick. And so 
is Arlene. And Krista.” 

“Yes, but that doesn’t mean—” I started. 

“So I think you cast a spell on us,” Judith interrupted. 

Was she joking? I couldn’t tell. 

“I just hope you feel better,” I mumbled awkwardly. I could hear Mrs. 
Bellwood in the background telling Judith she should get off the phone. 

So I said good-bye and hung up. I was grateful it was a short conversation. 
But I couldn’t decide if Judith was kidding or not about my casting a spell. 

Her voice was really weak. She sounded so weary and lifeless. 

I felt angry that she had accused me, joke or no joke. That was so typical of 
Judith. Finding a way to make me angry even when I was calling to be nice. 

But I also felt guilty. Whether Judith had guessed it or not, I had cast a spell 
on her and the others. 

And now I had to find a way to have the spell removed. 

The next morning, two seats in my class were empty again. Judith and Anna 
were both absent. 

At lunch, I asked Cory if he wanted to come with me after school to go 
searching for the strange woman. 

“No way!” he cried, shaking his head. “She’ll probably turn me into a frog 
or something!” 

“Cory—can’t you take this seriously?” I screamed. Several kids turned to 

look. 

“Give me a break,” Cory muttered, blushing under his Orlando Magic cap. 
“Okay, I’m sorry,” I told him. “I’m really stressed out—you know?” 

He still refused to keep me company. He made up a lame excuse about 
having to help his mother clean the basement. 

Who cleans the basement in the middle of winter? 

Cory pretended he didn’t believe my story about the woman and the three 
wishes. But I had the feeling that maybe he was a little afraid. 

I was afraid, too. Afraid I wouldn’t find her. 

After school, I jumped on my bike and began pedaling toward Jeffers’ 
Woods. 

It was a gray, blustery day. Enormous, dark clouds rolled rapidly over the 
sky, threatening rain, maybe snow. 

It’s a lot like the day I ran into Clarissa, I thought. For some reason, that 
fact encouraged me. 

Some kids in my class waved to me and called out. But I rode past them, 
leaning over the handlebars, shifting gears to pick up speed. 

A few minutes later, Montrose Avenue curved away from the houses that 
lined both sides, and the bare trees of the woods came into view. 

The tall trees formed a dark wall, darker than the charcoal sky above. 

“She’s got to be here, got to be here,” I repeated in rhythm with my 
pedaling feet. 

Got to be here, got to be here. 

My heart nearly leapt out of my chest when I saw her, huddled low at the 
edge of the road. 

Waiting for me. 

“Hi!” I called out. “Hi! It’s me!” 

Why didn’t she answer? 

16 

As I pedaled closer, my heart pounding happily, I saw that she had her back 
turned to me. 

She had changed her outfit. She was wearing a purple wool beret, and a 
long black coat down nearly to her ankles. 

I screeched my bike to a halt a few feet behind her, my tires skidding over 
the pebbly road. “I need to make another wish!” I called breathlessly. 

She turned, and I gasped. 

I stared into a face full of freckles, a young-looking face framed by short, 
curly blonde hair. 

“I’m sorry. What did you say?” she asked, narrowing her eyes at me, her 
expression bewildered. 

“I—I’m sorry,” I stammered, feeling my face turn hot. “I—I thought you 
were someone else.” 

It was a different woman. 

I felt so embarrassed, I just wanted to die! 

Behind her, I saw two blonde-haired kids tossing a Frisbee back and forth at 
the edge of the woods. “Tommy—don’t throw it so hard. Your sister can’t catch 
it!” the woman instructed. 

Then she turned back to me. “What did you say about wishes? Are you 
lost?” she asked, studying my face with concern. 

I knew I was still blushing, but I couldn’t help it. “No. I thought you were 
—” I started. 

“Tommy—go chase it yourself!” she shouted to her little boy. The two kids 
started squabbling. She hurried over to settle it. 

“Sorry I bothered you,” I called. “Bye.” I turned my bike around and started 
pedaling rapidly toward home. 

I was embarrassed that I’d said such a stupid thing to a total stranger. But 
mainly I was disappointed. 

I really had expected the strange woman to be there. 

Where else could she be? I asked myself. 

I remembered that I had shown her the way to Madison Road. Maybe, I 
decided, I will get lucky and run into her there. 

It was a real long shot. But I was desperate. 

I turned my bike around and made my way to Madison. The wind had 
picked up, and my face began to feel cold and raw. I was riding against the wind, 
and the sharp cold was making my eyes water. 

Even through the blur, I could see that the woman was not hanging around 
on Madison, waiting for me to show up. 

Two mangy brown mutts trotted side by side across the street, their heads 
bowed against the wind. They were the only living creatures I saw. 

I rode slowly back and forth a few times, my eyes searching the rambling 
old houses of the neighborhood. 

A total waste of time. 

I was completely frozen. My ears and nose tingled with numbness. My 
watering eyes sent cold tears rolling down my cheeks. 

“Give up, Sam,” I instmcted myself aloud. 

The sky darkened. The storm clouds hovered low above the shivering trees. 

Feeling miserable and defeated, I turned and headed for home. I was 
pedaling furiously down the center of the street, trying to keep my bike upright 
in the gusting wind. 

I stopped when Judith’s house came into view. It was a long, low, redwood 
ranch-style house, set back from the street on a wide, sloping front lawn. 

Maybe I’ll stop for a minute and see how Judith is doing, I decided. 

It’ll give me a chance to get warm, too, I thought. I reached up a hand and 
felt my nose. Totally numb. 

Shivering, I rode up the driveway and lowered my bike to the ground. Then, 
trying to rub some feeling into my poor nose, I jogged up the walk and rang the 
bell. 

Mrs. Bellwood seemed very surprised to see a visitor. I told her who I was 
and that I just happened to be riding by. “How is Judith feeling?” I asked, 
shivering. 

“About the same,” she replied with a worried sigh. She had Judith’s green 
eyes, but her hair was nearly entirely gray. 

She led me into the hallway, which felt toasty and warm. The house smelled 
of roasting chicken. I suddenly realized I was hungry. 

“Judith! You have a visitor!” Mrs. Bellwood shouted up the stairs. 

I heard a weak reply, but couldn’t make out the words. 

“Go on up,” Judith’s mother said, putting a hand on the shoulder of my 

coat. “You look so cold,” she added, shaking her head. “Be careful, dear. You 
don’t want to get sick, too.” 

I climbed the stairs and found Judith’s room at the end of the hall. I 
hesitated at the doorway and peered in. 

The room was dimly lit. I could see Judith lying in bed, on top of the quilt, 
her head propped up on several pillows. Books and magazines and a couple of 
school notebooks were scattered over the bed. But Judith wasn’t reading. She 
was just staring straight ahead. 

“Stork?” she cried, seeing me in the doorway. 

I entered the room, forcing a smile to my face. “How are you feeling?” I 
asked softly. 

“What are you doing here?” she asked coldly. Her voice was hoarse. 

“I—I was riding my bike, and—” I stammered, staying by the door. I was 
startled by her anger. 

“Riding your bike? In this cold?” With great effort, she pulled herself up to 
a sitting position. Leaning against the headboard, she glared at me suspiciously. 

“I just wondered how you were,” I muttered. 

“Why don’t you just fly away, Byrd!” she growled nastily. 

“Huh?” 

“You are a witch—aren’t you!” she accused. 

I couldn’t believe she was saying these things. I was stunned. Shocked! It 
was no joke. I could see clearly that she was serious! 

“You did cast a spell on us. I know it!” 

“Judith—please,” I cried. “What are you saying ?” 

“We did a unit on witches in social studies last year,” she said in her hoarse 
voice. “We studied spells and things.” 

“That’s crazy!” I insisted. 

“You were jealous of me, Sam. Of me and Anna and everyone else,” Judith 
accused. 

“So?” I cried angrily. 

“So, all of a sudden all the girls on the team feel weak and sick. Except for 
you, Sam. You feel fine—right?” 

“Judith, listen to me—” I pleaded. 

“You’re a witch, Sam!” she screamed, her weak voice breaking. She started 
to cough. 

“Judith, you’re talking like a crazy person,” I insisted. “I’m not a witch. 

How could I be a witch? I’m sorry you’re sick. Really, I am. But—” 

“You’re a witch! You’re a witch!” Judith chanted, her voice a shrill whisper. 
“I’ve talked to all the girls. They all agree. You’re a witch. A witch!” 

I was so furious, I thought I’d explode. I had my hands balled into tight 
fists. My head was throbbing. 

Judith had been talking to all the other girls, spreading this story that I was 
a witch. How could she do such a crazy thing? 

“A witch! You’re a witch!” she continued to chant. 

I was so upset, I totally lost it. “Judith —” I shrieked. “I never would have 
done it to you if you hadn’t been so horrible to me!” 

I realized immediately that I’d made a terrible mistake. 

I had just admitted to her that I was responsible for her being sick. 

I had just blurted out that I was a witch! 

But I was so furious, I didn’t care. 

“I knew it!” Judith croaked in her hoarse voice, her green eyes glowing 
excitedly, pointing an accusing finger at me. 

“What’s going on here? What’s all the shouting?” Judith’s mother appeared 
in the room, her eyes flashing back and forth between Judith and me. 

“She’s a witch! A witch!” Judith screamed. 

“Judith—your voice! Stop!” Mrs. Bellwood cried, running to the bed. She 
turned back to me. “I think Judith is delirious. She—she’s saying such crazy 
things. Please don’t pay attention. She—” 

“She’s a witch! She admitted it! She’s a witch!” Judith shrieked. 

“Judith—please. Please, you have to calm down. You have to save your 
strength,” Mrs. Bellwood pleaded. 

“I’m sorry. I’ll go now,” I said sharply. 

I darted out of the room, ran down the stairs, and out of the house as fast as 
I could. 

“A witch! A witch!” Judith’s hoarse chant followed me out. 

I was so angry, so hurt, so humiliated, I felt about to explode. “I wish Judith 
would disappear!” I screamed. “I really do!” 

“Very well. That shall be your second wish,” said a voice behind me. 

I spun around to see the strange woman standing at the side of the house, 
her long, black hair fluttering behind her in the gusting wind. She held the 
glowing red ball high. Her eyes glowed as red as the ball. 

“I shall cancel your first wish,” she said in her shaky, old lady’s voice. 

“And I shall grant your second.” 

17 

“No—wait!” I cried. 

The woman smiled and pulled her shawl over her head. 

“Wait! I didn’t mean it!” I cried, running toward her. “I didn’t know you 
were there. Wait—OW!” 

My foot caught on a loose stone in the walk, and I stumbled. I hit my knees 
hard. The pain shot up through my entire body. 

When I looked up, she was gone. 

After dinner, Ron agreed to play basketball out back. But it was too cold and 
windy. A light snow had started to fall. 

We settled for Ping-Pong in the basement. 

Ping-Pong games in our basement are always difficult. For one thing, the 
ceiling is so low, the ball is always hitting it and bouncing crazily away. Also, 
Punkin has a bad habit of chasing after the ball and biting holes in it. 

Ping-Pong is the only sport I’m good at. I have a really tricky serve, and 
I’m good at slamming the ball down my opponent’s throat. I can usually beat 
Ron two games out of three. 

But tonight he could see my heart wasn’t in it. 

“What’s up?” he asked as we batted the ball softly back and forth. His dark 
eyes peered into mine from behind his black-framed glasses. 

I decided I had to tell him about Clarissa, and her red crystal ball, and the 
three wishes. I was so desperate to tell someone. 

“I helped this strange woman a few days ago,” I blurted out. “And she 
granted me three wishes. I made a wish, and now all the girls on my basketball 
team are going to die!” 

Ron dropped his paddle onto the table. His mouth dropped open. “What an 
amazing coincidence!” he cried. 

“Huh?” I gaped at him. 

“I met my fairy godmother yesterday!” Ron exclaimed. “She promised to 
make me the richest person in the world, and she’s going to give me a solid gold 
Mercedes with a swimming pool in the back!” 

He burst out laughing. He just thinks he’s such a riot. 

“Aaaaagh!” I let out an angry, frustrated groan. 

Then I tossed my paddle at him and ran upstairs to my room. 

I slammed the bedroom door behind me and began to pace back and forth, my 
arms crossed tightly in front of me. 

I kept telling myself that I had to calm down, that it wasn’t good to be this 
stressed out. But of course, telling yourself to calm down doesn’t do any good. It 
only makes you more tense. 

I decided I had to do something to occupy my mind, to keep myself from 
thinking about Judith, and Clarissa, and the new wish I had accidentally made. 

My second wish. 

“It’s not fair!” I cried aloud, still pacing. 

After all, I didn’t know I was making a second wish. That woman tricked 
me! She appeared out of nowhere—and tricked me! 

I stopped in front of my mirror and fiddled with my hair. I have very fine, 
light blonde hair. It’s so fine, there isn’t much I can do with it. I usually tie it in a 
ponytail on the right side of my head. It’s a style I saw on a model that looked a 
little like me in Seventeen. 

Just to keep my hands busy, I tried doing something else with my hair. 
Studying myself in the mirror, I tried sweeping it straight back. Then I tried 
parting it in the middle and letting it fall over my ears. It looked really lame. 

The activity wasn’t helping. It wasn’t taking my mind off Judith at all. I 
pulled it back into the same old ponytail. Then I brushed it for a while, tossed 
down the brush with a sigh, and returned to pacing. 

My big question, of course, was: Had my wish come true? 

Had I caused Judith to disappear? 

As much as I hated Judith, I certainly didn’t want to be responsible for 
making her disappear forever. 

With a loud moan, I tossed myself down on my bed. What should I do? I 
asked myself. I had to know if the wish had come true. 

I decided to call her house. 

I wouldn’t talk to her. I’d just call her house and see if she was still around. 

I wouldn’t even tell them who was calling. 

I looked up Judith’s number in the school directory. I didn’t know it by 
heart. I had only called it once before. 

My hand was shaking as I reached for the phone on my desk. I punched in 

her phone number. 

It took me three tries. I kept making mistakes. 

I was really scared. I felt as if my stomach were tied in a knot and my heart 
had jumped up into my throat. 

The phone rang. One ring. 

Two rings. 

Three rings. 

Had she disappeared? 

18 

Four rings. 

No answer. 

“She’s gone,” I murmured aloud, a chill running down my back. 

Before the fifth ring could begin, I heard a clicking sound. Someone had 
picked up the receiver. 

“Hello?” 

Judith! 

“Hello? Who is this?” she demanded. 

I slammed the receiver down. 

My heart was pounding. My hands were ice-cold. 

I breathed a sigh of relief. Judith was there. She was definitely there. She 
hadn’t vanished from the face of the earth. 

And, I realized her voice had returned to normal. 

She didn’t sound hoarse or weak. She sounded as nasty as ever. 

What did this mean? I jumped to my feet and began to pace back and forth, 
trying to figure it all out. 

Of course, I couldn ’t figure it out. 

I only knew that the second wish hadn’t been granted. 

Feeling a little relieved, I went to bed and quickly fell into a heavy, 
dreamless sleep. 

I opened one eye, then the other. Pale morning sunlight was shining through my 
bedroom window. With a sleepy groan, I pushed down the covers and started to 
sit up. 

My eye went to the clock above my desk and I gasped. 

Nearly ten after eight? 

I rubbed my eyes and looked again. Yes. Ten after eight. 

“Huh?” I cried, trying to clear the sleep from my voice. Mom wakes me 
every morning at seven so I can get to school by eight-thirty. 

What happened? 

There was no way I’d be on time now. 

“Hey—Mom!” I shouted. “Mom!” I jumped out of bed. My long legs got 
tangled up in the covers, and I nearly fell over. 

Great way to start the day—with a typical Samantha klutz move! 

“Hey, Mom—” I shouted out the bedroom door. “What happened? I’m 
late!” 

Not hearing a reply, I pulled off my nightshirt and quickly searched through 
the closet for some clean clothes to wear. Today was Friday, laundry day. So I 
was down to the bottom of the pile. 

“Hey, Mom? Ron? Anybody up?” 

Dad leaves the house for work every morning at seven. Usually I hear him 
moving around. This morning I hadn’t heard a sound. 

I pulled on a pair of faded jeans and a pale green sweater. Then I brushed 
my hair, staring at my still-sleepy face in the mirror. 

“Anybody up?” I shouted. “How come no one woke me today? It’s not a 
holiday—is it?” 

I listened carefully as I tugged on my Doc Martens. 

No radio on down in the kitchen. How weird, I thought. Mom has that radio 
tuned to the all-news station every morning. We fight about it every morning. 
She wants news, and I want music. 

But today I couldn’t hear a sound down there. 

What’s going on? 

“Hey—I’m going to have to skip breakfast!” I shouted down the stairs. 
“I’m late.” 

No reply. 

I took one last look in the mirror, brushed a strand of hair off my forehead, 
and hurried out into the hall. 

My brother’s room is next door to mine. His door was closed. 

Uh-oh, Ron, I thought. Did you sleep late, too? 

I pounded on the door. “Ron? Ron, are you awake?” 

Silence. 

“Ron?” I pushed open the door. His room was dark, except for the pale light 
from the window. The bed was made. 

Had Ron already left? Why had he made his bed? It would be the first time 
in his life he ever did! 

“Hey, Mom!” Confused, I hurried down the stairs. Halfway down, I 
stumbled and nearly fell. Klutz Move Number Two. Pretty good for so early in 

the morning. 

“What’s going on down here? Is it the weekend? Did I sleep through 
Friday?” 

The kitchen was empty. No Mom. No Ron. No breakfast. 

Did they have to go somewhere early? I checked the refrigerator for a note. 

Nothing. 

Puzzled, I glanced at the clock. Nearly eight-thirty. I was already late for 
school. 

Why didn’t anyone wake me up? Why were they all gone so early in the 
morning? 

I pinched myself. I really did. I thought maybe I was dreaming. 

But no such luck. 

“Hey—anyone?” I called. My voice rang through the empty house. 

I ran to the front closet to get my coat. I had to get to school. I was sure this 
mystery would be cleared up later. 

I quickly pulled on my coat and ran upstairs for my backpack. My stomach 
was grumbling and growling. I was used to at least a glass of juice and a bowl of 
cereal for breakfast. 

Oh, well, I thought, I’ll buy an extra big lunch. 

A few seconds later, I headed out the front door and around to the side to 
the garage to get my bike. I pulled up the garage door—and stopped. 

I froze, staring into the garage. 

My dad’s car. It was still in the garage. 

He hadn’t left for work. 

So where was everyone ? 

19 

Back in my house I phoned my dad’s office. The phone rang and rang, and no 
one answered. 

I checked the kitchen again for a message from Mom or Dad. But I couldn’t 
find a thing. 

Glancing at the kitchen clock, I saw that I was already twenty minutes late 
for school. I needed a late excuse note, but there was no one to write it for me. 

I hurried back outside to get my bike. Better late than never, I thought. I 
wasn’t exactly frightened. I was just puzzled. 

I’ll call Mom or Dad at lunchtime and find out where everyone went this 
morning, I told myself. As I pedaled to school, I began to feel a little angry. They 
could’ve at least told me they were leaving early! 

There were no cars on the street, and no kids on bikes. I guessed that 
everyone was already at school or work or wherever people go in the morning. I 
got to school in record time. 

Leaving my bike in the bike rack, I adjusted my backpack on my shoulders 
and ran into the school. The halls were dark and empty. My footsteps echoed 
loudly on the hard floor. 

I dropped my coat into my locker. When I slammed the locker door, it 
sounded like an explosion in the empty hallway. 

The halls are kind of creepy when they’re this empty, I thought. I jogged to 
my classroom, which was just a few doors down from my locker. 

“My mom forgot to wake me, so I overslept.” 

That was the excuse I’d planned to give Sharon as soon as I entered. I 
mean, it wasn’t just an excuse. It was the truth. 

But I never got to tell Sharon my reason for being late. 

I pulled open the door to the classroom—and stared in shock. 

Empty. The room was empty. 

No kids. No Sharon. 

The lights hadn’t been turned on. And yesterday’s work was still on the 
chalkboard. 

Weird, I thought. 

But I didn’t know then how weird things were going to get. 

I froze for a moment, staring into the empty, dark room. Then I decided that 
everyone must be at an assembly in the auditorium. 

I turned quickly and made my way to the auditorium at the front of the 
school, jogging down the empty corridor. 

The door to the teachers’ lounge was open. I peered in and was surprised to 
find it empty, too. Maybe all the teachers are at the assembly, I thought. 

A few seconds later, I pulled open the double doors to the auditorium. 

And peered into the darkness. 

The auditorium was silent and empty. 

I pushed the doors shut and began to run down the hall, stopping to look 
into every room. 

It didn’t take me long to realize that I was the only person in the building. 
No kids. No teachers. I even checked the janitors’ room downstairs. No janitors. 

Is it Sunday? Is it a holiday? 

I tried to figure out where everyone had gone, but I couldn’t. 

Feeling the first stirrings of panic in my chest, I dropped a quarter in the 
pay phone next to the principal’s office and called home. 

I let it ring at least ten times. Still no one home. 

“Where is everyone?” I shouted down the empty corridor. The only reply 
came from my echoing voice. 

“Can anybody hear me?” I shouted, cupping my hands around my mouth. 
Silence. 

I suddenly felt very frightened. I had to get out of the creepy school 
building. I grabbed my coat and started to run. I didn’t even bother to close the 
locker door. 

Carrying my coat over my shoulder, I ran outside, to the bike rack. My bike 
was the only bike parked there. I scolded myself for not noticing that when I 
arrived. 

I pulled on my coat, arranged my backpack, and started for home. Again, I 
saw no cars on the street. No people. 

“This is so weirdl” I cried aloud. 

My legs suddenly felt heavy, as if something was weighing them down. I 
knew it was my panic. My heart was pounding. I kept searching desperately for 
someone—anyone—on the street. 

Halfway home, I turned around and headed my bike to town. The small 
shopping district was just a few blocks north of school. 

I rode in the center of the street. There was no reason not to. No cars or 
trucks appeared in either direction. 

The bank came into view, followed by the grocery store. As I pedaled as 
hard as I could, I noticed all the other shops that lined both sides of Montrose 
Avenue. 

All dark and empty. 

Not a soul in town. Not a person in any store. 

No one. 

I braked the bike in front of Farber’s Hardware and jumped off. The bike 
fell onto its side. I stepped to the sidewalk and listened. The only sound was the 
banging of a shutter being blown by the wind above the barbershop. 

“Hello!” I called at the top of my voice. “Hellllooooo!” 

I started running frantically from store to store, pressing my face against the 
windows, peering inside, searching desperately for another human being. 

Back and forth. I covered both sides of the street, my fear growing heavier 
inside me with each step. With each dark store. 

“Hellooooo! Helllooooo! Can anybody hear me?” 

But I knew it was a waste of my voice. 

Standing in the center of the street, staring at the dark stores and empty 
sidewalks, I knew that I was alone. 

Alone in the world. 

I suddenly realized my second wish had been granted. 

Judith had disappeared. And everyone else had disappeared with her. 

Everyone. 

My mom and dad. My brother, Ron. Everyone. 

Would I ever see them again? 

I slumped down on the cement stoop in front of the barbershop and hugged 
myself, trying to stop my body from trembling. 

Now what? I wondered miserably. Now what? 

20 

I don’t know how long I sat there on the stoop, hugging myself, my head 
lowered, my mind in a total, spinning panic. I would have sat there forever, 
listening to the banging shutter, listening to the wind blow through the deserted 
street—if my stomach hadn’t started to growl and grumble. 

I stood up, suddenly remembering that I had missed my breakfast. 

“Sam, you’re all alone in the world. How can you think about eating?” I 
asked myself aloud. 

Somehow it was comforting to hear a human voice, even though it was my 

own. 

“I’m staaaaarving!” I shouted. 

I listened for a response. It was really stupid, but I refused to give up hope. 

“This is all Judith’s fault,” I muttered, picking my bike up from the street. 

I rode home through the empty streets, my eyes searching the deserted 
yards and houses. As I passed the Carters’ house on the corner of my block, I 
expected their little white terrier to come yapping after my bike the way he 
always did. 

But there weren’t even any dogs left in my world. Not even my poor little 
Punkin. 

There was just me. Samantha Byrd. The last person on earth. 

As soon as I got home, I rushed into the kitchen and made myself a peanut butter 
sandwich. Gobbling it down, I stared at the open peanut butter jar. It was nearly 
empty. 

“How am I going to feed myself?” I wondered aloud. “What do I do when 
the food runs out?” 

I started to fill a glass with orange juice. But I hesitated, and filled it up 
only halfway. 

Do I rob the grocery store? I asked myself. Do I just take the food I need? 

Is it really robbing if there’s no one there? If there’s no one anywhere ? 

Does it matter? Does anything matter? 

“How can I take care of myself? I’m only twelve!” I shouted. 

For the first time, I felt the urge to cry. But I jammed another hunk of 

peanut butter sandwich into my mouth and forced the urge away. 

Instead, I turned my thoughts to Judith, and my unhappiness and fear 
quickly gave way to anger. 

If Judith hadn’t made fun of me, hadn’t tried to embarrass me, if Judith 
hadn’t constantly sneered at me and said, “Byrd, why don’t you just fly away!” 
and all the other horrible things she’d said to me, then I never would have made 
any wishes about her, and I wouldn’t be all alone now. 

“I hate you, Judith!” I screamed. 

I jammed the last section of sandwich into my mouth—but I didn’t chew. 

I froze. And listened. 

I heard something. 

Footsteps. Someone walking in the living room. 

21 

I swallowed the sandwich section whole, and went tearing into the living room. 
“Mom? Dad?” 

Were they back? Were they really back? 

No. 

I stopped in the living room doorway when I saw Clarissa. She was 
standing in the center of the room, her black hair reflecting the light from the 
front window, a pleased smile on her face. 

Her bright red shawl was draped loosely over her shoulders. She wore a 
long black jumper over a white, high-collared blouse. 

“You!” I cried breathlessly. “How did you get in?” 

She shrugged. Her smile grew wider. 

“Why did you do this to me?” I shrieked, my anger bursting out of me. 
“How could you do this to me?” I demanded, gesturing at the empty room, the 
empty house. 

“I didn’t,” she replied quietly. 

She walked to the window. In the bright afternoon sunlight, her skin 
appeared pale and wrinkled. She looked so old. 

“But—but—” I sputtered, too furious to speak. 

“You did it,” she said, her smile fading. “You made the wish. I granted it.” 

“I didn’t wish for my family to disappear!” I screamed, striding into the 
room, my hands balled into tight fists. “I didn’t wish for everyone in the world to 
disappear! You did that! You!” 

“You wished for Judith Bellwood to disappear,” Clarissa said, adjusting the 
shawl on her shoulders. “I granted the wish as best as I knew how.” 

“No. You tricked me,” I insisted angrily. 

She snickered. “Magic is often unpredictable,” she said. “I figured you 
would not be happy with your last wish. That is why I have returned. You have 
one more wish. Would you like to make it now?” 

“Yes!” I exclaimed. “I want my family back. I want all the people back. I 

“Be careful,” she warned, pulling the red glass ball from the purple bag. 
“Think carefully before you make your final wish. I am trying to repay your 

kindness to me. I do not want you to be unhappy with the results of your wish.” 

I started to reply, but stopped. 

She was right. I had to be careful. 

I had to make the right wish this time. And I had to say it the right way. 
“Take your time,” she urged softly. “Since this is your final wish, it shall be 
permanent. Be very careful.” 

I stared into her eyes as they turned from black to red, reflecting the red 
glow of the ball in her hand, and I thought as hard as I could. 

What should I wish for? 

22 

The light from the living room window faded as clouds rolled over the sun. As 
the light dimmed, the old woman’s face darkened. Deep black ruts formed 
beneath her eyes. Lines creased her forehead. She seemed to sag into the 
shadows. 

“Here is my wish,” I said in a trembling voice. I spoke slowly, carefully. I 
wanted to consider each word. I didn’t want to slip up this time. 

I didn’t want to give her a chance to trick me. 

“I am listening,” she whispered, her face completely covered by shadow 
now. Except for her eyes, glowing as red as fire. 

I cleared my throat. I took a deep breath. 

“Here is my wish,” I repeated carefully. “I wish for everything to return to 
normal. I want everything to be exactly the way it was—but—” 

I hesitated. 

Should I finish this part of it? 

Yes! I told myself. 

“I want everything to be the way it was—but I want Judith to think that I’m 
the greatest person who ever lived!” 

“I will grant your third wish,” she said, raising the glass ball high. “Your 
second wish will be canceled. Time will back up to this morning. Goodbye, 
Samantha.” 

“Good-bye,” I said. 

I was swallowed up by the radiating red glow. When it faded, Clarissa had 
vanished. 

“Sam! Sam—rise and shine!” 

My mother’s voice floated up to my room from downstairs. 

I sat straight up in bed, instantly awake. “Mom!” I cried happily. 

I remembered everything. I remembered waking up in an empty house, in 
an empty world. And I remembered my third wish. 

But time had gone back to this morning. I glanced at the clock. Seven. 
Mom was waking me up at the usual time. 

“Mom!” I leapt out of bed, ran downstairs in my nightshirt, and joyfully 

threw my arms around her, hugging her tight. “Mom!” 

“Sam? Are you okay?” She stepped back, a startled expression on her face. 
“You running a fever?” 

“Good morning!” I cried happily, hugging Punkin, who seemed just as 
startled. “Is Dad still home?” I was so eager to see him, too, to know that he was 
back. 

“He left a few minutes ago,” Mom said, still examining me suspiciously 
with her eyes. 

“Oh, Mom!” I exclaimed. I couldn’t conceal my happiness. I hugged her 
again. 

“Whoa.” I heard Ron enter the kitchen behind us. 

I turned to see him staring at me, his eyes narrowed in disbelief behind his 
glasses. I ran over and hugged him, too. 

“Mom—what did you put in her orange juice?” he demanded, struggling to 
back away from me. “Yuck! Let go of me!” 

Mom shrugged. “Don’t ever ask me to explain your sister,” she replied 
dryly. She turned to the kitchen cabinets. “Go get dressed, Sam. You don’t want 
to be late.” 

“What a beautiful morning!” I exclaimed. 

“Yeah. Beautiful,” Ron repeated, yawning. “You must have had some 
terrific dreams or something, Sam.” 

I laughed and hurried upstairs to get dressed. 

I couldn’t wait to get to school. I couldn’t wait to see my friends, to see the halls 
filled once again with talking, laughing faces. 

Pedaling my bike as hard as I could, I grinned every time a car passed. I 
loved seeing people again. I waved at Mrs. Miller across the street, bending to 
pick up her morning newspaper. 

I didn’t even mind it when the Carters’ terrier came chasing after my bike, 
barking his high-pitched yips and nipping at my ankles. 

“Good dog!” I cried gleefully. 

Everything is normal, I told myself. Everything is wonderfully normal. 

I opened the front door to school to the sound of crashing locker doors and 
shouting kids. “Great!” I cried aloud. 

A sixth-grader came tearing around the corner and bumped right into me, 
practically knocking me over as I made my way to my locker. I didn’t cry out 

angrily. I just smiled. 

I was so happy to be back in school, back in my crowded noisy school. 

Unable to stop grinning, I unlocked my locker and pulled open the door. I 
called out a cheerful greeting to some friends across the hall. 

I even said good morning to Mrs. Reynolds, our principal! 

“Hey—Stork!” a seventh-grade boy called to me. He made a funny face, 
then disappeared around the corner. 

I didn’t care. I didn’t care what anyone called me. The sound of so many 
voices was so wonderful! 

As I started to take my coat off, I saw Judith and Anna arrive. 

They were busy chatting, both talking at once. But Judith stopped when she 
saw me. 

“Hi, Judith,” I called warily. I wondered what Judith would be like now. 
Would she treat me any differently? Would she be nicer to me? 

Would she remember how much she and I used to hate each other? 

Would she be any different at all? 

Judith gave Anna a little wave and came hurrying over to me. “Morning, 
Sam,” she said, and smiled. 

Then she pulled off her wool ski cap—and I gasped. 

23 

“Judith—your hair!” I cried in astonishment. 

“Do you like it?” she asked, staring at me eagerly. 

She had cut it shorter like mine and had tied a pony tail on the side—just 
like mine! 

“I—I guess...” I stammered. 

She breathed a sigh of relief and smiled at me. “Oh, I’m so glad you like it, 
Sam!” she cried gratefully. “It looks just like yours, doesn’t it? Or did I cut it too 
short? Do you think it should be longer?” She studied my hair. “I think yours 
might be longer.” 

“No. No. It’s... great, Judith,” I told her, backing toward my locker. 

“Of course, it’s not as good as yours,” Judith continued, staring at my 
ponytail. “My hair just isn’t as pretty as yours. It isn’t as fine, and the color is 
too dark.” 

I don’t believe this! I thought. 

“It looks good,” I said softly. 

I pulled my coat off and hung it in my locker. Then I bent to pick up my 
backpack. 

“Let me carry that,” Judith insisted. She grabbed it out of my hands. 
“Really. I don’t mind, Sam.” 

I started to protest, but Anna interrupted. “What are you doing?” she asked 
Judith, flashing me a cold glance. “Let’s get to class.” 

“You go without me,” Judith replied. “I want to carry Sam’s backpack for 

her.” 

“Huh?” Anna’s mouth dropped open. “Are you totally losing it, Judith?” 
she demanded. 

Judith ignored her question and turned back to me. “I love that T-shirt, Sam. 
It’s ribbed, isn’t it? Did you get it at the Gap? That’s where I got mine. Look. 
I’m wearing one just like yours.” 

I goggled in surprise. Sure enough, Judith was wearing the same style T- 
shirt, only hers was gray and mine was pale blue. 

“Judith—what’s your problem?” Anna asked, applying a twentieth layer of 
bright orange lipstick on her lips. “And what did you do to your hair?” she cried, 

suddenly noticing the new style. 

“Doesn’t it look just like Sam’s?” Judith asked her, flipping the ponytail 
with one hand. 

Anna rolled her eyes. “Judith, have you gone psycho or something?” 

“Give me a break, Anna,” Judith replied. “I’d like to talk to Sam—okay?” 

“Huh?” Anna knocked on Judith’s head, as if knocking on a door. “Anyone 
home?” 

“See you later, okay?” Judith said impatiently. 

Anna sighed, then walked away angrily. 

Judith turned back to me. “Can I ask you a favor?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I replied. “What kind of favor?” 

She hoisted my backpack over her left shoulder. Her own backpack hung on 
her right shoulder. “Would you help me work on my foul shot at practice this 
afternoon?” 

I wasn’t sure I had heard Judith correctly. I stared at her, my mouth hanging 
open. 

“Would you?” she pleaded. “I’d really like to try shooting fouls your way. 
You know. Underhanded. I bet I’d have a lot more control shooting them 
underhanded, the way you do.” 

This was too much! Too much! 

As I stared at Judith, I saw absolute worship in her eyes! 

She was the best foul shooter on the team. And here she was, begging me to 
show her how to shoot the klutzy way I did it! 

“Yeah. Okay. I’ll try to help you,” I told her. 

“Oh, thank you, Sam!” she cried gratefully. “You’re such a pal! And do you 
think I could borrow your social studies notes later? Mine are such a mess.” 

“Well...” I said thoughtfully. My notes were so bad, even I couldn’t make 
them out. 

“I’ll copy them over and get them right back to you. Promise,” Judith said 
breathlessly. I think the weight of two backpacks was starting to get to her. 

“Okay. You can borrow them,” I told her. 

We started walking to class. Several kids stopped to stare at Judith, lugging 
two backpacks on her shoulders. 

“Where did you get your Doc Martens?” she asked as we entered the room. 
“I want to get a pair just like yours.” 

What a laugh! I thought, very pleased with myself. This is an absolute riot! 

The change in Judith was simply hilarious. It was all I could do not to burst 
out laughing. 

Little did I know then that my laughter would quickly turn to horror. 

24 

It started to get really embarrassing. Judith wouldn’t leave me alone. 

She hung around me wherever I went. When I got up to sharpen my pencil, 
she followed me and sharpened hers. 

My throat got dry during a spelling test, and I asked Lisa if I could run out 
to the water fountain to get a drink. As I was bending over the fountain, I turned 
and saw Judith right behind me. “My throat is dry like yours,” she explained, 
faking a cough. 

Later, during free reading, Lisa had to separate Judith and me because 
Judith wouldn’t stop talking. 

At lunch, I took my usual place across the table from Cory. I had just started 
telling him about Judith’s new attitude—when she appeared at our table. 

“Could you move down a seat?” she asked the kid sitting next to me. “I 
want to sit next to Sam.” 

The kid moved, and Judith dropped her lunch tray onto the table and took 
her seat. “Would you like to trade lunches?” she asked me. “Yours looks so 
much better than mine.” 

I was holding a mushed-up tunafish sandwich. “This?” I asked, waving it. 
Half the tunafish fell out of the soggy bread. 

“Yum!” Judith exclaimed. “Want my pizza, Sam? Here. Take it.” She slid 
her tray in front of me. “You bring the best lunches. I wish my mom packed 
lunches like yours.” 

I could see Cory staring at me across the table, his eyes wide with disbelief. 

I really couldn’t believe it, either. All Judith wanted from the world was to 
be exactly like me! 

A few tables away, near the wall, Anna sat by herself. She looked really 
glum. I saw her glance over to our table, frowning. Then she quickly lowered her 
eyes to her lunch. 

After lunch, Judith followed me to my locker. She helped me pull out my 
books and notebooks and asked if she could carry my backpack. 

At first, I thought this was all really funny. But then I started to get 
annoyed. And embarrassed. 

I saw that kids were laughing at us. Two boys from my class followed us 

down the hall, snickering. I heard other kids talking about Judith and me in the 
hall. They stopped when Judith and I walked by, but I saw amused smirks on 
their faces. 

She’s making me look like a total jerk! I realized. 

The whole school is laughing at us! 

“Are you getting braces?” Judith asked me as we made our way back to the 
classroom. “Someone told me you were getting braces.” 

“Yeah. I’m getting them,” I grumbled, rolling my eyes. 

“Great!” Judith declared. “Then I want to get them, too!” 

After school I hurried to the gym, expecting to have basketball practice. In all 
the excitement over the wishes, I had forgotten that we had an actual game that 
afternoon. 

The girls’ team from Edgemont Middle School was already on the floor, 
warming up by shooting lay-ups. Most of their shots were dropping in. They 
were big, tough-looking girls. We had heard that they were a really good team— 
and they looked it. 

I changed quickly and hurried out of the locker room. My teammates were 
huddled around Ellen for last-minute instructions. As I jogged over to them, I 
crossed my fingers on both hands and prayed that I wouldn’t make too big a fool 
of myself in the game. 

Judith grinned at me as I joined the huddle. Then she practically 
embarrassed me out of my Reeboks by shouting, “Here she is! Here comes our 
star!” 

Anna and the others laughed, of course. 

But then their smiles quickly faded when Judith interrupted Ellen to 
announce, “Before the game starts, I think we should name Sam team captain.” 

“You’re joking!” Anna cried. 

A few girls laughed. Ellen stared at me, bewildered. 

“Our best player should be captain,” Judith continued in all seriousness. 
“So it should be Sam, not me. All in favor, raise your hand.” 

Judith shot her hand up in the air, but no one else did. 

“What’s your problem?” Anna asked her nastily. “What are you trying to 
do, Judith—ruin our team?” 

Judith and Anna got into an angry shouting match over that, and Ellen had 
to pull them apart. 

Ellen stared at Judith as if she had lost her mind or something. Then she 
said, “Let’s worry about who’s captain later. Let’s just go out and play a good 
game, okay?” 

The game was a disaster. Judith copied everything I did. If I tried to dribble, and 
tripped over my feet, Judith would dribble and trip. If I threw a bad pass that was 
intercepted by the other team, Judith would throw a bad pass. 

When I missed an easy lay-up under the basket, Judith did the same thing, 
deliberately missing the next time she had the ball. 

It was one flub after another—doubled because of Judith copying me! 

And the whole time, she kept clapping and shouting, cheering me on. “Way 
to go, Sam! Nice try, Sam! You’re the best, Sam!” 

It was so obnoxious! 

And I could see the girls on the Edgemont team snickering at us, and 
laughing out loud when Judith fell head-first into the bleachers just because I 
had done it a few plays before. 

Anna and the other players on my team weren’t laughing. Their expressions 
were glum and angry. 

“You’re deliberately messing up!” Anna accused Judith about halfway 
through the game. 

“I am not!” Judith replied shrilly. 

“Why are you copying that clumsy ox?” I heard Anna demand. 

Judith grabbed her and knocked her down, and they began wrestling angrily 
on the floor, screaming and tearing at each other furiously. 

It took Ellen and the referee to stop the fight. Both girls were given a harsh 
lecture about sportsmanship and sent to the locker room. 

Ellen made me sit down on the bench. I was glad. I really didn’t feel like 
playing anymore. 

As I watched the rest of the game, I couldn’t concentrate on it at all. I kept 
thinking about my third and final wish, and how I’d blown it again. 

To my dismay, I realized that having Judith worship me was much worse 
than having her hate me! At least when she hated me, she left me alone! 

I had made three wishes, and each of them had turned into a nightmare. 
Now I was stuck with Judith following me around, hanging on my every word, 
constantly praising everything I did, fawning over me like a lovesick puppy— 
and, mainly, being an unbelievable pest! 

I actually longed for the days when she had made fun of me in front of the 
whole class, when she had followed after me, calling, “Byrd, why don’t you fly 
away! Why don’t you fly away, Byrd!” 

But what could I do? My three wishes were up. 

Was I going to be stuck with Judith for the rest of my life? 

We lost the game by fifteen or sixteen points. I didn’t pay much attention to 
the score. I just wanted to get out of there. 

But when I trudged into the locker room to change, Judith was waiting for 
me. She handed me a towel. “Good game!” she cried, slapping me a high-five. 

“Huh?” I could only gape at her. 

“Can we study together after dinner?” she asked with pleading eyes. 
“Please? You could help me with my algebra. You’re so much better at it than I 
am. You’re a real genius when it comes to algebra.” 

Luckily, I had to go with my parents to visit my aunt after dinner. That gave me a 
good excuse not to study with Judith. 

But what would be my excuse the next night? And the next, and the next? 

My aunt wasn’t feeling well, and the purpose of our visit was to cheer her 
up. I’m afraid I didn’t do a very good job. I barely said a word. 

I couldn’t stop thinking about Judith. 

What could I do about her? I could get angry and tell her to leave me alone. 
But I knew that wouldn’t help. I had wished for her to think I was the greatest 
person who ever lived. Now Judith was under an enchantment, under the power 
of the Crystal Woman’s spell. 

Telling her to go away wouldn’t discourage her in the least. 

Could I just ignore her? That wouldn’t be easy since she was constantly in 
my shadow, asking me a million questions, begging to wait on me like a servant. 

What could I do? What? 

I thought about it all the way home. Even my parents noticed I was 
distracted. 

“What’s the problem, Sam?” my mother demanded as we drove home. 

“Oh, nothing,” I lied. “Just thinking about schoolwork.” 

When we got home, there were four phone messages on the answering 
machine for me, all from Judith. 

My mother stared at me, curious. “That’s funny. I don’t remember your 
being friends with her before,” she said. 

“Yeah. She’s in my class,” I told her. I didn’t want to explain. I knew I 
couldn ’t explain. 

I hurried up to my room. I was totally exhausted, from all the worrying, I 
guess. I got changed into a nightshirt, clicked off the light, and climbed into bed. 

For a while, I lay staring up at the ceiling, watching shadows of the tree 
outside my window weave back and forth. I tried to clear my mind, tried to 
picture fluffy white sheep leaping over fluffy white clouds. 

I was just drifting off to sleep when I heard the floorboards creak. 

Opening my eyes wide, I saw a black shadow move against the darkness of 
my closet. 

I uttered a choked cry as I realized that someone was in my room. 

Before I could move, a hot, dry hand grabbed me by the arm. 

25 

I tried to scream, but the hand slid up over my mouth. 

I—I’m going to choke! I thought, frozen in panic. I can’t breathe! 

“Shh—don’t scream!” my attacker whispered. 

The light clicked on. 

The hand left my mouth. 

“Judith!” I rasped, my voice catching in my throat. 

She smiled at me, her green eyes flashing with excitement, and raised a 
finger to her lips. “Sshhh.” 

“Judith—what are you doing here?” I managed to cry, finding my voice. 
My heart was still pounding so hard, I could barely breathe. “How did you get 
in?” 

“Your back door was unlocked,” she whispered. “I hid in the closet to wait 
for you. I guess I fell asleep for a little while.” 

“But why?” I demanded angrily. I pulled myself up and lowered my feet to 
the floor. “What do you want?” 

Her smile faded. Her mouth formed a pout. “You said we could study 
together,” she said in a little-girl voice. “So I waited for you, Sam.” 

This was the last straw. “Get out!” I cried. 

I started to say more, but a knock on my door startled me into silence. 

“Sam—are you okay?” my dad called in. “Are you talking to someone?” 

“No. I’m fine, Dad,” I said. 

“You’re not on the phone, are you?” he asked suspiciously. “You know 
you’re not supposed to call people this late.” 

“No. I’m going to sleep now,” I told him. 

I waited till I heard his footsteps on the stairs. Then I turned back to Judith. 
“You have to go home,” I whispered. “As soon as the coast is clear—” 

“But why?” she demanded, hurt. “You said we’d study our algebra.” 

“I did not!” I cried. “Anyway, it’s too late. You have to go home. Your 
parents must be going nuts worrying about you, Judith.” 

She shook her head. “I sneaked out. They think I’m asleep in bed.” She 
smiled. “But that’s so great of you to worry about my parents, Sam. You really 

are the most considerate girl I know.” 

Her stupid compliment made me even angrier. I was so furious, I wanted to 
tear her apart with my bare hands. 

“I love your room,” she gushed, glancing around quickly. “Did you pick out 
all the posters yourself?” 

I sighed in total exasperation. 

“Judith, I just want you to go home—now,” I snarled slowly, one word at a 
time, so that maybe she would hear me. 

“Can we study together tomorrow?” she pleaded. “I really need your help, 
Sam.” 

“Maybe,” I replied. “But you can’t sneak into my house anymore, and—” 

“You’re so smart,” Judith gushed. “Where did you get that nightshirt? The 
stripes are terrific. I wish I had one like it.” 

Motioning for her to be silent, I crept out into the hall. All the lights had 
been turned off. My parents had gone to bed. 

Tugging Judith by the hand, I led the way downstairs, tiptoeing silently, 
taking it one step at a time. Then I practically shoved her out the front door and 
swung it closed with a soft click behind her. 

I stood in the dark entryway, panting hard, my mind racing. 

What can I do? What can I do? What can I do? 

It took me hours to get to sleep. And when I finally drifted off, I dreamed 
about Judith. 

“You look tired, dear,” my mom said at breakfast. 

“I didn’t sleep very well,” I confessed. 

When I headed out the front door to go to school, Judith was waiting for me 
by the driveway. 

She smiled at me and waved cheerily. “I thought we could walk to school 
this morning,” she chirped. “But if you want to ride your bike, I’ll be happy to 
mn alongside.” 

“No!” I shrieked. “No! Please—no!” 

I totally lost it. I just couldn’t stand it anymore. 

I dropped my backpack and started to run. I didn’t know where I was 
running. And I didn’t care. 

I just knew I had to run away from her. 

“Sam—wait! Wait up!” 

I turned to see her chasing after me. “No—please! Go away! Go away!” I 
screamed. 

But I could see her pick up speed, her sneakers thudding against the 
sidewalk, starting to catch up. 

I turned into someone’s yard and ran behind a hedge, trying to lose her. 

I didn’t really know what I was doing. I had no plan, no destination. I just 
had to run ! 

I was running through back yards now, across driveways, behind garages. 

And Judith followed, running at full speed, her short ponytail bobbing as 
she ran. “Sam—wait! Sam!” she called breathlessly. 

Suddenly I was running through woods, a thick tangle of trees and tall 
weeds. I weaved through them, first this way, then that, jumping over fallen 
branches, plunging through thick piles of dead, brown leaves. 

I’ve got to lose her! I told myself. I’ve got to get away! 

But then I stumbled over an upraised tree root and fell, sprawling face down 
on the carpet of dead leaves. 

Typical klutz move. 

And a second later, Judith was standing over me. 

26 

I glanced up from the ground—and saw to my shock that it wasn’t Judith. 

Clarissa hovered over me, her red shawl tight around her shoulders, her 
black eyes staring intently. 

“You!” I cried angrily, and started to scramble to my feet. 

“You are unhappy,” she said softly, frowning. 

“Your wishes have ruined my life!” I cried, furiously brushing dead leaves 
off the front of my sweater. 

“I don’t want you to be unhappy,” she replied. “I was trying to repay your 
kindness.” 

“I wish I’d never met you!” I cried angrily. 

“Very well.” She raised the round red crystal ball in one hand. As she raised 
it, her dark eyes began to glow, the same scarlet color as the crystal. “I will 
cancel your third wish. Make one final wish. Since you are so unhappy, I shall 
grant you one more.” 

I could hear the crunching of the leaves close behind me. Judith was 
catching up. 

“I—I wish I’d never met you!” I cried to the Crystal Woman. “I wish Judith 
had met you instead of me!” 

The crystal glowed brighter until the red light surrounded me in its glare. 

When it faded, I was standing on the edge of the woods. 

Whew! I thought. What a relief! What a great break! 

I’m so lucky! 

I could see Judith and Clarissa standing in the shade of a wide tree. They 
were huddled together, talking intently. 

This is the perfect revenge! I told myself. Now Judith will make a wish— 
and her life will be totally ruined! 

Chuckling to myself, I strained to hear what they were saying. I was dying 
to know what Judith would wish for. 

I’m pretty sure I heard Judith say, “Byrd, why don’t you fly away!” 

But that didn’t make any sense. 

I was so happy! So deliriously happy! 

I was free, totally free! 

I suddenly felt so different. Lighter. Happier. 

Let Judith have her wishes! I thought gleefully. Let her see what it’s like! 

Tilting my head, I saw a juicy, brown earthworm poke its head up from the 
ground. All of a sudden I was feeling pretty hungry. I jabbed my head forward 
and caught the end of the worm. Then I ate it. 

Very tasty. 

I fluttered my wings, testing the wind. 

Then I took off, flying low over the woods. 

The cool breeze felt so refreshing against my feathers. 

As I fluttered my wings harder, swooping higher into the sky, I glanced 
down and saw Judith. She was standing beside Clarissa. 

Judith stared up at me from the ground, and I guess she got her first wish— 
because she had the biggest smile on her face! 


PIANO LESSONS 
CAN BE MURDER 

1 

I thought I was going to hate moving into a new house. But actually, I had fun. 

I played a pretty mean joke on Mom and Dad. 

While they were busy in the front room showing the moving men where to 
put stuff, I went exploring. I found a really neat room to the side of the dining 
room. 

It had big windows on two sides looking out onto the back yard. Sunlight 
poured in, making the room brighter and a lot more cheery than the rest of the 
old house. 

The room was going to be our new family room. You know, with a TV and 
CD player, and maybe a Ping-Pong table and stuff. But right now it was 
completely empty. 

Except for two gray balls of dust in one corner, which gave me an idea. 

Chuckling to myself, I bent down and shaped the two dust balls with my 
hands. Then I began shouting in a real panicky voice: “Mice! Mice! Help! 
Mice!” 

Mom and Dad came bursting into the room at the same time. Their mouths 
nearly dropped to the floor when they saw the two gray dust mice. 

I kept screaming, “Mice! Mice!” Pretending I was scared of them. Trying 
hard to keep a straight face. 

Mom just stood in the doorway, her mouth hanging open. I really thought 
she was going to drop her teeth! 

Dad always panics more than Mom. He picked up a broom that was leaning 
against the wall, ran across the room, and began pounding the poor, defenseless 
dust mice with it. 

By that time, I was laughing my head off. 

Dad stared down at the glob of dust stuck to the end of the broom, and he 
finally caught on it was a joke. His face got real red, and I thought his eyes were 
going to pop out from behind his glasses. 

“Very funny, Jerome,” Mom said calmly, rolling her eyes. Everyone calls 
me Jerry, but she calls me Jerome when she’s upset with me. “Your father and I 
sure appreciate your scaring us to death when we’re both very nervous and 
overworked and trying to get moved into this house.” 

Mom is always real sarcastic like that. I think I probably get my sense of 
humor from her. 

Dad just scratched the bald spot on the back of his head. “They really 
looked like mice,” he muttered. He wasn’t angry. He’s used to my jokes. They 
both are. 

“Why can’t you act your age?” Mom asked, shaking her head. 

“I am!” I insisted. I mean, I’m twelve. So I was acting my age. If you can’t 
play jokes on your parents and try to have a little fun at twelve, when can you? 

“Don’t be such a smart guy,” Dad said, giving me his stern look. “There’s a 
lot of work to be done around here, you know, Jerry. You could help out.” 

He shoved the broom toward me. 

I raised both hands as if shielding myself from danger, and backed away. 
“Dad, you know I’m allergic!” I cried. 

“Allergic to dust?” he asked. 

“No. Allergic to work!” 

I expected them to laugh, but they just stormed out of the room, muttering 
to themselves. “You can at least look after Bonkers,” Mom called back to me. 
“Keep her out of the movers’ way.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I called back. Bonkers is our cat, and there’s no way I can 
keep Bonkers from doing anything! 

Let me say right out that Bonkers is not my favorite member of our family. 
In fact, I keep as far away from Bonkers as I can. 

No one ever explained to the stupid cat that she’s supposed to be a pet. 
Instead, I think Bonkers believes she’s a wild, man-eating tiger. Or maybe a 
vampire bat. 

Her favorite trick is to climb up on the back of a chair or a high shelf—and 
then leap with her claws out onto your shoulders. I can’t tell you how many good 
T-shirts have been ripped to shreds by this trick of hers. Or how much blood I’ve 
lost. 

The cat is nasty—just plain vicious. 

She’s all black except for a white circle over her forehead and one eye. 
Mom and Dad think she’s just wonderful. They’re always picking her up, and 
petting her, and telling her how adorable she is. Bonkers usually scratches them 
and makes them bleed. But they never learn. 

When we moved to this new house, I was hoping maybe Bonkers would get 
left behind. But, no way. Mom made sure that Bonkers was in the car first, right 

next to me. 

And of course the stupid cat threw up in the back seat. 

Whoever heard of a cat who gets carsick? She did it deliberately because 
she’s horrible and vicious. 

Anyway, I ignored Mom’s request to keep an eye on her. In fact, I crept into 
the kitchen and opened the back door, hoping maybe Bonkers would run away 
and get lost. 

Then I continued my exploring. 

Our other house was tiny, but new. This house was old. The floorboards 
creaked. The windows rattled. The house seemed to groan when you walked 
through it. 

But it was really big. I discovered all kinds of little rooms and deep closets. 
One upstairs closet was as big as my old bedroom! 

My new bedroom was at the end of the hall on the second floor. There were 
three other rooms and a bathroom up there. I wondered what Mom and Dad 
planned to do with all those rooms. 

I decided to suggest that one of them be made into a Nintendo room. We 
could put a wide-screen TV in there to play the games on. It would be really 
neat. 

As I made plans for my new video game room, I started to feel a little 
cheered up. I mean, it isn’t easy to move to a new house in a new town. 

I’m not the kind of kid who cries much. But I have to admit that I felt like 
crying a lot when we moved away from Cedarville. Especially when I had to say 
good-bye to my friends. 

Especially Sean. Sean is a great guy. Mom and Dad don’t like him too 
much because he’s kind of noisy and he likes to burp real loud. But Sean is my 
best friend. 

I mean he was my best friend. 

I don’t have any friends here in New Goshen. 

Mom said Sean could come stay with us for a few weeks this summer. That 
was really nice of her, especially since she hates his burping so much. 

But it didn’t really cheer me up. 

Exploring the new house was making me feel a little better. The room next 
to mine can be a gym, I decided. We’ll get all those great-looking exercise 
machines they show on TV. 

The movers were hauling stuff into my room, so I couldn’t go in there. I 

pulled open a door to what I thought was a closet. But to my surprise, I saw a 
narrow, wooden stairway. I guessed it led up to an attic. 

An attic! 

I’d never had an attic before. I’ll bet it’s filled with all kinds of great old 
stuff, I thought excitedly. Maybe the people who used to live here left their old 
comic book collection up there—and it’s worth millions! 

I was halfway up the stairs when I heard Dad’s voice behind me. “Jerry, 
where are you going?” 

“Up,” I replied. That was pretty obvious. 

“You really shouldn’t go up there by yourself,” he warned. 

“Why not? Are there ghosts up here or something?” I asked. 

I could hear his heavy footsteps on the wooden stairs. He followed me up. 
“Hot up here,” he muttered, adjusting his glasses on his nose. “It’s so stuffy.” 

He tugged on a chain suspended from the ceiling, and an overhead light 
came on, casting pale yellow light down on us. 

I glanced quickly around. It was all one room, long and low, the ceiling 
slanting down on both sides under the roof. I’m not very tall, but I reached up 
and touched the ceiling. 

There were tiny, round windows at both ends. But they were covered with 
dust and didn’t let in much light. 

“It’s empty,” I muttered, very disappointed. 

“We can store a lot of junk up here,” Dad said, looking around. 

“Hey—what’s that?” I spotted something against the far wall and began 
walking quickly toward it. The floorboards squeaked and creaked under my 
sneakers. 

I saw a gray, quilted cover over something large. Maybe it’s some kind of 
treasure chest, I thought. 

No one ever accused me of not having a good imagination. 

Dad was right behind me as I grabbed the heavy cover with both hands and 
pulled it away. 

And stared at a shiny, black piano. 

“Wow,” Dad murmured, scratching his bald spot, staring at the piano with 
surprise. “Wow. Wow. Why did they leave this behind?” 

I shrugged. “It looks like new,” I said. I hit some keys with my pointer 
finger. “Sounds good.” 

Dad hit some keys, too. “It’s a really good piano,” he said, rubbing his hand 

lightly over the keyboard. “I wonder what it’s doing hidden up here in the attic 
like this....” 

“It’s a mystery,” I agreed. 

I had no idea how big a mystery it really was. 

I couldn’t get to sleep that night. I mean, there was no way. 

I was in my good old bed from our old house. But it was facing the wrong 
direction. And it was against a different wall. And the light from the neighbor’s 
back porch was shining through the window. The window rattled from the wind. 
And all these creepy shadows were moving back and forth across the ceiling. 

I’m never going to be able to sleep in this new room, I realized. 

It’s too different. Too creepy. Too big. 

I’m going to be awake for the rest of my life! 

I just lay there, eyes wide open, staring up at the weird shadows. 

I had just started to relax and drift off to sleep when I heard the music. 

Piano music. 

At first, I thought it was coming from outside. But I quickly realized it was 
coming from up above me. From the attic! 

I sat straight up and listened. Yes. Some kind of classical music. Right over 
my head. 

I kicked off the covers and lowered my feet to the floor. 

Who could be up in the attic playing the piano in the middle of the night? I 
wondered. It couldn’t be Dad. He can’t play a note. And the only thing Mom can 
play is “Chopsticks”, and not very well. 

Maybe it’s Bonkers, I told myself. 

I stood up and listened. The music continued. Very softly. But I could hear 
it clearly. Every note. 

I started to make my way to the door and stubbed my toe against a carton 
that hadn’t been unpacked. “Ow!” I cried out, grabbing my foot and hopping 
around until the pain faded. 

Mom and Dad couldn’t hear me, I knew. Their bedroom was downstairs. 

I held my breath and listened. I could still hear the piano music above my 
head. 

Walking slowly, carefully, I stepped out of my room and into the hallway. 
The floorboards creaked under my bare feet. The floor was cold. 

I pulled open the attic door and leaned into the darkness. 

The music floated down. It was sad music, very slow, very soft. 
“Who—who’s up there?” I stammered. 

2 

The sad music continued, floating down the dark, narrow stairway to me. 

“Who’s up there?” I repeated, my voice shaking just a little. 

Again, no reply. 

I leaned into the darkness, peering up toward the attic. “Mom, is that you? 
Dad?” 

No reply. The melody was so sad, so slow. 

Before I even realized what I was doing, I was climbing the stairs. They 
groaned loudly under my bare feet. 

The air grew hot and stuffy as I reached the top of the stairs and stepped 
into the dark attic. 

The piano music surrounded me now. The notes seemed to be coming from 
all directions at once. 

“Who is it?” I demanded in a shrill, high-pitched voice. I guess I was a little 
scared. “Who’s up here?” 

Something brushed against my face, and I nearly jumped out of my skin. 

It took me a long, shuddering moment to realize it was the light chain. 

I pulled it. Pale yellow light spread out over the long, narrow room. 

The music stopped. 

“Who’s up here?” I called, squinting toward the piano against the far wall. 

No one. 

No one there. No one sitting at the piano. 

Silence. 

Except for the floorboards creaking under my feet as I walked over to the 
piano. I stared at it, stared at the keys. 

I don’t know what I expected to see. I mean, someone was playing the 
piano. Someone played it until the exact second the light went on. Where did 
they go? 

I ducked down and searched under the piano. 

I know it was stupid, but I wasn’t thinking clearly. My heart was pounding 
really hard, and all kinds of crazy thoughts were spinning through my brain. 

I leaned over the piano and examined the keyboard. I thought maybe this 

was one of those old-fashioned pianos that played by itself. A player piano. You 
know, like you sometimes see in cartoons. 

But it looked like an ordinary piano. I didn’t see anything special about it. 

I sat down on the bench. 

And jumped up. 

The piano bench was warm! As if someone had just been sitting on it! 
“Whoa!” I cried aloud, staring at the shiny, black bench. 

I reached down and felt it. It was definitely warm. 

But I reminded myself the whole attic was really warm, much warmer than 
the rest of the house. The heat seemed to float up here and stay. 

I sat back down and waited for my racing heart to return to normal. 

What’s going on here? I asked myself, turning to stare at the piano. The 
black wood was polished so well, I could see the reflection of my face staring 
back at me. 

My reflection looked pretty scared. 

I lowered my eyes to the keyboard and then hit a few soft notes. 

Someone had been playing this piano a few moments ago, I knew. 

But how could they have vanished into thin air without me seeing them? 

I plunked another note, then another. The sound echoed through the long, 
empty room. 

Then I heard a loud creak. From the bottom of the stairs. 

I froze, my hand still on the piano keys. 

Another creak. A footstep. 

I stood up, surprised to find my legs all trembly. 

I listened. I listened so hard, I could hear the air move. 

Another footstep. Louder. Closer. 

Someone was on the stairs. Someone was climbing to the attic. 

Someone was coming for me. 

3 

Creak. Creak. 

The stairs gave way beneath heavy footsteps. 

My breath caught in my throat. I felt as if I would suffocate. 

Frozen in front of the piano, I searched for a place to hide. But of course 
there wasn’t any. 

Creak. Creak. 

And then, as I stared in terror, a head poked up above the stairwell. 

“Dad!” I cried. 

“Jerry, what on earth are you doing up here?” He stepped into the pale 
yellow light. His thinning brown hair was standing up all over his head. His 
pajama pants were twisted. One leg had rolled up to the knee. He squinted at me. 
He didn’t have his glasses on. 

“Dad—I—I thought—” I sputtered. I knew I sounded like a complete jerk. 
But give me a break—I was scared ! 

“Do you know what time it is?” Dad demanded angrily. He glanced down at 
his wrist, but he wasn’t wearing his watch. “It’s the middle of the night, Jerry!” 

“I—I know, Dad,” I said, starting to feel a little better. I walked over to him. 
“I heard piano music, see. And so I thought—” 

“You what?” His dark eyes grew wide: His mouth dropped open. “You 
heard what?” 

“Piano music,” I repeated. “Up here. So I came upstairs to check it out, and 

“Jerry!” Dad exploded. His face got really red. “It’s too late for your dumb 
jokes!” 

“But, Dad—” I started to protest. 

“Your mother and I killed ourselves unpacking and moving furniture all 
day,” Dad said, sighing wearily. “We’re both exhausted, Jerry. I shouldn’t have 
to tell you that I’m in no mood for jokes. I have to go to work tomorrow 
morning. I need some sleep.” 

“Sorry, Dad,” I said quietly. I could see there was no way I was going to get 
him to believe me about the piano music. 

“I know you’re excited about being in a new house,” Dad said, putting a 

hand on the shoulder of my pajama shirt. “But, come on. Back to your room. 
You need your sleep, too.” 

I glanced back at the piano. It glimmered darkly in the pale yellow light. As 
if it were breathing. As if it were alive. 

I pictured it rumbling toward me, chasing me to the stairs. 

Crazy, weird thoughts. I guess I was more tired than I thought! 

“Would you like to learn to play it?” Dad asked suddenly. 

“Huh?” His question caught me by surprise. 

“Would you like to take piano lessons? We could have the piano brought 
downstairs. There’s room for it in the family room.” 

“Well... maybe,” I replied. “Yeah. That might be neat.” 

He took his hand from my shoulder. Then he straightened his pajama 
bottoms and started down the stairs. “I’ll discuss it with your mother,” he said. 
“I’m sure she’ll be pleased. She always wanted someone to be musical in the 
family. Pull the light chain, okay?” 

Obediently, I reached up and clicked off the light. The sudden darkness was 
so black, it startled me. I stayed close behind my dad as we made our way down 
the creaking stairs. 

Back in my bed, I pulled the covers up to my chin. It was kind of cold in 
my room. Outside, the winter wind gusted hard. The bedroom window rattled 
and shook, as if it were shivering. 

Piano lessons might be fun, I thought. If they let me learn to play rock 
piano, not that drippy, boring classical stuff. 

After a few lessons, maybe I could get a synthesizer. Get two or three 
different keyboards. Hook them up to a computer. 

Then I could do some composing. Maybe get a group together. 

Yeah. It could be really excellent. 

I closed my eyes. 

The window rattled again. The old house seemed to groan. 

I’ll get used to these noises, I told myself. I’ll get used to this old house. 
After a few nights, I won’t even hear the noises. 

I had just about drifted off to sleep when I heard the soft, sad piano music 
begin again. 

4 

Monday morning, I woke up very early. My cat clock with the moving tail and 
eyes wasn’t unpacked yet. But I could tell it was early by the pale gray light 
coming through my bedroom window. 

I got dressed quickly, pulling on a clean pair of faded jeans and a dark green 
pullover shirt that wasn’t too wrinkled. It was my first day at my new school, so 
I was pretty excited. 

I spent more time on my hair than I usually do. My hair is brown and thick 
and wiry, and it takes me a long time to slick it down and make it lie flat the way 
I like it. 

When I finally got it right, I made my way down the hall to the front stairs. 
The house was still silent and dark. 

I stopped outside the attic door. It was wide open. 

Hadn’t I closed it when I’d come downstairs with my dad? 

Yes. I remembered shutting it tight. And now, here it was, wide open. 

I felt a cold chill on the back on my neck. I closed the door, listening for the 
click. 

Jerry, take it easy, I warned myself. Maybe the latch is loose. Maybe the 
attic door always swings open. It’s an old house, remember? 

I’d been thinking about the piano music. Maybe it was the wind blowing 
through the piano strings, I told myself. 

Maybe there was a hole or something in the attic window. And the wind 
blew in and made it sound as if the piano were playing. 

I wanted to believe it had been the wind that made that slow, sad music. I 
wanted to believe it, so I did. 

I checked the attic door one more time, making sure it was latched, then 
headed down to the kitchen. 

Mom and Dad were still in their room. I could hear them getting dressed. 

The kitchen was dark and a little cold. I wanted to turn up the furnace, but I 
didn’t know where the thermostat was. 

Not all of our kitchen stuff had been unpacked. Cartons were still stacked 
against the wall, filled with glasses and plates and stuff. 

I heard someone coming down the hall. 

A big, empty carton beside the refrigerator gave me an idea. Snickering to 
myself, I jumped inside it and pulled the lid over me. 

I held my breath and waited. 

Footsteps in the kitchen. I couldn’t tell if it was Mom or Dad. 

My heart was pounding. I continued to hold my breath. If I didn’t, I knew I 
would burst out laughing. 

The footsteps went right past my carton to the sink. I heard water running. 
Whoever it was filled the kettle. 

Footsteps to the stove. 

I couldn’t wait anymore. 

“SURPRISE!” I screamed and jumped to my feet in the carton. 

Dad let out a startled shriek and dropped the kettle. It landed on his foot 
with a thud, then tilted onto its side on the floor. 

Water puddled around Dad’s feet. The kettle rolled toward the stove. Dad 
was howling and holding his injured foot and hopping up and down. 

I was laughing like a maniac! You should’ve seen the look on Dad’s face 
when I jumped up from the carton. I really thought he was going to drop his 
teeth! 

Mom came bursting into the room, still buttoning her sleeve cuffs. “What’s 
going on in here?” she cried. 

“Just Jerry and his stupid jokes,” Dad grumbled. 

“Jerome!” Mom shouted, seeing all the spilled water on the linoleum. “Give 
us a break.” 

“Just trying to help wake you up,” I said, grinning. They complain a lot, but 
they’re used to my twisted sense of humor. 

I heard the piano music again that night. 

It was definitely not the wind. I recognized the same sad melody. 

I listened for a few moments. It came from right above my room. 

Who’s up there? Who can be playing? I asked myself. 

I started to climb out of bed and investigate. But it was cold in my room, 
and I was really tired from my first day at the new school. 

So I pulled the covers over my head to drown out the piano music, and 
quickly fell asleep. 

“Did you hear the piano music last night?” I asked my mom. 

“Eat your cornflakes,” she replied. She tightened the belt of her bathrobe 

and leaned toward me over the kitchen table. 

“How come I have to have cornflakes?” I grumbled, mushing the spoon 
around in the bowl. 

“You know the rules,” she said, frowning. “Junk cereal only on weekends.” 

“Stupid rule,” I muttered. “I think cornflakes is a junk cereal.” 

“Don’t give me a hard time,” Mom complained, rubbing her temples. “I 
have a headache this morning.” 

“From the piano playing last night?” I asked. 

“What piano playing?” she demanded irritably. “Why do you keep talking 
about piano playing?” 

“Didn’t you hear it? The piano in the attic? Someone was playing it last 
night.” 

She jumped to her feet. “Oh, Jerry, please. No jokes this morning, okay? I 
told you I have a headache.” 

“Did I hear you talking about the piano?” Dad came into the kitchen, 
carrying the morning newspaper. “The guys are coming this afternoon to carry it 
down to the family room.” He smiled at me. “Limber up those fingers, Jerry.” 

Mom had walked over to the counter to pour herself a cup of coffee. “Are 
you really interested in this piano?” she demanded, eyeing me skeptically. “Are 
you really going to practice and work at it?” 

“Of course,” I replied. “Maybe.” 

* * * 

The two piano movers were there when I got home from school. They weren’t 
very big, but they were strong. 

I went up to the attic and watched them while Mom pulled cartons out of 
the family room to make a place for it. 

The two men used ropes and a special kind of dolly. They tilted the piano 
onto its side, then hoisted it onto the dolly. 

Lowering it down the narrow staircase was really hard. It bumped against 
the wall several times, even though they moved slowly and carefully. 

Both movers were really red-faced and sweaty by the time they got the 
piano downstairs. I followed them as they rolled it across the living room, then 
through the dining room. 

Mom came out of the kitchen, her hands jammed into her jeans pockets, 



and watched from the doorway as they rolled the dolly with the piano into the 
family room. 

The men strained to tilt it right side up. The black, polished wood really 
glowed in the bright afternoon sunlight through the family room windows. 

Then, as they started to lower the piano to the floor, Mom opened her 
mouth and started to scream. 

5 

“The cat! The cat!” Mom shrieked, her face all twisted in alarm. 

Sure enough, Bonkers was standing right in the spot where they were 
lowering the piano. 

The piano thudded heavily to the floor. Bonkers ran out from under it just in 

time. 

Too bad! I thought, shaking my head. That dumb cat almost got what it 
deserved. 

The men were apologizing as they tried to catch their breath, mopping their 
foreheads with their red-and-white bandannas. 

Mom ran to Bonkers and picked her up. “My poor little kitty.” 

Of course Bonkers swiped at Mom’s arm, her claws tearing out several 
threads in the sweater sleeve. Mom dropped her to the floor, and the creature 
slithered quickly out of the room. 

“She’s a little freaked out being in a new house,” Mom told the two 
workers. 

“She always acts like that,” I told them. 

A few minutes later, the movers were gone. Mom was in her room, trying to 
fix her sweater. And I was alone in the family room with my piano. 

I sat on the bench and slid back and forth on it. The bench was polished and 
smooth. It was real slippery. 

I planned a really funny comedy act where I sit down to play the piano for 
Mom and Dad, only the bench is so slippery, I keep sliding right onto the floor. 

I practiced sliding and falling for a while. I was having fun. 

Falling is one of my hobbies. It isn’t as easy as it looks. 

After a while, I got tired of falling. I just sat on the bench and stared at the 
keys. I tried picking out a song, hitting notes until I found the right ones. 

I started to get excited about learning to play the piano. 

I imagined it was going to be fun. 

I was wrong. Very wrong. 

Saturday afternoon, I stood staring out the living room window. It was a blustery, 
gray day. It looked like it was about to snow. 

I saw the piano teacher walking up the driveway. He was right on time. Two 
o’clock. 

Pressing my face against the window, I could see that he was big, kind of 
fat. He wore a long, puffy red coat and he had bushy white hair. From this 
distance, he sort of looked like Santa Claus. 

He walked very stiffly, as if his knees weren’t good. Arthritis or something, 
I guessed. 

Dad had found his name in a tiny ad in the back of the New Goshen 
newspaper. He showed it to me. It said: 

THE SHREEK SCHOOL 
New Method Piano Training 

Since it was the only ad in the paper for a piano teacher, Dad called it. 

And now, Mom and Dad were greeting the teacher at the door and taking 
his heavy red coat. “Jerry, this is Dr. Shreek,” Dad said, motioning for me to 
leave my place by the window. 

Dr. Shreek smiled at me. “Hello, Jerry.” 

He really did look like Santa Claus, except he had a white mustache, no 
beard. He had round, red cheeks and a friendly smile, and his blue eyes sort of 
twinkled as he greeted me. 

He wore a white shirt that was coming untucked around his big belly, and 
baggy, gray pants. 

I stepped forward and shook hands with him. His hand was red and kind of 
spongy. “Nice to meet you, Dr. Shreek,” I said politely. 

Mom and Dad grinned at each other. They could never believe it when I 
was polite! 

Dr. Shreek put his spongy hand on my shoulder. “I know I have a funny 
name,” he said, chuckling. “I probably should change it. But, you have to admit, 
it’s a real attention-getter!” 

We all laughed. 

Dr. Shreek’s expression turned serious. “Have you ever played an 
instrument before, Jerry?” 

I thought hard. “Well, I had a kazoo once!” 

Everyone laughed again. 

“The piano is a little more difficult than the kazoo,” Dr. Shreek said, still 

chuckling. “Let me see your piano.” 

I led him through the dining room and into the family room. He walked 
stiffly, but it didn’t seem to slow him down. 

Mom and Dad excused themselves and disappeared upstairs to do more 
unpacking. 

Dr. Shreek studied the piano keys. Then he lifted the back and examined the 
strings with his eyes. “Very fine instrument,” he murmured. “Very fine.” 

“We found it here,” I told him. 

His mouth opened in a little O of surprise. “You found it?” 

“In the attic. Someone just left it up there,” I said. 

“How strange,” he replied, rubbing his pudgy chin. He straightened his 
white mustache as he stared at the keys. “Don’t you wonder who played this 
piano before you?” he asked softly. “Don’t you wonder whose fingers touched 
these keys?” 

“Well...” I really didn’t know what to say. 

“What a mystery,” he said in a whisper. Then he motioned for me to take a 
seat on the piano bench. 

I was tempted to do my comedy act and slide right off onto the floor. But I 
decided I’d save it for when I knew him better. 

He seemed like a nice, jolly kind of guy. But I didn’t want him to think I 
wasn’t serious about learning to play. 

He dropped down beside me on the bench. He was so wide, there was 
barely room for the two of us. 

“Will you be giving me lessons here at home every week?” I asked, 
scooting over as far as I could to make room. 

“I’ll give you lessons at home at first,” he replied, his blue eyes twinkling at 
me. “Then, if you show promise, Jerry, you can come to my school.” 

I started to say something, but he grabbed my hands. 

“Let me take a look,” he said, raising my hands close to his face. He turned 
them over and studied both sides. Then he carefully examined my fingers. 

“What beautiful hands!” he exclaimed breathlessly. “Excellent hands!” 

I stared down at my hands. They didn’t look like anything special to me. 
Just normal hands. 

“Excellent hands,” Dr. Shreek repeated. He placed them carefully on the 
piano keys. He showed me what each note was, starting with C, and he had me 
play each one with the correct finger. 

“Next week we will start,” he told me, climbing up from the piano bench. “I 
just wanted to meet you today.” 

He searched through a small bag he had leaned against the wall. He pulled 
out a workbook and handed it to me. It was called Beginning to Play: A Hands- 
On Approach. 

“Look this over, Jerry. Try to learn the notes on pages two and three.” He 
made his way over to his coat, which Dad had draped over the back of the couch. 

“See you next Saturday,” I said. I felt a little disappointed that the lesson 
had been so short. I thought I’d be playing some great rock riffs by now. 

He pulled on his coat, then came back to where I was sitting. “I think you 
will be an excellent student, Jerry,” he said, smiling. 

I muttered thanks. I was surprised to see that his eyes had settled on my 
hands. “Excellent. Excellent,” he whispered. 

I felt a sudden chill. 

I think it was the hungry expression on his face. 

What’s so special about my hands? I wondered. Why does he like them so 
much? 

It was weird. Definitely weird. 

But of course I didn’t know how weird.... 

6 

CDEFGABC. 

I practiced the notes on pages two and three of the piano workbook. The 
book showed which finger to use and everything. 

This is easy, I thought. 

So when can I start playing some rock and roll? 

I was still picking out notes when Mom surfaced from the basement and 
poked her head into the family room. Her hair had come loose from the 
bandanna she had tied around her head, and she had dirt smudges on her 
forehead. 

“Did Dr. Shreek leave already?” she asked, surprised. 

“Yeah. He said he just wanted to meet me,” I told her. “He’s coming back 
next Saturday. He said I had excellent hands.” 

“You do?” She brushed the hair out of her eyes. “Well, maybe you can take 
those excellent hands down to the basement and use them to help us unpack 
some boxes.” 

“Oh, no!” I cried, and I slid off the piano bench and fell to the floor. 

She didn’t laugh. 

That night, I heard piano music. 

I sat straight up in bed and listened. The music floated up from downstairs. 

I climbed out of bed. The floorboards were cold under my bare feet. I was 
supposed to have a carpet, but Dad hadn’t had time to put it down yet. 

The house was silent. Through my bedroom window, I could see a gentle 
snow coming down, tiny, fine flakes, gray against the black sky. 

“Someone is playing the piano,” I said aloud, startled by the huskiness of 
my sleep-filled voice. 

“Someone is downstairs playing my piano.” 

Mom and Dad must hear it, I thought. Their room is at the far end of the 
house. But they are downstairs. They must hear it. 

I crept to my bedroom door. 

The same slow, sad melody. I had been humming it just before dinner. Mom 
had asked me where I’d heard it, and I couldn’t remember. 

I leaned against the doorframe, my heart pounding, and listened. The music 
drifted up so clearly, I could hear each note. 

Who is playing? 

Who? 

I had to find out. Trailing my hand along the wall, I hurried through the 
dark hallway. There was a night-light by the stairway, but I was always 
forgetting to turn it on. 

I made my way to the stairs. Then, gripping the wooden banister tightly, I 
crept down, one step at a time, trying to be silent. 

Trying not to scare the piano player away. 

The wooden stairs creaked quietly under my weight. But the music 
continued. Soft and sad, almost mournful. 

Tiptoeing and holding my breath, I crossed the living room. A streetlight 
cast a wash of pale yellow across the floor. Through the large front window, I 
could see the tiny snowflakes drifting down. 

I nearly tripped over an unpacked carton of vases left next to the coffee 
table. But I grabbed the back of the couch and kept myself from falling. 

The music stopped. Then started again. 

I leaned against the couch, waiting for my heart to stop pounding so hard. 

Where are Mom and Dad? I wondered, staring toward the back hallway 
where their room was. 

Can’t they hear the piano, too? Aren’t they curious? Don’t they wonder 
who is in the family room in the middle of the night, playing such a sad song? 

I took a deep breath and pushed myself away from the couch. Slowly, 
silently, I made my way through the dining room. 

It was darker back there. No light from the street. I moved carefully, aware 
of all the chairs and table legs that could trip me up. 

The door to the family room stood just a few feet ahead of me. The music 
grew louder. 

I took a step. Then another. 

I moved into the open doorway. 

Who is it? Who is it? 

I peered into the darkness. 

But before I could see, someone uttered a horrifying shriek behind me—and 
shoved me hard, pushing me down to the floor. 

7 

I hit the floor hard on my knees and elbows. 

Another loud shriek—right in my ears. 

My shoulders throbbed with pain. 

The lights came on. 

“Bonkers!” I roared. 

The cat leapt off my shoulders and scurried out of the room. 

“Jerry—what are you doing? What’s going on?” Mom demanded angrily as 
she ran into the room. 

“What’s all the racket?” Dad was right behind her, squinting hard without 
his glasses. 

“Bonkers jumped on me!” I screamed, still on the floor. “Ow. My shoulder. 
That stupid cat!” 

“But, Jerry—” Mom started. She bent to help pull me up. 

“That stupid cat!” I fumed. “She jumped down from that shelf. She scared 
me to death. And look—look at my pajama shirt!” 

The cat’s claws had ripped right through the shoulder. 

“Are you cut? Are you bleeding?” Mom asked, pulling the shirt collar down 
to examine my shoulder. 

“We really have to do something about that cat,” Dad muttered. “Jerry is 
right. She’s a menace.” 

Mom immediately jumped to Bonkers’ defense. “She was just frightened, 
that’s all. She probably thought Jerry was a burglar.” 

“A burglar?” I shrieked in a voice so high, only dogs could hear me. “How 
could she think I was a burglar? Aren’t cats supposed to see in the dark?” 

“Well, what were you doing down here, Jerry?” Mom asked, straightening 
my pajama shirt collar. She patted my shoulder. As if that would help. 

“Yeah. Why were you skulking around down here?” Dad demanded, 
squinting hard at me. He could barely see a thing without his glasses. 

“I wasn’t skulking around,” I replied angrily. “I heard piano music and—” 

“You what?” Mom interrupted. 

“I heard piano music. In the family room. So I came down to see who was 

playing.” 

My parents were both staring at me as if I were a Martian. 

“Didn’t you hear it?” I cried. 

They shook their heads. 

I turned to the piano. No one there. Of course. 

I hurried over to the piano bench, leaned down, and rubbed my hand over 
the surface. 

It was warm. 

“Someone was sitting here. I can tell!” I exclaimed. 

“Not funny,” Mom said, making a face. 

“Not funny, Jerry,” Dad echoed. “You came down here to pull some kind of 
joke—didn’t you!” he accused. 

“Huh? Me?” 

“Don’t play innocent, Jerome,” Mom said, rolling her eyes. “We know you. 
You’re never innocent.” 

“I wasn’t playing a joke!” I cried angrily. “I heard music, someone playing 

“Who?” Dad demanded. “Who was playing?” 

“Maybe it was Bonkers,” Mom joked. 

Dad laughed, but I didn’t. 

“What was the joke, Jerry? What were you planning to do?” Dad asked. 

“Were you going to do something to the piano?” Mom demanded, staring at 
me so hard, I could practically feel it. “That’s a valuable instrument, you know.” 

I sighed wearily. I felt so frustrated, I wanted to shout, scream, throw a fit, 
and maybe slug them both. “The piano is haunted !” I shouted. The words just 
popped into my head. 

“Huh?” It was Dad’s turn to give me a hard stare. 

“It must be haunted!” I insisted, my voice shaking. “It keeps playing—but 
there’s no one playing it!” 

“I’ve heard enough,” Mom muttered, shaking her head. “I’m going back to 
bed.” 

“Ghosts, huh?” Dad asked, rubbing his chin thoughtfully. He stepped up to 
me and lowered his head, the way he does when he’s about to unload something 
serious. “Listen, Jerry, I know this house might seem old and kind of scary. And 
I know how hard it was for you to leave your friends behind and move away.” 

“Dad, please—” I interrupted. 

But he kept going. “The house is just old, Jerry. Old and a little rundown. 
But that doesn’t mean it’s haunted. These ghosts of yours—don’t you see?— 
they’re really your fears coming out.” 

Dad was a psychology major in college. 

“Skip the lecture, Dad,” I told him. “I’m going to bed.” 

“Okay, Jer,” he said, patting my shoulder. “Remember—in a few weeks, 
you’ll know I’m right. In a few weeks, this ghost business will all seem silly to 
you.” 

Boy, was he wrong! 

* * * 

I slammed my locker shut and started to pull on my jacket. The long school 
hallway echoed with laughing voices, slamming lockers, calls and shouts. 

The halls were always noisier on Friday afternoons. School was over, and 
the weekend was here! 

“Oooh, what’s that smell?” I cried, making a disgusted face. 

Beside me, a girl was down on her knees, pawing through a pile of junk on 
the floor of her locker. “I wondered where that apple disappeared to!” she 
exclaimed. 

She climbed to her feet, holding a shriveled, brown apple in one hand. The 
sour aroma invaded my nostrils. I thought I was going to hurl! 

I must have been making a funny face, because she burst out laughing. 
“Hungry?” She pushed the disgusting thing in my face. 

“No thanks.” I pushed it back toward her. “You can have it.” 

She laughed again. She was kind of pretty. She had long, straight black hair 
and green eyes. 

She set the rotten apple down on the floor. “You’re the new kid, right?” she 
asked. “I’m Kim. Kim Li Chin.” 

“Hi,” I said. I told her my name. “You’re in my math class. And science 
class,” I told her. 

She turned back to her locker, searching for more stuff. “I know,” she 
replied. “I saw you fall out of your chair when Ms. Klein called on you.” 

“I just did that to be funny,” I explained quickly. “I didn’t really fall.” 

“I know,” she said. She pulled a heavy gray wool sweater down over her 
lighter sweater. Then she reached down and removed a black violin case from 

her locker. 

“Is that your lunchbox?” I joked. 

Tm late for my violin lesson,” she answered, slamming her locker shut. 
She struggled to push the padlock closed. 

“I’m taking piano lessons,” I told her. “Well, I mean I just started.” 

“You know, I live across the street from you,” she said, adjusting her 
backpack over her shoulder. “I watched you move in.” 

“Really?” I replied, surprised. “Well, maybe you could come over and we 
could play together. I mean, play music. You know. I’m taking lessons every 
Saturday with Dr. Shreek.” 

Her mouth dropped open in horror as she stared at me. “You’re doing 
what?” she cried. 

“Taking piano lessons with Dr. Shreek,” I repeated. 

“Oh!” She uttered a soft cry, spun around, and began running toward the 
front door. 

“Hey, Kim—” I called after her. “Kim—what’s wrong?” 

But she disappeared out the door. 

8 

“Excellent hands. Excellent!” Dr. Shreek declared. 

“Thanks,” I replied awkwardly. 

I was seated at the piano bench, hunched over the piano, my hands spread 
over the keys. Dr. Shreek stood beside me, staring down at my hands. 

“Now play the piece again,” he instructed, raising his blue eyes to mine. His 
smile faded beneath his white mustache as his expression turned serious. “Play it 
carefully, my boy. Slowly and carefully. Concentrate on your fingers. Each 
finger is alive, remember—a/zve!” 

“My fingers are alive,” I repeated, staring down at them. 

What a weird thought, I told myself. 

I began to play, concentrating on the notes on the music sheet propped 
above the keyboard. It was a simple melody, a beginner’s piece by Bach. 

I thought it sounded pretty good. 

“The fingers! The fingers!” Dr. Shreek cried. He leaned down toward the 
keyboard, bringing his face close to mine. “Remember, the fingers are alive!” 

What’s with this guy and fingers? I asked myself. 

I finished the piece. I glanced up to see a frown darken his face. 

“Pretty good, Jerry,” he said softly. “Now let us try it a bit faster.” 

“I goofed up the middle part,” I confessed. 

“You lost your concentration,” he replied. He reached down and spread my 
fingers over the keys. “Again,” he instructed. “But faster. And concentrate. 
Concentrate on your hands.” 

I took a deep breath and began the piece again. But this time I messed it up 
immediately. 

I started over. It sounded pretty good. Only a few clunkers. 

I wondered if Mom and Dad could hear it. Then I remembered they had 
gone grocery shopping. 

Dr. Shreek and I were alone in the house. 

I finished the piece and lowered my hands to my lap with a sigh. 

“Not bad. Now faster,” Dr. Shreek ordered. 

“Maybe we should try another piece,” I suggested. “This is getting kind of 

boring.” 

“Faster this time,” he replied, totally ignoring me. “The hands, Jerry. 
Remember the hands. They’re alive. Let them breathe!” 

Let them breathe? 

I stared down at my hands, expecting them to talk back to me! 

“Begin,” Dr. Shreek instructed sternly, leaning over me. “Faster.” 

Sighing, I began to play again. The same boring tune. 

“Faster!” the instructor cried. “Faster, Jerry!” 

I played faster. My fingers moved over the keys, pounding them hard. I 
tried to concentrate on the notes, but I was playing too fast for my eyes to keep 
up. 

“Faster!” Dr. Shreek cried excitedly, staring down at the keyboard. “That’s 
it! Faster, Jerry!” 

My fingers were moving so fast, they were a blur! 

“Faster! Faster!” 

Was I playing the right notes? I couldn’t tell. It was too fast, too fast to 
hear! 

“Faster, Jerry!” Dr. Shreek instructed, screaming at the top of his lungs. 
“Faster! The hands are alive! Alive!” 

“I can’t do it!” I cried. “Please—!” 

“Faster! Faster!” 

“I can’t!” I insisted. It was too fast. Too fast to play. Too fast to hear. 

I tried to stop. 

But my hands kept going! 

“Stop! Stop!” I screamed down at them in horror. 

“Faster! Play faster!” Dr. Shreek ordered, his eyes wide with excitement, 
his face bright red. “The hands are a/zve!” 

“No—please! Stop!” I called down to my hands. “Stop playing!” 

But they really were alive. They wouldn’t stop. 

My fingers flew over the keys. A crazy tidal wave of notes flooded the 
family room. 

“Faster! Faster!” the instructor ordered. 

And despite my frightened cries to stop, my hands gleefully obeyed him, 
playing on, faster and faster and faster. 

9 

Faster and faster, the music swirled around me. 

It’s choking me, I thought, gasping for breath. I can’t breathe. 

I struggled to stop my hands. But they moved frantically over the keyboard, 
playing louder. Louder. 

My hands began to ache. They throbbed with pain. 

But still they played. Faster. Louder. 

Until I woke up. 

I sat up in bed, wide awake. 

And realized I was sitting on my hands. 

They both tingled painfully. Pins and needles. My hands had fallen asleep. 

I had been asleep. The weird piano lesson—it was a dream. 

A strange nightmare. 

“It’s still Friday night,” I said aloud. The sound of my voice helped bring 
me out of the dream. 

I shook my hands, trying to get the circulation going, trying to stop the 
uncomfortable tingling. 

My forehead was sweating, a cold sweat. My entire body felt clammy. The 
pajama shirt stuck damply to my back. I shuddered, suddenly chilled. 

And realized the piano music hadn’t stopped. 

I gasped and gripped the bedcovers tightly. Holding my breath, I listened. 

The notes floated into my dark bedroom. 

Not the frantic roar of notes from my dream. The slow, sad melody I had 
heard before. 

Still trembling from my frightening dream, I climbed silently out of bed. 

The music floated up from the family room, so soft, so mournful. 

Who is playing down there? 

My hands still tingled as I made my way over the cold floorboards to the 
doorway. I stopped in the hall and listened. 

The tune ended, then began again. 

Tonight I am going to solve this mystery, I told myself. 

My heart was pounding. My entire body was tingling now. Pins and needles 

up and down my back. 

Ignoring how frightened I felt, I walked quickly down the hall to the 
stairway. The dim night-light down near the floor made my shadow rise up on 
the wall. 

It startled me for a moment. I hung back. But then I hurried down the stairs, 
leaning hard on the banister to keep the steps from creaking. 

The piano music grew louder as I crossed the dark living room. 

Nothing is going to stop me tonight, I told myself. Nothing. 

Tonight I am going to see who is playing the piano. 

The music continued, soft high notes, so light and sad. 

I tiptoed carefully through the dining room, holding my breath, listening to 
the music. 

I stepped up to the doorway to the family room. 

The music continued, a little louder. 

The same melody, over and over. 

Peering into the darkness, I stepped into the room. 

One step. Another. 

The piano was only a few feet in front of me. 

The music was so clear, so close. 

But I couldn’t see anyone on the piano bench. I couldn’t see anyone there at 
all. 

Who is playing? Who is playing this sad, sad music in the darkness? 

Trembling all over, I took another step closer. Another step. 

“Who—who’s there?” I called out in a choked whisper. 

I stopped, my hands knotted tensely into tight fists at my sides. I stared hard 
into the blackness, straining to see. 

The music continued. I could hear fingers on the keys, hear the slide of feet 
on the pedals. 

“Who’s there? Who’s playing?” My voice was tiny and shrill. 

There’s no one here, I realized to my horror. 

The piano is playing, but there’s no one here. 

Then, slowly, very slowly, like a gray cloud forming in the night sky, the 
ghost began to appear. 

10 

At first I could just see faint outlines, pale lines of gray moving against the 
blackness. 

I gasped. My heart was pounding so hard, I thought it would burst. 

The gray lines took shape, began to fill in. 

I stood frozen in terror, too frightened to run or even look away. 

And as I stared, a woman came into view. I couldn’t tell if she was young or 
old. She had her head down and her eyes closed, and was concentrating on the 
piano keys. 

She had long, wavy hair hanging loose down to her shoulders. She wore a 
short-sleeved top and a long skirt. Her face, her skin, her hair—all gray. 
Everything was gray. 

She continued to play as if I weren’t standing there. 

Her eyes were closed. Her lips formed a sad smile. 

She was kind of pretty, I realized. 

But she was a ghost. A ghost playing the piano in our family room. 

“Who are you? What are you doing here?” My high-pitched, tight voice 
startled me. The words came flying out, almost beyond my control. 

She stopped playing and opened her eyes. She stared hard at me, studying 
me. Her smile faded quickly. Her face revealed no emotion at all. 

I stared back, into the gray. It was like looking at someone in a heavy, dark 

fog. 

With the music stopped, the house had become so quiet, so terrifyingly 
quiet. “Who—who are you?” I repeated, stammering in my tiny voice. 

Her gray eyes narrowed in sadness. “This is my house,” she said. Her voice 
was a dry whisper, as dry as dead leaves. As dry as death. 

“This is my house.” The whispered words seemed to come from far away, 
so soft I wasn’t sure I had heard them. 

“I—don’t understand,” I choked out, feeling a cold chill at the back of my 
neck. “What are you doing here?” 

“My house,” came the whispered reply. “My piano.” 

“But who are you?” I repeated. “Are you a ghost?” 

As I uttered my frightened question, she let out a loud sigh. And as I stared 

into the grayness, I saw her face begin to change. 

The eyes closed, and her cheeks began to droop. Her gray skin appeared to 
fall, to melt away. It drooped like cookie batter, like soft clay. It fell onto her 
shoulders, then tumbled to the floor. Her hair followed, falling off in thick 
clumps. 

A silent cry escaped my lips as her skull was revealed. Her gray skull. 

Nothing remained of her face except for her eyes, her gray eyes, which 
bulged in the open sockets, staring at me through the darkness. 

“Stay away from my piano!” she rasped. “I’m warning you—STAY AWAY! ” 

I backed up and turned away from the hideous, rasping skull. I tried to 
scramble away, but my legs didn’t cooperate. 

I fell. 

Hit the floor on my knees. 

I struggled to pull myself up, but I was shaking too hard. 

“Stay away from my piano!” The gray skull glared at me with its bulging 

eyes. 

“Mom! Dad!” I tried to scream, but it came out a muffled whisper. 

I scrambled to my feet, my heart pounding, my throat closed tight with fear. 

“This is my house! My piano! STAY AWAY!” 

“Mom! Help me! Dad!” 

This time I managed to call out. “Mom—Dad—please!” 

To my relief, I heard bumping and clumping in the hall. Heavy footsteps. 

“Jerry? Jerry? Where are you?” Mom called. “Ow!” I heard her bump into 
something in the dining room. 

Dad reached the family room first. 

I grabbed him by the shoulders, then pointed. “Dad—look! A ghost! It’s a 
GHOST!” 

11 

Dad clicked on the light. Mom stumbled into the room, holding one knee. 

I pointed in horror to the piano bench. 

Which was now empty. 

“The ghost—I saw her!” I cried, shaking all over. I turned to my parents. 
“Did you hear her? Did you?” 

“Jerry, calm down.” Dad put his hands on my trembling shoulders. “Calm 
down. It’s okay. Everything is okay.” 

“But did you see her?” I demanded. “She was sitting there, playing the 
piano, and—” 

“Ow. I really hurt my knee,” Mom groaned. “I bumped it on the coffee 
table. Oww.” 

“Her skin dropped off. Her eyes bulged out of her skull!” I told them. I 
couldn’t get that grinning skull out of my mind. I could still see her, as if her 
picture had been burned into my eyes. 

“There’s no one there,” Dad said softly, holding onto my shoulders. “See? 
No one.” 

“Did you have a nightmare?” Mom asked, bending to massage her knee. 

“It wasn’t a nightmare!” I screamed. “I saw her! I really did! She talked to 
me. She told me this was her piano, her house.” 

“Let’s sit down and talk about this,” Mom suggested. “Would you like a cup 
of hot cocoa?” 

“You don’t believe me —do you?” I cried angrily. “I’m telling you the 
truth!” 

“We don’t really believe in ghosts,” Dad said quietly. He guided me to the 
red leather couch against the wall and sat down beside me. Yawning, Mom 
followed us, lowering herself onto the soft couch arm. 

“You don’t believe in ghosts, do you, Jerry?” Mom asked. 

“I do now!” I exclaimed. “Why don’t you listen to me? I heard her playing 
the piano. I came downstairs and I saw her. She was a woman. She was all gray. 
And her face fell off. And her skull showed through. And—and—” 

I saw Mom give Dad a look. 

Why wouldn’t they believe me? 

“A woman at work was telling me about a doctor,” Mom said softly, 
reaching down and taking my hand. “A nice doctor who talks with young people. 
Dr. Frye, I think his name was.” 

“Huh? You mean a psychiatrist?” I cried shrilly. “You think I’m crazy?” 

“No, of course not,” Mom replied quickly, still holding on to my hand. “I 
think something has made you very nervous, Jerry. And I don’t think it would 
hurt to talk to someone about it.” 

“What are you nervous about, Jer?” Dad asked, straightening the collar of 
his pajama shirt. “Is it the new house? Going to a new school?” 

“Is it the piano lessons?” Mom asked. “Are you worried about the lessons?” 
She glanced at the piano, gleaming black and shiny under the ceiling light. 

“No. I’m not worried about the lessons,” I muttered unhappily. “I told you 
—I’m worried about the ghost\” 

“I’m going to make you an appointment with Dr. Frye,” Mom said quietly. 
“Tell him about the ghost, Jerry. I’ll bet he can explain it all better than your 
father and I can.” 

“I’m not crazy,” I muttered. 

“Something has you upset. Something is giving you bad dreams,” Dad said. 
“This doctor will be able to explain it to you.” He yawned and stood up, 
stretching his arms above his head. “I’ve got to get some sleep.” 

“Me, too,” Mom said, letting go of my hand and climbing off the arm of the 
couch. “Do you think you can go to sleep now, Jerry?” 

I shook my head and muttered, “I don’t know.” 

“Do you want us to walk you to your room?” she asked. 

“I’m not a little baby!” I shouted. I felt angry and frustrated. I wanted to 
scream and scream until they believed me. 

“Well, good night, Jer,” Dad said. “Tomorrow’s Saturday, so you can sleep 
late.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I muttered. 

“If you have any more bad dreams, wake us up,” Mom said. 

Dad clicked off the light. They headed down the hall to their room. 

I made my way across the living room to the front stairs. 

I was so angry, I wanted to hit something or kick something. I was really 
insulted, too. 

But as I climbed the creaking stairs in the darkness, my anger turned to fear. 

The ghost had vanished from the family room. What if she was waiting for 

me up in my room? 

What if I walked into my room and the disgusting gray skull with the 
bulging eyeballs was staring at me from my bed? 

The floorboards squeaked and groaned beneath me as I slowly made my 
way through the hall to my room. I suddenly felt cold all over. My throat 
tightened. I struggled to breathe. 

She’s in there. She’s in there waiting for me. 

I knew it. I knew she’d be there. 

And if I scream, if I cry for help, Mom and Dad will just think I’m crazy. 

What does the ghost want? 

Why does she play the piano every night? Why did she try to frighten me? 
Why did she tell me to stay away? 

The questions rolled through my mind. I couldn’t answer them. I was too 
tired, too frightened to think clearly. 

I hesitated outside my room, breathing hard. 

Then, holding onto the wall, I gathered my courage and stepped inside. 

As I moved into the darkness, the ghost rose up in front of my bed. 

12 

I uttered a choked cry and staggered back into the doorway. 

Then I realized I was staring at my covers. I must have kicked them over 
the foot of the bed during my nightmare about Dr. Shreek. They stood in a clump 
on the floor. 

My heart pounding, I crept back into the room, grabbed the blanket and 
sheet, and pulled them back onto the bed. 

Maybe I am cracking up! I thought. 

No way, I assured myself. I might be scared and frustrated and angry—but I 
saw what I saw. 

Shivering, I slid into bed and pulled the covers up to my chin. I closed my 
eyes and tried to force the picture of the ugly gray skull from my mind. 

When I finally started to drift off to sleep, I heard the piano music start 
again. 

* * * 

Dr. Shreek arrived promptly at two the next afternoon. Mom and Dad were out 
in the garage, unpacking more cartons. I took Dr. Shreek’s coat, then led him 
into the family room. 

It was a cold, blustery day outside, threatening snow. Dr. Shreek’s cheeks 
were pink from the cold. With his white hair and mustache, and round belly 
under his baggy, white shirt, he looked more like Santa Claus than ever. 

He rubbed his pudgy hands together to warm them and motioned for me to 
take a seat at the piano bench. “Such a beautiful instrument,” he said cheerily, 
running a hand over the shiny, black top of the piano. “You are a very lucky 
young man to find this waiting for you.” 

“I guess,” I replied without enthusiasm. 

I had slept till eleven, but I was still tired. And I couldn’t shake the ghost 
and her warning from my mind. 

“Have you practiced your notes?” Dr. Shreek asked, leaning against the 
piano, turning the pages of the music workbook. 

“A little,” I told him. 

“Let me see what you have learned. Here.” He began to place my fingers 
over the keys. “Remember? This is where you start.” 

I played a scale. 

“Excellent hands,” Dr. Shreek said, smiling. “Keep repeating it, please.” 

The lesson went well. He kept telling me how good I was, even though I 
was just playing notes and a simple scale. 

Maybe I do have some talent, I thought. 

I asked him when I could begin learning some rock riffs. 

He chuckled for some reason. “In due time,” he replied, staring at my 
hands. 

I heard Mom and Dad come in through the kitchen door. A few seconds 
later, Mom appeared in the family room, rubbing the arms of her sweater. “It’s 
really getting cold out there,” she said, smiling at Dr. Shreek. “I think it’s going 
to snow.” 

“It’s nice and warm in here,” he replied, returning her smile. 

“How’s the lesson going?” Mom asked him. 

“Very well,” Dr. Shreek told her, winking at me. “I think Jerry shows a lot 
of promise. I would like him to start taking his lessons at my school.” 

“That’s wonderful!” Mom exclaimed. “Do you really think he has talent?” 

“He has excellent hands,” Dr. Shreek replied. 

Something about the way he said it gave me a cold chill. 

“Do you teach rock music at your school?” I asked. 

He patted my shoulder. “We teach all kinds of music. My school is very 
large, and we have many fine instructors. We have students of all ages there. Do 
you think you could come after school on Fridays?” 

“That would be fine,” Mom said. 

Dr. Shreek crossed the room and handed my mom a card. “Here is the 
address of my school. I’m afraid it is on the other end of town.” 

“No problem,” Mom said, studying the card. “I get off work early on 
Fridays. I can drive him.” 

“That will end our lesson for today, Jerry,” Dr. Shreek said. “Practice the 
new notes. And I’ll see you Friday.” 

He followed my mom to the living room. I heard them chatting quietly, but 
I couldn’t make out what they were saying. 

I stood up and walked to the window. It had started to snow, very large 
flakes coming down really hard. The snow was already starting to stick. 

Staring into the back yard, I wondered if there were any good hills to sled 
on in New Goshen. And I wondered if my sled had been unpacked. 

I cried out when the piano suddenly started to play. 

Loud, jangling noise. Like someone pounding furiously on the keys with 
heavy fists. 

Pound. Pound. Pound. 

“Jerry—stop it!” Mom shouted from the living room. 

“I’m not doing it!” I cried. 

13 

Dr. Frye’s office wasn’t the way I pictured a psychiatrist’s office. It was small 
and bright. The walls were yellow, and there were colorful pictures of parrots 
and toucans and other birds hanging all around. 

He didn’t have a black leather couch like psychiatrists always have on TV 
and in the movies. Instead, he had two soft-looking, green armchairs. He didn’t 
even have a desk. Just the two chairs. 

I sat in one, and he sat in the other. 

He was a lot younger than I thought he’d be. He looked younger than my 
dad. He had wavy red hair, slicked down with some kind of gel or something, I 
think. And he had a face full of freckles. 

He just didn’t look like a psychiatrist at all. 

“Tell me about your new house,” he said. He had his legs crossed. He rested 
his long notepad on them as he studied me. 

“It’s a big, old house,” I told him. “That’s about it.” 

He asked me to describe my room, so I did. 

Then we talked about the house we moved from and my old room. Then we 
talked about my friends back home. Then we talked about my new school. 

I felt nervous when we started. But he seemed okay. He listened carefully to 
everything I said. And he didn’t give me funny looks, like I was crazy or 
something. 

Even when I told him about the ghost. 

He scribbled down a few notes when I told him about the piano playing late 
at night. He stopped writing when I told him how I’d seen the ghost, and how 
her hair fell off and then her face, and how she had screamed at me to stay away. 

“My parents didn’t believe me,” I said, squeezing the soft arms of the chair. 
My hands were sweating. 

“It’s a pretty weird story,” Dr. Frye replied. “If you were your mom or dad, 
and your kid told you that story, would you believe it?” 

“Sure,” I said. “If it was true.” 

He chewed on his pencil eraser and stared at me. 

“Do you think I’m crazy?” I asked. 

He lowered his notepad. He didn’t smile at the question. “No. I don’t think 

you’re crazy, Jerry. But the human mind can be really strange sometimes.” 

Then he launched into this long lecture about how sometimes we’re afraid 
of something, but we don’t admit to ourselves that we’re afraid. So our mind 
does all kinds of things to show that we’re afraid, even though we keep telling 
ourselves that we’re not afraid. 

In other words, he didn’t believe me, either. 

“Moving to a new house creates all kinds of stress,” he said. “It is possible 
to start imagining that we see things, that we hear things—just so we don’t admit 
to ourselves what we’re really afraid of.” 

“I didn’t imagine the piano music,” I said. “I can hum the melody for you. 
And I didn’t imagine the ghost. I can tell you just what she looked like.” 

“Let’s talk about it next week,” he said, climbing to his feet. “Our time is 
up. But until next time, I just want to assure you that your mind is perfectly 
normal. You’re not crazy, Jerry. You shouldn’t think that for a second.” 

He shook my hand. “You’ll see,” he said, opening the door for me. “You’ll 
be amazed at what we figure out is behind that ghost of yours.” 

I muttered thanks and walked out of his office. 

I made my way through the empty waiting room and stepped into the 
hallway. 

And then I felt the ghost’s icy grip tighten around my neck. 

14 

The unearthly cold shot through my entire body. 

Uttering a terrified cry, I jerked away and spun around to face her. 

“Mom!” I cried, my voice shrill and tiny. 

“Sorry my hands are so cold,” she replied calmly, unaware of how badly 
she had scared me. “It’s freezing out. Didn’t you hear me calling you?” 

“No,” I told her. My neck still tingled. I tried to rub the cold away. “I... 
uh... was thinking about stuff, and—” 

“Well, I didn’t mean to scare you,” she said, leading the way across the 
small parking lot to the car. She stopped to pull the car keys from her bag. “Did 
you and Dr. Frye have a nice talk?” 

“Kind of,” I said. 

This ghost has me jumping out of my skin, I realized as I climbed into the 
car. Now I’m seeing the ghost everywhere. 

I have got to calm down, I told myself. I’ve just got to. 

I’ve got to stop thinking that the ghost is following me. 

But how? 

Friday after school, Mom drove me to Dr. Shreek’s music school. It was a cold, 
gray day. I stared at my breath steaming up the passenger window as we drove. It 
had snowed the day before, and the roads were still icy and slick. 

“I hope we’re not late,” Mom fretted. We stopped for a light. She cleared 
the windshield in front of her with the back of her gloved hand. “I’m afraid to 
drive any faster than this.” 

All of the cars were inching along. We drove past a bunch of kids building a 
snow fort in a front yard. One little red-faced kid was crying because the others 
wouldn’t let him join them. 

“The school is practically in the next town,” Mom remarked, pumping the 
brakes as we slid toward an intersection. “I wonder why Dr. Shreek has his 
school so far away from everything.” 

“I don’t know,” I answered dully. I was kind of nervous. “Do you think Dr. 
Shreek will be my instructor? Or do you think I’ll have someone else?” 

Mom shrugged her shoulders. She leaned forward over the steering wheel, 

struggling to see through the steamed-up windshield. 

Finally, we turned onto the street where the school was located. I stared out 
at the block of dark, old houses. The houses gave way to woods, the bare trees 
tilting up under a white blanket of snow. 

On the other side of the woods stood a brick building, half-hidden behind 
tall hedges. “This must be the school,” Mom said, stopping the car in the middle 
of the street and staring up at the old building. “There’s no sign or anything. But 
it’s the only building for blocks.” 

“It’s creepy-looking,” I said. 

Squinting through the windshield, she pulled the car into a narrow gravel 
driveway, nearly hidden by the tall, snow-covered hedges. 

“Are you sure this is it?” I asked. I cleared a spot on the window with my 
hand and peered through it. The old building looked more like a prison than a 
school. It had rows of tiny windows above the ground floor, and the windows 
were all barred. Thick ivy covered the front of the building, making it appear 
even darker than it was. 

“I’m pretty sure,” Mom said, biting her lip. She lowered the window and 
stuck her head out, gazing up at the enormous, old house. 

The sound of piano music floated into the car. Notes and scales and 
melodies all mixed together. 

“Yeah. We’ve found it!” Mom declared happily. 

“Go on, Jerry. Hurry. You’re late. I’m going to go pick up something for 
dinner. I’ll be back in an hour.” 

I pushed open the car door and stepped out onto the snowy driveway. My 
boots crunched loudly as I started to jog toward the building. 

The piano music grew louder. Scales and songs jumbled together into a 
deafening rumble of noise. 

A narrow walk led up to the front stoop. The walk hadn’t been shoveled, 
and a layer of ice had formed under the snow. I slipped and nearly fell as I 
approached the entrance. 

I stopped and gazed up. It looks more like a haunted house than a music 
school, I thought with a shiver. 

Why did I have such a heavy feeling of dread? 

Just nervous, I told myself. 

Shrugging away my feeling, I turned the cold brass doorknob and pushed 
open the heavy door. It creaked open slowly. Taking a deep breath, I stepped into 

the school. 

15 

Along, narrow hall stretched before me. The hall was surprisingly dark. Coming 
in from the bright, white snow, it took my eyes a long time to adjust. 

The walls were a dark tile. My boots thudded noisily on the hard floor. 
Piano notes echoed through the hall. The music seemed to burst out from all 
directions. 

Where is Dr. Shreek’s office? I wondered. 

I made my way down the hall. The lights grew dimmer. I turned into 
another long hallway, and the piano music grew louder. 

There were dark brown doors on both sides of this corridor. The doors had 
small, round windows in them. As I continued walking, I glanced into the 
windows. 

I could see smiling instructors in each room, their heads bobbing in rhythm 
to piano music. 

Searching for the office, I passed door after door. Each room had a student 
and an instructor. 

The piano sounds became a roar, like an ocean of music crashing against 
the dark tile walls. 

Dr. Shreek really has a lot of students, I thought. There must be a hundred 
pianos playing at once! 

I turned another corner and then another. 

I suddenly realized I had completely lost my sense of direction. I had no 
idea where I was. I couldn’t find my way back to the front door if I wanted to! 

“Dr. Shreek, where are you?” I muttered to myself. My voice was drowned 
out by the booming piano music that echoed off the walls and low ceiling. 

I began to feel a little frightened. 

What if these dark halls twisted on forever? I imagined myself walking and 
walking for the rest of my life, unable to find my way out, deafened by the 
pounding piano music. 

“Jerry, stop scaring yourself,” I said aloud. 

Something caught my eye. I stopped walking and stared up at the ceiling. A 
small, black camera was perched above my head. 

It appeared to be a video camera, like the security cameras you see in banks 

and stores. 

Was someone watching me on a TV screen somewhere? 

If they were, why didn’t they come help me find the way to Dr. Shreek? 

I began to get angry. What kind of school was this? No signs. No office. No 
one to greet people. 

As I turned another corner, I heard a strange thumping sound. At first I 
thought it was just another piano in one of the practice rooms. 

The thumping grew louder, closer. I stopped in the middle of the hall and 
listened. A high-pitched whine rose up over the thumping sounds. 

Louder. Louder. 

The floor seemed to shake. 

And as I stared down the dark hall, an enormous monster turned the corner. 
Its huge, square body glowed in the dim light as if it were made of metal. Its 
rectangular head bobbed near the ceiling. 

Its feet crashed against the hard floor as it moved to attack me. Eyes on the 
sides of its head flashed an angry red. 

“No!” I cried, swallowing hard. 

It uttered its high-pitched whine in reply. Then it lowered its gleaming head 
as if preparing for battle. 

I spun away, determined to escape. 

To my shock, as I turned, I saw Dr. Shreek. 

He stood just a few yards down the hall. Dr. Shreek was watching the 
enormous creature move in on me, a pleased grin on his face. 

16 

I stopped short with a loud gasp. 

Behind me, the creature was stomping closer, blasting out its angry whine. 

Ahead of me, Dr. Shreek, his blue eyes glowing with pleasure, blocked my 
escape. 

I cried out, preparing to be caught from behind by the silvery monster. 

But it stopped. 

Silence. 

No crashing of its heavy metallic feet. No shrill whine. 

“Hello, Jerry,” Dr. Shreek said calmly, still grinning. “What are you doing 
all the way back here?” 

Breathing hard, I pointed to the monster, which stood silently, staring down 
at me. “I—I—” 

“You are admiring our floor sweeper?” Dr. Shreek asked. 

“Your what?” I managed to choke out. 

“Our floor sweeper. It is rather special,” Dr. Shreek said. He stepped past 
me and put a hand on the front of the thing. 

“It—it’s a machine?” I stammered. 

He laughed. “You didn’t think it was alive, did you?” 

I just gaped at it. I was still too freaked out to speak. 

“Mr. Toggle, our janitor, built this for us,” Dr. Shreek said, rubbing his hand 
along the square metal front of it. “It works like a dream. Mr. Toggle can build 
anything. He’s a genius, a true genius.” 

“Wh-why does it have a face?” I asked, hanging back against the wall. 
“Why does it have eyes that light up?” 

“Just Mr. Toggle’s sense of humor,” Dr. Shreek replied, chuckling. “He put 
in those cameras, too.” He pointed to the video camera perched on the ceiling. 
“Mr. Toggle is a mechanical genius. We couldn’t do a thing without him. We 
really couldn’t.” 

I took a few reluctant steps forward and admired the floor sweeper from 
closer up. “I—I couldn’t find your office,” I told Dr. Shreek. “I was wandering 
and wandering—” 

“I apologize,” he replied quickly. “Let us begin your lesson. Come.” 

I followed him as he led the way back in the direction I had come. He 
walked stiffly but rapidly. His white shirt was untucked in front of his big 
stomach. He swung his hands stiffly as he walked. 

I felt really stupid. Imagine letting myself be terrified by a floor sweeper! 

He pushed open one of the brown doors with a round window, and I 
followed him into the room. I glanced quickly around. It was a small, square 
room lighted by two rows of fluorescents on the ceiling. There was no window. 

The only furniture was a small, brown upright piano, a narrow piano bench, 
and a music stand. 

Dr. Shreek motioned for me to sit down on the piano bench, and we began 
our lesson. He stood behind me, placing my fingers carefully on the keys, even 
though I now knew how to do it myself. 

We practiced different notes. I hit C’s and D’s. Then we tried E’s and F’s. 
He showed me my first chord. Then he had me do scales over and over. 

“Excellent!” he declared near the end of the hour. “Excellent work, Jerry. 
I’m most pleased.” His Santa Claus cheeks were bright pink beneath his white 
mustache. 

I squeezed my hands together, trying to get rid of a cramp. “Are you going 
to be my teacher?” I asked. 

He nodded. “Yes, I will instruct you in the basics,” he replied. “Then when 
your hands are ready, you will be given over to one of our fine teachers.” 

“When my hands are ready?” 

What exactly did he mean by that? 

“Let us try this short piece,” he said, reaching over me to turn the page in 
the music book. “Now, this piece has only three notes. But you must pay 
attention to the quarter notes and the half notes. Do you remember how long to 
continue a half note?” 

I demonstrated on the piano. Then I tried to play the short melody. I did 
pretty well. Only a few clunkers. 

“Wonderful! Wonderful!” Dr. Shreek declared, staring at my hands as I 
played. He glanced at his watch. “I’m afraid our time is up. See you next Friday, 
Jerry. Be sure to practice what I showed you.” 

I thanked him and climbed to my feet. I was glad the lesson was over. 
Having to concentrate so hard was really tiring. Both my hands were sweating, 
and I still had a cramp in one. 

I headed to the door, then stopped. “Which way do I go?” I asked. “How do 

I get to the front?” 

Dr. Shreek was busy collecting the work sheets we had used, tucking them 
into the music book. “Just keep going left,” he said without looking up. “You 
can’t miss it.” 

I said good-bye and stepped out into the dark hallway. My ears were 
immediately attacked by the roar of piano notes. 

Aren’t the other lessons over? I wondered. 

How come they keep playing even though the hour is up? 

I glanced in both directions, making sure there were no floor sweepers 
waiting to attack. Then I turned left, as Dr. Shreek had instructed, and began to 
follow the hallway toward the front. 

As I passed door after door, I could see the smiling instructors inside each 
room, their heads moving in rhythm with the piano playing. 

Most of the students in these rooms were more advanced than me, I 
realized. They weren’t practicing notes and scales. They were playing long, 
complicated pieces. 

I turned left, then when the corridor came to an end, turned left one more 

time. 

It took me a while to realize that I was lost again. 

Had I missed a left turn somewhere? 

The dark halls with their rows of brown doors on both sides all looked 
alike. 

I turned left again. My heart began to pound. 

Why wasn’t anyone else in the hall? 

Then up ahead I saw double doors. The front exit must be through those 
doors, I decided. 

I made my way eagerly to the double doors and started to push through 
them—when powerful hands grabbed me from behind, and a gruff voice rasped 
in my ear, “No, you don’t!” 

17 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry. 

The hands pulled me back, then let go of my shoulders. 

The double doors swung back into place. 

I spun around to see a tall, wiry man with long, scraggly black hair and a 
stubbly black beard. He wore a yellow T-shirt under denim overalls. 

“Not that way,” he said softly. “You’re looking for the front? It’s up there.” 
He pointed to the hall to the left. 

“Oh. Sorry,” I said, breathing hard. “You... scared me.” 

The man apologized. “I’ll take you to the front,” he offered, scratching his 
stubbly cheek. “Allow me to introduce myself. I’m Mr. Toggle.” 

“Oh. Hi,” I said. “I’m Jerry Hawkins. Dr. Shreek told me about you. I—I 
saw your floor sweeper.” 

He smiled. His black eyes lit up like dark coals. “It’s a beauty, isn’t it? I 
have a few other creations like it, some even better.” 

“Dr. Shreek says you’re a mechanical genius,” I gushed. 

Mr. Toggle chuckled to himself. “Yes. I programmed him to say that!” he 
joked. We both laughed. 

“Next time you come to the school, I’ll show you some of my other 
inventions,” Mr. Toggle offered, adjusting his overall straps over his slender 
shoulders. 

“Thanks,” I replied. The front door was right up ahead. I was never so glad 
to see a door! “I’m sure I’ll catch on to the layout of this place,” I said. 

He didn’t seem to hear me. “Dr. Shreek tells me you have excellent hands,” 
he said, a strange smile forming under his stubbly black beard. “That’s what we 
look for here, Jerry. That’s what we look for.” 

Feeling kind of awkward, I thanked him. I mean, what are you supposed to 
say when someone tells you what excellent hands you’ve got? 

I pushed open the heavy front door and saw Mom waiting in the car. “Good 
night!” I called, and eagerly ran out of the school, into the snowy evening. 

* * * 

After dinner, Mom and Dad insisted that I show them what I had learned in my 
piano lesson. I really didn’t want to. I had only learned that one simple song, and 
I still hadn’t played it all the way through without goofing it up. 

But they forced me into the family room and pushed me onto the piano 
bench. “If I’m going to pay for the lessons, I want to hear what you’re learning,” 
Dad said. He sat down close to Mom on the couch, facing the back of the piano. 

“We only tried one song,” I said. “Couldn’t we wait till I learn more?” 

“Play it,” Dad ordered. 

I sighed. “I have a cramp in my hand.” 

“Come on, Jerry. Don’t make excuses,” Mom snapped impatiently. “Just 
play the song, okay? Then we won’t bug you anymore tonight.” 

“What did the school look like?” Dad asked Mom. “It’s way on the other 
side of town, isn’t it?” 

“It’s practically out of town,” Mom told him. “It’s in this very old house. 
Kind of run-down looking, actually. But Jerry told me it’s nice inside.” 

“No, I didn’t,” I interrupted. “I said it was big. I didn’t say it was nice. I got 
lost in the halls twice!” 

Dad laughed. “I see you have your mother’s sense of direction!” 

Mom gave Dad a playful shove. “Just play the piece,” she said to me. 

I found it in the music book and propped the book in front of me on the 
piano. Then I arranged my fingers on the keys and prepared to play. 

But before I hit the first note, the piano erupted with a barrage of low notes. 
It sounded as if someone was pounding on the keys with both fists. 

“Jerry—stop it,” Mom said sharply. “That’s too loud.” 

“That can’t be what you learned,” Dad added. 

I set my fingers in place and began to play. 

But my notes were drowned out by the horrible, loud banging again. 

It sounded like a little kid pounding away on the keys as hard as he could. 

“Jerry—give us a break!” Mom shouted, holding her ears. 

“But I’m not doing it!” I screamed. “It isn’t me!” 

18 

They didn’t believe me. 

Instead, they got angry. They accused me of never taking anything 
seriously, and sent me up to my room. 

I was actually glad to get out of the family room and away from that 
haunted piano. I knew who was pounding the keys and making that racket. The 
ghost was doing it. 

Why? What was she trying to prove? 

What did she plan to do to me? 

Those questions I couldn’t answer... yet. 

The next Friday afternoon, Mr. Toggle kept his promise. He greeted me at the 
door to the piano school after my mom dropped me off. He led me through the 
twisting halls to his enormous workshop. 

Mr. Toggle’s workshop was the size of an auditorium. The vast room was 
cluttered with machines and electronic equipment. 

An enormous two-headed metal creature, at least three times as tall as the 
floor sweeper that had terrified me the week before, stood in the center. It was 
surrounded by tape machines, stacks of electric motors, cases of tools and 
strange-looking parts, video equipment, a pile of bicycle wheels, several piano 
frames with no insides, animal cages, and an old car with its seats removed. 

One entire wall seemed to be a control panel. It had more than a dozen 
video screens, all on, all showing different classes going on in the school. 
Around the screens were thousands of dials and knobs, blinking red and green 
lights, speakers, and microphones. 

Beneath the control panel, on a counter that ran the length of the room, 
stood at least a dozen computers. All of them seemed to be powered up. 

“Wow!” I exclaimed. My eyes kept darting from one amazing thing to 
another. “I don’t believe this!” 

Mr. Toggle chuckled. His dark eyes lit up. “I find ways to keep busy,” he 
said. He led me to an uncluttered corner of the enormous room. “Let me show 
you some of my musical instruments.” 

He walked to a row of tall, gray metal cabinets along the far wall. He pulled 

a few items from a cabinet and came hurrying back. 

“Do you know what this is, Jerry?” He held up a shiny, brass instrument 
attached to some kind of tank. 

“A saxophone?” I guessed. 

“A very special saxophone,” he said, grinning. “See? It’s attached to this 
tank of compressed air. That means you don’t have to blow into it. You can 
concentrate on your fingering.” 

“Wow,” I said. “That’s really neat.” 

“Here. Put this on,” Mr. Toggle urged. He slipped a brown leather cap over 
my head. The cap had several thin wires flowing out the back, and it was 
attached to a small keyboard. 

“What is it?” I asked, adjusting the cap over my ears. 

“Blink your eyes,” Mr. Toggle instructed. 

I blinked my eyes, and the keyboard played a chord. I moved my eyes from 
right to left. It played another chord. I winked one eye. It played a note. 

“It’s completely eye-controlled,” Mr. Toggle said with pride. “No hands 
required.” 

“Wow,” I repeated. I didn’t know what else to say. This stuff was amazing! 

Mr. Toggle glanced up at a row of clocks on the control panel wall. “You’re 
late for class, Jerry. Dr. Shreek will be waiting. Tell him it’s my fault, okay?” 

“Okay,” I said. “Thanks for showing me everything.” 

He laughed. “I didn’t show you everything,” he joked. “There’s lots more.” 
He rubbed his stubbly beard. “But you’ll see it all in due time.” 

I thanked him again and hurried toward the door. It was nearly four-fifteen. 
I hoped Dr. Shreek wouldn’t be angry that I was fifteen minutes late. 

As I jogged across the enormous workroom, I nearly ran into a row of dark 
metal cabinets, shut and padlocked. 

Turning away from them, I suddenly heard a voice. 

“Help!” A weak cry. 

I stopped by the side of the cabinet and listened hard. 

And heard it again. A little voice, very faint. “Help me, please!” 

19 

“Mr. Toggle—what’s that?” I cried. 

He had begun fiddling with the wires on the brown leather cap. He slowly 
looked up. “What’s what?” 

“That cry,” I told him, pointing to the cabinet. “I heard a voice.” 

He frowned. “It’s just damaged equipment,” he muttered, returning his 
attention to the wires. 

“Huh? Damaged equipment?” I wasn’t sure I had heard him correctly. 

“Yeah. Just some damaged equipment,” he repeated impatiently. “You’d 
better hurry, Jerry. Dr. Shreek must be wondering where you are.” 

I heard a second cry. A voice, very weak and tiny. “Help me—please!” 

I hesitated. Mr. Toggle was staring at me impatiently. 

I had no choice. I turned and ran from the room, the weak cries still in my 

ears. 

On Saturday afternoon I went outside to shovel snow off our driveway. It had 
snowed the night before, only an inch or two. Now it was one of those clear 
winter days with a bright blue sky overhead. 

It felt good to be out in the crisp air, getting some exercise. Everything 
seemed so fresh and clean. 

I was finishing down at the bottom of the drive, my arms starting to ache 
from all the shoveling, when I saw Kim Li Chin. She was climbing out of her 
mother’s black Honda, carrying her violin case. I guessed she was coming from 
a lesson. 

I had seen her in school a few times, but I hadn’t really talked to her since 
that day she ran away from me in the hall. 

“Hey!” I called across the street, leaning on the shovel, a little out of breath. 
“Hi!” 

She handed the violin case to her mother and waved back. Then she came 
jogging toward me, her black hightops crunching over the snow. “How’s it 
going?” she asked. “Pretty snow, huh?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. Want to shovel some? I still have to do the walk.” 

She laughed. “No thanks.” She had a high, tinkly laugh, like two glasses 

clinking together. 

“You coming from a violin lesson?” I asked, still leaning on the shovel. 

“Yeah. I’m working on a Bach piece. It’s pretty hard.” 

“You’re ahead of me,” I told her. “I’m still doing mostly notes and scales.” 

Her smile faded. Her eyes grew thoughtful. 

We talked a little while about school. Then I asked if she’d like to come in 
and have some hot chocolate or something. 

“What about the walk?” she asked, pointing. “I thought you had to shovel 
it.” 

“Dad would be disappointed if I didn’t save some of it for him,” I joked. 

Mom filled two big white mugs with hot chocolate. Of course I burned my 
tongue on the first sip. 

Kim and I were sitting in the den. Kim sat on the piano bench and tapped 
some keys lightly. “It has a really good tone,” she said, her face growing serious. 
“Better than my mother’s piano.” 

“Why did you run away that afternoon?” I blurted out. 

It had been on my mind ever since it happened. I had to know the answer. 

She lowered her eyes to the piano keyboard and pretended she hadn’t heard 
me. 

So I asked again. “Why did you run away like that, Kim?” 

“I didn’t,” she replied finally, still avoiding my eyes. “I was late for a 
lesson, that’s all.” 

I set my hot chocolate mug down on the coffee table and leaned against the 
arm of the couch. “I told you I was going to take piano lessons at the Shreek 
School, remember? Then you got this strange look on your face, and you ran 
away.” 

Kim sighed. She had the white hot chocolate mug in her lap. I saw that she 
was gripping it tightly in both hands. “Jerry, I really don’t want to talk about it,” 
she said softly. “It’s too... too scary.” 

“Scary?” I asked. 

“Don’t you know the stories about the Shreek School?” she asked. 

20 

I laughed. I’m not sure why. Maybe it was the serious expression on Kim’s face. 
“Stories? What kind of stories?” 

“I really don’t want to tell you,” she said. She took a long sip from the 
white mug, then returned it to her lap. 

“I just moved here, remember?” I told her. “So I haven’t heard any stories. 
What are they about?” 

“Things about the school,” she muttered. She climbed off the piano bench 
and walked to the window, carrying the mug in one hand. 

“What kinds of things?” I demanded. “Come on, Kim —tell me!” 

“Well... things like, there are monsters there,” she replied, staring out the 
window into my snowy back yard. “Real monsters that live in the basement.” 

“Monsters?” I laughed. 

Kim spun around. “It’s not funny,” she snapped. 

“I’ve seen the monsters,” I told her, shaking my head. 

Her face filled with surprise. “You’ve what?” 

“I’ve seen the monsters,” I repeated. “They’re floor sweepers.” 

“Huh?” Her mouth dropped open. She nearly spilled hot chocolate down 
the front of her sweatshirt. “Floor sweepers?” 

“Yeah. Mr. Toggle built them. He works at the school. He’s some kind of 
mechanical genius. He builds all kinds of things.” 

“But—” she started. 

“I saw one my first day at the school,” I continued. “I thought it was some 
kind of monster. It made this weird whining sound, and it was coming right at 
me. I practically dropped my teeth! But it was one of Mr. Toggle’s floor 
cleaners.” 

Kim tilted her head, staring at me thoughtfully. “Well, you know how 
stories get started,” she said. “I knew they probably weren’t true. They probably 
all have simple explanations like that.” 

“All?” I asked. “There are more?” 

“Well...” She hesitated. “There were stories about how kids went in for 
lessons and never came out again. How they vanished, just disappeared.” 

“That’s impossible,” I said. 

“Yeah, I guess,” she quickly agreed. 

Then I remembered the tiny voice from the cabinet, calling out for help. 

It had to be some invention of Mr. Toggle’s, I told myself. It had to be. 

Damaged equipment, he said. He didn’t seem the least bit excited or upset 
about it. 

“It’s funny how scary stories get started,” Kim said, walking back to the 
piano bench. 

“Well, the piano school building is creepy and old,” I said. “It really looks 
like some kind of haunted mansion. I guess that’s probably why some of the 
stories got started.” 

“Probably,” she agreed. 

“The school isn’t haunted, but that piano is!” I told her. I don’t know what 
made me say it. I hadn’t told anyone about the ghost and the piano. I knew no 
one would believe me. 

Kim gave a little start and stared at the piano. “This piano is haunted? What 
do you mean? How do you know?” 

“Late at night, I hear someone playing it,” I told her. “A woman. I saw her 
once.” 

Kim laughed. “You’re putting me on—right?” 

I shook my head. “No, I’m serious, Kim. I saw this woman. Late at night. 
She plays the same sad melody over and over.” 

“Jerry, come on!” Kim pleaded, rolling her eyes. 

“The woman talked to me. Her skin fell off. It—it was so frightening, Kim. 
Her face disappeared. Her skull, it stared at me. And she warned me to stay 
away. Stay away.” 

I felt a shiver. Somehow I had shut that scary scene out of my mind for a 
few days. But now, as I told it to Kim, it all came back to me. 

Kim had a big grin on her face. “You’re a better storyteller than I am,” she 
said. “Do you know a lot of ghost stories?” 

“It isn’t a story! ” I cried. Suddenly, I was desperate for her to believe me. 

Kim started to reply, but my mom poked her head into the family room and 
interrupted. “Kim, your mom just called. She needs you to come home now.” 

“Guess I’d better go,” Kim said, setting down the hot chocolate mug. 

I followed her out. 

We had just reached the family room doorway when the piano began to 
play. A strange jumble of notes. 

“See?” I cried excitedly to Kim. “See? Now do you believe me?” 

21 

We both turned back to stare at the piano. 

Bonkers was strutting over the keys, his tail straight up behind him. 

Kim laughed. “Jerry, you’re funny! I almost believed you!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

That stupid cat had made a fool of me again. 

“See you in school,” Kim said. “I loved your ghost story.” 

“Thanks,” I said weakly. Then I hurried across the room to chase Bonkers 
off the piano. 

Late that night I heard the piano playing again. 

I sat straight up in bed. The shadows on my ceiling seemed to be moving in 
time to the music. 

I had been sleeping lightly, restlessly. I must have kicked off my covers in 
my sleep, because they were bunched at the foot of the bed. 

Now, listening to the familiar slow melody, I was wide awake. 

This was not Bonkers strutting over the keys. This was the ghost. 

I stood up. The floorboards were ice-cold. Outside the bedroom window, I 
could see the winter-bare trees shivering in a strong breeze. 

As I crept to the bedroom doorway, the music grew louder. 

Should I go down there? I asked myself. 

Will the ghost disappear the minute I poke my head into the family room? 

Do I really want to see her? 

I didn’t want to see that hideous, grinning skull again. 

But I realized I couldn’t just stand there in the doorway. I couldn’t go back 
to bed. I couldn’t ignore it. 

I had to go investigate. 

I was pulled downstairs, as if tugged by an invisible rope. 

Maybe this time Mom and Dad will hear her, too, I thought as I made my 
way along the hallway. Maybe they will see her, too. Maybe they will finally 
believe me. 

Kim flashed into my mind as I started down the creaking stairs. She thought 

I was making up a ghost story. She thought I was trying to be funny. 

But there really was a ghost in my house, a ghost playing my piano. And I 
was the only one who knew it. 

Into the living room. Across the worn carpet to the dining room. 

The music floated so gently, so quietly. 

Such ghostly music, I thought.... 

I hesitated just short of the family room doorway. Would she vanish the 
instant I peeked in? 

Was she waiting for me? 

Taking a deep breath, I took a step into the family room. 

22 

She had her head down, her long hair falling over her face. 

I couldn’t see her eyes. 

The piano music seemed to swirl around me, pulling me closer despite my 

fear. 

My legs were trembling, but I took a step closer. Then another. 

She was all gray. Shades of gray against the blackness of the night sky 
through the windows. 

Her head bobbed and swayed in rhythm with the music. The sleeves of her 
blouse billowed as her arms moved over the keys. 

I couldn’t see her eyes. I couldn’t see her face. Her long hair covered her, as 
if hiding her behind a curtain. 

The music soared, so sad, so incredibly sad. 

I took a step closer. I suddenly realized I had forgotten to breathe. I let my 
breath out in a loud whoosh. 

She stopped playing. Maybe the sound of my breathing alerted her that I 
was there. 

As she raised her head, I could see her pale eyes peering out at me through 
her hair. 

I didn’t move. 

I didn’t breathe. 

I didn’t make a sound. 

“The stories are true,” she whispered. A dry whisper that seemed to come 
from far away. 

I wasn’t sure I had heard her correctly. I tried to say something, but my 
voice caught in my throat. 

No sound came out at all. 

“The stories are true,” she repeated. Her voice was only air, a hiss of air. 

I goggled at her. 

“Wh-what stories?” I finally managed to choke out. 

“The stories about the school,” she answered, her hair falling over her face. 
Then she started to raise her arms off the piano keys. “They’re true,” she 

moaned. “The stories are true.” 

She held her arms up to me. 

Gaping at them in horror, I cried out—then started to gag. 
Her arms ended in stumps. She had no hands. 

23 

The next thing I knew, my mom was wrapping her arms around me. “Jerry, calm 
down. Jerry, it’s okay. It’s okay,” she kept repeating. 

“Huh? Mom?” 

I was gasping for breath. My chest was heaving up and down. My legs were 
all wobbly. 

“Mom? Where—? How—?” 

I looked up to see my dad standing a few feet away, squinting at me through 
his glasses, his arms crossed in front of his bathrobe. “Jerry, you were screaming 
loud enough to wake the entire town!” 

I stared at him in disbelief. I hadn’t even realized I was screaming. 

“It’s okay now,” Mom said soothingly. “It’s okay, Jerry. You’re okay now.” 

I’m okay? 

Again, I pictured the ghost woman, all in gray, her hair falling down, 
forming a curtain over her face. Again, I saw her raise her arms to show me. 
Again, I saw the horrible stumps where her hands should have been. 

And again, I heard her dry whisper, “The stories are true. ” 

Why didn’t she have any hands? Why? 

How did she play the piano without hands? 

Why was she haunting my piano? Why did she want to terrify me? 

The questions circled my brain so fast, I wanted to scream and scream and 
scream. But I was all screamed out. 

“Your mom and I were both sound asleep. You scared us to death,” Dad 
said. “I never heard wails like that.” 

I didn’t remember screaming. I didn’t remember the ghost disappearing, or 
Mom and Dad rushing in. 

It was too horrifying. I guess my mind just shut off. 

“I’ll make you some hot chocolate,” Mom said, still holding me tight. “Try 
to stop trembling.” 

“I—I’m trying,” I stammered. 

“Guess it was another nightmare,” I heard Dad tell Mom. “Must have been 
a vivid one.” 

“It wasn’t a nightmare!” I shrieked. 

“Sorry,” Dad said quickly. He didn’t want to get me started again. 

But it was too late. Before I even realized it was happening, I started to 
scream. “I don’t want to play the piano! Get it out of here! Get it out!” 

“Jerry, please—” Mom pleaded, her face tight with alarm. 

But I couldn’t stop. “I don’t want to play! I don’t want lessons! I won’t go 
to that piano school! I won’t, I won’t!” 

“Okay, okay!” Dad cried, shouting to be heard over my desperate wails. 
“Okay, Jerry. No one is going to force you.” 

“Huh?” I gazed from one parent to the other, trying to see if they were 
serious. 

“If you don’t want piano lessons, you don’t have to take them,” Mom said, 
keeping her voice in a low, soothing tone. “You’re only signed up for one more 
anyway.” 

“Yeah,” Dad quickly joined in. “When you go to the school on Friday, just 
tell Dr. Shreek that it’s your last lesson.” 

“But I don’t want—” I started. 

Mom put a gentle hand over my mouth. “You have to tell Dr. Shreek, Jerry. 
You can’t just quit.” 

“Tell him on Friday,” Dad urged. “You don’t have to play the piano if you 
don’t want to. Really.” 

Mom’s eyes searched mine. “Does that make you feel better, Jerry?” 

I glanced at the piano, now silent, shimmering dully in the dim light from 
overhead. “Yeah. I guess,” I muttered uncertainly. “I guess it does.” 

Friday afternoon after school, a gray, blustery day with dark snowclouds 
hovering low overhead, Mom drove me to the piano school. She pulled into the 
long driveway between the tall hedges and stopped in front of the entrance to the 
dark, old building. 

I hesitated. “Couldn’t I just run in and tell Dr. Shreek that I quit, then run 
right back out?” 

Mom glanced at the clock on the dashboard. “Take one more lesson, Jerry. 
It won’t hurt. We’ve already paid for it.” 

I sighed unhappily. “Will you come in with me? Or can you wait out here 
for me?” 

Mom frowned. “Jerry, I’ve got three stops to make. I’ll be back in an hour, I 

promise.” 

Reluctantly, I pushed open the car door. “Bye, Mom.” 

“If Dr. Shreek asks why you’re quitting, just tell him it was interfering with 
your schoolwork.” 

“Okay. See you in an hour,” I said. I slammed the car door, then watched as 
she drove away, the tires crunching over the gravel drive. 

I turned and trudged into the school building. 

My sneakers thudded loudly as I made my way through the dark halls to Dr. 
Shreek’s room. I looked for Mr. Toggle, but didn’t see him. Maybe he was in his 
enormous workshop inventing more amazing things. 

The usual roar of piano notes poured from the practice rooms as I passed by 
them. Through the small, round windows I could see smiling instructors, their 
hands waving, keeping the beat, their heads swaying to their students’ playing. 

As I turned a corner and headed down another long, dark corridor, a strange 
thought popped into my head. I suddenly realized that I had never seen another 
student in the halls. 

I had seen instructors through the windows of the rooms. And I had heard 
the noise of their students’ playing. But I had never seen another student. 

Not one. 

I didn’t have long to think about it. A smiling Dr. Shreek greeted me outside 
the door to our practice room. “How are you today, Jerry?” 

“Okay,” I replied, following him into the room. 

He wore baggy gray pants held up with bright red suspenders over a 
rumpled white shirt. His white hair looked as if it hadn’t been brushed in a few 
days. He motioned for me to take my place on the piano bench. 

I sat down quickly, folding my hands tensely in my lap. I wanted to get my 
speech over with quickly before we began the lesson. “Uh... Dr. Shreek?” 

He walked stiffly across the small room until he was standing right in front 
of me. “Yes, my boy?” he beamed down at me, his Santa Claus cheeks bright 
pink. 

“Well... I... this will be my last lesson,” I choked out. “I’ve decided I... 
uh... have to quit.” 

His smile vanished. He grabbed my wrist. “Oh, no,” he said, lowering his 
voice to a growl. “No. You’re not leaving, Jerry.” 

“Huh?” I cried. 

He tightened his grip on my wrist. He was really hurting me. 

“Quitting?” he exclaimed. “Not with those hands.” His face twisted into an 
ugly snarl. “You can’t quit, Jerry. I need those beautiful hands.” 

24 

“Let go!” I screamed. 

He ignored me and tightened his grip, his eyes narrowing menacingly. 
“Such excellent hands,” he muttered. “Excellent.” 

“No!” 

With a shrill cry, I jerked my wrist free. I leapt up from the piano bench and 
began running to the door. 

“Come back, Jerry!” Dr. Shreek called angrily. “You cannot get away!” 

He started after me, moving stiffly but steadily, taking long strides. 

I pushed open the door and darted out into the hall. The banging of piano 
music greeted my ears. The long, dark hall was empty as always. 

“Come back, Jerry!” Dr. Shreek called from right behind me. 

“No!” I cried out again. I hesitated, trying to decide which way to go, which 
way led to the front door. Then I lowered my head and started to run. 

My sneakers thudded over the hard floor. I ran as fast as I could, faster than 
I’d ever run in my life. The practice rooms whirred past in a dark blur. 

But to my surprise, Dr. Shreek kept right behind me. “Come back, Jerry,” 
he called, not even sounding out of breath. “Come back. You cannot get away 
from me.” 

Glancing back, I saw that he was gaining on me. 

I could feel the panic rise to my throat, choking off my air. My legs ached. 
My heart pounded so hard, it felt as if my chest were about to burst. 

I turned a corner and ran down another long hall. 

Where was I? Was I heading toward the front door? 

I couldn’t tell. This dark hallway looked like all the others. 

Maybe Dr. Shreek is right. Maybe I can’t get away, I thought, feeling the 
blood throb at my temples as I turned another corner. 

I searched for Mr. Toggle. Perhaps he could save me. But the halls were 
empty. Piano music poured out of every room, but no one was out in the hall. 

“Come back, Jerry! There’s no use running!” 

“Mr. Toggle!” I screamed, my voice hoarse and breathless. “Mr. Toggle— 
help me! Help me, please!” 

I turned another corner, my sneakers sliding on the smoothly polished floor. 
I was gasping for breath now, my chest heaving. 

I saw double doors up ahead. Did they lead to the front? 

I couldn’t remember. 

With a low moan, I stuck out both hands and pushed open the doors. 

“No!” I heard Dr. Shreek shout behind me. “No, Jerry! Don’t go into the 
recital hall!” 

Too late. 

I pushed through the doors and bolted inside. Still running, I found myself 
in an enormous, brightly lit room. 

I took a few more steps—then stopped in horror. 

The piano music was deafening—like a never-ending roar of thunder. 

At first, the room was a blur. Then it slowly began to come into focus. 

I saw row after row of black pianos. Beside each piano stood a smiling 
instructor. The instructors all looked alike. They all were bobbing their heads in 
time to the music. 

The music was being played by— 

It was being played by— 

I gasped, staring from row to row. 

The music was being played by— HANDS! 

Human hands floating over the keyboards. 

No people attached. 

Just HANDS! 

25 

My eyes darted down the rows of pianos. A pair of hands floated above each 
piano. 

The instructors were all bald-headed men in gray suits with smiles plastered 
on their faces. Their heads bobbed and swayed, their gray eyes opened and 
closed as the hands played over the keyboards. 

Hands. 

Just hands. 

As I gaped, paralyzed, trying to make sense of what I saw, Dr. Shreek burst 
into the room from behind me. He made a running dive at my legs, trying to 
tackle me. 

Somehow I dodged away from his outstretched hands. 

He groaned and hit the floor on his stomach. I watched him slide across the 
smooth floor, his face red with anger. 

Then I spun around, away from the dozens of hands, away from the 
banging pianos, and started back toward the doors. 

But Dr. Shreek was faster than I imagined. To my surprise, he was on his 
feet in a second, moving quickly to block my escape. 

I skidded to a stop. 

I tried to turn around, to get away from him. But I lost my balance and fell. 

The piano music swirled around me. I looked up to see the rows of hands 
pounding away on their keyboards. 

With a frightened gasp, I struggled to my feet. 

Too late. 

Dr. Shreek was closing in on me, a gleeful smile of triumph on his red, 
round face. 

26 

“No!” I cried, and tried to climb to my feet. 

But Dr. Shreek bent over me, grabbed my left ankle, and held on. “You 
can’t get away, Jerry,” he said calmly, not even out of breath. 

“Let me go! Let me go!” I tried to twist out of his grip. But he was 
surprisingly strong. I couldn’t free myself. 

“Help me! Somebody—help me!” I cried, screaming over the roar of the 
pianos. 

“I need your hands, Jerry,” Dr. Shreek said. “Such beautiful hands.” 

“You can’t! You can’t\” I shrieked. 

The double doors burst open. 

Mr. Toggle ran in, his expression confused. His eyes darted quickly around 
the enormous room. 

“Mr. Toggle!” I cried happily. “Mr. Toggle—help me! He’s crazy ! Help 

me!” 

Mr. Toggle’s mouth dropped open in surprise. “Don’t worry, Jerry!” he 
called. 

“Help me! Hurry!” I screamed. 

“Don’t worry!” he repeated. 

“Jerry, you can’t get away!” Dr. Shreek cried, holding me down on the 
floor. 

Struggling to free myself, I watched Mr. Toggle run to the far wall. He 
pulled open a gray metal door, revealing some kind of control panel. 

“Don’t worry!” he called to me. 

I saw him pull a switch on the control panel. 

Instantly, Dr. Shreek’s hand loosened. 

I pulled my leg free and scrambled to my feet, panting hard. 

Dr. Shreek slumped into a heap. His hands drooped lifelessly to his sides. 
His eyes closed. His head sank, his chin lowering to his chest. 

He didn’t move. 

He ’s some kind of robot, I saw to my amazement. 

“Are you okay, Jerry?” Mr. Toggle had hurried to my side. 

I suddenly realized my entire body was trembling. The piano music roared 
inside my head. The room began to spin. 

I held my hands over my ears, trying to shut out the pounding noise. “Make 
them stop! Tell them to stop!” I cried. 

Mr. Toggle jogged back to the control panel and threw another switch. 

The music stopped. The hands froze in place over their keyboards. The 
instructors stopped bobbing their heads. 

“Robots. All robots,” I murmured, still shaking. 

Mr. Toggle hurried back, his dark eyes studying me. “You’re okay?” 

“Dr. Shreek—he’s a robot,” I uttered in a trembling whisper. If only I could 
get my knees to stop shaking! 

“Yes, he’s my best creation,” Mr. Toggle declared, smiling. He placed a 
hand on Dr. Shreek’s still shoulder. “He’s really lifelike, isn’t he?” 

“They—they’re all robots,” I whispered, motioning to the instructors, 
frozen beside their pianos. 

Mr. Toggle nodded. “Primitive ones,” he said, still leaning on Dr. Shreek. 
“They’re not as advanced as my buddy Dr. Shreek here.” 

“You—made them all?” I asked. 

Mr. Toggle nodded, smiling. “Every one of them.” 

I couldn’t stop shaking. I was starting to feel really sick. “Thanks for 
stopping him. I guess Dr. Shreek was out of control or something. I—I’ve got to 
go now,” I said weakly. I started walking toward the double doors, forcing my 
trembling knees to cooperate. 

“Not just yet,” Mr. Toggle said, placing a gentle hand on my shoulder. 

“Huh?” I turned to face him. 

“You can’t leave just yet,” he said, his smile fading. “I need your hands, 

see.” 

“What?” 

He pointed to a piano against the wall. A gray-suited instructor stood 
lifelessly beside it, a smile frozen on his face. There were no hands suspended 
over the keyboard. 

“That will be your piano, Jerry,” Mr. Toggle said. 

27 

I started backing toward the double doors one step at a time. “Wh-why?” I 
stammered. “Why do you need my hands?” 

“Human hands are too hard to build, too complicated, too many parts,” Mr. 
Toggle replied. He scratched his black, stubbly beard with one hand as he moved 
toward me. 

“But—” I started, taking another step back. 

“I can make the hands play beautifully,” Mr. Toggle explained, his eyes 
locked on mine. “I’ve designed computer programs to make them play more 
beautifully than any live human can play. But I can’t build hands. The students 
must supply the hands.” 

“But why?” I demanded. “Why are you doing this?” 

“To make beautiful music, naturally,” Mr. Toggle replied, taking another 
step closer. “I love beautiful music, Jerry. And music is so much more beautiful, 
so much more perfect, when human mistakes don’t get in the way.” 

He took another step toward me. Then another. “You understand, don’t 
you?” His dark eyes burned into mine. 

“No!” I screamed. “No, I don’t understand! You can’t have my hands! You 
can’t!” 

I took another step back. My legs were still trembling. 

If I can just get through those doors, I thought, maybe I have a chance. 
Maybe I can outrun him. Maybe I can get out of this crazy building. 

It was my only hope. 

Gathering my strength, ignoring the pounding of my heart, I turned. 

I darted toward the doors. 

“Ohh!” I cried out as the ghost woman appeared in front of me. 

The woman from my house, from my piano. 

She rose up, all in gray except for her eyes. Her eyes glowed red as fire. 
Her mouth was twisted in an ugly snarl of rage. She floated toward me, blocking 
my path to the door. 

I’m trapped, I realized. 

Trapped between Mr. Toggle and the ghost. 

There’s no escape now. 

28 

“I warned you!” the ghost woman wailed, her red eyes glowing with fury. “I 
warned you!” 

“No, please—” I managed to cry in a choked voice. I raised my hands in 
front of me, trying to shield myself from her. “Please—let me go!” 

To my surprise, she floated right past me. 

She was glaring at Mr. Toggle, I realized. 

He staggered back, his face tight with terror. 

The ghost woman raised her arms. “Awaken!” she wailed. “Awaken!” 

And as she waved her arms, I saw a fluttering at the pianos. The fluttering 
became a mist. Wisps of gray cloud rose up from each piano. 

I backed up to the doors, my eyes wide with disbelief. 

At each piano, the dark mist took shape. 

They were ghosts, I realized. 

Ghosts of boys, girls, men, and women. 

I watched, frozen in horror, as they rose up and claimed their hands. They 
moved their fingers, testing their hands. 

And then, with arms outstretched, their hands fluttering in front of them, the 
ghosts floated away from their pianos, moving in rows, in single file, toward Mr. 
Toggle. 

“No! Get away! Get away!” Mr. Toggle shrieked. 

He turned and tried to flee through the doors. But I blocked his path. 

And the ghosts swarmed over him. 

Their hands pulled him down. Their hands pressed him to the floor. 

He kicked and struggled and screamed. 

“Let me up! Get off me! Get off!” 

But the hands, dozens and dozens of hands, flattened over him, held him 
down, pushed him facedown on the floor. 

The gray ghost woman turned to me. “I tried to warn you!” she called over 
Mr. Toggle’s frantic screams. “I tried to scare you away! I lived in your house. I 
was a victim of this school! I tried to frighten you from becoming a victim, too!” 

“I—I—” 

“Run!” she ordered. “Hurry—call for help!” 

But I was frozen in place, too shocked by what I was seeing to move. 

* * * 

As I stared in disbelief, the ghostly hands swarmed over Mr. Toggle and lifted 
him off the floor. He squirmed and struggled, but he couldn’t free himself from 
their powerful grasp. 

They carried him to the door and then out. I followed to the doorway to 
watch. 

Mr. Toggle appeared to be floating, floating into the deep woods beside the 
school. The hands carried him away. He disappeared into the tangled trees. 

I knew he’d never be seen again. 

I spun around to thank the ghost woman for trying to warn me. 

But she was gone, too. 

I was all alone now. 

The hall stretched behind me in eerie silence. Ghostly silence. 

The piano music had ended... forever. 

A few weeks later, my life had pretty much returned to normal. 

Dad put an ad in the newspaper and sold the piano right away to a family 
across town. It left a space in the family room, so Mom and Dad got a big-screen 
TV! 

I never saw the ghost woman again. Maybe she moved out with the piano. I 
don’t know. 

I made some good friends and was starting to get used to my new school. I 
was thinking seriously of trying out for the baseball team. 

I’m not a great hitter, but I’m good in the field. 

Everyone says I have great hands. 


THE WEREWOLF 
OF FEVER SWAMP 

1 

We moved to Florida during Christmas vacation. A week later, I heard the 
frightening howls in the swamp for the first time. 

Night after night, the howls made me sit up in bed. I would hold my 
breath and wrap my arms around myself to keep from shivering. 

I would stare out my bedroom window at the chalk-colored full moon. 
And I would listen. 

What kind of creature makes such a cry? I would ask myself. 

And how close is it? Why does it sound as if it’s right outside my 
window? 

The wails rose and fell like police car sirens. They weren’t sad or 
mournful. They were menacing. 

Angry. 

They sounded to me like a warning. Stay out of the swamp. You do not 
belong here. 

When my family first moved to Florida, to our new house at the edge 
of the swamp, I couldn’t wait to explore. I stood in the back yard with the 
binoculars my dad had given me for my twelfth birthday and gazed toward 
the swamp. 

Trees with slender, white trunks tilted over each other. Their flat, broad 
leaves appeared to form a roof, covering the swamp floor in blue shadow. 

Behind me, the deer paced uneasily in their wire-mesh pen. I could 
hear them pawing the soft, sandy ground, mbbing their antlers against the 
walls of their pen. 

Lowering my binoculars, I turned to look at them. The deer were the 
reason we had moved to Florida. 

You see, my dad, Michael F. Tucker, is a scientist. He works for the 
University of Vermont in Burlington, which, believe me, is a long way from 
the Florida swamps! 

Dad got these six deer from some country in South America. They’re 
called swamp deer. They’re not like regular deer. I mean, they don’t look 
like Bambi. For one thing, their fur is very red, not brown. And their hooves 
are really big and kind of webbed. For walking on wet, swampy ground, I 

guess. 

Dad wants to see if these South American swamp deer can survive in 
Florida. He plans to put little radio transmitters on them, and set them free 
in the swamp. Then he’ll study how they get along. 

When he told us back in Burlington that we were moving to Florida 
because of the deer, we all totally freaked. We didn’t want to move. 

My sister, Emily, cried for days. She’s sixteen, and she didn’t want to 
miss her senior year in high school. I didn’t want to leave my friends, either. 

But Dad quickly got Mom on his side. Mom is a scientist, too. She and 
Dad work together on a lot of projects. So, of course, she agreed with him. 

And the two of them tried to persuade Emily and me that this was the 
chance of a lifetime, that it was going to be really exciting. An adventure 
we’d never forget. 

So here we were, living in a little white house in a neighborhood of 
four or five other little white houses. We had six weird-looking red deer 
penned up behind the house. The hot Florida sun was beaming down. And 
an endless swamp stretched beyond our flat, grassy back yard. 

I turned away from the deer and raised the binoculars to my face. 
“Oh,” I cried out as two dark eyes seemed to be staring back at me. 

I pulled the binoculars away and squinted toward the swamp. In the 
near distance I saw a large white bird on two long, spindly legs. 

“It’s a crane,” Emily said. I hadn’t realized Emily had stepped up 
beside me. She was wearing a sleeveless white T-shirt and short red denim 
shorts. My sister is tall and thin and very blonde. She looks a lot like a 
crane. 

The bird turned and began high-stepping toward the swamp. 

“Let’s follow it,” I said. 

Emily made her pouting face, an expression we’d all seen a lot of since 
moving down here. “No way. It’s too hot.” 

“Aw, come on.” I tugged her skinny arm. “Let’s do some exploring, 
check out the swamp.” 

She shook her head, her white-blonde ponytail swinging behind her. “I 
really don’t want to, Grady.” She adjusted her sunglasses on her nose. “I’m 
kind of waiting for the mail.” 

Since we’re so far from the nearest post office, we only get mail two 
times a week. Emily had been spending most of her time waiting for the 

mail. 

“Waiting for a love letter from Martin?” I asked with a grin. She hated 
when I teased her about Martin, her boyfriend back in Burlington. So I 
teased her as often as I could. 

“Maybe,” she said. She reached out with both hands and messed up 
my hair. She knows I hate to have my hair messed up. 

“Please?” I pleaded. “Come on, Emily. Just a short walk. Very short.” 

“Emily, take a short walk with Grady,” Dad’s voice broke in. We 
turned to see him inside the deer pen. He had a clipboard in one hand and 
was going from deer to deer, taking notes. “Go ahead,” he urged my sister. 
“You’re not doing anything else.” 

“But, Dad—” Emily could whine with the best of them when she 
wanted. 

“Go ahead, Em,” Dad insisted. “It will be interesting. More interesting 
than standing around in the heat arguing with him.” 

Emily pushed the sunglasses up again. They kept slipping down her 
nose. “Well...” 

“Great!” I cried. I was really excited. I’d never been in a real swamp 
before. “Let’s go!” I grabbed my sister’s hand and pulled. 

Emily reluctantly followed, a fretful expression on her face. “I have a 
bad feeling about this,” she muttered. 

My shadow slanting behind me, I hurried toward the low, tilting trees. 
“Emily, what could go wrong?” I asked. 

2 

It was hot and wet under the trees. The air felt sticky against my face. The 
broad palm leaves were so low, I could almost reach up and touch them. 
They nearly blocked out the sun, but shafts of yellow light broke through, 
beaming down on the swamp floor like spotlights. 

Scratchy weeds and fern leaves brushed against my bare legs. I wished 
I’d worn jeans instead of shorts. I kept close to my sister as we made our 
way along a narrow, winding trail. The binoculars, strapped around my 
neck, began to feel heavy against my chest. I should’ve left them at home, I 
realized. 

“It’s so noisy here,” Emily complained, stepping over a decaying log. 

She was right. The most surprising thing about the swamp was all the 
sounds. 

A bird trilled from somewhere above. Another bird replied with a shrill 
whistle. Insects chittered loudly all around us. I heard a steady tap-tap-tap, 
like someone hammering on wood. A woodpecker? Palm leaves crackled as 
they swayed. Slender tree trunks creaked. My sandals made thup thup 
sounds, sinking into the marshy ground as I walked. 

“Hey, look,” Emily said, pointing. She pulled off her dark glasses to 
see better. 

We had come to a small, oval-shaped pond. The water was dark green, 
half-hidden in shade. Floating on top were white water lilies, bending 
gracefully over flat, green lily pads. 

“Pretty,” Emily said, brushing a bug off her shoulder. “I’m going to 
come back here with my camera and take pictures of this pond. Look at the 
great light.” 

I followed her gaze. The near end of the pond was darkened by long 
shadows. But light slanted down through the trees at the other end, forming 
what looked like a bright curtain that spilled into the still pond water. 

“It is kind of cool,” I admitted. I wasn’t really into ponds. I was more 
interested in wildlife. 

I let Emily admire the pond and the water lilies a little longer. Then I 
headed around the pond and deeper into the swamp. 

My sandals slapped over the wet ground. Up ahead, a swarm of tiny 
gnats, thousands of them, danced silently in a shaft of sunlight. 

“Yuck,” Emily muttered. “I hate gnats. It makes me itchy just to look 
at them.” She scratched her arms. 

We turned away—and both saw something scamper behind a fallen, 
moss-covered log. 

“Hey—what was that?” Emily cried, grabbing my elbow. 

“An alligator!” I shouted. “Ahungry alligator!” 

She uttered a short, frightened cry. 

I laughed. “What’s your problem, Em? It was just some kind of 
lizard.” 

She squeezed my arm hard, trying to make me flinch. “You’re a creep, 
Grady,” she muttered. She scratched her arms some more. “It’s too itchy in 
this swamp,” she complained. “Let’s head back.” 

“Just a little bit farther,” I pleaded. 

“No. Come on. I really want to get back.” She tried to pull me, but I 
backed out of her grasp. “Grady—” 

I turned and started walking away from her, deeper into the swamp. I 
heard the tap-tap-tap again, directly overhead. The low palm leaves scraped 
against each other, shifting in a soft, wet breeze. The shrill cluttering of the 
insects grew louder. 

“I’m going home and leaving you here,” Emily threatened. 

I ignored her and kept walking. I knew she was bluffing. 

My sandals crackled over dried, brown palm leaves. Without turning 
around, I could hear Emily a few steps behind me. 

Another little lizard scampered across the path, just in front of my 
sandals. It looked like a dark arrow, shooting into the underbrush. 

The ground suddenly sloped upward. We found ourselves climbing a 
low hill into bright sunlight. A clearing of some sort. 

Beads of sweat ran down my cheeks. The air was so wet, I felt as if I 
were swimming. 

At the top of the hill, we stopped to look around. “Hey—another 
pond!” I cried, running over fat, yellow swamp grass, hurrying up to the 
water’s edge. 

But this pond looked different. 

The dark green water wasn’t flat and smooth. Leaning over it, I could 

see that it was murky and thick, like split-pea soup. It made disgusting 
gurgling and plopping sounds as it churned. 

I leaned down closer to get a better look. 

“It’s quicksand!” I heard Emily cry in horror. 

And then two hands shoved me hard from behind. 

3 

As I started to fall into the bubbling green stew, the same hands grabbed my 
waist and pulled me back. 

Emily giggled. “Gotcha!” she cried, holding on to me, keeping me 
from turning around and slugging her. 

“Hey—let go!” I cried angrily. “You almost pushed me into quicksand ! 
That’s not funny!” 

She laughed some more, then let me go. “It isn’t quicksand, dork,” she 
muttered. “It’s a bog.” 

“Huh?” I turned to stare into the gloppy green water. 

“It’s a bog. A peat bog,” she repeated impatiently. “Don’t you know 
anything?” 

“What’s a peat bog?” I asked, ignoring her insults. Emily the Know-It- 
All. She’s always bragging about how she knows everything and I’m a 
stupid clod. But she gets B’s in school, and I get A’s. So who’s the smart 
one? 

“We learned about this last year when we studied the wetlands and rain 
forests,” she replied smugly. “The pond is thick because it has peat moss 
growing in it. The moss grows and grows. It absorbs twenty-five times its 
own weight in water.” 

“It’s gross-looking,” I said. 

“Why don’t you drink some and see how it tastes,” she urged. 

She tried to push me again, but I ducked and skirted away. “I’m not 
thirsty,” I muttered. I realize it wasn’t too clever, but it was the best reply I 
could think of. 

“Let’s get going,” she said, wiping sweat off her forehead with her 
hand. “I’m really hot.” 

“Yeah. Okay,” I reluctantly agreed. “This was a pretty neat walk.” 

We turned away from the peat bog and started back down the hill. 
“Hey, look!” I cried, pointing to two black shadows floating high above us 
under a white cloud. 

“Falcons,” Emily said, shielding her eyes with one hand as she gazed 
up. “I think they’re falcons. It’s hard to see. They sure are big.” 

We watched them soar out of sight. Then we continued down the hill, 
making our way carefully on the damp, sandy ground. 

At the bottom of the hill, back under the deep shade of the trees, we 
stopped to catch our breath. 

I was really sweating now. The back of my neck felt hot and itchy. I 
mbbed it with one hand, but it didn’t seem to help. 

The breeze had stopped. The air felt heavy. Nothing moved. 

Loud cawing sounds made me glance up. Two enormous blackbirds 
peered down at us from a low branch of a cypress tree. They cawed again, 
as if telling us to go away. 

“This way,” Emily said with a sigh. 

I followed her, feeling prickly and itchy all over. “I wish we had a 
swimming pool at our new house,” I said. “I’d jump right in with my 
clothes on!” 

We walked for several minutes. The trees grew thicker. The light grew 
dimmer. The path ended. We had to push our way through tall, leafy ferns. 

“I—I don’t think we’ve been here before,” I stammered. “I don’t think 
this is the right way.” 

We stared at each other, watching each other’s face fill with fright. 

We both realized we were lost. Completely lost. 

4 

“I don’t believe this!” Emily shrieked. 

Her loud shout made the two blackbirds flutter off their tree limb. 
They soared away, cawing angrily. 

“What am I doing here?” she cried. Emily is not good in emergencies. 
When she got a flat tire during one of her first driving lessons back home in 
Burlington, she jumped out of the car and ran away! 

So I didn’t exactly expect her to be calm and cool now. Since we were 
totally lost in the middle of a dark, hot swamp, I expected her to panic. And 
she did. 

I’m the calm one in the family. I take after Dad. Cool and scientific. 
“Let’s just figure out the direction of the sun,” I said, ignoring the fluttering 
in my chest. 

“What sun?” Emily cried, throwing her hands up. 

It was really dark. The palm trees with their wide leaves formed a 
pretty solid roof above us. 

“Well, we could check out some moss,” I suggested. The fluttering in 
my chest was growing stronger. “Isn’t moss supposed to grow on the north 
side of trees?” 

“East side, I think,” Emily muttered. “Or is it the west?” 

“I’m pretty sure it’s the north,” I insisted, gazing around. 

“Pretty sure? What good is pretty sure?” Emily cried shrilly. 

“Forget the moss,” I said, rolling my eyes. “I’m not even sure what 
moss looks like.” 

We stared at each other for a long time. 

“Didn’t you used to carry a compass with you wherever you went?” 
Emily asked, sounding a little shaky. 

“Yeah. When I was four,” I replied. 

“I can’t believe we were so stupid,” Emily wailed. “We should have 
worn one of the radio transmitters. You know. For the deer. Then Dad could 
track us down.” 

“I should have worn jeans,” I muttered, noticing some tiny red bumps 
along my calf. Poison ivy? Some kind of rash? 

“What should we do?” Emily asked impatiently, wiping sweat off her 
forehead with her hand. 

“Go back up the hill, I guess,” I told her. “There were no trees there. It 
was sunny. Once we see where the sun is, we can figure out the direction to 
get back.” 

“But which way is the hill?” Emily demanded. 

I spun around. Was it behind us? To our right? A cold chill ran down 
my back as I realized I wasn’t sure. 

I shrugged. “We’re really lost,” I murmured with a sigh. 

“Let’s go this way,” Emily said, starting to walk away. “I just have a 
feeling this is the way. If we come to that bog, we’ll know we’re going 
right.” 

“And if we don’t?” I demanded. 

“We’ll come to something else, maybe,” she replied. 

Brilliant. 

But I didn’t see any good in arguing with her. So I followed. 

We walked in silence, the shrill ringing of the insects on all sides, the 
calls of birds startling us from above. After a short while, we pushed our 
way through a clump of tall, stiff reeds. 

“Have we been here before?” Emily asked. 

I couldn’t remember. I pushed a reed away to step through and realized 
it had left something sticky on my hand. “Yuck!” 

“Hey, look!” Emily’s excited cry made me glance up from the sticky 
green gunk that clung to my hand. 

The bog! It was right in front of us. The same bog we had stopped at 
before. 

“Yay!” Emily cried. “I knew I was right. I just had a feeling.” 

The sight of the gurgling green pond cheered us both up. Once past it, 
we began to run. We knew we were on the right path, nearly home. 

“Way to go!” I cried happily, running past my sister. “Way to go!” 

I was feeling really good again. 

Then something reached up, grabbed my ankle, and pulled me down to 
the swampy ground. 

5 

I hit the ground hard, landing on my elbows and knees. 

My heart leapt into my mouth. 

I tasted blood. 

“Get up! Get up!” Emily was screaming. 

“It—it’s got me!” I cried in a tight, trembling voice. 

The fluttering in my chest had become a pounding. Again, I tasted 
blood. 

I raised my eyes to see Emily laughing. 

Laughing? 

“It’s just a tree root,” she said, pointing. 

I followed the direction of her finger—and instantly realized I hadn’t 
been pulled down. I had tripped over one of the many upraised tree roots 
that arched over the ground. 

I stared at the bonelike root. It was bent in the middle and looked like a 
skinny, white leg. 

But what was the blood I tasted? 

I felt my aching lip. I had bitten it when I fell. 

With a loud groan, I pulled myself to my feet. My knees ached. My lip 
throbbed. Blood trickled down my chin. 

“That was pretty clumsy,” Emily said softly. And then she added, “Are 
you okay?” She brushed some dried leaves off the back of my T-shirt. 

“Yeah, I guess,” I replied, still feeling a little shaky. “I really thought 
something had grabbed me.” I forced a laugh. 

She rested a hand on my shoulder, and we started walking again, 
slower than before, side by side. 

Slender beams of light poked down through the thick tree leaves, 
dotting the ground in front of us. It all looked unreal, like something in a 
dream. 

Some creature scampered noisily behind the tangle of low shrubs at 
our right. Emily and I didn’t even turn to try to see it. We just wanted to get 
home. 

It didn’t take us long to realize we were headed in the wrong direction. 

We stopped at the edge of a small, round clearing. Birds chattered 
noisily above us. A light breeze made the palm leaves scrape and creak. 

“What are those huge gray things?” I asked, lingering behind my 
sister. 

“Mushrooms, I think,” she replied quietly. 

“Mushrooms as big as footballs,” I murmured. 

We both saw the small shack at the same time. 

It was hidden in the shadow of two low cypress trees beyond the field 
of giant mushrooms at the other side of the clearing. 

We both gaped at it in surprise, studying it in shocked silence. We took 
a few steps toward it. Then a few more. 

The shack was tiny, built low to the ground, not much taller than me. It 
had some kind of thatched roof, made of long reeds or dried grass. The 
walls were made of layers of dried palm leaves. 

The door, built of slender tree limbs bound together, was shut tight. 
There were no windows. 

A pile of gray ashes formed a circle a few yards from the door. Signs 
of a campfire. 

I saw a pair of battered, old workboots lying at the side of the shack. 
Beside them were several empty tin cans on their sides and a plastic water 
bottle, also empty, partly crumpled. 

I turned to Emily and whispered, “Do you think someone lives here? 
In the middle of the swamp?” 

She shrugged, her features tight with fear. 

“If someone lives here, maybe he can tell us which way to go to get 
home,” I suggested. 

“Maybe,” Emily murmured. Her eyes were straight ahead on the tiny 
shack covered in blue shadow. 

We took another couple of steps closer. 

Why would someone want to live in a tiny shack like this in the middle 
of a swamp? I wondered. 

An answer flashed into my mind: Because whoever it is wants to hide 
from the world. 

“It’s a hideout,” I muttered, not realizing I was speaking out loud. “A 
criminal. A bank robber. Or a killer. He’s hiding here.” 

“Sshhh. ” Emily put a finger on my mouth to silence me, hitting the cut 

on my lip. I pulled away. 

“Anyone home?” she called. Her voice came out low and shaky, so 
low I could barely hear her. “Anyone home?” she repeated, a little more 
forcefully. 

I decided to join in. We shouted together: “Anyone home? Anyone in 
there?” 

We listened. 

No reply. 

We stepped up to the low door. 

“Anyone in there?” I called one more time. 

Then I reached for the doorknob. 

6 

Just as I was about to pull open the crude wooden door, it swung out, nearly 
hitting us both. We leapt back as a man burst out from the dark doorway of 
the hut. 

He glared at us with wild black eyes. He had long, gray-white hair, 
down past his shoulders, tied behind him in a loose ponytail. 

His face was bright red, sunburned, maybe. Or maybe red from anger. 
He stared at us with a menacing scowl, standing bent over, stooped from 
being inside the low hut. 

He wore a loose-fitting white T-shirt, dirt-stained and wrinkled, over 
heavy black trousers that bagged over his sandals. 

As he glared at us with those amazing black eyes, his mouth opened, 
revealing rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

Huddling close to my sister, I took a step back. 

I wanted to ask him who he was, why he lived in the swamp. I wanted 
to ask if he could help us find our way back home. 

A dozen questions flashed through my mind. 

But all I could utter was, “Uh... sorry.” 

Then I realized that Emily was already running away. Her ponytail 
flew behind her as she dived through the tall weeds. 

And a second later, I was running after her. My heart pounded. My 
sandals squished over the soft ground. 

“Hey, Emily—wait up! Wait up!” 

I ran over the rough carpet of dead leaves and twigs. 

As I struggled to catch up to her, I glanced behind me—and cried out 
in terror. “Emily—he’s chasing us!” 

7 

Bent low to the ground, the man from the hut moved steadily after us, 
taking long strides. His hands bobbed at his sides. He was breathing hard, 
and his mouth was open, revealing the jagged teeth. 

“Run!” Emily cried. “Run, Grady!” 

We were following a narrow path between tall weeds. The trees 
thinned out. We ran through shadow and sunlight and back into shadow. 

“Emily—wait up!” I called breathlessly. But she didn’t slow down. 

A long, narrow pond appeared to our left. Strange trees lifted up from 
the middle of the water. The slender trunks were surrounded by a thicket of 
dark roots. Mangrove trees. 

I wanted to stop and look at the eerie-looking trees. But this wasn’t the 
time for sightseeing. 

We ran along the edge of the pond, our sandals sinking into the marshy 
ground. Then, my chest heaving, my throat choked and dry, I followed 
Emily as the path curved into the trees. 

A sharp pain in my side made me cry out. I stopped running. I gasped 
for breath. 

“Hey—he’s gone,” Emily said, swallowing hard. She stopped a few 
yards ahead of me and leaned against a tree trunk. “We lost him.” 

I bent over, trying to force away the pain in my side. After a short 
while, my breathing slowed to normal. “Weird,” I said. I couldn’t think of 
anything else. 

“Yeah. Weird,” Emily agreed. She walked back to me and pulled me 
up straight. “You okay?” 

“I guess.” At least the pain had faded away. I always get a pain in my 
right side when I run a long time. This one was worse than usual. I usually 
don’t have to run for my life! 

“Come on,” Emily said. She let go of me and started walking quickly, 
following the path. 

“Hey, this looks familiar,” I said. I began to feel a little better. I started 
to jog. We passed clusters of trees and ferns that looked familiar. I could see 
our footprints in the sandy ground, going the other way. 



A short while later, our back yard came into view. “Home sweet 
home!” I cried. 

Emily and I stepped out from the low trees and began running across 
the grass toward the back of the house. 

Mom and Dad were in the back yard setting up outdoor furniture. Dad 
was lowering an umbrella into the white umbrella table. Mom was washing 
off the white lawn chairs with the garden hose. 

“Hey—welcome back,” Dad said, smiling. 

“We thought you got lost,” Mom said. 

“We did!” I cried breathlessly. 

Mom turned off the nozzle, stopping the spray of water. “You what?” 

“A man chased us!” Emily exclaimed. “A strange man with long white 
hair.” 

“He lives in a hut. In the middle of the swamp,” I added, dropping 
down into one of the lawn chairs. It was wet, but I didn’t care. 

“Huh? He chased you?” Dad’s eyes narrowed in alarm. Then he said, 
“I heard in town there’s a swamp hermit out there.” 

“Yes, he chased us!” Emily repeated. Her normally pale face was 
bright red. Her hair had come loose and fell wildly around her face. “It—it 
was scary.” 

“A guy in the hardware store told me about him,” Dad said. “Said he 
was strange, but perfectly harmless. No one knows his name.” 

“Harmless?” Emily cried. “Then why did he chase us?” 

Dad shrugged. “I’m only repeating what I heard. Evidently he’s lived 
in the swamp most of his life. By himself. He never comes to town.” 

Mom dropped the hose and walked over to Emily. She placed a hand 
on Emily’s shoulder. In the bright sunlight, they looked like sisters. They’re 
both tall and thin, with long, straight blonde hair. I look more like my dad. 
Wavy brown hair. Dark eyes. A little chunky. 

“Maybe they shouldn’t go back in the swamp by themselves,” Mom 
said, biting her lower lip fretfully. She started to gather Emily’s hair back up 
into a ponytail. 

“The hermit is supposed to be completely harmless,” Dad repeated. He 
was still struggling to lower the umbrella into the concrete base. Every time 
he lowered it, he missed the opening. 

“Here, Dad. I’ll help you.” I scooted under the table and guided the 



umbrella stem into the base. 

“Don’t worry,” Emily said. “You won’t catch me back in that swamp.” 
She scratched both shoulders. “I’m going to be itchy for the rest of my 
life!” she groaned. 

“We saw a lot of neat things,” I said, starting to feel normal again. “A 
peat bog and mangrove trees...” 

“I told you this was going to be an experience,” Dad said, arranging 
the white chairs around the table. 

“Some experience,” Emily grumbled, rolling her eyes. “I’m going in to 
take a shower. Maybe if I stay in it for an hour or so, I’ll stop itching.” 

Mom shook her head, watching Emily stomp toward the back door. 
“This is going to be a hard year for Em,” she muttered. 

Dad wiped his dirty hands on the sides of his jeans. “Come with me, 
Grady,” he said, motioning for me to follow him. “Time to feed the deer.” 

We talked more about the swamp at dinner. Dad told us stories about how 
they hunted and trapped the swamp deer that he was using for his 
experiment. 

Dad and his helpers searched the South American jungles for weeks. 
They used tranquilizer guns to capture the deer. Then they had to bring in 
helicopters to pull the deer out, and the deer were not too happy about 
flying. 

“The swamp you two were exploring this afternoon,” he said, twirling 
his spaghetti. “Know what it’s called? Fever Swamp. That’s what the local 
people call it, anyway.” 

“Why?” Emily asked. “Because it’s so hot in there?” 

Dad chewed and swallowed a mouthful of spaghetti. He had orange 
splotches of tomato sauce on both sides of his mouth. “I don’t know why 
it’s called Fever Swamp. But I’m sure we’ll find out eventually.” 

“It was probably discovered by a guy named Mr. Fever,” Mom joked. 

“I want to go home to Vermont!” Emily wailed. 

After dinner, I found myself feeling a little homesick, too. I took a tennis 
ball out to the back of the house. I thought maybe I could bounce it off the 
wall and catch it the way I had done back home. 

But the deer pen was in the way. 



I thought about my two best friends back in Burlington, Ben and 
Adam. We had lived on the same block and used to hang out after dinner. 
We’d throw a ball around or walk down to the playground and just mess 
around. 

Staring at the deer, who milled silently at one end of the pen, I realized 
I really missed my friends. I wondered what they were doing right now. 
Probably hanging out in Ben’s back yard. 

Feeling glum, I was about to go back inside and see what was on TV 
—when a hand grabbed me from behind. 

The swamp hermit! 



8 


He found me! 

The swamp hermit found me! And now he’s got me! 

Those are the thoughts that burst into my mind. 

I spun around—and uttered a startled cry when I saw that it wasn’t the 
swamp hermit. It was a boy. 

“Hi,” he said. “I thought you saw me. I didn’t mean to scare you.” He 
had a funny voice, gravelly and hoarse. 

“Oh. Uh... that’s okay,” I stammered. 

“I saw you in your yard,” he said. “I live over there.” He pointed to the 
house two doors down. “You just moved in?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I’m Grady Tucker.” I slapped the tennis ball into my 
hand. “What’s your name?” 

“Will. Will Blake,” he said in his hoarse voice. He was about my 
height, but he was heavier, bigger somehow. His shoulders were broader. 
His neck was thicker. He reminded me of a football lineman. 

He had dark brown hair, cut very short. It stood straight up on top, like 
a flattop, and was swept back on the sides. He wore a blue-and-white- 
striped T-shirt and denim cutoffs. 

“How old are you?” he asked. 

“Twelve,” I answered. 

“Me, too,” he told me, glancing over my shoulder at the deer. “I 
thought maybe you were eleven. I mean, you look kind of young.” 

I was insulted by that remark, but I decided to ignore it. “How long 
have you lived here?” I asked, tossing the tennis ball from hand to hand. 

“A few months,” Will said. 

“Are there any other kids our age?” I asked, glancing down the row of 
six houses. 

“Yeah. One,” Will replied. “But she’s a girl. And she’s kind of weird.” 

In the distance, the sun was lowering itself behind the swamp trees. 
The sky was a dark scarlet. The air suddenly became cooler. Gazing high in 
the sky, I could see a pale moon, nearly full. 

Will headed over to the deer pen, and I followed him. He walked 



heavily, his big shoulders bobbing with each step. He poked his hand 
through the wire mesh and let a deer lick his palm. 

“Your father works for the Forest Service, too?” he asked, his eyes 
studying the deer. 

“No,” I told him. “My mom and dad are both scientists. They’re doing 
studies with these deer.” 

“Weird-looking deer,” Will said. He pulled his wet hand from the pen 
and held it up. “Yuck. Deer slime.” 

I laughed. “They’re called swamp deer,” I told him. I tossed him the 
tennis ball. We backed away from the deer pen and started to throw the ball 
back and forth. 

“Have you been in the swamp?” he asked. 

I missed the ball and had to chase it across the grass. “Yeah. This 
afternoon,” I told him. “My sister and I, we got lost.” 

He snickered. 

“Do you know why it’s called Fever Swamp?” I asked, tossing him a 
high one. 

It was getting pretty dark, harder to see. But he caught the ball one- 
handed. “Yeah. My dad told me the story,” Will said. “I think it was a 
hundred years ago. Maybe longer. Everyone in town came down with a 
strange fever.” 

“Everyone?” I asked. 

He nodded. “Everyone who had been in the swamp.” He held on to the 
ball and moved closer. “My dad said the fever lasted for weeks, sometimes 
even months. And lots of people died from it.” 

“That’s horrible,” I murmured, glancing across the back yard to the 
darkening trees at the swamp edge. 

“And those who didn’t die from the fever began acting very strange,” 
Will continued. He had small, round eyes. And as he told his story, his eyes 
gleamed. “They started talking crazy, not making any sense, just saying 
nonsense words. And they couldn’t walk very well. They’d fall down a lot 
or walk around in circles.” 

“Weird,” I said, my eyes still trained on the swamp. The sky darkened 
from scarlet to a deep purple. The nearly full moon seemed to glow 
brighter. 

“Ever since that time, they called it Fever Swamp,” Will said, finishing 



his story. He flipped the tennis ball to me. “I’d better get home.” 

“Did you ever see the swamp hermit?” I asked. 

He shook his head. “No. I heard about him, but I’ve never seen him.” 

“I did,” I told him. “My sister and I saw him this afternoon. We found 
his hut.” 

“That’s cool!” Will exclaimed. “Did you talk to him or anything?” 

“No way,” I replied. “He chased us.” 

“He did?” Will’s expression turned thoughtful. “Why?” 

“I don’t know. We were pretty scared,” I admitted. 

“I’ve got to go,” Will said. He started jogging toward his house. “Hey, 
maybe you and I can go exploring in the swamp together,” he called back. 

“Yeah. Great!” I replied. 

I felt a little cheered up. I’d made a new friend. Maybe it won’t be so 
bad living here, I thought. 

I watched Will head around the side of his house two doors down. His 
house looked almost identical to ours, except there was no deer pen in back, 
of course. 

I saw a swing set with a small slide and seesaw in his back yard. I 
wondered if he had a little brother or sister. 

I thought about Emily as I headed to the house. I knew she’d be 
jealous that I’d made a friend. Poor Emily was really sad without that goon 
Martin hanging around her. 

I never liked Martin. He always called me “Kiddo”. 

I watched one of the deer lower itself to the ground, folding its legs 
gracefully. Another deer did the same. They were settling in for the night. 

I made my way inside and joined my family in the living room. They 
were watching a show about sharks on the Discovery Channel. My parents 
love the Discovery Channel. Big surprise, huh? 

I watched for a short while. Then I began to realize I wasn’t feeling 
very well. I had a headache, a sharp throbbing at my temples. And I had 
chills. 

I told Mom. She got up and walked over to my chair. “You look a little 
flushed,” she said, studying me with concern. She placed a cool hand on my 
forehead and left it there for a few seconds. 

“Grady, I think you have a little fever,” she said. 



9 


A few nights later, I heard the strange, frightening howls for the first time. 

My fever had gone up to 101 degrees and stayed there for a day. Then 
it went away. Then it came back. 

“It’s the swamp fever!” I told my parents earlier that night. “Pretty 
soon I’m going to start acting crazy.” 

“You already act crazy,” Mom teased. She handed me a glass of 
orange juice. “Drink. Keep drinking.” 

“Drinking won’t help swamp fever,” I insisted glumly, taking the glass 
anyway. “There’s no cure for it.” 

Mom tsk-tsked. Dad continued to read his science magazine. 

I had strange dreams that night, disturbing dreams. I was back in 
Vermont, running through the snow. Something was chasing me. I thought 
maybe it was the swamp hermit. I kept running and running. I was very 
cold. I was shivering in the dream. 

I turned back to see who was chasing me. There wasn’t anyone there. 
And suddenly, I was in the swamp. I was sinking in a peat bog. It gurgled 
all around me, green and thick, making these sick sucking sounds. 

It was sucking me down. Down... 

The howls woke me up. 

I sat straight up in my bed and stared out the window at the nearly full 
moon. It floated right beyond the window, silvery and bright against the 
blue-black sky. 

Another long howl rose on the night air. 

I realized I was shaking all over. I was sweating. My pajama shirt 
stuck to my back. 

Gripping the covers with both hands, I listened hard. 

Another howl. The cry of an animal. 

From the swamp? 

The cries sounded so close. Right outside the window. Long, angry 
howls. 

I shoved down the covers and lowered my feet to the floor. I was still 
trembling, and my head throbbed as I stood up. I guessed I still had a fever. 



Another long howl. 

I made my way to the hall on shaky legs. I had to find out if my 
parents had heard the howls, too. 

Walking through the darkness, I bumped into a low table in the hall. I 
still wasn’t used to this new house. 

My feet were cold as ice, but my head felt burning hot, as if it were on 
fire. Rubbing the knee I had banged, I waited for my eyes to adjust to the 
darkness. Then I continued down the hall. 

My parents’ room was just past the kitchen in the back of the house. I 
was halfway across the kitchen when I stopped short. 

What was that sound? 

A scratching sound. 

My breath caught in my throat. I froze, my arms stiff at my sides. 

I listened. 

There it was again. 

Over the pounding of my heart, I heard it. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

Someone—or something —scratching at the kitchen door. 

Then—another howl. So close. So terrifyingly close. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

What could it be? Some kind of animal? Just outside the house? 

Some kind of swamp animal howling and scratching at the door? 

I realized I’d been holding my breath a long while. I let it out in a 
whoosh, then sucked in another breath. 

I listened hard, straining to hear over the pounding of my heart. 

The refrigerator clicked on. The loud click nearly made me jump out 
of my skin. I grabbed the countertop. My hands were as cold as my feet, 
cold and clammy. 

I listened. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

I took a step toward the kitchen door. 

One step, then I stopped. 

A shudder of fear ran down my back. 

I realized I wasn’t alone. 

Someone was there, breathing beside me in the dark kitchen. 



10 


I gasped. I was gripping the countertop so hard, my hand ached. 

“Wh-who’s there?” I whispered. 

The kitchen light flashed on. 

“Emily!” I practically shouted her name, in surprise and relief. “Emily 

“Did you hear the howls?” she asked, speaking just above a whisper. 
Her blue eyes burned into mine. 

“Yes. They woke me up,” I said. “They sound so angry.” 

“Like a cry of attack,” Emily whispered. “Why do you look so weird, 
Grady?” 

“Huh?” Her question caught me off guard. 

“Your face is all red,” she said. “And look at you—you’re all shaky.” 

“I think my fever is back,” I told her. 

“Swamp fever,” she murmured, examining me with her eyes. “Maybe 
it’s the swamp fever you were telling me about.” 

I turned to the kitchen door. “Did you hear the scratching sounds?” I 
asked. “Something was scratching on the back door.” 

“Yes,” she whispered. She stared at the door. 

We both listened. 

Silence. 

“Do you think one of the deer escaped?” she asked, taking a few steps 
toward the door, her arms crossed in front of her pink-and-white robe. 

“Do you think a deer would scratch at the door?” I asked. 

It was such a silly question, we both burst out laughing. 

“Maybe it wanted a glass of water!” Emily exclaimed, and we both 
laughed some more. Giddy laughter. Nervous laughter. 

We both cut our laughter short at the same time, and listened. 

Another howl rose up outside like a police siren. 

I saw Emily’s eyes narrow in fear. “It’s a wolf!” she cried in a hushed 
whisper. She raised a hand to her mouth. “Only a wolf makes a sound like 
that, Grady.” 



“Emily, come on—” I started to protest. 

“No. I’m right,” she insisted. “It’s a wolf howl.” 

“Em, stop,” I said, sinking onto a kitchen stool. “There are no wolves 
in the Florida swamps. You can look in the guidebooks. Or better yet, ask 
Mom and Dad. Wolves don’t live in swamps.” 

She started to argue, but a scratching at the door made her stop. 

Scratch scratch scratch. 

We both heard it. We both reacted with sharp gasps. 

“What is that?” I whispered. And then, reading her expression, I 
quickly added, “Don’t say it’s a wolf.” 

“I—I don’t know,” she replied, both hands raised to her face. I 
recognized her look of panic. “Let’s get Mom and Dad.” 

I grabbed the door handle. “Let’s just take a look,” I said. 

I don’t know where my sudden courage came from. Maybe it was the 
fever. But, suddenly, I just wanted to solve the mystery. 

Who or what was scratching at the door? 

There was one good way to find out—open the door and look outside. 

“No, Grady—wait!” Emily pleaded. 

But I waved away her protests. 

Then I turned the doorknob and pulled open the kitchen door. 



11 


A gust of hot, wet air rushed in through the open door. The chirp of cicadas 
greeted my ears. 

Holding on to the door, I peered into the darkness of the back yard. 

Nothing. 

The nearly full moon, yellow as a lemon, floated high in the sky. Thin 
wisps of black clouds drifted over it. 

The cicadas stopped suddenly, and all was quiet. 

Too quiet. 

I squinted into the distance, toward the blackness of the swamp. 

Nothing moved. Nothing made a sound. 

I waited for my eyes to adjust to the darkness. The moonlight sent a 
pale glow over the grass. In the far distance, I could see the black outline of 
slanting trees where the swamp began. 

Who or what had scratched at the door? Were they hiding in the 
darkness now? 

Watching me? 

Waiting for me to close the door so they could begin their frightening 
howls again? 

“Grady—close the door.” 

I could hear my sister’s voice behind me. She sounded so frightened. 

“Grady—do you see something? Do you?” 

“No,” I told her. “Just the moon.” 

I ventured out onto the back stoop. The air was hot and steamy, like 
the air in the bathroom after you’ve taken a hot shower. 

“Grady—come back. Close the door.” Emily’s voice was shrill and 
trembly. 

I gazed toward the deer pen. I could see their shadowy forms, still and 
silent. The hot wind rustled the grass. The cicadas began chirping again. 

“Is anybody out here?” I called. I immediately felt foolish. 

There was no one out here. 

“Grady—shut the door. Now.” 



I felt Emily’s hand on my pajama sleeve. She tugged me back into the 
kitchen. I closed the door and locked it. 

My face felt wet from the damp night air. I had chills. My knees were 
shaking. 

“You look kind of sick,” Emily said. She glanced over my shoulder to 
the door. “Did you see anything?” 

“No,” I told her. “Nothing. It’s so dark in back, even with a full 
moon.” 

“What’s going on in here?” A stern voice interrupted us. Dad lumbered 
into the kitchen, adjusting the collar of the long nightshirt he always wore. 
“It’s past midnight.” He glanced from Emily to me, then back to Emily, 
looking for a clue. 

“We heard noises,” Emily said. “Howls outside.” 

“And then something was scratching on the door,” I added, trying to 
keep my knees from shaking. 

“Fever dreams,” Dad said to me. “Look at you. You’re red as a tomato. 
And you’re shaking. Let’s take your temperature. You must be burning up.” 
He started toward the bathroom to get the thermometer. 

“It wasn’t a dream,” Emily called after him. “I heard the noises, too.” 

Dad stopped in the doorway. “Did you check the deer?” 

“Yeah. They’re okay,” I said. 

“Then maybe it was just the wind. Or some creatures in the swamp. 
It’s hard to sleep in a new house. The sounds are all so new, so unfamiliar. 
But you’ll both get used to them after a while.” 

I’ll never get used to those horrible howls, I thought stubbornly. But I 
headed back to my room. 

Dad took my temperature. It was just slightly above normal. “You 
should be fine by tomorrow,” he said, smoothing my blanket over me. “No 
more wandering around tonight, okay?” 

I murmured a reply and almost instantly drifted into a restless sleep. 

Again I had strange, troubling dreams. I dreamed I was walking in the 
swamp. I heard the howls. I could see the full moon between the slender 
tree trunks of the swamp. 

I started to mn. And then suddenly I was up to my waist in a thick, 
green bog. And the howls continued, one after the other, echoing through 
the trees as I sank into the murky bog. 



When I awoke the next morning, the dream lingered in my mind. I 
wondered if the howls were real, or just part of the dream. 

Climbing out of bed, I realized I felt fine. Yellow morning sunlight 
poured in through the window. I could see a clear blue sky. The beautiful 
morning made me forget my nightmares. 

I wondered if Will was around this morning. Maybe he and I could go 
exploring in the swamp. 

I got dressed quickly, pulling on pale blue jeans and a black-and-silver 
Raiders T-shirt. (I’m not a Raiders fan. I just like their colors.) 

I gulped down a bowl of Frosted Flakes, allowed my mom to feel my 
head to make sure my fever was gone, and hurried to the back door. 

“Whoa. Hold on,” Mom called, setting down her coffee cup. “Where 
are you going so early?” 

“I want to see if Will is home,” I said. “Maybe we’ll hang out or 
something.” 

“Okay. Just don’t overdo it,” she warned. “Promise?” 

“Yeah. Promise,” I replied. 

I pulled open the kitchen door, stepped out into blinding sunlight—and 
screamed as an enormous, dark monster leapt onto my chest and heaved me 
to the ground. 



12 


“It—it’s got me!” I screamed as it pushed me to the ground and jumped on 
my chest. 

“Help! It—it’s licking my faceV 

I was so startled, it took me a long time to realize my attacker was a 

dog. 

By the time Mom and Dad came to my rescue and started to pull the 
big creature off my chest, I was laughing. “Hey—that tickles! Stop!” 

I wiped the dog spit off my face with my hands and scrambled to my 

feet. 

“Where’d you come from?” Mom asked the dog. She and Dad were 
holding on to the enormous beast. 

They both let go, and it stood wagging its tail excitedly, panting, its big 
red tongue hanging down practically to the ground. 

“He’s enormous!” Dad exclaimed. “He must be part shepherd.” 

I was still wiping the sticky saliva off my cheeks. 

“He scared me to death,” I confessed. “Didn’t you, fella?” I reached 
down and stroked the dark gray fur on the top of his head. His long tail 
started wagging faster. 

“He likes you,” Mom said. 

“He practically killed me!” I exclaimed. “Look at him. He must weigh 
more than a hundred pounds!” 

“Were you the one scratching at our door last night?” Emily appeared 
in the doorway, still in the long T-shirt she used as a nightshirt. “I think this 
clears up the mystery,” she said to me, yawning sleepily and pulling her 
blonde hair behind her shoulders with both hands. 

“I guess,” I muttered. I got down on my knees beside the big dog and 
stroked his back. He turned his head and licked my cheek again. “Yuck! 
Quit that!” I told him. 

“I wonder who he belongs to?” Mom said, staring at the dog 
thoughtfully. “Grady, check his collar. There’s probably an ID tag.” 

I reached up to the dog’s broad neck and felt around in his fur for a 
collar. “Nothing there,” I reported. 



“Maybe he’s a stray,” Emily said from inside the kitchen. “Maybe 
that’s why he was scratching the door last night.” 

“Yeah,” I said quickly. “He needs a place to live.” 

“Whoa,” Mom said, shaking her head. “I don’t think we need a dog 
right now, Grady. We just moved in, and—” 

“But I need a pet!” I insisted. “It’s so lonely here. A dog would be 
great, Mom. He could keep me company.” 

“You have the deer for pets,” Dad said, frowning. He turned to the deer 
pen. The six deer were all standing alertly at attention, staring warily at the 
dog. 

“You can’t walk a deer!” I protested. “Besides, you’re going to set the 
deer free, right?” 

“The dog probably belongs to someone,” Mom said. “You can’t just 
claim any dog that wanders by. Besides, he’s so big, Grady. He’s too big to 

“Aw, let him keep it,” Emily called from the house. 

I stared at her in shock. I couldn’t remember the last time Emily and I 
had been on the same side of a family argument. 

The discussion continued for several minutes more. Everyone agreed 
that he seemed like a sweet-tempered, gentle dog despite his huge size. And 
he certainly was affectionate. I couldn’t make him stop licking me. 

Glancing up, I saw Will come out of his house and head across the 
back lawns toward us. He was wearing a sleeveless blue T-shirt and blue 
Lycra bicycle shorts. “Hi! Look what we found!” I called. 

I introduced Will to my mom and dad. Emily had disappeared back to 
her room to get dressed. 

“Have you seen this dog before?” Dad asked Will. “Does he belong to 
someone in the neighborhood?” 

Will shook his head. “Nope. Never seen him.” He cautiously petted the 
dog’s head. 

“Where’d you come from, fella?” I asked, staring into the creature’s 
eyes. They were blue. Sky-blue. 

“He looks more like a wolf than a dog,” Will said. 

“Yeah. He really does,” I agreed. “Was that you howling like a wolf all 
last night?” I asked the dog. He tried to lick my nose, but I pulled my face 
back in time. 



I glanced up at Will. “Did you hear those howls last night? They were 
really weird.” 

“No. I didn’t hear anything,” Will replied. “I’m a very sound sleeper. 
My dad comes into my room and shouts through a megaphone to wake me 
up in the morning. Really!” 

We all laughed. 

“He really does look like a wolf,” Mom commented, staring at the 
dog’s blue eyes. 

“Wolves are skinnier,” Dad remarked. “Their snouts are narrower. He 
could be part wolf, I suppose. But it’s not very likely in this geographical 
area.” 

“Let’s call him Wolf,” I suggested enthusiastically. “It’s the perfect 
name for him.” I climbed to my feet. “Hi, Wolf,” I called to the dog. “Wolf! 
Hi, Wolf!” 

His ears perked straight up. 

“See? He likes the name!” I exclaimed. “Wolf! Wolf!” 

He barked at me, a single yip. 

“Can I keep him?” I asked. 

Mom and Dad exchanged long glances. “We’ll see,” Mom said. 

That afternoon, Will and I headed to the swamp to do some exploring. My 
nightmares about the swamp lingered in my mind. But I did my best to 
force them away. 

It was a blazing hot day. The sun burned down in a clear, cloudless 
sky. As we crossed my back yard, I hoped it would be cooler in the leafy 
shade of the swamp. 

I glanced back at Wolf. He was napping in the hot sunlight on his side, 
his four legs stretched straight out in front of him. 

We had fed him before lunch, some leftover roast beef scraps from our 
dinner the night before. He gobbled it up hungrily. Then, after slurping up 
an entire bowl of water, he dropped down in the grass in front of the back 
stoop to take his nap. 

Will and I followed the dirt path into the slanting trees. Black-and- 
orange monarch butterflies, four or five of them, fluttered over a bank of 
tall wildflowers. 

“Hey!” I cried out as my foot sank into a marshy spot in the dirt. When 



I pulled my sneaker out, it was covered with wet sand. 

“Have you seen the bog?” Will asked. “It’s kind of neat.” 

“Yeah. Let’s go there,” I said enthusiastically. “We can throw sticks in 
and stuff, and watch them sink.” 

“Do you think any people ever got sunk in the bog?” Will asked 
thoughtfully. He brushed a mosquito off his broad forehead, then scratched 
his short, dark brown hair. 

“Maybe,” I replied, following him as he turned off the path and headed 
through a wide patch of tall reeds. “Do you think it would really suck you 
down into it, like quicksand?” 

“My dad says there’s no such thing as quicksand,” Will said. 

“I bet there is,” I told him. “I bet people have fallen into the bog 
accidentally and gotten sucked down. If we brought a fishing rod, we could 
cast a line in and pull up their bones.” 

“Gross,” he said. 

We were walking over a carpet of dead brown leaves. Our sneakers 
crunched noisily as we made our way under tangled palm trees toward the 
bog. 

Suddenly, Will stopped. “Ssshhh. ” He raised a finger to his lips. 

I heard it, too. 

Crunching behind us. 

Footsteps. 

We both froze in place, listening hard. The footsteps drew closer. 

Will’s dark eyes narrowed in fear. “Someone’s following us,” he 
murmured. “It’s the swamp hermit!” 



13 


“Quick—hide!” I cried. 

Will dived behind a thick clump of tall weeds. I tried to follow him, 
but there wasn’t room for both of us. 

Crawling on my hands and knees, I searched frantically for something 
to hide behind. 

The crackling of dead leaves became louder. The footsteps hurried 
closer. 

I scrambled toward a nest of brambles. No. They wouldn’t hide me. 

A clump of ferns across from me was too low. 

The footsteps crackled closer. 

Closer. 

“Hide! Hide!” Will urged. 

But I was trapped out in the open. Caught. 

I struggled to my feet just as our pursuer came into view. 

“Wolf!” I cried. 

The big dog’s tail began wagging furiously as soon as he saw me. He 
uttered a joyful bark—and jumped. 

“No!” I managed to cry. 

His front paws landed hard on my chest. I stumbled backwards into the 
tall weeds and fell onto Will. 

“Hey!” He cried out and scrambled to his feet. 

Wolf barked happily and practically smothered me, trying to lick my 

face. 

“Wolf—down! Down!” I shouted. I stood up and started brushing dead 
leaves off my T-shirt. “Wolf, you’ve got to stop doing that, boy,” I told him. 
“You’re not a little puppy, you know?” 

“How did he find us?” Will asked, pulling a burr off the seat of his 
blue Lycra shorts. 

“Good nose, I guess,” I replied, staring down at the happily panting 
dog. “Maybe he’s part hunting dog or something.” 

“Let’s get to the bog,” Will said impatiently. He began leading the 



way, but Wolf pushed past him, nearly bumping him over, and continued 
trotting toward the bog, his powerful legs taking long, steady strides. 

“Wolf acts as if he knows where we’re going,” I said, a little surprised. 

“Maybe he’s been here before,” Will replied. “Maybe he’s a swamp 
dog.” 

“Maybe,” I replied thoughtfully, staring down at Wolf. Where do you 
come from, dog? I wondered. He certainly did seem at home in the swamp. 

In a short while, we came to the edge of the peat bog. I wiped the 
sweat off my forehead with the back of my hand and stared across the oval¬ 
shaped pond. 

Shafts of sunlight made the green surface sparkle. Thousands of tiny 
white insects fluttered just above it, catching the light, glistening like little 
diamonds. 

Will picked up a small tree branch. He cracked it in half between his 
hands. Then he heaved one of the halves high into the air. 

It hit the surface of the bog with more of a thunk than a splash. And 
then it just lay there. It didn’t sink. 

“Weird,” I said. “Let’s try something heavier.” 

I started to search for something, but a low growl caught my attention. 
I turned toward the sound. To my surprise, it was coming from Wolf. 

The dog had lowered its big head. Its entire body stood tensed, as if in 
attack position. Its dark lips were pulled back, revealing two sharp rows of 
teeth. It uttered a low growl, then another. 

“I think he senses danger,” Will said softly. 



14 


Wolf uttered another menacing growl, baring his jagged teeth. The fur on 
his back stood up stiffly. His legs tensed as if preparing to attack. 

The sound of crackling twigs made me raise my eyes. I saw a gray 
figure darting behind tall weeds on the other side of the bog. 

“Who—who’s that?” Will whispered. 

I stared straight ahead, unable to speak. 

“Is that—” Will started. 

“Yes,” I managed to choke out. “It’s him. The swamp hermit.” I 
dropped quickly to my knees, hoping to keep out of view. 

But had he already seen us? 

Had he been there at the other side of the bog all along? 

Will must have been sharing my thoughts. “Has that weirdo been 
spying on us?” he demanded, huddling beside me. 

Wolf uttered a quiet growl, still frozen in place, ready to attack. 

Keeping low, I scooted closer to the dog. For protection, I guess. 

I watched the strange man as he made his way through the weeds. His 
long, gray-white hair was wild, standing straight out around his face. He 
kept glancing behind him as he walked, as if making sure he wasn’t being 
followed. 

He carried a brown sack over one shoulder. 

He turned his gaze in our direction. I dropped down lower, trying to 
hide behind Wolf, my heart pounding. 

Wolf hadn’t moved, but he was silent now. His ears were still pulled 
back, his lips still open in a soundless snarl. 

What were those dark stains on the front of the swamp hermit’s grimy 
shirt? 

Bloodstains? 

A shiver of fear ran down my back. 

Wolf stared straight ahead without blinking, without moving a muscle. 

The swamp hermit disappeared behind the tall weeds. We couldn’t see 
him, but we could still hear his footsteps crunching over dead leaves and 
fallen twigs. 



I glanced over at Wolf. The big dog shook himself, as if shaking the 
swamp hermit from his mind. His tail wagged slowly. His body relaxed. 

He uttered soft whimpers, as if telling me how scared he had been. 

“It’s okay, boy,” I said quietly, and rubbed the soft fur on top of the 
dog’s head. He stopped whimpering and licked at my wrist. 

“That guy is creepy!” Will exclaimed, climbing slowly to his feet. 

“He even scared the dog,” I said, petting Wolf some more. “What do 
you think he had in the sack?” 

“Probably someone’s head!” Will said, his dark eyes wide with horror. 

I laughed. But I stopped when I saw that Will wasn’t joking. 
“Everyone says he’s harmless,” I said. 

“He had blood all over the front of his shirt,” Will said with a shudder. 
He scratched his short, dark hair nervously. 

The sunlight faded quickly as clouds rolled over the sun. Long 
shadows crept over the bog. The stick Will had thrown had disappeared, 
sucked into the thick, murky water. 

“Let’s get home,” I suggested. 

“Yeah. Okay,” Will agreed quickly. 

I called to Wolf, who was exploring in the tall weeds. Then we turned 
and started to make our way back along the twisting dirt path. 

A soft breeze fluttered the trees, making the palm leaves scrape and 
clatter. Tall ferns shivered in the wind. The shadows grew deeper and 
darker. 

I could hear Wolf behind us. I could hear his body brushing through 
low shrubs and weeds. 

We were nearly to where the trees ended and the flat grass leading to 
our back yards began. We were nearly out of the swamp when Will stopped 
suddenly. 

I saw his mouth drop open in horror. 

I turned to follow his gaze. 

Then I uttered a shocked cry and covered my eyes to shut out the 
gmesome sight. 



15 


When I opened my eyes, the hideous pile of feathers and blood-covered 
flesh was still at my feet. 

“Wh-what is it?” Will stammered. 

It took me a long while to realize we were staring at a bird. A large 
heron. 

It was hard to recognize because it had been torn apart. 

Long, white feathers were scattered over the soft ground. The poor 
bird’s chest had been torn wide open. 

“The swamp hermit!” Will cried. 

“Huh?” I cried. I turned away from the hideous sight and tried to force 
the image from my mind. 

“That’s why he had blood all over his shirt!” Will declared. 

“But why would he rip a bird apart?” I asked weakly. 

“Because... because he’s a monster !” Will exclaimed. 

“He’s just a weird old guy who lives alone in the swamp,” I said. “He 
didn’t do this, Will. Some kind of animal did it. Look!” I pointed to the 
ground. 

There were paw prints in the soft ground. All around the dead bird. 

“They look like dog’s paws,” I said, thinking out loud. 

“Dogs don’t rip apart birds,” Will replied quietly. 

At that moment, Wolf came bounding up to us through the weeds. He 
came to a stop in front of the dead bird and started to sniff it. 

“Get away from there, Wolf,” I ordered. “Come on. Get away.” I 
tugged him back, pulling him with both hands around his thick neck. 

“Let’s get home,” Will said. “Let’s get away from this thing. I’m going 
to have bad dreams. I really will.” 

I pulled Wolf with both hands. We stepped carefully around the dead 
heron and then hurried toward the swamp edge. Neither of us said a word. I 
guess we were both still picturing what we had seen. 

As we reached the flat grass behind our houses, I said good-bye to 
Will. I watched him hurry to his house. Wolf scampered after him for part 
of the way. Then he turned and hurried back to me. 



The late afternoon sun burned its way through the clouds. I shielded 
my eyes from the sudden brightness, and saw my dad working in the deer 
pen behind the house. 

“Hey, Dad—” I ran toward him over the grass. 

He glanced up when I called to him. He was wearing denim cutoffs 
and a sleeveless yellow T-shirt. He had an Orlando Magic cap pulled down 
over his forehead. “What’s up, Grady?” 

“Will and I—we saw a dead heron,” I told him breathlessly. 

“Where? In the swamp?” he asked casually. He pulled off the cap, 
wiped his forehead with the back of his hand, and replaced the cap. 

“Dad, it—it was torn apart!” I cried. 

He didn’t react. “That’s part of life in the wild,” he said, pulling up one 
of the deer’s hooves to examine the bottom. “You know that, Grady. It can 
get pretty violent out there. We’ve talked about survival of the fittest and 
stuff like that.” 

“No, Dad. This is different,” I insisted. “The heron—it was ripped in 
two. I mean, like someone took it, and—” 

“Another bird, maybe,” Dad said, concentrating on the deer hoof. “A 
larger bird of prey. It could have been—” 

“We saw the swamp hermit,” I interrupted. “He had blood all over his 
shirt. Then we saw paw prints in the ground. All around the dead bird.” 

“Grady, calm down,” Dad said, setting down the deer’s leg. “If you go 
exploring in the swamp, you’re going to see a lot of frightening-looking 
things. But don’t let your imagination run away with you.” 

“Will said it was done by a monster!” I exclaimed. 

Dad frowned and scratched his head through the cap. “I see your new 
friend has a good imagination, too,” he said quietly. 

That night, I was glad my parents agreed to let Wolf sleep in my room. I felt 
a lot safer with the big dog curled up on the rug beside my bed. 

I hadn’t been able to shake the ugly picture of the dead heron from my 
mind. I watched some TV until dinnertime. Then after dinner, I played a 
long chess game with Emily. 

But no matter what I did, I kept seeing the white feathers scattered 
over the ground, the torn-apart bird lying crumpled on the path. 

So now I felt a little comforted with Wolf sleeping in the room. “You’ll 



protect me, won’t you, boy?” I whispered from my bed. 

He uttered a low snort. Light from the full moon spilled over him 
through the window. I saw that he was sleeping with his head resting on his 
two front paws. 

Then I drifted into a dreamless sleep. 

I don’t know how long I slept. 

I was awakened some time later by a horrifying crash. 

I sat straight up with a startled gasp. 

The crash had come from the living room, I realized. 

Someone was breaking in! 



16 


Was it a burglar? 

I climbed out of bed, my heart pounding, and crept to the door. 

Another crash. A loud thump. 

Footsteps. 

“Who—who is it?” I cried. My voice came out in a choked whisper. 

Keeping against the wall, I made my way slowly toward the living 
room. “Who’s there?” I shouted. 

Mom and Dad and Emily met me in the dark hallway. Even in the 
darkness I could see the fear and confusion on their faces. 

I was the first to the living room. Pale yellow light from the full moon 
washed across the room. “Hey!” I called out. 

Wolf leaped against the big front window. His shoulders made a loud 
thud against the glass. 

“Wolf—stop!” I cried. 

In the pale light, I saw what had caused the loud crash. Wolf had 
knocked over the table and a lamp that had stood in front of the window. 

“He—he’s trying to get outside,” I stammered. 

I felt Dad’s hand on the shoulder of my pajama shirt. “What a mess 
he’s made,” he murmured. 

“Wolf—stop!” I called again. 

The big dog turned, breathing hard. His eyes glowed red in the 
moonlight through the window. 

“Why is he so desperate to get out?” Emily demanded. 

“We can’t have him in the house if he does this every night,” Mom 
said, her voice hoarse from sleep. 

The big dog lowered his head and let out an excited growl. His tail 
stood straight up behind him. 

“Open the front door. Let him out,” Mom said. “Before he wrecks the 
whole house.” 

Dad hurried across the room and pulled open the door. Wolf didn’t 
hesitate for a second. He bounded to the door and burst out. 



I ran to the window to watch him. But the big dog disappeared around 
the side of the house, running toward the back yard. 

“He’s heading to the swamp,” I guessed. 

“He tried to break right through the window,” Mom said. 

Emily clicked on a lamp. “He’s so strong, he probably could have 
broken the window,” she said quietly. 

Dad closed the front door. He yawned. Then he turned his gaze on me. 
“You know what this means, don’t you, Grady?” 

I was still staring out at the full moon. “No. What?” 

“Wolf will have to stay outdoors from now on,” Dad said. He stooped 
and began picking up pieces of the broken lamp. 

“But, Dad—” I started to protest. 

“He’s too big and too restless to stay in the house,” Dad continued. He 
handed the lamp pieces to Emily. Then he pulled the table rightside up and 
returned it to its place in front of the window. 

“Wolf didn’t mean to break the lamp,” I argued weakly. 

“He’ll break everything we have,” Mom said quietly. 

“He’s just too big,” Dad added. “He’ll have to stay outside, Grady.” 

“Why did he want out so desperately?” Emily demanded. 

“He’s probably used to being outside,” Dad told her. “He’ll be happier 
out there,” he said, turning to me. 

“Yeah. Maybe,” I replied glumly. I liked having Wolf sleep beside me 
in my bedroom. But I knew there was no way I could convince my parents 
to give the dog a second chance. Their minds were made up. 

And at least they were letting me keep Wolf. 

I pulled the vacuum cleaner out of the closet and plugged it in. Dad 
took the nozzle and began vacuuming up the tiny pieces of glass from the 
carpet. 

That crazy dog, I thought, shaking my head unhappily. What is his 
problem, anyway? 

When Dad finished, I carried the vacuum cleaner back to the closet. 

“Now maybe we can all sleep in peace,” Mom said, yawning. 

She was wrong. 



17 


I heard the frightening howls again a short while later. 

At first I thought I was dreaming them. 

But when I opened my eyes and gazed around my dark bedroom, the 
howls continued. Still half asleep, I gripped the covers with both hands and 
pulled them up to my chin. 

The howls sounded so close, as if they were right outside my window. 
They didn’t seem like the cries of an animal. They were too angry, too 
deliberate. 

Too human. 

Stop trying to frighten yourself, I thought. It’s a wolf. It has to be some 
kind of swamp wolf. 

In the back of my mind, I knew it might be Wolf making those 
frightening sounds. But I kept pushing the thought away. 

Why would the dog howl like that? 

Dogs bark. They don’t howl unless they’re very sad or upset. 

I shut my eyes, wishing the frightening wails away. 

Suddenly, they stopped. Silence. 

Then I heard rapid thumps on the ground. Footsteps. 

Some kind of a struggle. 

I heard a short, terrifying cry. It cut off almost as soon as it began. 

It’s right in back of the house, I realized. 

Wide awake now, I jumped out of bed, dragging the covers with me. I 
stumbled to the bedroom window and grabbed the windowsill. 

The full moon had risen high in the night sky. The back yard stretched 
out silvery in the moonlight, the dewy grass shimmering in the bright light. 

Pressing my forehead against the windowpane, I peered out toward the 
dark swamp. I uttered a near-silent gasp when I saw the shadowy creature 
running toward the trees. 

A large creature, running on all fours. 

It was only a black outline fading into the darkness. But I could see 
how big it was, and I could see how fast it was running. 



And I heard its howls. Triumphant howls, I thought. 

Is it Wolf? I wondered. I peered out the window without moving, even 
though the darkness had swallowed the creature up. I could see only the 
outline of distant trees. 

But I could still hear the howls rising and falling on the heavy night 
air. 

Is it Wolf? 

It can’t be Wolf—can it? 

I lowered my gaze. My breath caught in my throat. I saw something. In 
the middle of the backyard. A few feet from the deer pen. 

At first I thought it was a pile of rags. 

My hands trembled as I pulled open my window. 

I had to get a better look. I had to see what that was in the back yard. 

I pulled up my pajama bottoms. Then, gripping the windowsill, I 
lowered myself out the window onto the grass. 

The wet grass felt cold under my bare feet. I turned to the deer pen. 
The six swamp deer were standing tensely, huddled together against the 
house. Their dark eyes followed me as I began to creep across the grass. 

What is that thing? I wondered, staring into the silvery light. 

Is it just a pile of old rags? 

No. 

What is it? 



18 


My bare feet felt cold and wet as I made my way slowly across the dew- 
covered grass. The night air was heavy and still, still as death. 

When I came close enough to see what was lying in a heap on the 
grass, I uttered a faint cry and started to gag. 

I pressed a hand against my mouth and swallowed hard. 

I realized I was staring down at a rabbit. Its small, black eyes were 
frozen open in terror. One of its ears had been pulled off. 

The rabbit had been ripped open, nearly torn in half. 

I forced myself to look away. 

My stomach still heaving, I hurried back over the wet grass to my open 
window and scrambled back in. 

As I struggled to pull the window shut, the howls rang out again, rising 
triumphantly from the nearby swamp. 

After breakfast the next morning, I led Dad out to the back yard to show 
him the murdered rabbit. It was a bright, hot day, and a red sun climbed a 
pale, clear sky. 

As soon as we stepped off the back stoop, Wolf appeared from around 
the side of his house. His tail began wagging furiously. He came running 
excitedly to greet me, as if he hadn’t seen me in years, leaping onto my 
chest, nearly knocking me over. 

“Down, Wolf! Down!” I cried, laughing as the dog stretched to lick my 

face. 

“Your dog is a killer,” a voice said behind me. I turned to see that 
Emily had followed us. She was wearing a red T-shirt over white tennis 
shorts. She had her arms crossed in front of her, and she was glaring 
disapprovingly at Wolf. “Look what he did to that poor bunny rabbit,” she 
said, shaking her head. 

“Whoa. Hold on,” I replied, petting Wolf’s gray fur. “Who said Wolf 
did this?” 

“Who else would have done it?” Emily demanded. “He’s a killer.” 

“Oh, yeah? Look how gentle he is,” I insisted. I put my wrist in Wolf’s 



mouth. He clamped down gently on it, being careful not to hurt me. 

“Wolf may be a bit of a hunter,” Dad said thoughtfully. He had been 
staring down at the rabbit, but now he turned his glance to the deer pen. 

Huddled together at one end of the pen, the deer were all staring warily 
at Wolf. They had their heads lowered cautiously as they followed the dog’s 
every move. 

“I’m glad they’re safe inside that pen,” Dad said softly. 

“Dad, you have to get rid of this dog!” Emily said shrilly. 

“No way!” I cried. I turned angrily to my sister. “You have no proof 
that Wolf did anything wrong!” I shouted. “No proof at all!” 

“You have no proof that he didn’t do it!” Emily replied nastily. 

“Of course he didn’t!” I cried, feeling myself lose control. “Didn’t you 
hear the howls last night? Didn’t you hear those frightening howls? It 
wasn’t a dog howling like that. Dogs don’t howl like that!” 

“Then what was it?” Emily demanded. 

“I heard them, too,” Dad said, stepping between us. “They sounded 
more like wolf howls. Or maybe a coyote.” 

“See?” I told Emily. 

“But I’d be very surprised to find a wolf or coyote in this area,” Dad 
continued, gazing out toward the swamp. 

Emily still had her arms crossed tightly over her chest. She gazed 
down at Wolf and shuddered. “He’s dangerous, Dad. You really have to get 
rid of him.” 

Dad walked over and patted Wolf’s head. He scratched Wolf under the 
chin. Wolf licked Dad’s hand. 

“Let’s just be careful around him,” Dad said. “He seems very gentle. 
But we don’t really know anything about him—do we? So let’s be very 
careful, okay?” 

“I’m going to be careful,” Emily replied, narrowing her eyes at Wolf. 
“I’m going to stay as far away from that monster as I can.” She turned and 
stormed back to the house. 

Dad made his way to the shed to get a shovel and box to carry away 
the dead rabbit in. 

I dropped to my knees and hugged Wolf’s broad neck. “You aren’t a 
monster, are you, boy?” I asked. “Emily is crazy, isn’t she? You’re not a 
monster. That wasn’t you I saw running toward the swamp last night, was 



it?” 


Wolf raised his deep blue eyes to mine. He stared hard at me. 
He seemed to be trying to tell me something. 

But I had no idea what it could be. 



19 


That night I didn’t hear the howls. 

I woke up in the middle of the night and stared out the window. Wolf 
was gone, probably exploring the swamp. In the morning, I knew he’d 
come running back to greet me as if I were a long lost friend. 

The next morning Will showed up just as I was giving Wolf his 
breakfast, a big bowl of crunchy, dry dog food. “Hey, what’s up?” Will 
asked, his usual greeting. 

“Nothing much,” I said. I rolled up the top of the big bag of dog food 
and dragged it back into the kitchen. Wolf stood over his bowl, his head 
lowered, chewing noisily away. 

I pushed open the screen door and returned to Will. He was wearing a 
dark blue muscle shirt and black Lycra bike shorts. He had a green-and- 
yellow Forest Service cap pulled down over his dark hair. 

“Want to go exploring?” he asked in his hoarse voice, watching Wolf 
hungrily gobble down his breakfast. “You know. In the swamp?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I said. I called inside to tell my parents where I was 
going. Then I followed Will across the back lawn toward the swamp. 

Wolf came scampering after us. He’d run past us, then let us catch up. 
Then he’d run in crazy zigzags in front of us, behind us, romping happily 
under the hot morning sun. 

“Did you hear about Mr. Warner?” Will asked. He stopped to pick up a 
long blade of grass and put it between his teeth. 

“Who?” 

“Ed Warner,” Will replied. “I guess you haven’t met the Warners yet. 
They live in the very last house.” He turned and pointed behind us to the 
last white house at the end of the row of white houses. 

“What about him?” I asked, nearly tripping over Wolf, who had come 
rumbling past my feet. 

“He’s missing,” Will replied, chewing on the grass blade. “He didn’t 
come home last night.” 

“Huh? From where?” I asked, turning to stare at the Warners’ house. 
Heat waves shimmered up from the grass, making the house appear to bend 



and quiver. 

“From the swamp,” Will replied darkly. “Mrs. Warner called my mom 
this morning. She said Mr. Warner went hunting yesterday afternoon. He 
likes to hunt wild turkeys. He took me with him a couple times. He’s real 
good at chasing them down. When he kills one, he hangs its feet up on his 
den wall.” 

“He does?” I cried. It sounded pretty gross to me. 

“Yeah. You know. Like a trophy,” Will continued. “Anyway, he went 
hunting wild turkeys in the swamp yesterday afternoon, and he hasn’t come 
home.” 

“Weird,” I said, watching Wolf stop at the edge of the trees. “Maybe he 
got lost.” 

“No way,” Will insisted, shaking his head. “Not Mr. Warner. He’s lived 
here a long time. He was the first one to move here. Mr. Warner wouldn’t 
get lost.” 

“Then maybe the werewolf got him!” called a strange voice behind us. 



20 


Startled, we both spun around to see a girl about our age. She had rust- 
colored red hair tied in a ponytail on one side. She had catlike green eyes, 
and a short stub of a nose, and freckles all over her face. She was wearing 
faded red denim jeans and a T-shirt with a grinning green alligator on the 
front. 

“Cassie, what are you doing here?” Will demanded. 

“Following you,” she replied, making a face at him. She turned to me. 
“You’re the new kid, Grady, right? Will told me about you.” 

“Hi,” I said awkwardly. “He told me a girl lived in the neighborhood. 
But he didn’t tell me much about you.” 

“What’s to tell?” Will teased. 

“I’m Cassie O’Rourke,” she said. She shot up her hand and pulled the 
blade of grass from Will’s mouth. 

“Hey!” He playfully tried to slug her, but missed. 

“What did you say about a werewolf?” I asked. 

“Don’t start with that stuff again,” Will grumbled to Cassie. “It’s so 
stupid.” 

“You’re just afraid,” Cassie accused. 

“No, I’m not. It’s too stupid,” Will insisted. 

We stepped into the shade of the trees at the swamp edge. A funnel 
cloud of white gnats whirred crazily in a shaft of light between the trees. 

“There’s a werewolf in the swamp,” Cassie said, lowering her voice as 
we ducked past the gnats and moved deeper into the shade. 

“And I’m going to flap my wings and fly to Mars,” Will said 
sarcastically. 

“Shut up, Will,” Cassie snapped. “Grady doesn’t think it’s stupid—do 
you?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know,” I said. “I don’t think I believe in 
werewolves.” 

Will laughed. “Cassie believes in the Easter Bunny, too,” he said. 

Cassie socked him hard in the chest. 

“Hey!” Will cried out angrily as he staggered back. “What’s your 



problem?” 

“Mosquito,” she said, pointing. “A big one. I got him.” 

Scowling, Will glanced down. “I don’t see any mosquito. Give me a 
break, Cassie.” 

We made our way along the winding path. It had rained the day before. 
The ground was marshier than usual. We kept slipping in the soft mud. 

“Do you hear the howling sounds at night?” I asked Cassie. 

“That’s the werewolf,” she replied softly. Her green cat-eyes burned 
into mine. “I’m not kidding around, Grady. I’m serious. Those howls aren’t 
human. Those howls come from a werewolf who has just killed.” 

Will snickered. “You’ve got a good imagination, Cassie. I guess you 
watch a lot of scary movies on TV, huh?” 

“Real life is scarier than the movies,” she said, lowering her voice to a 
whisper. 

“Ooh, stop. You’re making me shake all over!” Will exclaimed 
sarcastically. 

She didn’t reply. She was still staring at me as we walked. “You 
believe me, don’t you?” 

“I don’t know,” I said. 

The bog came into view. The air became heavier, wetter. The tall 
weeds on the other side stood straight up. The bog gurgled quietly. Two big 
flies danced over the dark green surface. 

“There’s no such thing as werewolves, Cassie,” Will muttered, 
searching for something to throw into the bog. He grinned at her. “Unless 
maybe you ’re one!” 

She rolled her eyes. “Very funny.” She made biting motions with her 
teeth as if she were going to bite him. 

I heard a rustling sound across the oval-shaped bog. The tall weeds 
suddenly parted, and Wolf appeared at the edge of the water. 

“What does the werewolf look like?” Will asked sarcastically. “Does it 
have red hair and freckles?” 

Cassie didn’t reply. 

I turned to see a look of terror freeze on her face. Her green eyes grew 
wide, and her freckles seemed to fade. “Th-there’s the werewolf !” she 
stammered in a choked whisper. She pointed. 

Feeling a chill of fear, I turned to see where she was pointing. 



To my horror, she was pointing right at Wolf! 



21 


“No!” I started to protest. 

But then I saw that I had misunderstood. Cassie wasn’t pointing at 
Wolf. She was pointing to the figure moving through the tall weeds behind 
the dog. 

The swamp hermit! 

I saw him walking quickly behind the weeds, his shoulders bent, his 
mangy head bobbing with each step. 

As he moved into a small break in the weeds, I could see why he was 
leaning forward. He carried something over one shoulder. A bag of some 
sort. 

Wolf started to growl. 

The hermit stopped walking. 

It wasn’t a bag slung over his shoulder, I saw. It was a turkey. A wild 
turkey. 

A chilling thought burst into my mind: Had he taken it from Mr. 
Warner? 

Was Cassie right about the swamp hermit? Was he a werewolf? Had he 
done something horrible to Mr. Warner and claimed the wild turkey as his 
prize? 

I tried to dismiss these horrible thoughts. They were crazy. Impossible. 

But Cassie looked so frightened, staring across the gurgling green bog 
at the wild-eyed hermit. And the howls at night, the howls had been so 
frightening, so human. 

And the dead animals I’d seen, torn so brutally apart, as if... as if by a 
werewolf! 

Wolf uttered another warning growl. He stared at the hermit, his tail 
standing stiffly behind him, his fur rising up on his back. 

The hermit moved quickly. I saw his dark eyes flash just before he 
disappeared behind the weeds. 

“It’s him!” Cassie cried, still pointing. “It’s the werewolf!” 

“Cassie —shut up!” Will warned. “He’ll hear you!” 

I swallowed hard, frozen in place by my fear. I saw the weeds tremble 



across the bog. I heard rustling sounds growing closer. 

“Run!” Will cried, his hoarse voice shrill and frightened. “Come on— 

run!” 

Too late. 

The swamp hermit burst out of the weeds right behind us. “I’m the 
werewolf!” he shrieked. His eyes were wild, excited. His face, surrounded 
by his long, tangled hair, was bright red. “I’m the werewolf!” 

He had heard Cassie! 

Laughing at the top of his lungs, he tossed up both hands, then began 
to swing the turkey in a wide circle over his head. “I’m the werewolf!” he 
cried. 

Cassie, Will, and I all cried out at the same time. 

Then we started to run. 

Out of the corner of my eye, I could see Wolf. He hadn’t moved from 
his spot across the bog. But now, as I started to mn, he came bounding 
toward us, barking excitedly. 

“I’m the werewolf!” the hermit shrieked. He howled with laughter, still 
swinging the turkey as he chased after us. 

“Leave us alone!” Cassie cried, running beside Will a few steps ahead 
of me. “Do you hear me? Leave us alone!” 

Her pleas made the hermit howl again. 

My shoes slipped in the muddy ground. 

I turned back. He was gaining on me. Right behind me. 

Gasping for breath, I struggled to run faster. Sharp vines and heavy 
leaves slapped at my face and arms as I plunged forward. 

It was all a blur now. A blur of light and shade, trees and vines, tall 
weeds and sharp brambles. 

“I’m the werewolf! I’m the werewolf!” 

The crazed hermit’s high-pitched wails of laughter echoed through the 
swamp. 

Keep going, Grady, I urged myself. Keep going. 

Then, with a terrified cry, I felt my feet slide out from under me. 

I fell face forward into the mud, landing hard on my hands and knees. 

He’s got me, I realized. 

The werewolf has got me. 



22 


I tried frantically to scramble up from the mud. But I slipped again and 
tumbled forward with a splat. 

He’s got me now, I thought. 

The werewolf has got me now. I cannot escape. 

My muscles all froze in panic. I struggled to crawl away. 

I turned back, expecting the hermit to grab me. 

But he had stopped several yards away. The turkey dangled to the 
ground as he stared down at me, a strange grin on his weathered face. 

Where was Wolf? I wondered. 

Wolf had been growling furiously at the swamp hermit. Why hadn’t 
Wolf attacked? 

“Help! Will! Cassie!” I called desperately. 

Silence. 

They were gone. They were both probably out of the swamp by now, 
running for home. 

I was alone. Alone to face the hermit. 

I stumbled to my feet, my eyes locked on his. Why was he grinning at 
me like that? 

“Go on. Go,” he murmured, gesturing with his free hand. “Just teasing 
you.” 

“What?” My voice came out tiny and frightened. 

“Go. I’m not going to bite you,” he said. His grin faded. The light 
seemed to dim in his shiny black eyes. 

Wolf appeared behind him. The dog gazed up at the hermit, then 
lowered his eyes to the dead turkey. He barked once, a shrill yip. But I 
could see that Wolf had relaxed. He had no intention of attacking the 
hermit. 

“This dog yours?” the hermit asked, eyeing Wolf warily. 

“Yeah,” I replied, still breathing hard. “I... found him.” 

“Watch out for him,” the hermit said sharply. Then he turned and, 
hoisting the large bird on his shoulder, headed back into the weeds. 



“W-watch out for him?” I stammered. “What do you mean?” 

But the hermit didn’t reply. I could hear him brushing the tall weeds 
away as he disappeared back into the swamp. 

“What do you mean?” I called after him. 

But he was gone. The swamp was silent now except for the chirping 
and clicking of insects and the dry sound of palm leaves brushing against 
each other. 

I stared straight ahead at the tall weeds. I guess I expected the swamp 
hermit to return, to burst back into view, to attack again. 

Two white moths fluttered together over the weeds. Nothing else 
moved. 

He was teasing us, he had said. 

That’s all it was, just teasing. 

I swallowed hard. Then I forced myself to breathe normally again. 

After a while, I lowered my gaze to Wolf. The dog was busily sniffing 
the ground where the hermit had stood. 

“Wolf—why didn’t you protect me?” I scolded. 

The dog glanced up, then returned to his sniffing. 

“Hey, dog—are you a big coward?” I asked, brushing at the wet dirt on 
the knees of my jeans. “Is that your problem? You sound real tough, but 
you’re actually a big chicken?” 

Wolf ignored me. 

I turned and headed home, thinking about the hermit’s warning. As I 
made my way along the narrow path, I could hear Wolf running through the 
weeds and tall grass, following close behind. 

“Watch out for him, ” the hermit had said. 

Was he teasing about that, too? Was he just trying to scare me? 

The strange man saw that Will, Cassie, and I were afraid of him. So he 
decided to have some fun with us. 

That’s all it was, I decided. 

He heard Cassie call him a werewolf. So he decided to give us a real 
scare. 

As I walked along the marshy ground under the shade of the tilted 
palm trees, my mind spun with thoughts about Cassie and Will and Wolf 
and werewolves. 

I didn’t see the snake until I stepped on it. 



I glanced down in time to see its bright green head shoot forward. 
I felt a sharp stab of pain as its fangs dug into my ankle. 

The pain jolted up my leg. 

I uttered a choked gasp before I crumpled to the ground. 



23 


I hit the ground and curled into a tight ball as the pain throbbed through my 
body. 

Red dots formed in my eyes. The dots grew larger and larger until I 
saw only red. The color shimmered in rhythm to the throbbing pain. 

Through the curtain of red, I saw the snake slither into the bushes. 

I grabbed my ankle, trying to force the pain down. 

Slowly, the red faded, then vanished, leaving only the pain. 

My hand suddenly felt wet. 

Blood? 

I glanced down to see Wolf licking my hand. Fierce licking, as if 
trying to cure me, trying to make everything okay again. 

Despite the pain, I laughed. “It’s okay, boy,” I said. “I’m okay.” 

He kept licking my hand until I climbed to my feet. I felt a little dizzy. 
My legs were shaky. 

I tried putting weight on the foot that had been bitten. 

It felt a little better. 

I took a step, limping. Then another. 

“Let’s go, Wolf,” I said. He gazed up at me sympathetically. 

I knew I had to get home quickly. If the snake was poisonous, I was in 
big trouble. I had no way of knowing how much time I had before the 
venom would paralyze me completely—or worse. 

Wolf stayed by my side as I limped over the soft ground toward home. 
I was gasping for breath. My chest felt tight. The ground swayed beneath 
me. 

Was it because of the snake venom? Or was it just because I was so 
frightened? 

Pain shot up my side with every step I took. 

But I kept pulling myself along, talking to Wolf all the while, ignoring 
the throbbing ache of my ankle. 

“We’re almost there, Wolf,” I said, panting loudly. “Almost there, 
boy.” 



The dog sensed that something was seriously wrong. He stayed by my 
side instead of running his usual zigzag patterns in front of me and behind 
me. 

The end of the trees came into view. I could see bright sunlight just 
beyond the swamp. 

“Hey—” a voice called to me. I saw Will and Cassie waiting for me on 
the flat grass. 

They began running toward me. “Are you okay?” Cassie called. 

“No. I... I got bit!” I managed to choke out. “Please—go get my dad!” 

They both took off, running full speed to my house. I dropped down on 
the grass, spreading my legs straight out, and waited. 

I tried to stay calm, but it was impossible. 

Was the snake poisonous? Was the venom heading straight to my 
heart? Was I about to die any second? 

I reached down with both hands and carefully, carefully, pulled off my 
mud-covered sneaker. Then, moving it a tiny bit at a time, I lowered my 
white sock down over the ankle and off my foot. 

The ankle was a little swollen. The skin was red except for a white, 
puckered spot around the bite. Inside that spot, I saw two small puncture 
marks, bright red droplets of blood oozing from each hole. 

When I raised my eyes from the wound, I saw my dad, dressed in 
brown shorts and a white T-shirt, hurrying along the flat grass toward me, 
followed closely by Will and Cassie. 

“What happened?” I heard my dad ask them. “What happened to 
Grady?” 

“He was bitten by a werewolf!” I heard Cassie reply. 


* * * 


“Keep the ice pack on it,” Dad instructed. “The swelling will go down.” 

I groaned and held the ice pack against my ankle. 

Mom tsk-tsked from the kitchen table. She had a newspaper spread out 
in front of her. I couldn’t tell if she was tsk-tsking over me or over the day’s 
news. 

Outside the screen door I could see Wolf, on his side on the grass just 
past the back stoop, sound asleep. Emily was in the front room, watching 



some soap on TV. 

“How does it feel?” Mom asked. 

“A lot better,” I told her. “I think I was mainly scared.” 

“Green snakes aren’t poisonous,” Dad reminded me for the tenth time. 
“But I took every precaution, just in case. We’ll wrap it up really good 
when you’re through putting ice on it.” 

“What was all that talk about werewolves?” Mom asked. 

“Cassie has werewolves on the brain,” I said. “She thinks the swamp 
hermit is a werewolf.” 

“She seems like a sweet girl,” Mom said quietly. “I had a nice talk 
with her while your father was taking care of your bite. You’re lucky, 
Grady, to find two kids your age out here on the edge of a swamp.” 

“Yeah, I guess,” I replied, shifting the ice pack on the ankle. “But she 
was driving Will and me nuts with all her werewolf talk.” 

Dad was washing his hands in the kitchen sink. He dried them on a 
dish towel, then turned to me. “That old swamp hermit is supposed to be 
harmless,” he said. “At least, that’s what everyone says.” 

“Well, he gave us a real scare,” I told him. “He chased us through the 
swamp, shouting, T’m the werewolf!”’ 

“Weird,” Dad replied thoughtfully. He tossed the dish towel onto the 
counter. 

“You should stay away from him,” Mom said, looking up from the 
newspaper. 

“Do you believe in werewolves?” I asked. 

Dad snickered. “Your mom and I are scientists, Grady. We’re not 
supposed to believe in supernatural things like werewolves.” 

“Your father is a werewolf,” Mom joked. “I have to shave his back 
every morning so he’ll look human.” 

“Ha-ha,” I said sarcastically. “I’m serious. I mean, haven’t you heard 
the weird howls at night?” 

“Lots of creatures howl,” Mom replied. “I’ll bet you howled when that 
snake bit your ankle!” 

“Can’t you be serious?” I cried shrilly. “You know, the howls didn’t 
start until it was a full moon.” 

“I remember. The howls didn’t start until that dog showed up!” Emily 
called from the front room. 



“Emily, give me a break!” I shouted. 

“Your dog is a werewolf!” Emily called. 

“Enough werewolf talk,” Mom muttered. “Look. I’ve got hair growing 
on my palms!” She held up her hands. 

“That’s just ink off the newspaper,” Dad said. He turned to me. “See? 
There’s a scientific explanation for everything.” 

“I really would like to be taken seriously,” I said through clenched 
teeth. 

“Well...” Dad glanced outside. Wolf had rolled onto his back and was 
sleeping with all four legs up in the air. “The moon will look full for only 
two more nights,” Dad told me. “Tonight and tomorrow night. If the howls 
stop after tomorrow night, we’ll know it was a werewolf, howling at the full 
moon.” 

Dad chuckled. He thought it was all a big joke. 

We had no idea that something was about to happen that night that 
might change his opinion about werewolves—forever. 



24 


Will and Cassie came over after dinner. Mom and Dad were still loading 
dishes into the dishwasher and cleaning up. Emily had hurried into town to 
go to the only movie playing. 

I was walking around pretty well. The ankle barely hurt at all. Dad’s a 
pretty good doctor, I guess. 

The three of us settled in the front room, and we instantly got into an 
argument about werewolves. 

Cassie insisted that the swamp hermit wasn’t kidding, that he really 
was a werewolf. 

Will told her she was a complete jerk. “He only chased us because he 
heard you call him a werewolf,” he told Cassie angrily. 

“Why do you think he lives by himself way deep in the swamp?” 
Cassie demanded of Will. “Because he knows what happens to him when 
the moon is full, and he doesn’t want anyone else to know it!” 

“Then why did he scream to us that he was a werewolf this 
afternoon?” Will asked impatiently. “Because he was just joking, that’s 
why.” 

“Come on, guys. Let’s change the subject,” I said. “My parents are 
both scientists, and they say there’s no proof that werewolves exist.” 

“That’s what scientists always say,” Cassie insisted. 

“They’re right,” Will said. “There are no werewolves except in 
movies. You’re a real jerk, Cassie.” 

“You’re a jerk!” Cassie shouted back. 

I could see they’d had fights like this before. “Let’s play a game or 
something,” I suggested. “Want to play some Nintendo? It’s in my room.” 

“Mr. Warner still hasn’t shown up,” Cassie told Will, ignoring me. She 
tugged at her red ponytail, then tossed it behind her head. “You know why? 
Because he was murdered by the werewolf!” 

“Don’t be stupid,” Will said. “How do you know?” 

“Maybe you ’re the werewolf!” I told Cassie. 

Will laughed. “Yeah. That’s why you’re such an expert, Cassie.” 

“Oh, shut up,” Cassie grumbled. “You look more like a werewolf than 



me, Will!” 

“You look like a vampirel” he told her. 

“Well, you look like King Kong!” she cried. 

“What are you kids talking about?” Mom interrupted, poking her head 
into the room. 

“Just talking about movies and things,” I replied quickly. 

I couldn’t get to sleep that night. I kept rolling onto one side, then the other. 
I couldn’t get comfortable. 

I kept listening for the howls. 

A strong wind had come up from the Gulf. I could hear it rushing past 
our small house. It rattled the wire mesh of the deer pen out back. It made a 
constant ssshhhhhh sound, and I strained to hear the familiar howls. 

I had just about drifted off to sleep when the howls began. 

Instantly alert, I jumped to my feet. My left ankle ached as I stepped 
down on it. 

Another howl. Far off. Barely carrying over the steady rush of the 
wind. 

I limped to my bedroom window. The ankle had stiffened up a bit 
while I was lying in bed. I pressed my face against the glass and peered out. 

The full moon, gray as a skull, hovered low in the charcoal sky. The 
dewy grass gleamed under its blanket of pale light. 

A burst of wind rattled my window. 

Startled, I pulled back. And listened. 

Another howl. Closer. 

This one sent a cold shudder down my back. 

It sounded really close. Or was the wind carrying it from the swamp? 

I squinted out the window. Swirls of wind made the grass sway from 
one side to the other. The ground appeared to be spinning, glowing in the 
pale moonlight as it twirled. 

Another howl. Even closer. 

I couldn’t see anything. I had to know who or what was making that 
terrifying sound. 

I pulled my jeans on over my pajama bottoms. Struggling in the dark, I 
managed to slide my feet into a pair of flip-flops. 

I started out of my room, but stopped short when I heard a banging. A 



loud crash. A pounding. A harsh thud. 

Right outside. 

Right outside my house. 

My heart pounding, I ran through the dark hallway. My ankle ached, 
but I ignored it. 

I hurried through the kitchen, unlocked the back door, and pulled it 
open. A strong gust of wind pushed me back as I opened the screen door. 

The wind was hot and wet. Another strong gust pushed me back. 

The wind is trying to keep me inside, I thought. Trying to keep me 
from solving the mystery of the terrifying howls. 

I lowered my head against the driving gusts and leapt down off the 
stoop. 

“Ow!” I cried out as pain shot up my leg. 

Waiting for my eyes to adjust to the dim light, I listened hard. 

No howls now. Just the shrill, steady rush of wind, pushing, pushing 
me back against the house. 

The back yard glowed in the moonlight. Everything was silver and 

gray. 

And silent. 

I searched the back yard, my eyes sweeping slowly across the shifting 
grass. Empty. 

But what had caused all the commotion I’d heard in my room? The 
banging? The loud thuds ? The rattling sounds? 

Why had the howls stopped when I came outside? 

What a mystery, I thought. What a strange mystery. 

The wind swirled around me. My face was dripping wet from the 
heavy dampness of the air. 

Feeling defeated, I turned back toward the house. 

And uttered a shocked cry when I saw that the werewolf had murdered 
again. 



25 


I took a step through the swirling wind toward the deer pen. 

“Dad!” I called. But my voice came out a hushed whisper. “Dad!” I 
tried to shout, but my throat was too dry and choked with fear. 

Staring straight ahead, I took another step. I could see it all clearly 
now. A scene of death. Pale light and shadows. The only sounds were the 
pounding of my heart, the swell of the wind, and the rattling of the wire 
mesh of the pen. 

I took another step closer. “Dad? Dad?” I cried out without thinking, 
without hearing myself, knowing he couldn’t hear. 

But I wanted him to be there. I wanted someone to be there with me. I 
didn’t want to be all alone out there in the back yard. 

I didn’t want to be staring at the hole that had been ripped in the side 
of the pen. I didn’t want to see the murdered deer lying so pitifully on its 
side. 

The five remaining deer huddled together at the other end of the pen. 
Their eyes were on me. Frightened eyes. 

The wind swept around me, hot and wet. But I felt cold all over. A cold 
shudder of terror ran down my body. I swallowed hard. Once. Twice. 
Trying to choke down the heavy lump in my throat. 

Then, before I even realized what I was doing, I began running to the 
house, screaming, “Dad! Mom! Dad! Mom!” at the top of my lungs. 

My cries rose on the gusting wind like the terrifying howls I’d heard 
just a few moments before. 

His pajama shirt flapping over the jeans he had pulled on, Dad dragged the 
dead deer to the back of the yard. Then, as I watched from the kitchen 
window, he patched the deer pen with a large sheet of box cardboard. 

As he tried to return to the house, the strong winds nearly blew the 
screen door off its hinges. Dad jerked the door shut, then locked it. 

His face was dripping with perspiration. He had mud down the side of 
one pajama sleeve. 

Mom poured him a glass of water from the sink, and he drank it down 



without taking a breath. Then he wiped the sweat from his forehead with a 
dish towel. 

Tm afraid your dog is a killer,” he said softly to me. He tossed the 
towel back onto the counter. 

“It wasn’t Wolf!” I cried. “It wasn’t!” 

Dad didn’t reply. He took a deep breath, then let it out slowly. Mom 
and Emily watched silently from in front of the sink. 

“What makes you think it was Wolf?” I demanded. 

“I saw the prints on the ground,” he replied, frowning. “Paw prints.” 

“It wasn’t Wolf,” I insisted. 

“I’m going to have to take him to the pound in the morning,” Dad said. 
“The one over in the next county.” 

“But they’ll kill him!” I cried. 

“The dog is a killer,” Dad insisted softly. “I know how you feel, Grady. 
I know. But the dog is a killer.” 

“It wasn’t Wolf,” I cried. “Dad, I know it wasn’t Wolf. I heard the 
howls, Dad. It was a wolf.” 

“Grady, please—” he started wearily. 

Then the words just burst out of me. I lost all control of them. They 
just poured out in a flood. “It was a werewolf, Dad. There’s a werewolf in 
the swamp. Cassie is right. It wasn’t a dog, and it wasn’t a wolf. It’s a 
werewolf who’s been killing animals, who killed your deer.” 

“Grady, stop—” Dad pleaded impatiently. 

But I couldn’t stop. “I know I’m right, Dad,” I cried in a shrill voice 
that didn’t sound like me. 

“It’s been a full moon this week, right? And that’s when the howls 
began. It’s a werewolf, Dad. The swamp hermit. That crazy guy who lives 
in the shack in the swamp. He’s a werewolf. He told us he is. He chased us 
and he told us he’s a werewolf. He did it, Dad. Not Wolf. He killed the deer 
tonight. I heard him howling outside, and then—then—” 

My voice caught in my throat. I started to choke. 

Dad filled the glass with water and handed it to me. I gulped it down 
thirstily. 

He put a hand on my shoulder. “Grady, let’s talk about it in the 
morning, okay? We’re both too tired to think straight now. What do you 
say?” 



“It wasn’t Wolf!” I cried stubbornly. “I know it wasn’t.” 

“In the morning,” Dad repeated, his hand still on my shoulder. He held 
it there to comfort me, to steady me. 

I felt shaky. I was panting. My heart pounded. 

“Yeah. Okay,” I agreed finally. “In the morning.” 

I made my way slowly to my room, but I knew I wouldn’t sleep. 

The next morning, Dad was gone when I got up. “He went to the lumber 
yard,” Mom told me, “to get wire mesh to repair the pen.” 

I yawned and stretched. I had fallen into a restless sleep at about two- 
thirty. But I still felt tired and nervous. 

“Is Wolf out there?” I asked anxiously. I ran to the kitchen window 
before she could reply. 

I could see Wolf at the head of the driveway. He had a blue mbber ball 
between his front paws, and he was chewing at it furiously. 

“Bet he’s hungry for breakfast,” I muttered. 

I heard the crunch of gravel, and Dad’s car pulled up the drive. The 
trunk was opened partway, a roll of wire mesh bulging inside. 

“Morning,” Dad said as he came into the kitchen. His expression was 
grim. 

“Are you going to take Wolf?” I demanded immediately. My eyes 
were on the dog, chewing on the rubber ball outside. He looked so cute. 

“People in town are upset,” Dad replied, pouring himself a cup of 
coffee from the coffeemaker. “A lot of animals have been killed this week. 
And a guy who lives down the way, Ed Warner, has disappeared in the 
swamp. People are very worried. They’ve heard the howls, too.” 

“Are you taking Wolf away?” I repeated shrilly, my voice trembling. 

Dad nodded. His expression remained grim. He took a long sip of 
coffee. “Go look at the paw prints outside the pen, Grady,” he said, locking 
his eyes on mine. “Go ahead. Take a look.” 

“I don’t care about prints,” I moaned. “I just know—” 

“I can’t take any more chances,” Dad said. 

“I don’t care! He’s my dog!” I screamed. 

“Grady—” Dad set down the cup and started toward me. 

But I burst past him and ran to the door. Pushing open the screen door, 
I leapt off the back stoop. 

Wolf stood up as soon as he saw me. His tail started to wag. Leaving 
the blue rubber ball behind, he began loping toward me eagerly. 

Dad was right behind me. “I’m going to take the dog away now, 
Grady,” he said. “Do you want to come along?” 

“No!” I cried. 

“I have no choice,” Dad said, his voice just above a whisper. He 
stepped forward and reached for Wolf. 

“No!” I shouted. “No! Run, Wolf! Run!” 

I gave the dog a shove. Wolf turned to me uncertainly. 

“Run!” I screamed. “Run! Run!” 

26 

I gave Wolf another hard shove. “Run! Run, boy! Go!” 

Dad had his hands around Wolf’s shoulders, but he didn’t have a good 

grip. 

Wolf broke free and started to run toward the swamp. 

“Hey—!” Dad called angrily. He chased Wolf to the end of the back 
yard. But the big dog was too fast for him. 

I stood behind the house, breathing hard, and watched Wolf until he 
disappeared into the low trees at the edge of the swamp. 

Dad turned back toward me, an angry expression on his face. “That 
was dumb, Grady,” he muttered. 

I didn’t say anything. 

“Wolf will come back later,” Dad said. “When he does, I’ll have to 
take him away.” 

“But, Dad—” I started. 

“No more discussion,” he said sternly. “As soon as the dog returns, 
I’m taking him to the pound.” 

“You can’tl” I screamed. 

“The dog is a killer, Grady. I have no choice.” Dad headed toward the 
car. “Come help me unload this wire mesh. I’ll need your help getting the 
pen patched up.” 

I gazed toward the swamp as I followed Dad to the car. Don’t come 
back, Wolf, I pleaded silently. Please, don ’t come back. 

All day long, I watched the swamp. I felt nervous, shaky. I had no appetite 
at all. After I helped Dad repair the deer pen, I stayed in my room. I tried to 
read a book, but the words were just a blur. 

By evening, Wolf hadn’t returned. 

You’re safe, Wolf, I thought. At least for today. 

My whole family was tense. At dinner, we hardly spoke. Emily talked 
about the movie she had seen the night before, but no one joined in with 
any comments. 

I went to bed early. I was really tired. From tension, I guess. And from 

being up most of the night before. 

My room was darker than usual. It was the last night of the full moon, 
but heavy blankets of clouds covered the moonlight. 

I settled my head onto my pillow and tried to get to sleep. But I kept 
thinking about Wolf. 

The howls started a short while later. 

I crept out of bed and hurried to the window. I squinted out into the 
darkness. Heavy, black clouds still covered the moon. The air was still. 
Nothing moved. 

I heard a low growl, and Wolf came into focus. 

He was standing stiffly in the middle of the back yard, his head tilted 
up to the sky, uttering low growls. As I stared out the window at him, the 
big dog began to pace, back and forth from one side of the yard to the other. 

He’s pacing like a caged animal, I thought. Pacing and growling, as if 
something is really troubling him. 

Or scaring him. 

As he paced, he kept raising his head toward the full moon behind the 
clouds and growling. 

What is going on? I wondered. I had to find out. 

I got dressed quickly in the darkness, pulling on the jeans and T-shirt I 
had worn all day. 

I fumbled into my sneakers. At first I had the left one on the right foot. 
It was so dark in my room without the moonlight pouring in! 

As soon as my sneakers were tied, I hurried back to the window. Wolf 
was leaving the back yard, I saw. He was lumbering slowly in the direction 
of the swamp. 

I’m going to follow Wolf, I decided. I’m going to prove once and for 
all that he isn’t a killer—or a werewolf. 

I was afraid my parents might hear me if I went to the kitchen door. So 
I crawled out my window. 

The grass was wet from a heavy dew. The air was wet, too, and nearly 
as hot as during the day. My sneakers squeaked and slid on the damp grass 
as I hurried to follow Wolf. 

I stopped at the end of the back yard. I’d lost him. 

I could still hear him somewhere up ahead. I could hear the soft thud 
of his paws on the marshy ground. 

But it was too dark to see him. 

I followed the sound of his footsteps, gazing up at the shifting, 
shadowy clouds. 

I was nearly to the swamp when I heard footsteps behind me. 

With a gasp of fright, I stopped and listened hard. 

Yes. Footsteps. 

Moving rapidly toward me. 

27 

“Hey!” 

I let out a choked cry and spun around. 

At first, all I could see was blackness. “Hey—who’s there?” My voice 
came out in a hushed whisper. 

Will stepped out from the darkness. “Grady—it’s you!” he cried. He 
came closer. He was wearing a dark sweatshirt over black jeans. 

“Will—what are you doing out here?” I asked breathlessly. 

“I heard the howls,” he replied. “I decided to investigate.” 

“Me, too. I’m so glad to see you!” I exclaimed. “We can explore 
together.” 

“I’m glad to see you, too,” he said. “It was so dark, I—I didn’t know it 
was you. I thought—” 

“I’m following Wolf,” I told him. I led the way into the swamp. It 
grew even darker as we made our way under the low trees. 

As we walked, I told Will about the night before, about the murdered 
deer, the paw prints around the deer pen. I told him about how people in 
town were talking. And about how my dad planned to take Wolf away to 
the pound. 

“I know Wolf isn’t the killer,” I told him. “I just know it. But Cassie 
got me so scared with all her werewolf stories, and—” 

“Cassie is a jerk,” Will muttered. He pointed into the weeds. “Look— 
there’s Wolf!” 

I could see his black outline moving steadily through the heavy 
darkness. “I was so stupid. I should have brought a flashlight,” I murmured. 

Wolf disappeared behind the weeds. Will and I followed the sound of 
his footsteps. We walked for several minutes. Suddenly, I realized I could 
no longer hear the dog. 

“Where’s Wolf?” I whispered, my eyes searching the dark bushes and 
low trees. “I don’t want to lose him.” 

“He went this way,” Will called back to me. “Follow me.” 

Our sneakers slid over the damp, marshy ground. I slapped at a 
mosquito on the back of my neck. Too late. I could feel warm blood. 

Deeper into the swamp. Past the bog, eerily silent now. 

“Hey, Will?” 

I stopped—and searched. “Oh.” A soft cry escaped my lips as I 
realized I had lost him. 

Somehow we had gotten separated. 

I heard rustling up ahead. The crack of twigs. The whispering brush of 
weeds being stepped on and pushed out of the way. 

“Will? Is that you?” 

Or was it Wolf? 

“Will?” 

“Where are you?” 

Pale light suddenly washed over me, washed slowly over the ground. 
Glancing up, I saw the heavy clouds pull away. The yellow full moon 
hovered high in the sky. 

As the light slowly swept over the swamp, a low structure came into 
view straight ahead of me. 

At first, I couldn’t figure out what it was. Some kind of gigantic plant? 

No. 

As the moonlight shone down, I realized I was staring at the swamp 
hermit’s shack. 

I stopped, frozen in sudden fear. 

And then the howls began. 

The frightening sound tore through the heavy silence. A horrifying 
wail, so loud, so nearby, rose on the still air, rose and then fell. 

The sound was so terrifying, I raised my hands to cover my ears. 

The swamp hermit! I thought. He is a werewolf! 

I knew he was the werewolf. 

I’ve got to get away from here, I realized. I’ve got to get home. 

I turned away from the small shack. 

My legs were trembling so hard, I didn’t know if I could walk. 

Got to go! Got to go! Got to go! The words repeated in my mind. 

But before I could move, the werewolf burst out from behind a tree— 
and, howling its hideous howl, leapt onto my shoulders and shoved me to 
the ground. 

28 

As the yellow light of the full moon shone down, I gazed into the face of the werewolf as it pinned me to the ground. 

Its dark eyes glared out at me from a human face, a human face covered in wolf fur. It howled its rage, its animal snout opening wide to reveal two gleaming rows of wolf fangs. 

It’s a human wolf! I realized to my terror. A werewolf! 

“Get off!” I shrieked. “Will—get off me!” 

It was Will. The werewolf was Will. 

Even through the thick, matted wolf fur, I could recognize his dark features, his small, black eyes, his thick, stubby neck. 

“Will—!” I screamed. 

I struggled to push him away, to squirm out from under. 

But he was too powerful. I couldn’t move. 

“Will —get off!” 

He raised his fur-covered face to the moon and uttered an animal howl. Then, snarling out his rage, he lowered his beastly head and dug his fangs into my shoulder. 

I let out a shriek of pain. 

Blinding flashes of red filled my eyes. 

I thrust out my hands, kicked my legs—struggled blindly to free myself. 

But he had animal strength. He was much too strong for me... too strong... . 

The flashing red faded, turned to black. Everything was fading to black. I could feel myself sinking, sinking down a black tunnel, sinking forever into deep, deep, endlessly deep darkness. 

A loud growl brought me back. 

Bewildered, I gazed up to see Wolf leap onto Will. 

Will uttered a shrill howl of anger and turned to wrestle with the snarling dog. 

I watched in stunned disbelief as they scrabbled over the ground, biting and clawing, raging at each other, growling and grunting. 

“Will... Will, it was you... it was you all along....” I murmured, struggling to my feet. 

I gripped a tree trunk. The ground appeared to be sliding beneath me. 

The two creatures continued to battle, grunting and growling as they clawed at each other, wrestling over the wet ground. 

“I knew it wasn’t Wolf,” I muttered aloud. “I knew...” 

And then a deafening high-pitched shriek startled me, and I tumbled to my knees. 

I looked up in time to see Will running away, fleeing on all fours through the tall weeds. Wolf followed close behind, snapping at Will’s ankles, jumping on him, biting and clawing him as they ran. 

Then, I heard Will utter another cry of pain, a wail of defeat. 

As the anguished sound faded, I sank down, down, down into the blue- black darkness. 

29 

“You have a slight fever,” Mom said. “But you’ll be okay.” 

“Swamp fever,” I murmured weakly. I gazed up at her, trying to focus. Her face was blurred, hovering over me in the soft light. 

It took me a long while to realize I was in my own bedroom. “How— how did I get here?” I stammered. 

“The swamp hermit—he found you in the swamp and carried you home,” Mom said. 

“He did?” I tried to sit up, but my shoulder ached. To my surprise, it was tightly bandaged. “The—the werewolf—Will—he bit me,” I said, swallowing hard. 

Dad’s face, hovered beside Mom’s. “What are you saying, Grady? Why do you keep muttering about a werewolf?” 

I pulled myself up a little and told them the whole story. They listened in silence, glancing at each other from time to time as I talked. 

“Will is a werewolf,” I concluded. “He changed. Under the full moon. He changed into a wolf, and—” 

“I’m going to check this out right now,” Dad said, staring intently down at me. “Your story is crazy, Grady. Just crazy. Maybe it’s the fever. I don’t know. But I’m going right over to your friend’s house and see what’s what.” 

“Dad—be careful,” I called after him. “Be careful.” 

Dad returned a short while later, a bewildered look on his face. I was sitting in the living room, feeling a lot better, a big bowl of popcorn in my lap. 

“There’s no one there,” Dad said, scratching his head. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” Mom asked. 

“The house is empty,” Dad told us. “Deserted. It doesn’t look like anyone has lived there in months! ” 

“Wow, Grady. You certainly have strange friends!” Emily exclaimed, rolling her eyes. 

“I don’t get it,” Dad said, shaking his head. 

I didn’t, either. But I didn’t care. Will was gone. The werewolf was gone for good. 

“So can I keep Wolf?” I asked Dad, climbing up from the chair and crossing the room to him. “Wolf saved my life. Can I keep him?” 

Dad stared back at me thoughtfully, but didn’t reply. 

“The swamp hermit told us he saw the dog chase some kind of animal away from Grady,” Mom said. 

“Probably a squirrel,” Emily joked. 

“Emily, give me a break,” I groaned. “Wolf really saved my life,” I told them. 

“I guess you can keep him,” Dad said reluctantly. 

“YAY!” I thanked him and eagerly made my way to the back yard to give Wolf a happy hug. 

That all happened nearly a month ago. 

Since then, Wolf and I have had a wonderful time exploring the swamp. I’ve gotten to know just about every inch of Fever Swamp. It’s like my second home. 

Sometimes Wolf and I let Cassie come along exploring with us. She’s kind of fun, even though she’s always on the lookout for werewolves. I really wish she’d just drop the subject. 

I’m standing at my bedroom window now, watching the full moon rising over the distant trees. This first full moon in a month makes me think of Will. 

Will may be gone, but he changed my life. I know I’ll never forget him. 

I can feel the fur sprouting on my face. My snout is expanding, and my fangs are sliding out between my dark lips. 

Yes, when he bit me, Will passed the curse on to me. But I don’t mind. I’m not upset. 

I mean, with Will out of the way, the swamp is now mine! All mine! 

I’m climbing out of my window now. There’s Wolf waiting for me, eager to do some night exploring. 

I drop easily to the ground on all fours. I raise my fur-covered face to the moon and utter a long, joyful howl. 

Let’s go, Wolf. Let’s hurry to Fever Swamp. 

I’m ready to hunt. 


YOU CAN’T SCARE ME! 

1 

The day we decided to scare Courtney was the day of our class field trip. 

Mr. Melvin, our teacher, and Ms. Prince, the other sixth-grade teacher, stood counting us as we boarded the yellow school bus. 

Courtney was first in line, of course. Courtney makes sure she is always first in line. Her friend Denise boarded right behind her. 

It was a gray day. Dark storm clouds rolled overhead, blocking the sun. The guy on the radio said there was a ninety percent chance of rain. 

I didn’t care. I was happy to be getting out of school. 

I pushed my friend Hat into the kid in front of him. His real name is Herbie, but everyone calls him Hat. That’s because no one has ever seen him without a baseball cap on his head. I’ve known Hat since fourth grade, and I don’t think I’ve ever seen his hair. 

The kid in front spun around and shoved Hat back at me. 

“Hey—give me a break!” Hat shouted. He slugged me hard on the shoulder. “You made me swallow my gum, Eddie.” 

“Hey, guys, be cool,” Mr. Melvin said, frowning at us. He’s the kind of teacher who always says things like “be cool” and tries to act like he’s our friend. But he’s a pretty good teacher, anyway. 

And he takes us on a lot of field trips, which is cool. 

“Why are we going to a forest?” Hat grumbled, slipping another piece of bubble gum into his mouth. “What are we supposed to look for?” 

“Trees, I guess,” I replied. I didn’t remember why we were going to Greene Forest. I just remembered we were supposed to take notes. 

“Eddie, want some bubble gum?” 

I turned around to see my friend Charlene right behind me in line. She and my other friend Molly had big gobs of grape gum in their mouths and were chewing hard. 

“Molly, how can you chew that stuff with braces?” I asked. 

She opened her mouth in a wide grin, showing me her teeth. “It doesn’t stick too much,” she said. 

Molly’s braces are red and blue. She’s always showing them off. I don’t know why. 

Molly and Charlene look so much alike, almost like sisters. They both have short brown hair and brown eyes. They’re both about my height, five two. They both wear faded jeans and big, oversized T-shirts all the time. The only difference between Molly and Charlene is that Molly wears glasses and has braces, and Charlene doesn’t. 

“I’ll protect you two in the deep, dark forest,” I teased. “You know. In case you’re attacked by fleas or something.” 

“Eddie’s a real macho guy,” Hat said, grinning. “He’s real brave.” He punched my shoulder. Hard. 

I pretended it didn’t hurt. 

“You both have fleas,” Charlene said. 

“We’ll protect you, Eddie,” Molly offered. “There might be some vicious worms there!” 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene burst out laughing. Molly was teasing me about the time the four of us went fishing at Muddy Creek, and I had a little trouble putting a worm on my hook. 

“I wasn’t afraid of that worm!” I cried angrily. “It was just yucky, that’s all.” 

I scowled at Molly, but I wasn’t really angry. I’m used to being teased. Kids always make fun of my freckles and my red hair. And my older brother, Kevin, calls me Bugs. He says I look just like Bugs Bunny because my two front teeth stick out. 

“What’s up, doc? What’s up, doc?” That’s all Kevin ever says to me. He and his high school pals think it’s a riot. 

I climbed onto the bus and scrambled past Hat to get a window seat. Courtney and Denise had taken the front seat, of course. Courtney was brushing her long, blonde hair, using the bus window as a mirror. Denise was writing something in her notebook. 

Hat slammed into me, and I stumbled down the aisle. He quickly slid into the seat and moved to the window. “Hey—no fair!” I shouted. 

He giggled his high-pitched giggle and grinned at me. Hat is my best pal, but I have to admit he’s sort of goofy-looking. I mean, he’s always grinning, sort of like Dopey in Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs. And he has really big ears that bend down beneath his baseball cap, sort of doubled over. 

He’s a good guy. He really makes Molly, Charlene, and me laugh all the time. 

“I get the window going back,” I said, slumping down beside Hat. Charlene messed up my hair as she walked past. 

“Why do they call it Greene Forest?” Hat asked, pressing his nose against the window, watching it steam up from his breath. “Why not Blue Forest or Red Forest?” 

“A guy named Greene used to own it,” I told him. “He gave the land to the city when he died.” 

“I knew that,” Hat said. What a liar. 

I spun his cap around till it was backwards. He really hates that. But he deserved it for grabbing the window seat. 

A few minutes later, the bus was bouncing toward Greene Forest. A few minutes after that, we were piling out of the bus, staring at the tall trees that reached up to the dark, cloudy sky. 

“Make two columns on your work sheet,” Ms. Prince was telling everyone. “One for wildlife and one for plantlife.” 

“I’m putting you down as plantlife,” I told Charlene. 

She stuck her tongue out at me with the big, purple blob of bubble gum on the tip. Hat slapped her on the back really hard, and the wad of bubble gum went flying. 

Charlene cried out angrily and tried to slug him, but Hat backed away to safety. He was too fast for her. 

The teachers divided us into groups, and we began to explore the forest. We followed a narrow dirt path that twisted through the trees. 

It was cooler in the forest, and dark. I wished the sun would come out. 

“What’s that green stuff on that tree?” Hat asked me, pointing. “Is that moss? Is moss wildlife or plantlife?” 

“You should know,” I told him. “You have it growing on your back!” 

Molly and Charlene laughed, but Hat didn’t. “Can’t you ever be serious?” He scribbled something on his work sheet. 

I glanced down at mine. I hadn’t written anything yet. I mean, I’d only seen a bunch of trees and some weeds. Who cared about writing that down? 

“The creatures are hiding,” Ms. Prince was telling the group of kids ahead of us. “Search for their hiding places. Look for holes in the ground and in trees. Look for hidden nests.” 

I gazed up at the trees above my head. The leaves were too thick to see any nests. I was about to tell Hat he should look under some rocks because that’s where he came from. But before I could, I heard a hushed cry behind us. 

“Ssshhh! Look! A deer!” 

We all turned back to see who had called out. Of course it was Courtney. Who else would be the first to spot a deer? 

She and Denise were frozen like statues, staring into a narrow space between the trees. Courtney kept raising her finger to her lips, signaling for everyone to be silent. 

Hat, Molly, Charlene, and I went running over to see the deer. “I don’t see anything,” I said, squinting hard into the trees. 

“It ran away,” Courtney told me. 

“You missed it,” Denise added. I watched her write deer on her work sheet under wildlife. She already had four other creatures on her list. I didn’t have any. 

“Did you see the sleeping bat?” Courtney asked me. 

“Bat?” I don’t like bats. They’re so ugly. And what if one bites you? 

“It was hanging on that tree,” Courtney said, pointing behind us. “How could you miss it?” 

I shrugged. 

“There’s a birch tree,” Denise told Courtney. “And there’s a weeping beech tree. Add them to the list.” 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene had moved on along the trail, and I hurried to catch up to them. Courtney and Denise were working too hard, in my opinion. Field trips are supposed to be for goofing and having fun away from school. 

We made our way slowly through the forest. After a while, the sun came out and sent shafts of yellow light down through the trees. 

I tried to push Hat into a huge patch of poison ivy. But he dodged away from me, and I went sprawling face down in the dirt. 

I was still brushing myself off when I saw the snake. 

Right beside my left sneaker. 

It was bright green, and big. 

I stopped breathing. I stared down at it. 

I had nearly stepped on it. 

As I stared helplessly, it arched its head, opened its jaws, and darted forward to bite my leg. 

I opened my mouth to scream, but no sound came out. 

2 


The snake dived toward me. I shut my eyes and waited for the stab of pain. 

“Ohh.” A low, frightened cry escaped my lips. 

I opened my eyes to see Courtney holding up the snake. “Courtney—I —I—” I stammered. 

“Eddie, you’re not scared of this, are you?” Courtney demanded, raising the snake to my face. Its black eyes stared up at me. It flicked its tongue. 

“It’s a harmless green snake, Eddie,” Courtney said. “You can’t be afraid of a green snake! ” 

I heard Denise snickering behind me. 

Courtney petted the snake, stroking it, letting it slide through her fingers. 

“Uh... I wasn’t really scared,” I muttered. But my voice trembled. I could tell Courtney didn’t believe me. 

“A harmless green snake,” she repeated. She set the snake down on the ground. 

I jumped back. I thought it was coming for me again. 

But it slid silently into the weeds. 

Hat laughed. A high-pitched, nervous laugh. 

Denise shook her head scornfully. 

“Add that to the list,” Courtney told her. “Green snake. That makes seven in the wildlife column.” 

“We should write down chicken,” Denise said, staring at me. “That would make eight.” 

“Cluck cluck,” I replied bitterly. I motioned for my friends to follow me, and we hurried up the path. We could hear Courtney and Denise both laughing. 

“Don’t feel bad,” Hat said to me, patting my shoulder. “Just because she made you look like a total jerk.” 

Molly laughed, but Charlene didn’t. “Courtney was just showing off,” Charlene said to me. “For a change.” 

“I wish that snake had bitten her perfect nose,” Molly added. “You know. Put a little dent in it.” 

“I really wasn’t afraid,” I insisted shrilly. “The snake surprised me, that’s all. I knew it was harmless.” 

“Yeah. Right,” Hat replied, rolling his beady little black eyes. I made a swipe at his cap but missed. 

“Coming through! Coming through!” Courtney called. She and Denise hurried past us, swinging their work sheets in one hand as they passed by. 

Denise turned and hissed at me like a snake. Courtney laughed. 

“I suppose they’ll be teasing me about the green snake for the next hundred years,” I said with a sigh. 

“We’ll all tease you about it for a hundred years,” Molly promised. 

I trudged unhappily along the path. Golden sunshine filtered down through the trees, but it didn’t brighten my spirits. A cute red-furred squirrel scampered across the path. I wasn’t interested. 

My day had been ruined. 

Ruined by Courtney and that stupid green snake. 

I could hear kids up ahead laughing about it. Every time I looked at Hat, he grinned at me as if to say, “You really blew it today, Eddie.” 

It’s not a big deal, I kept telling myself. So I got scared of a snake. And I had to be rescued by Courtney. So what? 

“Look out, Eddie. There’s a caterpillar. It might bite!” some kid called from a clump of tall weeds up ahead. 

“Give me a break!” I cried angrily. 

As I made my way along the path, the forest became a bright green blur to me. Other kids were busy adding to the lists on their work sheets. 

But I couldn’t see anything to add. The air became hot and damp. My T-shirt stuck to my back. Little white gnats flew around my face. 

I was really glad when the path ended and we stepped out near the parking lot. We had made a complete circle. The school bus stood at the edge of the grass, its door open invitingly. 

But no one was getting on the bus. 

To my surprise, I saw a big crowd of kids huddled in a circle several feet from the bus. They were standing silently, staring straight ahead. 

“What—what’s up?” I called to Charlene, who was hurrying toward the silent circle of kids. 

“It’s Courtney!” she called back. 

I began running, too. 

The kids were huddled so silently. No one moved. Had something terrible happened to Courtney? 

3 

What happened to her? Did she faint or something? Was she bitten by some kind of forest animal? 

I ran across the grass and pushed my way into the circle of kids. 

And I saw Courtney standing in the center of the circle, an excited smile on her face. 

I was wrong. Nothing terrible had happened to Courtney. 

She was showing off again. 

She had her hand raised and was showing everyone her open palm. Two enormous bumblebees were in her hand, walking across her palm. 

I sucked in my breath and stared along with the others. 

Courtney’s smile grew wider as her eyes landed on me. 

One of the bees had crossed her wrist and was walking down her arm. The other bee stood in the center of her palm. 

Mr. Melvin and Ms. Prince stood in the circle across from Courtney. They had admiring expressions on their faces. Mr. Melvin was smiling. Ms. Prince had her arms crossed tensely in front of her. She looked a little more worried than Mr. Melvin. 

“Bees will not sting you unless they are provoked,” Courtney said softly. 

“What do they feel like?” a kid asked. 

“They kind of tickle,” Courtney told him. 

Some kids hid their eyes. A few others groaned or shuddered. 

“Get rid of them!” someone urged. 

The bee crawled up Courtney’s arm toward the sleeve of her T-shirt. I wondered what she’d do if it crawled under her shirt. 

Would she panic then? 

Would she go totally nuts, screaming and thrashing her arms, trying to get it out? 

No. No way. Not Courtney. 

Cool, calm Courtney would never panic. 

The other bee walked slowly across her hand. 

“It tickles. It really does,” Courtney giggled. Her blonde hair gleamed in the sunlight. Her blue eyes twinkled excitedly. 

Come on, bee — sting! STING! I urged silently. 

I wondered if anyone else had the same secret wish. 

It was a mean thought, I admit. But Courtney was really asking for it. 

Come on—just one little sting! I begged, concentrating with all my might. 

The bee on her arm turned around when it reached the T-shirt sleeve and made its way back slowly toward Courtney’s elbow. 

“Bees are really very gentle,” Courtney said softly. 

Both bees were in her palm now. 

Courtney smiled at me. I felt a shiver go down my back. How does she do that? I wondered. 

I had to admit to myself that I was afraid of bees. I’d always been afraid of them, ever since I’d been stung when I was a little kid. 

“Would anyone else like to try this?” Courtney asked. 

Nervous laughter rose up from the circle. No one was crazy enough to volunteer. 

“Here, Eddie—catch!” Courtney cried. 

And before I could move or shout or duck or do anything —she pulled back her hand and tossed both bees at me! 

4 

I screamed and stepped back. 

I heard loud gasps all around. 

One of the bees hit my shoulder and dropped to the grass. 

The other bee fluttered onto the front of Hat’s shirt and stuck there. 

“Get it off! Get it off!” Hat screamed. He shook his shirt with both hands and did a wild, frightened dance. 

Some kids were screaming. But most everyone was laughing uproariously. 

I had my eye on the bee on the grass. It buzzed loudly off the ground and made a dive for my face. 

“Whoa!” I screamed and dropped to my knees, flailing my hands above my head. 

“I think it’s time to get back to school,” I heard Mr. Melvin say over the laughter of the other kids. 

Courtney flashed me a smug grin as I walked past her down the aisle on the bus. I kept my eyes straight ahead and walked faster, ignoring her. 

Some kids were making buzzing bee sounds. Others were hissing like snakes. Everyone thought it was a total riot that Hat and I had acted like such chickens. 

I slumped down into the very last seat with a sigh. Hat dropped beside me and pulled his cap down over his eyes. 

The seat stretched all the way across the back of the bus. Molly and Charlene joined us. Charlene was chewing her bubble gum furiously. Molly was trying to unstick her gum from her braces. 

None of us said a word until the bus pulled away. 

Then we started to grumble in low voices about Courtney and what a show-off she was. “She just thinks she’s the greatest,” Hat muttered unhappily. 

“She acts as if she isn’t afraid of anything,” Charlene said. “Like she’s Superwoman or something.” 

“Throwing those bees at Eddie was a mean joke,” Molly added, still struggling to unstick the gum from her braces. 

“She knows what a chicken Eddie is,” Hat said. “She knew he’d scream and carry on like a jerk.” 

“Well, so did you!” I cried, not meaning to sound so babyish. 

“Hey, I’m on your side!” Hat insisted, giving me a shove. 

I shoved him back. I was really angry. Mostly with myself, I guess. 

“There’s got to be something that Courtney is afraid of,” Charlene said thoughtfully. 

The bus stopped at a red light. I glanced out the window and saw that we were at the woods that led to Muddy Creek. “Maybe she’s afraid of the Mud Monsters,” I suggested. 

My three friends laughed bitterly. “No way,” Charlene said. “No one really believes in the Mud Monsters anymore. That’s a stupid old fairy tale. No way Courtney would be afraid of them.” 

There’s a legend in our town that the Mud Monsters live under the muddy banks of the creek. And sometimes when the moon is full, the Mud Monsters rise up from the creek bed, all dripping with mud, and look for victims to pull down in the mud with them. 

It’s a good story. I used to believe it when I was a little kid. My brother, Kevin, always took me into the woods there. He would tell me about the Mud Monsters rising up. Then he’d start to point and tremble and say that he saw them. I tried not to get scared. But I couldn’t help it. I always started screaming and running for my life! 

“Is your brother still making that movie about the Mud Monsters?” Hat asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. You should see the disgusting costumes he and his friends cooked up. They’re really gross.” 

Kevin and some of his friends were making a home video for one of their high school courses. It was a horror movie called The Mud Monsters of Muddy Creek. 

I begged him to let me be in it. But he said he couldn’t take the risk. “What if the real Mud Monsters rose up and came after you?” he asked, grinning at me. 

I tried to explain that I was too old, that he couldn’t scare me with that stuff anymore. But Kevin still wouldn’t let me be in the video. 

The bus started with a jolt. I glanced up to the front and saw Courtney and Denise staring back at me, laughing. 

I turned to my friends. “We’ve got to find a way to scare Courtney,” I said heatedly. “We’ve got to!” 

“Eddie’s right,” Hat quickly agreed. “We’ve got to find a way to scare Courtney and embarrass her in front of a whole bunch of kids. Otherwise, she’ll never let us forget today.” 

“But she’s so brave, so totally fearless,” Charlene said, shaking her head. “What could we possibly do to frighten her?” 

We all moaned quietly, shaking our heads, thinking hard. 

Then I saw an evil smile break across Molly’s face. She pushed her glasses up on her nose. Behind them, her brown eyes sparkled with excitement. “I think I have an idea,” she whispered. 

5 

“My brother has a disgusting rubber snake,” Molly whispered. Her excited grin grew wider. 

The four of us huddled together on the edge of the back seat. Every time the bus bounced, we nearly fell to the floor. 

“Courtney isn’t afraid of snakes,” Hat interrupted. “She likes to pet them. Remember?” 

“That was a stupid green snake,” Molly whispered. “My brother’s mbber snake is big and black. The mouth is open. It’s got these huge, pointy white fangs. It’s got a fierce expression on its face, and—” 

“Does it look real or does it look fake?” I asked. 

The bus hit a hard bump. We all bounced a foot straight up. 

“It looks real,” Molly replied, her eyes flashing behind her glasses. “And it feels warm and kind of sticky.” 

“Yuck!” Charlene exclaimed, making a face. 

“He’s scared me with it a dozen times,” Molly confessed. “It’s so real and disgusting, I’m fooled by it every time. Once when I reached under my pillow in the middle of the night and felt it there, I screamed for at least an hour. No one could get me to stop.” 

“Great!” Hat declared. 

I still had my doubts. “You really think it’ll make Courtney scream?” 

Molly nodded. “She’ll freak. She’ll totally freak. This rubber snake is ugly enough to scare a real snake!” 

We all laughed loudly. Some kids in the front turned to see what was so funny. I could see Courtney and Denise in the front seat, writing in their notebooks. They were probably copying their work sheet lists over. They both had to be perfect students in every way. 

“I can’t wait to scare Courtney,” I said as the bus pulled up to our school. “You sure you can get this snake from your brother, Molly?” 

Molly grinned at me. “I know which drawer he keeps it in. I’ll just borrow it.” 

“But what are we going to do with it?” Charlene demanded. “How are we going to scare Courtney with it? Where are we going to hide it?” 

“In her lunch bag, of course,” Molly replied. 

The four of us climbed off the bus with big smiles on our faces. 

* * * 

The lunch bags were kept on a low bookshelf in the back of our classroom. My class always eats lunch right in our classroom. Our school is very small so a cafeteria was never built. Courtney’s lunch was always easy to spot. It was the biggest one on the shelf. 

Her mother always packed her two sandwiches and two boxes of juice. Plus a bag of potato chips and an apple, some string cheese, and usually a fruit rollup or two. 

I don’t know why Courtney’s mom gave her such big lunches. There was no way Courtney could eat it all. She became a big hero at lunchtime because she shared a lot of it with kids who had crummy lunches. 

The next morning, I got to school a little late. The lunch bags were already spread out on the low shelf. I could see Courtney’s overstuffed brown paper bag at the end. 

I studied Courtney’s lunch bag as I set mine down at the other end. Had Molly succeeded in her mission? Had she stuffed the rubber snake into the bag? 

I couldn’t tell by looking at the bag. But I could tell by looking at Molly. Her face was bright red, and she kept darting nervous glances at me. 

Yes. 

Molly had succeeded. 

Now we just had to survive the three and a half hours until lunchtime. 

How would I be able to concentrate on anything? I kept turning around in my seat and glancing back at Courtney’s bulging lunch bag. 

I kept imagining what was about to happen. I pictured the wonderful scene again and again. I saw Courtney sitting across the table from Denise, as she always did. I saw her chattering away. I saw her reach into the brown paper bag.... 

I saw the horrified look on Courtney’s face. I imagined her scream. I imagined the snake popping up from the bag, its fangs bared, its eyes glowing like hot coals. 

I pictured Courtney shrieking in fright and everyone else laughing at her, making fun of her. I imagined myself walking over casually and picking up the snake. “Why, it’s only rubber, Courtney,” I’d say, holding it up high so everyone could see. “You shouldn’t be afraid of rubber snakes. They’re harmless. Perfectly harmless!” 

What a victory! 

All morning long, Hat, Molly, Charlene, and I kept grinning at each other, casting secret glances back and forth. I don’t think we heard a single word Mr. Melvin said. 

I couldn’t tell you what spelling words were written on the blackboard. And I couldn’t tell you what kind of math was on my review sheet. It was just a blur of numbers and squiggly signs to me. 

My three friends and I spent most of the morning staring eagerly at the clock. Finally, lunchtime rolled around. 

We hung back, all four of us. We waited at our tables and watched Courtney and Denise walk together to the back of the room to get their lunches. 

We watched Courtney bend down in front of the bookshelf. First she handed Denise’s lunch up to her. Then she picked up her own bag. 

The two of them made their way to the table where they always sat. They pulled out chairs and sat down across from each other. 

This is it, I thought, holding my breath. 

This is the big moment. 

6 

My friends and I hurried to get our lunches. We didn’t want anyone to wonder why we were just standing there staring at Courtney. 

We sat down at our usual table. I kept my eyes glued on Courtney. I was so nervous and eager, I thought I would burst! 

Courtney started to open her lunch bag. 

Just then, everyone heard a low groan from the back of the room. It was Mr. Melvin. “Oh, no,” he cried. “I forgot my lunch today.” 

“That’s no problem,” Courtney called back to him. 

Mr. Melvin walked over to her table. He leaned down and started talking to her. I couldn’t hear what they were saying. It’s always really noisy in the room at lunchtime with everyone talking and laughing and crinkling their lunch bags and unwrapping their food. 

Hat, Molly, Charlene, and I were the only ones in the room who were being quiet. We watched as Courtney and Mr. Melvin continued to talk. 

“What are they talking about?” Hat whispered to me. “Why doesn’t he let her open her bag?” 

I shrugged, keeping my eyes on Courtney. She had a thoughtful expression on her face. Then she smiled up at him. 

Then she handed him her lunch bag. 

“No, really, it’s fine,” Courtney said to Mr. Melvin. “You can have some of my lunch. You know my mom always packs too much.” 

“Oh, no,” I groaned. I suddenly felt sick. 

“Should we warn him?” Hat asked me. 

Too late. 

Still standing beside Courtney’s table, Mr. Melvin opened the bag and reached inside. His eyes narrowed in bewilderment. 

Then he let out a high-pitched, startled cry as he pulled the big, black snake out. 

The lunch bag dropped to the floor. The rubber snake wriggled briefly in his hand. 

Molly was right. It was very real-looking. 

Mr. Melvin let out another cry, and the snake dropped to the floor. 

The room filled with startled shrieks and cries. 

Courtney leapt up from her seat. She gave Mr. Melvin a gentle shove to move him out of the way. Then she began stomping on the snake. Fierce, hard stomps. 

Heroic stomps. 

A few seconds later, she picked the snake up and flashed Mr. Melvin a triumphant grin. The snake was in two pieces. She had stomped off its head. “My brother is going to kill me!” Molly moaned. 

“Well, at least we scared Mr. Melvin,” Charlene said after school. Charlene always tries to look on the bright side. 

“I can’t believe he spent the rest of the afternoon trying to find out who put the snake in the bag,” Hat exclaimed. 

“Courtney kept looking over at us,” I said. “Do you think she suspected us?” 

“Probably,” Hat replied. “I’m just glad to get out of there.” 

“Mr. Melvin has a really funny scream,” Charlene remarked. 

Molly didn’t say a word. I guessed she was thinking about what her brother would do to her when he discovered his rubber snake was gone. 

We were walking to my house. We had all agreed to hold a meeting and try to come up with a better plan for scaring Courtney. 

It was a beautiful, warm day. It had been raining all week. This was the rainy season in southern California. But today the sun was bright yellow in a clear, smogless sky. 

Everyone was thinking about how we almost got caught—and how we failed at frightening Courtney. 

We failed. And Courtney was a hero once again. 

“The rubber snake was a bad idea,” Hat murmured as we crossed the street onto my block. 

“Tell us about it,” Molly grumbled, rolling her eyes. 

“Courtney will never fall for a fake,” Hat continued. “We need something real to scare Courtney. Something alive.” 

“Huh? Something alive?” I asked. 

Hat started to reply—but a woman’s voice interrupted him. 

I turned to see Mrs. Rudolph, one of our neighbors, running toward us. Her blonde hair was all wild, and she had a very troubled expression on her 

“Eddie, please—you’ve got to help me!” she cried. face. 

7 

I felt a cold chill run down my back. Mrs. Rudolph looked so frightened. 

“What’s w-wrong?” I stammered. 

She pointed up to the sky. “Can you help me?” 

“Huh?” I followed her gaze. It took me a while to realize she was 
pointing up to a tree branch, not to the sky. 

“It’s Muttly, my cat,” Mrs. Rudolph said, shielding her eyes from the 
sun with one hand, still pointing with the other. 

“I see him,” Hat said. “On that branch. The bent one.” 

“I don’t know how he got out of the house,” Mrs. Rudolph said. “He 
never climbs trees. Somehow he got up there, and he can’t get down.” 

I stared up into the thick leaves. Yep. There was Muttly. Pretty high 
up. Making frightened yowling sounds and pawing at the slender tree 
branch. 

We all stood staring up at the frightened cat. 

Suddenly I felt Mrs. Rudolph’s hand on my shoulder. “Can you climb 
up and get him, Eddie?” 

I swallowed hard. I’m not the best tree climber in the world. In fact, I 
hate climbing trees. I always cut my hands on the bark or scrape the skin 
off my stomach or something. 

“Please hurry,” Mrs. Rudolph pleaded. “Muttly’s so scared. He—he’s 
going to fall.” 

So what if he falls! Aren’t cats supposed to have nine lives? 

That’s what I thought. But I didn’t say that to Mrs. Rudolph. 

Instead, I stammered something about how high up he was. 

“You’re good at climbing trees, aren’t you?” Mrs. Rudolph said. “I 
mean, all boys your age climb trees, don’t they?” Her eyes studied me. She 
had a strong look of disapproval on her face. 

She thinks I’m a chicken, I realized. 

If I don’t climb the tree and rescue her stupid cat, she’ll tell my mom 
what a weakling I am. The word will be out all over the neighborhood: Mrs. 
Rudolph asked Eddie for help, and he just stood there like a coward, 
making lame excuses. 

“I’m a little afraid of heights,” I confessed. 

“Go ahead, Eddie,” Hat urged. “You can do it.” Some friend. 

Above us, the cat yowled loudly. He sounded like a baby crying. His 
tail stood stiffly straight up in the air. 

“You can do it, Eddie,” Charlene said, staring up at the cat. 

“Please hurry,” Mrs. Rudolph pleaded. “My kids will be heartbroken if 
anything happens to Muttly.” 

I hesitated, gazing up the long, rough-barked trunk. 

The cat yowled again. 

I saw the branch tremble. I saw the cat’s legs scrabble frantically as he 
lost his grip. 

Then I heard the cat yelp as he started to fall. 

8 

We all screamed. 

The branch bobbed up and down. The cat clung to the branch with his 
front paws. Its back legs kicked the air furiously. 

“Oh no oh no oh no!” Mrs. Rudolph chanted, covering her eyes with 
one hand. 

The cat yowled in terror. 

Somehow he managed to pull himself back up onto the shaking tree 
branch. Then he cried again, frightened, human-sounding cries. 

Mrs. Rudolph lowered her hand from her eyes. She stared disgustedly 
at me. “I guess I’d better call the fire department.” 

I knew I should grab onto the tree trunk and pull myself up. But I 
really am afraid of heights. I’m just not a good climber. 

With an exasperated sigh, Mrs. Rudolph turned and started jogging to 
her house. She stopped when we heard a girl’s voice cry out. 

“Hey—what’s the problem?” 

Courtney rolled onto the sidewalk on her sleek red racing bike. She 
hopped off and let the bike fall to the ground. She was wearing white denim 
overalls over a bright yellow T-shirt. 

“What’s going on, guys?” she asked, hurrying up to us. 

“My cat—” Mrs. Rudolph said, pointing up to the tree. 

The cat yowled in panic. 

Courtney gazed up to the bobbing branch. 

“I’ll get him down,” Courtney said. She grabbed the tree trunk and 
began shinnying up. 

The cat meowed and nearly slipped again. 

Courtney climbed quickly, easily, wrapping her legs around the trunk, 
pulling herself up with both hands. 

A few seconds later, she made her way onto the branch, grabbed the 
cat around the stomach with one hand, and pulled him close to her body. 
Then she skillfully lowered herself to the ground. 

“Here’s the poor kitty,” Courtney said, smoothing the cat’s fur, petting 
it gently. She handed him to Mrs. Rudolph. Courtney’s white denims and 

yellow T-shirt were smeared with dirt and bits of dark bark. She had pieces 
of green leaves in her blonde hair. 

“Oh, thank you,” Mrs. Rudolph gushed, wrapping the still mewing cat 
in her arms. “Thank you so much, dear. You were so wonderful.” 

Courtney brushed some of the dirt off her overalls. “I like climbing 
trees,” she told Mrs. Rudolph. “It’s really fun.” 

Mrs. Rudolph turned her gaze to me, and her smile quickly faded. “I’m 
glad someone in this neighborhood is brave,” she said, making a disgusted 
face. She thanked Courtney again, then turned and carried the cat into the 
house. 

I felt so bad. I wanted to sink into the ground with the worms. I wanted 
to disappear and never be seen again. 

But there I was, standing with my hands shoved in my jeans pockets. 

And there was Courtney, grinning at me. Gloating. Rubbing it in with 
that smug look on her face. 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene didn’t say a word. When I looked at them, 
they avoided my eyes. I knew they were embarrassed for me. And angry 
that Courtney had made us all look bad again. 

Courtney picked up her bike and started walking it away. She threw 
her leg over the bar and climbed on to the seat. Then she suddenly turned 
back to me. 

“Hey, Eddie—was it you who put that dumb snake in my lunch?” 

“Of course not!” I exclaimed. I kicked the grass with one sneaker. 

She continued to stare at me, her blue eyes studying my face. 

I knew I was blushing. I could feel my cheeks grow hot. But there was 
nothing I could do about it. 

“I thought maybe it was you,” Courtney said, tossing her hair behind 
her shoulder. “I thought maybe you were trying to pay me back. You know. 
For the green snake thing.” 

“No way,” I muttered. “No way, Courtney.” 

My three friends shifted uncomfortably. Hat started humming some 
song. 

Finally, Courtney raised her feet to the pedals and rode off down the 
street. 

“We’ve got to find a way to scare her,” I said through clenched teeth as 
soon as she had ridden out of sight. “We’ve just got to!” 

“How about a live tarantula down her back?” Hat suggested. 

9 

The plan was simple. 

Mr. Dollinger, the science teacher, kept two tarantulas in a cage in the 
second-floor science lab. 

Hat and I would sneak into the science lab after school on Thursday. 
We would borrow one of the tarantulas and hide it in my locker overnight. 

The next morning, we all had gym right after morning meeting. There 
is a narrow balcony over the gym floor where equipment is stored. Hat and 
I would sneak up onto the balcony with the tarantula. 

Then Molly and Charlene would start talking to Courtney and get her 
to stand under the balcony. When Courtney was in position under the 
balcony, one of us would drop the tarantula onto Courtney’s head. 

Then she’d scream and howl, and the tarantula would get tangled in 
her hair, and she wouldn’t be able to get it out, so she’d scream some more 
and go totally ballistic, and we’d all have a good laugh. 

A simple plan. 

And one we were sure would work. 

What could go wrong? 

Thursday after school, Molly and Charlene wished us luck. Hat and I went 
into the shop room and pretended to be working on our wood projects. 
Actually, we were waiting for all the kids to leave the school building. 

Pretty soon it was silent out in the hall. I poked my head out the shop 
door. Empty. 

“Okay, Hat,” I whispered, motioning for him to follow me. “Let’s get 
this over with.” 

We crept out into the hall. Our shoes scraped noisily against the hard 
tile floor. The halls at school are kind of creepy when everyone has left and 
it’s so quiet. 

We passed by the teachers’ lounge near the front stairway. The door 
was open a crack, and I could hear some kind of teachers’ meeting going 
on. 

That’s great, I told myself. If the teachers are all meeting downstairs, 

we will have the science lab to ourselves. 

Hat and I hurried up the front stairs. We leaned on the banister and 
tried to move as silently as we could. 

The science lab is at the end of the hall on the second floor. We passed 
by a couple of eighth graders we didn’t know. But we didn’t see anyone 
else. There didn’t seem to be any teachers up there. They were probably all 
at the meeting. 

Hat and I peeked into the lab. Late afternoon sunlight poured in 
through the windows. We had to squint down the long rows of lab tables. 

“Mr. Dollinger?” I called. I just wanted to make sure he wasn’t there. 

No reply. 

We both tried to squeeze through the door at the same time, but we 
didn’t fit. Hat laughed. His nervous, high-pitched giggle. I raised a finger to 
my lips, signaling for him to be quiet. I didn’t want anyone to hear us. 

Hat followed me down the center aisle of the long room. My heart 
began to thud loudly in my chest. My eyes darted around the room. 

The sunlight seemed to grow even brighter. The watercolor paintings 
of the rain forest we had all made were hanging on the wall behind Mr. 
Dollinger’s desk. Water dripped in one of the lab sinks to our right. Plonk. 
Plonk. Plonk. 

The door to the tall metal supply cabinet beside Mr. Dollinger’s desk 
had been left open. I pointed it out to Hat. “That probably means he’s 
coming back up here after the teachers’ meeting,” I whispered. 

Mr. Dollinger is a neat freak. He wouldn’t leave a supply closet open 
overnight. 

Hat gave me a shove. “We’d better hurry.” 

“Don’t push me,” I grumbled. 

We made our way to the tarantula cage, on a metal table against the 
wall. It was actually a rectangular, plywood box with a wire mesh top. 

A loud crash made me stop a few feet from the cage. I gasped and 
turned to Hat. “What was that?” 

The sound repeated. We both realized it was a Venetian blind, blown 
by the wind, banging against the open window behind us. 

I breathed a long sigh of relief. I stared at Hat and he stared at me. He 
nervously adjusted his baseball cap over his forehead. “Eddie, maybe this 
isn’t such a good idea,” he whispered. “Maybe we should get out of here.” 

I was tempted to agree with Hat and run out the door as fast as I could. 
But then I remembered Courtney’s smug smile as she climbed down from 
the tree with the cat. “Let’s stick to the plan,” I said. 

I really wanted to scare Courtney. More than anything else in the 
world. 

Hat and I peered down through the wire mesh at the two tarantulas. 
The bigger one was crawling along one end of the cage. The smaller, 
browner one was sitting like a lump at the other end. 

“Yuck,” I said in a low voice. “They really are gross.” 

Their legs were all hairy and prickly-looking. Their bodies looked like 
disgusting brown hairy sacks. 

“Let’s take the big one,” Hat urged, reaching for the lid. A grin spread 
across his face. “It’ll make a nice plop when it lands on Courtney’s head.” 

We both laughed. Hat made some funny plopping sounds. 

He lifted up the wire mesh top of the cage. He reached a hand in to 
grab the bigger tarantula. Then he suddenly stopped, and his grin faded. 

“We’ve got a little problem,” he said. 

“Huh? What?” I glanced nervously back to the doorway. No one there. 

“What are we going to put it in?” Hat demanded. 

My mouth dropped open. “Oh.” 

“We forgot to bring something to put it in,” Hat said. He lowered the 
top of the cage. Both tarantulas were crawling slowly toward each other 
now. 

“Yeah. Well, we need a bag or something,” I said. My eyes searched 
the tabletops. 

“A bag isn’t any good,” Hat replied, frowning. “Tarantulas can tear 
right through a bag.” 

“Oh, yeah. You’re right.” 

“Why didn’t we think of this before?” Hat demanded. “Why were we 
so stupid? What did we think we were doing? You can’t just put a tarantula 
in your backpack and carry it around!” 

“Calm down,” I said, motioning for him to lower his voice. I could see 
he was starting to panic. “There must be something to keep a tarantula in up 
here.” 

“This is really stupid,” he grumbled. “Did you think I was going to 
keep it in my pocket?” 

“Wait,” I told him. I hurried over to the next table and picked up a 
plastic container. It was the size of a cottage cheese container and had a 
plastic top. “This is perfect,” I whispered, holding it up to show him. “HI 
just poke holes in the top.” 

“Hurry,” Hat urged. He pulled off his cap and scratched his dark hair. 

I poked several air holes in the lid with a pencil. Then I carried the 
plastic container over to the cage. “Here,” I said, handing it to him. 

“You have to hold it,” Hat told me. “I can’t hold the container and pick 
up the tarantula.” 

“Oh,” I replied unhappily. I didn’t want to be that close to the 
tarantula. 

My hand started shaking a little. But I held the container close to the 
cage, ready to snap the lid over it as soon as Hat dropped one of the ugly 
creatures inside. 

He pulled up the lid and reached into the cage. Hat was really brave. 
He wrapped his hand around the bigger one’s body and lifted it up easily. 
Hat didn’t even hesitate or make a disgusted face. 

I was impressed. 

I nearly dropped the plastic container when he lowered the tarantula 
inside. My hand was really shaking. But I managed to hold on. 

The tarantula began flopping around frantically, shooting its legs out, 
slipping and sliding on the slippery plastic surface. 

“He doesn’t like it in there,” I said in a trembling voice. 

“Too bad,” Hat replied, closing the wire mesh cage lid. “Quick, Eddie 
—put the lid on the container.” 

I scrambled to clamp the lid on. 

I almost had it in place when I heard footsteps outside the door. And 
voices. 

Hat and I both gasped as we realized Mr. Dollinger was about to walk 
in. 

10 

A feeble croak escaped my lips. The bright sunlight suddenly glared white. 
I felt the floor sway. 

I could feel my panic weigh me down. I suddenly felt as if I weighed a 
thousand pounds. 

I could hear Mr. Dollinger talking to another teacher right outside the 
science lab door. In another few seconds, he’d step inside, and... and.... 

“Quick—duck under the table!” Hat whispered, his eyes wide with 
fright beneath his cap. 

I started to follow him under the table. But I realized it wasn’t a good 
hiding place at all. Mr. Dollinger would see us as soon as he went to his 
desk. 

“No—no good!” I croaked. “No good. Uh...” 

My eyes flashed around the room. Where could we hide? Where? 

“The supply cabinet!” I cried. I grabbed Hat’s arm and pulled him with 
me. 

The tall metal cabinet was wide enough to hide both of us. 

Could we get into it in time? 

We scrambled inside, pushing each other forward. 

I pulled the door closed. It clicked shut just as Mr. Dollinger entered 
the room. 

Hat and I stood trembling in the darkness of the cabinet, listening to 
his footsteps approach. I gripped the tarantula container tightly in one hand. 

Mr. Dollinger was softly humming a tune. I heard him stop right in 
front of the supply cabinet. 

My heart was pounding so loud, I wondered if the teacher could hear it 
through the cabinet door. 

I shifted my weight and bumped into Hat. There wasn’t another inch of 
space in there. I could hear Hat’s shallow breathing. I could tell he was as 
scared as I was. 

What if Mr. Dollinger decided to open the cabinet door? 

Please, please—just turn out the lights and go home, I pleaded silently. 

I could hear him shuffling papers on his desk. I heard the desk drawer 

open and shut. I heard a book slam shut. More footsteps. Water running in 
one of the sinks. 

He turned off the water. He was still humming softly to himself. More 
footsteps. The click of the light switch. 

Then silence. 

I struggled to hear over my pounding heartbeat. Silence. No humming. 
No footsteps. 

Hat and I stood frozen in the darkness, listening hard. “He—he’s 
gone,” I stammered finally. “He left, Hat.” 

“Phewwww!” Hat sighed loudly. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I cried. I reached for the latch. 

My hand fumbled around in the darkness, sweeping over the metal 
door. I located a slender metal bar and pulled up on it. It didn’t budge. 

“Hey—” I cried out. I moved my hand slowly up the door, trying to 
find a latch or release. 

“Hurry up. Open the cabinet door,” Hat urged. “It’s getting hot in 
here.” 

“I know,” I replied tensely. “I—I can’t find anything.” 

“Let me try,” Hat said impatiently. He pushed my hand away and 
began fumbling with the metal bar. 

“There’s got to be a latch or something,” I said shrilly. 

“Very helpful,” Hat grumbled. He began pounding on the door with his 
open hand. 

I grabbed his arm. “Stop. That won’t open it. And someone will hear 
you.” 

“You try again,” he ordered. His voice sounded really tiny and afraid. 

I swallowed hard. I suddenly had a heavy lump in my throat. It felt as 
if my heart had leapt up into my neck. 

I fumbled frantically with everything I could grab hold of. But I 
couldn’t find anything that would open the door. 

“I give up. We—we’re locked in, Hat,” I stammered. 

“I don’t believe it,” he muttered. 

The container started to slip out of my hand. I grabbed it with both 
hands—and made a startling discovery. 

The lid had come off. 

“Oh, no,” I murmured. 

“What now?” Hat demanded. 

Taking a deep breath, I shook the container. 

It was empty. No tarantula. 

I tried to tell Hat that the tarantula had escaped, but my voice caught in 
my throat. I let out a choking sound. 
And then I felt a prickling on my leg just above my sock. And then another prickling, like a pinprick, a little higher up. 

“Hat—the tarantula—” I managed to croak. “It—it’s crawling up my leg.” 

11 

The pinpricks moved a little higher on my leg. I could feel the tarantula’s warm, hairy body rub against my skin. 

“It—it’s going to b-bite me,” I stuttered. “I know it is.” 

“Don’t move,” Hat advised, sounding even more frightened than me. “Just don’t move.” 

The creature’s legs dug into my skin, like sharp needles. 

“I—I have to get out of here!” I screamed. Without thinking about it, I lowered my shoulder and heaved all my weight against the cabinet door. 

With a loud pop, it swung open. 

A startled cry escaped my lips as I tumbled out. I landed hard on my side, and the empty plastic container rolled across the room. Breathing hard, I scrambled to my feet and began furiously kicking and shaking my leg. The tarantula dropped to the floor and immediately began scrabbling across the linoleum. 

“Catch it! Catch it!” I shrieked. Hat dove out of the cabinet and lurched after the tarantula. 

I grabbed up the container and hurried over to him. Hat lifted the tarantula high in the air. Its hairy legs kicked and squirmed, but Hat didn’t let go. 

He plopped the ugly thing into the container. “Put the lid on tight this time,” he warned. 

“Don’t worry,” I moaned. My hands were shaking. But I clamped the lid on tightly, then checked and rechecked it three times. 

A short while later, Hat and I were heading downstairs to deposit the tarantula in my locker for safekeeping. I could still feel the itchy pinpricks on my leg, even though I knew the tarantula hadn’t bitten me. 

“Wow. That was scary!” Hat declared. “That was really scary.” 

“It just means that the rest of the plan will go perfectly,” I assured him. 

A little before nine the next morning, Hat and I were hiding again. This time we were hiding on the narrow balcony that overlooks the gym. 

While everyone else in our class changed into their gym shorts and sweats and stuff, Hat and I sneaked out of the boys’ locker room. Hat hid the tarantula container under his sweatshirt, and we hurried up to the balcony. The four of us had been calling each other for most of the night, getting the plan straight. It was a very simple plan, actually. 

All Molly and Charlene had to do was get Courtney to stand under the balcony. Then Hat would drop the tarantula into her hair, and we’d all watch her scream and cry and carry on, and make a total fool of herself. 

Simple. 

“What if Courtney doesn’t get upset?” Molly had asked me on the phone. “What if she just plucks it out of her hair and calmly asks if anyone has lost a tarantula?” 

“That’s impossible,” I had replied. “Courtney is calm—but she isn’t that calm! She’s got to scream and go wild with a tarantula in her hair. If she doesn’t, she’s not human. She’s a statue or something.” 

“Ready, Hat?” I asked, peering over the side of the balcony. 

He nodded solemnly, his eyes on the volleyball nets below. 

He carefully pulled the lid off the container. The tarantula reached up two legs as if to grab him. 

I heard voices down below. A few girls had wandered out of their locker room onto the floor. One of them picked up a volleyball and took a jump shot at the basket. The ball hit the rim and bounced off. 

“Get down. They can see you,” Hat whispered. 

I lowered my head. It was hot up on the balcony, hotter than down on the gym floor, and I started to sweat. 

We were both on our knees. Hat was holding the tarantula container in front of him with both hands. 

I could hear more voices down below. Several boys had come out and were dribbling a volleyball up and down the floor, passing it off to one another. 

“Do you see Courtney?” Hat whispered. 

I raised myself a little higher and peered down. “Yes!” 

Molly and Charlene had Courtney between them. Both of them were talking excitedly at the same time. I couldn’t hear what they were talking about. 

Courtney was shaking her head. I saw her laugh, then shake her head some more. She was wearing a loose-fitting purple T-shirt, and white shorts over purple tights. Her blonde hair was tied behind her in a loose ponytail. 

A perfect target, I thought gleefully. I grinned at Hat. I had a good feeling about this. A very good feeling. 

Raising my eyes beyond the volleyball nets, I saw that Mr. Russo, the gym teacher, was talking to another teacher at the door. 

Good, I thought. We don’t want Mr. Russo blowing the whistle and starting the volleyball game until we take care of Courtney. 

Molly and Charlene, meanwhile, still had Courtney between them. They were still chatting away. As they talked, they kept backing up, backing up, until they were almost in position. 

“Just a few more feet and Courtney will be under the balcony,” I whispered to Hat. “It’s happening, Hat. It’s really happening.” 

I was so excited, I felt like I was about to burst. Beads of sweat rolled down my forehead and into my eyes. I wiped it with the sleeve of my T- shirt and peered down. 

Yes! 

Molly and Charlene had done it. They had backed Courtney under the balcony. The three of them stood right beneath us. 

Perfect! 

“Hat—do it!” I whispered. 

Hat didn’t hesitat*e. Not for a second. This was too perfect. Too perfect! 

His eyes on the three girls directly below, he reached into the container and picked up the hairy tarantula. 

Then he raised himself up a little higher over the balcony edge, held the tarantula over the side, took careful aim—and let it drop. 

12 

Hat and I both leaned over the balcony and watched the tarantula drop. 

And we both cried out in horror when it landed with a sick plop in Molly’s hair. 

“Hat—you missed!” I screamed. 

But Molly was screaming a lot louder. Her face was as red as a tomato, and her eyes were bulging out of her head. She was shrieking at the top of her lungs and doing a strange dance, hopping wildly up and down while her hands thrashed the air. 

A lot of kids were running over with startled and bewildered expressions. “What’s wrong with Molly?” someone screamed. 

“Why is she doing that?” 

“What happened to her?” 

Staring down, I leaned so far over the balcony, I nearly dropped like the tarantula. 

Poor Molly was tearing at her hair now, still shrieking and hopping around. 

I cried out in relief as she finally managed to pull the tarantula from her dark hair. She juggled it in her hand, nearly dropping it. Then, still screaming, she tossed it to Charlene! 

Beside me on the balcony, Hat was laughing now. But I was too upset to find it funny. 

How could Hat have missed such an easy shot? 

Charlene let out a scream that rattled the gym rafters. She hobbled the tarantula from one hand to the other. 

Then it dropped to the floor at her feet. 

Charlene leapt back, still screaming, both hands pressed against the sides of her face. 

Everyone in the gym class had huddled around. Some kids still looked confused. Others were laughing. A couple of girls were trying to comfort Molly, whose hair was standing straight up on her head. 

“Oh, wow. Oh, wow,” Hat kept repeating, shaking his head. “Oh, wow.” 

Gripping the balcony edge with both hands, I watched Courtney bend over and gently pick up the tarantula from the gym floor. She placed it in the palm of her hand and appeared to be saying soothing words to it. 

The kids had formed a circle around Courtney. As she held the tarantula close to her face, they quieted down and watched. 

“It’s just a tarantula,” Courtney said, petting its hairy back with one finger. “Tarantulas don’t bite that often. And if they do, it doesn’t hurt very much.” 

Kids began murmuring once again about how brave Courtney was. I 
saw Molly and Charlene comforting each other at the edge of the circle. 
Charlene was smoothing down Molly’s hair. Molly’s whole body was still 
quivering. 

“Where did this tarantula come from?” Courtney was asking. 

I saw Molly stare up angrily at us. She raised her fist and shook it 
toward us. 

I ducked down out of sight behind the balcony wall. 

“The plan didn’t work too well,” Hat murmured. 

Is he the master of understatement—or what? 

We didn’t realize that the disaster wasn’t over. “Let’s get out of here,” I 
whispered. 

Too late. We both looked up to see Mr. Russo glaring angrily at us 
from the balcony entrance. “What are you boys doing up here?” he asked 
suspiciously. 

I turned to Hat. Hat stared back at me blankly. 

Neither of us could think of a good answer. 

“Come on back downstairs,” Mr. Russo said softly, holding open the 
door for us. “Let’s have a nice, long talk.” 

It could have been worse, I thought. Sure, Hat and I had to stay after school 
and clean the science lab every afternoon for the next two weeks. And sure, 
we had to write one-thousand-word essays on why it’s wrong to steal living 
things and drop them on people’s heads. 

And sure, Molly and Charlene aren’t speaking to Hat or me. 

But it could have been worse. 

I mean, what if Hat and I were still locked in the supply cabinet? That 
would be worse, wouldn’t it? 

It was later that afternoon. I was slumped on my bed, glumly thinking 
about gym class and how our plan had bombed. 

It’s all Courtney’s fault, I told myself, absently pulling at a little tear in 
my bedspread. 

Courtney had moved just at the last minute. 

She must have moved. Hat couldn’t be that bad of an aim. 

I sighed bitterly as once again I pictured Courtney calmly picking the 
tarantula up off the floor and petting it. “It’s only a tarantula,” Courtney 
had said. So smug. So superior. “It’s only a tarantula. They don’t bite very 
often. ” 

Why didn’t it bite her hand? 

That would have wiped the smug expression off her face. 

Why did she have to be so totally brave? 

Courtney really deserves to be scared out of her wits, I thought 
unhappily. I tore at the little rip in the bedspread, turning it into a big rip. 

She’s really asking for it, asking to be frightened speechless. 

But how, how, how? 

Sitting on the edge of the bed, I had my head lowered and my 
shoulders hunched. I was leaning forward glumly, picking at the bedspread 
without even realizing it. 

Again I pictured Hat letting the tarantula drop. 

Again I saw it land on Molly’s head. 

No! No! No! 

Again I saw Molly start to do her frantic, furious dance. 

The unhappy picture vanished from my mind as I suddenly realized I 
was no longer alone. Raising my eyes to the doorway, I gasped sharply. 

And saw the tall, lean monster stagger toward me, its face dripping 
with dark blood. 

13 

The tall monster lurched toward me, its dripping arms reaching out in front 
of it, ready to grab me. 

“Kevin—get out of here!” I cried. “You’re dripping mud all over my 
floor!” 

My older brother Kevin lowered his arms to his sides. “It isn’t real 
mud, punk,” he said. “It’s makeup.” 

“I don’t care,” I replied shrilly, jumping up off the bed and giving him 
a hard shove in the stomach. “It’s dripping all over.” 

He laughed. “Scared you, didn’t I?” 

“No way!” I insisted. “I knew it was you.” 

“You thought it was a Mud Monster,” he said, grinning at me through 
the thick, brownish-orange gunk dripping down his face. “Admit it, punk.” 

I hate when he calls me punk. I guess that’s why he does it. “You don’t 
look like a Mud Monster,” I told him nastily. “You just look like a pile of 
garbage.” 

“We scared some little kids who came into the woods this afternoon,” 
Kevin said gleefully. “You should’ve seen their faces. We ran at them and 
yelled BOO. Two of them started to cry.” He snickered. 

“Way to go,” I muttered. I gave him another shove toward the door and 
got the thick, brownish-orange gunk all over my hands. 

“The video is almost finished,” he told me, deliberately wiping his 
hand on my open notebook. He stared down at the dark stain he had made 
on my math homework. “Maybe I’ll let you see it when it’s done.” 

“Get away from my stuff, Kevin!” I said angrily. Then I remembered 
what I wanted to ask him, and changed my tone. “Can I be in the video?” I 
pleaded. “Please? You said maybe I could be in it—remember?” 

“Huh-uh, punk.” He shook his head. “You’d get too scared.” 

“What?” Was he putting me on? 

“You’d get too scared, Eddie,” he repeated, scratching his forehead 
through the heavy, wet makeup. “All alone in the deep, dark woods with 
three Mud Monsters walking around. You’d lose it. You’d totally lose it.” 

“Hey—” I cried angrily. “You’re not funny, Kevin. You promised—” 

“No, I didn’t,” Kevin insisted. A big brown blob of gunk fell off his 
shoulder and landed with a splat on my floor. “Whoa. You’re going to have 
to clean that up,” he said, grinning meanly. 

“I’m going to make you eat it!” I shouted angrily, crossing my arms 
over my chest. 

He just laughed. 

I suddenly had an idea. “Kevin, will you help me with something?” I 
asked thoughtfully. 

“Probably not,” he replied, still grinning. “What is it?” 

“Do you have any good ideas for scaring someone?” I asked. 

He narrowed his eyes at me. Then he gestured to the brownish-orange 
stuff covering his whole body. “Isn’t this scary enough?” 

“No. I mean, some other way to scare someone,” I said, wondering 
how to explain. I decided just to come right out and say it. “Some friends 
and I, we’re trying to scare this girl, Courtney.” 

“Why?” Kevin demanded, resting a globby hand on my dresser top. 

“You know. Just for fun,” I told him. 

He nodded. 

“But we haven’t been able to scare her at all,” I continued. 
“Everything we try totally bombs out.” I sank back onto my bed. 

“What have you tried?” Kevin asked. 

“Oh. A couple of things. A snake and a tarantula,” I said. “But she 
didn’t get scared.” 

“Too small,” he muttered. He stepped away from the dresser. I could 
see that he had left a big brown stain on the side. 

“Huh? What do you mean Too small’?” I demanded. 

“Too small,” he repeated. “You’re trying to scare her with little things. 
You’ve got to scare her with something big. You know. Maybe something 
bigger than she is.” 

I thought about what he was saying. It seemed to make sense. “What 
do you mean by big?” I asked him. “You mean like an elephant?” 

He frowned and shook his head. “Eddie, where are you going to get an 
elephant? I mean like a big dog. You know. A huge, growling dog.” 

“A dog?” I scratched my head. 

“Yeah. Let’s say this girl Courtney is walking down the street, or she’s 
in the woods, maybe—and suddenly she hears angry growls and snarls. She 

looks up and sees this enormous dog, its mouth open, its fangs bared, 
running right at her. That’ll scare her. No problem.” 

“Not bad,” I said thoughtfully. “Not bad. You’re a genius, Kevin. 
Really.” 

“Tell me about it,” he replied. He walked out of the room, leaving a 
muddy trail behind him. 

A huge, growling dog, I thought. I pictured it in my mind. I pictured it 
raising its head to the moon and howling like a wolf. 

Then I pictured Courtney walking innocently down a dark street. She 
hears a sound. A low growl. She stops. Her eyes grow wide with fear. 

What’s that noise? she wonders. 

And then she sees it. The biggest, meanest, loudest, angriest dog that 
ever lived. Its eyes glow red. It pulls back its heavy lips to reveal a mouth 
full of pointy fangs. 

With an earth-shattering growl, it makes its leap. It goes right for her 
throat. 

Courtney cries out for help. Then she turns. She’s running now, 
running for her life, shrieking and crying like a frightened baby. 

“Here, boy,” I call to the attacking beast. 

The dog stops. It turns around. It walks quickly to me, its tail wagging. 
Courtney is still crying, still shaking all over, as the dog gently licks my 
hand. 

“It’s only a dog,” I tell her. “Dogs won’t hurt you—unless they sense 
that you’re afraid !” 

I jumped up from my bed, laughing out loud. 

It’s definitely worth a try, I thought excitedly. Definitely worth a try. 

Now, who do I know who has an enormous, growling, ferocious dog? 

14 

Saturday afternoon we were in Charlene’s back yard, trying out the new 
croquet set her father had bought. It was an overcast day. High clouds kept 
blocking out the sun, sending long, gray shadows over the back lawn. 

The roar of a power mower from next door made it a little hard to be 
heard. But I was telling Molly, Charlene, and Hat about my brother’s idea 
for scaring Courtney. 

“A big, angry dog is way scary,” Hat quickly agreed. He tapped his 
mallet hard against his green croquet ball and sent mine sailing into the 
hedge. 

Molly frowned. She still hadn’t forgiven me for the tarantula incident, 
even though I had apologized a thousand times. She straightened the bottom 
of her yellow T-shirt over her black Lycra bike shorts and prepared to take 
her turn. 

“We need a dog that really looks vicious,” Molly said. She slammed 
her ball hard. It missed the hoop and bounced off a wooden peg. 

“I guess my dog, Buttercup, could do it,” Charlene offered, sighing. 

“Huh? Buttercup?” I cried out in surprise. “Get serious, Charlene. 
Buttercup is a big, lovable oaf. He couldn’t scare a fly.” 

A teasing smile formed on Charlene’s face. “Buttercup could do it,” 
she repeated. 

“Oh, sure,” I said, rolling my eyes. “He’s real vicious. That’s why you 
gave him a vicious name like Buttercup.” 

“It’s your turn,” Molly said to me, pointing to my ball way over at the 
hedge. 

“This is such a boring game,” I complained. “Why does anyone like 

it?” 

“I like it,” Hat said. He was winning. 

Charlene cupped her hands around her mouth and shouted, “Buttercup! 
Buttercup! Come here, you ferocious beast!” 

A few seconds later, the big Saint Bernard came lumbering toward us 
from the side of the house. His bushy, white tail was wagging hard, making 
his entire backside waggle as he hurried across the grass, his big pink 

tongue drooping out. 

“Ooh, I’m scared! I’m scared!” I cried sarcastically. I dropped my 
croquet mallet and hugged myself, pretending to shiver in fright. 

Buttercup ignored me. He ran up to Charlene and started licking her 
hand, making tiny mewing sounds, almost like a cat. 

“Ooh, he’s tough,” I exclaimed. 

Hat came up beside me, adjusting his baseball cap over his eyes. “He’s 
a big, lovable Saint Bernard, Charlene,” Hat said, bending to scratch the 
dog behind the ears. “He’s not too scary. We need a big wolf. Or a six-foot- 
tall Doberman.” 

Buttercup turned his big head to lick Hat’s hand. 

“Yuck!” Hat made a disgusted face. “I hate dog slobber.” 

“Where can we get a real attack dog?” I asked, picking up my mallet 
and leaning on it like a cane. “Do we know anyone who has a guard dog? A 
big, ugly German shepherd, maybe?” 

Charlene still had that teasing grin on her face, as if she knew 
something the rest of us didn’t. “Give Buttercup a chance,” she said softly. 
“You might be surprised.” 

Clouds drifted over the sun again. The air suddenly grew cooler as 
gray shadows slid over the grass. 

The power mower on the other side of the hedge sputtered to a stop. 
The back yard suddenly seemed eerily quiet and still. 

Buttercup dropped to the grass and rolled onto his back. His four furry 
paws kicked the air as he scratched his back on the lawn. 

“Not too impressive, Charlene,” Hat said, laughing. The dog looked so 
stupid. 

“I haven’t done our little trick yet,” Charlene replied. “Just watch.” 

She turned to the dog and started to whistle. A tuneless whistle, just a 
bunch of shrill, flat tones. 

The big Saint Bernard reacted immediately. As soon as he heard 
Charlene’s whistle, he rolled off his back and climbed to his feet. His tail 
shot out stiffly behind him. His entire body appeared to go rigid. His ears 
stood up on his head. 

Charlene continued to whistle. Not loudly. A steady, low whistle of 
long, shrill notes. 

And as we stared in silent surprise, Buttercup began to growl. The 

growl started deep in his stomach, angry and menacing. 

He pulled back his dark lips. He bared his big teeth. 

He growled loudly. His growl became a vicious snarl. 

The dog’s eyes glowed angrily. His back stiffened. His head arched 
back as if preparing to attack. 

Charlene sucked in a deep breath and whistled some more. Her eyes 
were locked on the growling dog. 

“Buttercup—get Eddie!” Charlene suddenly screamed. “Get Eddie! 
Kill! Kilir 

15 

“No!” I shrieked and fell back toward the hedge. 

The dog growled a warning. Then it leapt to attack. 

I raised my arms in front of me as a shield and waited for the impact. 

And waited. 

When I slowly lowered my arms, I saw that Charlene was hugging the 
dog around the neck. Charlene had a gleeful grin on her face. Buttercup 
turned and planted a slobbery dog kiss on her forehead. 

“Gotcha, Eddie!” Charlene declared. “That was to pay you back for 
the tarantula.” 

Molly laughed. “Way to go, Charlene.” 

“Wow,” I exclaimed weakly. My heart was still pounding. The back 
yard was spinning in front of me. 

“That’s a good trick,” Hat told Charlene. “How did you teach him 
that?” 

“I didn’t,” Charlene said, giving the dog a final hug, then shoving him 
away from her. “It was sort of an accident. I was whistling one day, and 
Buttercup went ballistic on me. He started growling and snarling, showing 
his teeth.” 

“I guess he really hates the way you whistle!” I exclaimed, starting to 
feel a little more normal. 

“He hates anyone whistling,” Charlene replied, brushing dog fur off 
the legs of her denim cutoffs. “Maybe it hurts his ears or something. I don’t 
know. But you can see what it makes him do. He goes nuts like that every 
time someone whistles.” 

“That’s great!” Hat declared. 

“He really can terrify Courtney,” Molly said. 

We watched the dog lumber away, his tongue hanging nearly to the 
ground. He sniffed at something in the flower bed, then disappeared around 
the side of the house. 

“Poor dog,” Charlene said, shaking her head. “He hates California. 
He’s hot all the time. But when we moved here from Michigan, we just 
couldn’t bear to part with him.” 

“I’m glad you didn’t,” I said enthusiastically. “Now we’re finally 
going to scare the life out of Courtney!” 

Molly tapped a croquet ball softly with her mallet. She had a troubled 
expression on her face. “We’re not really going to hurt Courtney, are we?” 
she asked. “I mean, Buttercup isn’t really going to attack her, is he? If he 
gets out of control...” 

“Of course not,” Charlene answered quickly. “He stops growling and 
carrying on as soon as I stop whistling. Really. As soon as the whistling 
stops, he goes right back to his gentle personality.” 

Molly looked relieved. She tapped the ball through a hoop, then used 
the mallet to push it back out. 

We had all lost interest in the croquet game. Planning how we were 
going to use Buttercup to terrify Courtney was a lot more exciting than any 
game. 

The sun had poked out from the high clouds. The closely trimmed 
grass gleamed brightly in the sunlight. We tossed down the mallets and 
made our way to the shade of the big grapefruit tree in the center of the 
back yard. 

“We should scare Courtney in the woods, at that tree house she and 
Denise built by Muddy Creek,” I suggested, sprawling on my back on the 
grass. “It’s the perfect place. She and Denise all alone in the woods. 
Suddenly, a snarling dog leaps out at them. They’ll both scream for a 
week!” 

“Yeah, that’s good,” Hat agreed. “In the woods, there are plenty of 
places for us to hide and watch. I mean, Charlene can hide behind a bush or 
an evergreen or something and whistle her brains out. We’ll all be hidden. 
Courtney will never know who did it.” 

Sitting with her legs crossed, Molly chewed her lower lip thoughtfully. 
She pushed her glasses up on her nose. “I don’t like it,” she said. “It’s no 
fun if we don’t scare Courtney in front of a lot of people. If we scare her in 
the woods with no one around, who will care?” 

“We will!” I argued. “ We will see it. That’s all that counts. We will 
know that we finally managed to terrify her.” 

“And maybe we can all jump out and yell ‘Gotcha!’ and stuff, so she’ll 
know we saw her get frightened,” Charlene added enthusiastically. “Then 
we’ll spread it around school, and everyone will know.” 

“I like it!” Hat declared. 

“When should we do it?” Molly asked. 

“How about now?” I said, jumping to my feet. 

“Huh? Now?” Charlene reacted with surprise. 

“Why not?” I argued. “Let’s just go do it. Maybe we’ll get lucky and 
find Courtney and Denise at their tree house. They go there a lot on 
weekends, you know, to hang out and read and stuff.” 

“Yeah! Let’s go!” Hat jumped up and slapped me on the back. “Let’s 
do it!” 

“I’ll go get Buttercup’s leash,” Charlene said. “I guess there’s no 
reason to wait.” She turned to Molly, who was hanging back. 

“I have a better idea,” Molly said, pulling a blade of grass from her 
brown hair. “Before we go running off to the woods, let’s make sure that 
Courtney is at the tree house.” 

“Huh? How do we do that?” I asked. 

“Simple,” she replied. And then Molly did the most amazing 
impersonation of Denise. “Hello, Courtney. Meet me at the tree house in 
ten minutes, okay?” It was incredible! She sounded just like Denise! 

We all gaped at her in amazement. 

“Molly, I didn’t know you were so talented,” Charlene said, laughing. 

“I’ve been practicing,” Molly said. “I can do all kinds of voices. I’m 
really pretty good at it.” 

“Molly, maybe you can do cartoon voices when you get older,” I 
suggested. “You could be Daffy Duck. You sound a lot like him already!” 

Hat laughed. Molly stuck her tongue out at me. 

“Let’s go inside and call Courtney,” Charlene said eagerly, sliding 
open the screen door. “If she isn’t home, she’s probably already at the tree 
house. So we’ll get Buttercup and go there. If she is home, Molly can 
pretend to be Denise and tell Courtney to meet at the tree house.” 

We made our way into the kitchen. Charlene handed the kitchen phone 
to Molly. Then she brought over the cordless phone for the rest of us to 
listen in on. 

Molly punched in Courtney’s number, and we each held our breath as 
we listened to the phone ring. One ring. Two. 

Courtney picked it up after the second ring. “Hello?” 

Molly put on her best Denise voice. “Hi, Courtney. It’s me.” She really 

sounded just like Denise. I think she could’ve fooled Denise’s own mother! 

“Can you meet me in the woods? You know. At the tree house?” Molly 
asked in Denise’s voice. 

“Who is this?” Courtney demanded. 

“It’s me, of course. Denise,” Molly replied. 

“That’s weird,” we all heard Courtney say. “How can you be Denise 
when Denise is standing here right next to me?” 

16 

“Oops. Wrong number,” Molly said. She quickly slammed down the 
receiver. 

Calling Courtney had turned out to be a bad idea. 

Our plan hadn’t exactly worked. But we were sure we could scare 
Courtney with Buttercup. We just had to catch her in the woods at the right 
time. 

The next day, Sunday, it rained. I was very disappointed. 

My brother, Kevin, stood beside me at the window, watching the 
raindrops patter against the glass. He was very disappointed, too. He and 
his friends had planned to finish their Mud Monsters video in the woods. 

“Today we were going to tape the big finish where the Mud Monsters 
rise up out of the mud,” he said. 

“Maybe the rain will stop,” I told him. 

“It doesn’t matter,” Kevin sighed. “We won’t be able to shoot 
anyway.” 

“Why not?” I asked. 

“Too muddy,” he replied. 

The week dragged by. It rained just about every day. 

On Saturday afternoon, the sun came out. Charlene put Buttercup on a 
leash, and we eagerly headed to the woods. 

“Courtney’s got to be there. She’s got to!” I declared. 

“Someone has to scout out the tree house,” Molly said. “Someone has 
to make sure Courtney and Denise are there before we let Buttercup go.” 

“I’ll do it!” Hat and I volunteered in unison. 

Everyone laughed. We were in a good mood. I think we all had a really 
good feeling, a feeling that this was the day we were finally going to scare 
Courtney out of her wits. 

The woods started a few blocks from Charlene’s house. It was a really 
pretty day, the first all week. Everything smelled fresh and sweet from all 
the rain. 

Buttercup kept stopping to sniff flowers and bushes and other plants. 

Charlene had to keep tugging the leash to keep him walking. It was a tough 
job. It isn’t easy to tug a Saint Bernard if he doesn’t want to be tugged! 

“My mouth is kind of dry,” Charlene complained as we neared the 
edge of the woods. “I hope I can whistle okay.” 

She tried whistling. It came out real breathy. Not much whistle sound. 

But that didn’t seem to matter to Buttercup. He raised his head 
instantly. His ears shot up and his tail stood straight back. 

Charlene blew harder, but she still wasn’t getting much sound. 

Buttercup’s stomach began to rumble. The rumble became a low 
growl. The growl became a snarl as the big dog ferociously bared his teeth. 

“Charlene—stop,” I said. “Don’t waste it.” 

Charlene stopped whistling. The dog relaxed. 

“Does anyone have some gum?” Charlene asked, holding her throat. 
“My mouth is really dry.” 

Molly handed her a stick of gum. 

“Buttercup is ready!” Hat declared happily as we stepped into the 
woods. 

Shadows of the leaves overhead danced on the ground. Sparkling rays 
of sunlight beamed down through the trees. Twigs and dried leaves crackled 
under our sneakers as we walked. 

“Come on, dog!” Charlene pleaded, tugging hard at the leash. 

“Ssshh,” Molly warned. “We’ve got to be quiet now. If Courtney is in 
the woods, she’ll hear us.” 

“Come on, Buttercup!” Charlene repeated in a loud whisper. 

The dog was being difficult. He kept stopping to sniff things. He 
pulled at the leash, trying to break free and go off on his own. I guess there 
were too many exciting smells for him. His tail was wagging back and 
forth, and he was panting noisily. 

We were deep in the woods now, approaching the creek. It grew 
shadier and cooler. Purple shadows surrounded us as we walked. 

“I’ll sneak up near the tree house and see if Courtney and Denise are 
there,” I whispered. I handed the brown paper bag I’d been carrying to Hat. 
“Hold this for me. I’ll be right back.” 

Hat gazed suspiciously at the bag. “What’s in it?” 

“You’ll see,” I told him and hurried off on my scouting mission. 
Keeping low, I made my way through a clump of tall weeds. 

I glanced back at my friends. They had clustered around Buttercup. 
The big dog had plopped down on the ground and was chewing on a big 
stick. 

As I followed a narrow dirt path through the trees, I realized my heart 
was pounding excitedly. This was it! The day of our victory over Courtney. 

Her tree house was perched near the creek on the other side of a small, 
grassy clearing. As I approached the clearing, I could hear the soft trickle of 
water from the creekbed. 

Slipping between the trees, I kept in the shadows. I didn’t want to be 
spotted by Courtney or Denise. That would spoil the surprise. 

A smile broke over my face as I thought about how scared they were 
about to become. If they were there.... 

I stopped at the edge of the clearing and peered across it. The tall grass 
was matted down by dozens of footprints. I realized that my brother and his 
friends must have taped part of their Mud Monsters video there. 

Keeping under the trees, I began to make my way around the circle of 
the clearing. There, on the other side, Courtney’s tree house came into view. 
It looked like a large wooden crate, perched in the lowest limb of an old oak 
tree. A rope ladder connected it to the ground. 

Were they there? Courtney and Denise? 

I couldn’t see them. 

I took a few more steps, pushing tall weeds out of the way as I came 
nearer. “Ow,” I muttered as something prickled my shoulder. Glancing 
down, I carefully pulled two burrs from the sleeve of my T-shirt. 

Then I kept walking, trying to be silent as I moved nearer the tree 
house. 

I stopped when I heard voices. Girls’ voices. 

And then I saw Courtney and Denise. They were just ahead of me, 
walking in the woods. 

I ducked low behind a clump of thick shrubs. 

They were only a few feet in front of me. Had they seen me? 

No. 

They were talking excitedly, having some kind of heated discussion. I 
watched them through the shrub. They were both wearing blue midriff tops 
and white denim shorts. Twins. 

They were walking slowly in the other direction, casually pulling up 

weeds and wildflowers as they walked. 

Great! I thought. This is perfect ! 

I knew this was the day! 

I turned and silently hurried away. I couldn’t wait to get back to my 
friends. 

I found them in the same spot, still huddled around the dog. 
“Buttercup, do your stuff!” I cried excitedly, grinning and waving as I ran 
up to them. 

“You mean they’re there?” Hat asked, surprised. 

“They’re there,” I said breathlessly, “waiting to be scared.” 

“Great!” Molly and Charlene exclaimed. Charlene tried to tug 
Buttercup to his feet. 

“Wait,” I said. I grabbed the brown paper bag from Hat. “Before 
Buttercup gets up, let’s put this on first.” 

I pulled out the can of shaving cream I had brought. 

“What’s that for?” Hat demanded. 

“I thought we’d smear shaving cream around his mouth,” I explained. 
“You know. Make him look like he’s frothing. Rabid dogs always froth at 
the mouth. When they see a growling dog frothing up white stuff as he 
attacks them, Courtney and Denise will drop dead!” 

“Excellent!” Molly cried, slapping me on the back. “That’s really 
excellent!” 

Everyone congratulated me. Sometimes I do have great ideas, I have to 
admit. 

Buttercup lumbered to his feet. He started pulling Charlene toward the 
clearing. 

“Let him get closer to them,” Charlene whispered loudly, as the big 
dog trotted through the trees, dragging her with him. “Then we’ll smear the 
stuff on and let him loose.” 

Molly, Hat, and I followed close behind. A short while later, we were 
at the edge of the clearing. We stopped behind the tall, thick shrubs and 
squatted down. We were completely hidden from view there. 

Courtney and Denise had stepped into the clearing. They were 
standing in the tall grass, their arms crossed over their chests, their heads 
bowed as they discussed whatever it was they were discussing. 

We could hear the murmur of their voices, but we weren’t close 

enough to hear what they were saying. Behind them, we could hear the 
creek trickling past in its muddy bed. 

“It’s showtime, Buttercup,” Charlene whispered, bending down to 
unleash the dog. She turned back to us. “As soon as he heads into the 
clearing, I’ll start whistling.” 

Gripping the shaving cream can, I sprayed a thick puddle of white 
lather into my hand. 

Suddenly I heard a sound behind us in the trees. 

A rustling, crackling sound. Something running over the dry leaves 
and twigs. A squirrel appeared in a break between the shrubs. 

Buttercup saw it, too. As I leaned over and reached out my hand to smear the shaving cream on his mouth, the big dog took off. 

I toppled over onto my face. 

I looked up in time to see the dog bolting for the trees, chasing after the squirrel. 

My three friends were already on their feet. “Buttercup! Buttercup! Come back!” Charlene was shouting. 

I climbed to my feet. I had shaving cream smeared over the front of my T-shirt. Ignoring it, I turned and ran into the trees after them. 

They were already pretty far ahead of me. I couldn’t see them. But I could hear Charlene yelling, “Buttercup! Come back! Buttercup—where are you?” 

17 

I ran as fast as I could and caught up with my friends. “Where—where’s Buttercup?” I asked breathlessly. 

“Over there somewhere, I think,” Charlene replied, pointing to a thick clump of trees. 

“No. I think I heard him over there,” Hat said, pointing in the opposite direction. 

“We can’t lose him,” I said, struggling to catch my breath. “He’s too big to lose.” 

“I didn’t know he could run that fast,” Charlene said unhappily. “He really wants to catch that squirrel.” 

“Doesn’t he know he has a job to do?” Molly asked, searching the trees. 

“I—I shouldn’t have let go of the leash,” Charlene moaned. “Now we’ll never catch the big oaf.” 

“Sure we will,” I replied, trying to sound cheerful. “He’ll come back to us after the squirrel runs away.” 

Dirt and dried leaves had stuck to the shaving cream when I fell over. Now I had a big, dark smear on my T-shirt. I wiped at it with my hand as my eyes searched the woods for Buttercup. 

“We’d better split up,” Charlene said. She looked really worried. “We’ve got to find him before he gets into some kind of trouble. He isn’t used to the woods.” 

“Maybe he’s by the creek,” Molly suggested, straightening her glasses. She had a twig caught in her hair. I pulled it out for her. 

“Let’s stop talking and go find him,” I urged impatiently. “Maybe we can still scare Courtney and Denise with him.” 

I’m always the optimist in the group. 

“Let’s just find him,” Charlene murmured, a tight, worried expression on her face. “If anything happens to Buttercup...” She was too upset to finish her sentence. 

We split up. I took the path that led toward the creek. I began jogging, 
pushing away low tree branches as I made my way along the twisting path. 

“Buttercup! Buttercup!” I called in a loud whisper. 

How could that dumb dog mess us up like this? How could he be so 
irresponsible? 

“Ow!” A sharp thorn tore through my wrist as I ran past a large 
bramble bush. I stopped to examine the cut, breathing hard. A small 
teardrop of bright red blood appeared on my wrist. 

Ignoring it, I resumed my search. “Buttercup! Buttercup?” 

I should be pretty near the creek by now, I realized. But I couldn’t hear 
the sound of the water. 

Was I on the right path? Had I gotten turned around somehow? 

I began running faster, jumping over a fallen log, pushing my way 
through tall reeds. The ground became soft and marshy. My sneakers were 
sinking into soft mud as I ran. 

Shouldn’t the clearing be right up ahead? 

Shouldn’t the creek be on this side of the clearing? 

I stopped. I leaned over, struggling to catch my breath, resting my 
hands on my knees. 

When I looked up, I realized I was lost. 

I gazed up to find the sun. Perhaps I could recapture my sense of 
direction. But the trees were too thick. Little sunlight filtered through. 

“I’m lost,” I said out loud, more startled than frightened. “I don’t 
believe it. I’m lost in the woods.” 

I spun around, searching for something familiar. Slender, white¬ 
trunked trees nearly formed a thick fence behind me. Darker trees 
surrounded me on the three other sides. 

“Hey—can anyone hear me?” I cried. My voice came out shrill and 
frightened. 

“Can anyone hear me?” I repeated, forcing myself to shout louder. 

No reply. 

A bird cawed loudly overhead. I heard fluttering wings. 

“Hey, Hat! Molly! Charlene!” I called their names several times. 

No reply. 

A cold shiver rolled down my back. “Hey, I’m lost!” I shouted. “Hey 
—somebody!” 

And then I heard the crunch of footsteps to my left. Heavy footsteps. 
Coming toward me rapidly. 

“Hey, guys—is that you?” I cried, listening hard. 

No reply. The heavy footsteps moved closer. 

I stared into the dark trees. 

I heard the caw of another bird. More fluttering wings. 

Heavy footsteps. Dry leaves crunching. 

“Buttercup—is that you? Hey—Buttercup?” 

It had to be the dog. I took a few steps toward the approaching sounds. 

I stopped when the dog stepped into view. 

“Buttercup?” 

No. 

I gasped as I stared into the glaring red eyes of another dog. An 
enormous, mean-looking dog, nearly as tall as a pony, with smooth, black 
fur. 

It lowered its sleek head and snarled at me, its red eyes glowing 
angrily. “Nice doggie,” I said weakly. “Nice doggie.” It bared its teeth and 
let out a terrifying growl. Then it took a running start and, snarling with 
fury, leapt at my throat. 

18 

“Hey!” An alarmed voice called out from somewhere behind me. 

The snarling dog appeared to stop in midair. 

Its eyes still glowing like hot coals, it landed hard on all four legs. 

“Hey—go away!” the voice cried. 

I turned to see Hat running toward me, swinging a long stick in one hand. “Go away, dog!” Hat shouted. 

The dog lowered its head and let out a growl, its eyes still on me. It took a reluctant step back, its smooth black tail tucked between its heavy legs. It took another step back. Then another. 

“Go away!” I took up the cry. “Go away!” 

I don’t know if it was because there were now two of us, or whether it was the stick Hat was swinging in front of him—but the enormous creature suddenly turned and loped off into the trees. 

“Oh, wow,” I moaned. “Wow. Wow. That was close.” I suddenly realized I’d been holding my breath for so long, my chest hurt. I let it out in a loud whoosh. 

“Are you okay?” Hat asked. 

“Yeah, I guess,” I replied shakily. “Thanks for saving my life.” 

He stared into the trees where the dog had disappeared. “Was that a dog or a horse?” Hat cried. “He looked mean enough, didn’t he?” 

I nodded. My throat suddenly felt very dry. It was hard to talk. I knew I’d be seeing that growling beast again, in nightmares. 

“Did you find Buttercup?” I managed to ask. 

Hat kicked at a fallen tree trunk. He shook his head. “No. Not yet. Charlene’s getting a little ballistic.” 

“I—I know how she feels,” I stammered. I glanced to the trees. For some reason, I thought I saw the big, black dog coming back for me. 

But it was just a gust of wind, shaking the leaves. 

“We’d better get back,” Hat said, giving the tree trunk a final kick. 

I followed him along the path. It curved and then sloped downhill. Little creatures rustled the dry leaves at our feet. Chipmunks, I thought. 

I didn’t pay any attention to them. I was still picturing the enormous, growling monster, still thinking about my close call. 

We caught up to Molly and Charlene a short while later. They both looked really miserable. 

“What are we going to do?” Charlene whined. She had her hands jammed tightly into the pockets of her jeans. She looked about to cry. “I can’t go home without Buttercup!” she wailed. “I can’t!” 

“I’ll bet your dog went home,” Molly said. “I’ll bet that stupid dog is home already.” 

Charlene’s face brightened a little. “Do you think so? You don’t think he’s lost in the woods?” 

“Dogs don’t get lost,” I offered. “Only people get lost.” 

“He’s right,” Hat agreed. “Dogs have a great sense of direction. Buttercup is probably at home.” 

“Let’s go check it out,” Molly urged, putting a comforting hand on Charlene’s shoulder. 

“And what if he isn’t there?” Charlene demanded miserably. “Then what?” 

“Then we’ll call the police and ask them to help us find him,” Molly told her. 

That answer seemed to satisfy Charlene. The four of us unhappily began trudging out of the woods. 

We had just stepped out from the trees and were heading toward the street when Courtney and Denise came into view. 

They were standing at the curb. There were two dogs standing with them. 

Buttercup stood on one side of Courtney. The huge, black dog-monster sat on its haunches on Courtney’s other side. 

“Hi!” Courtney called as we went running up to them. “Do these dogs belong to any of you?” 

I just stopped and stared in disbelief. 

Buttercup was affectionately licking Courtney’s hand. The big, black dog was tenderly licking her other hand. 

“The Saint Bernard is mine!” Charlene cried happily. 

“You should hold on to his leash,” Courtney told her. “He was totally lost when I found him.” She handed Buttercup’s leash to Charlene. 

Charlene thanked her. 

“Isn’t this other dog a sweetheart?” Courtney cooed. She bent down and gave the huge black monster a nose kiss. 

That’s when I decided to give up. 

It was impossible, I saw. There was no way —no way —we would ever scare Courtney. 

It was time to admit defeat, I told myself. 

Little did I know just how scary things were soon going to get. 

19 

Icy hands, cold as death, wrapped around my neck. 

I screamed. 

Charlene laughed. “Eddie, what’s your problem? A little tense?” 

“Why are your hands so cold?” I demanded, rubbing my neck. 

She held up a can of Coke. “I just took this from the fridge.” 

Everyone laughed at me. 

The four of us were sitting in Charlene’s den a few days later, trying to 
decide what to try next. It was about eight-thirty on a Thursday night. We’d 
told our parents we were studying together for our math final. 

“I think we should just give up,” I said glumly. “We can’t scare 
Courtney. We just can’t.” 

“Eddie’s right,” Hat agreed. He was sitting next to Molly on the brown 
leather couch. I was slouched in the big armchair across from them. 

Charlene had dropped down to the shaggy white carpet. 

“There’s got to be a way,” Charlene insisted. “Courtney isn’t a robot, 
you know. She’s got to get scared sometimes!” 

“I’m not so sure,” I said, shaking my head. 

At that moment, Buttercup padded into the room, his tail wagging 
behind him. He made his way to Charlene and started licking her arm. 

“Get that traitor out of here!” I demanded sharply. 

Buttercup raised his head and gave me a long, wet stare with those 
sorrowful brown eyes of his. 

“You heard me, Buttercup,” I said coldly. “You’re a traitor.” 

“He’s just a dog,” Charlene said, defending him. She pulled the furry 
beast down beside her on the rug. 

“Dogs sure seem to like Courtney,” Molly commented. 

“Snakes and tarantulas like her, too,” I added bitterly. “There’s nothing 
Courtney is scared of. Nothing.” 

Molly suddenly got this devilish expression on her face. “Want to see 
something really scary?” she asked. She reached over to the other side of 
the couch and pulled the baseball cap off Hat’s head. 

“YUCK!” the three of us all cried at once. “Scary!” 

Hat’s dark hair was plastered to his head. It looked like wood or 
something. He had a deep red mark across his forehead made by the rim of 
the cap. 

“Hey!” Hat cried angrily. He grabbed the cap back and jammed it onto 
his head. 

“Don’t you ever wash your hair?” Charlene cried. 

“What for?” Hat replied. He got up and walked to the mirror so he 
could adjust the cap the way he liked it. 

We talked about scaring Courtney for a while longer. We were pretty 
depressed about the whole thing. We just couldn’t think of any good ideas. 

At a little after nine o’clock, my mom called and told me I had to come home. So I said good night to my friends and headed out the door. 

It had rained most of the day. Now the air was cool and wet. The front lawns shimmered wetly in the pale light from the street lamps. 

My house was four blocks away on the same street. I wished I had ridden my bike. I don’t really like walking alone this late at night. Some of the street lamps were out, and it was kind of creepy. 

Okay, okay. I admit it. I’m a lot easier to scare than Courtney. 

Cold hands on the back of my neck are enough to make me jump. 

Maybe that’s what we should try on Courtney, I thought as I crossed the street and started down the next block. Icy cold hands on the back of her neck. . . 

I was passing an empty lot, a long rectangle of tall weeds and overgrown shrubs. In the corner of my eye, I saw something move along the ground. 

A darting shadow, black against the yellow-gray ground. 

Something scurrying through the tall weeds toward me. 

I swallowed hard, feeling my throat tighten up. I started to jog. 

The shadow slid toward me. 

I heard a low moan. 

Just the wind? 

No. Too human to be the wind. 

Another moan, more of a cry this time. 

The trees all began to shake and whisper. Black shadows swept quickly toward me. 

My heart pounding, I started to run. I crossed the street and kept running. 

But the shadows were closing in. Darkening. About to sweep over me. 

I knew I’d never make it home. 

20 

I was running as fast as I could. The dark hedges and trees flew by in a blur. My sneakers slapped the wet pavement loudly. 

I could feel the blood pulsing at my temples as my house came into view. The yellow porchlight made the front lawn glisten brightly. 

Almost there, I thought. Almost there. Please let me make it inside. 

A few seconds later, I was lurching up the driveway. I darted past the front walk, along the side of the house, and up to the kitchen door. 

With a final, desperate burst of energy, I pushed open the door with my shoulder, bolted into the kitchen, slammed the door behind me, and locked it. 

Gasping for breath, my chest heaving up and down, my throat dry and aching, I stood there for a long while, leaning my back against the door, struggling to catch my breath. 

It didn’t take me long to realize that no one had really been chasing me. I knew it was all my imagination. 

This had happened to me before. 

Lots of times. 

Why am I such a scaredy-cat? I asked myself, starting to feel a little more normal now that I was home safe and sound. 

And, then, standing in the empty kitchen, waiting for my heart to stop pounding, I realized what my friends and I had been doing wrong. I realized why we hadn’t been able to scare Courtney. 

“Eddie, is that you?” my mom called from the living room. 

“Yeah. I’m home,” I called back. I hurried through the hall and poked my head into the living room. “I just have to make one call,” I told her. 

“But you just got home—” Mom started to protest. 

I was already halfway up the stairs. “Just one call!” I shouted down. 

I flew into my room, grabbed the phone, and called Charlene. She picked up after the second ring. “Hello?” 

“We’ve been doing it all wrong!” I told her breathlessly. 

“Eddie? Are you home already? Did you run all the way?” 

“We’ve been doing it all wrong,” I repeated, ignoring her questions. 

“We’ve got to scare Courtney at night! At nightl Not in the daytime. Everything is scarier at night!” 

There was a brief silence. Charlene must have been thinking about what I was saying. Finally, she said, “You’re right, Eddie. Everything is a lot scarier at night. But we still don’t have any good ideas.” 

“Yeah, you’re right,” I admitted. 

“We can’t just jump out at Courtney in the dark and yell 'Boo!”’ Charlene said. 

Charlene was right. Nighttime was definitely the right time to scare Courtney. But we needed an idea. A really good, terrifying idea. 

Strangely enough, Courtney gave me the idea herself the next morning. 

21 

We were discussing monsters at morning meeting. 

We have morning meeting to start each day. We all gather in the meeting area at one end of the classroom. Mr. Melvin leans against the chalkboard or sits on a little three-legged stool he keeps there. And we discuss all kinds of things. 

Actually, the same three or four kids have the discussion. The rest of us just sit there and pretend to listen while we struggle to wake up. 

Of course Courtney is one of the big talkers. She’s always bright and enthusiastic, even first thing in the morning. And she’s never afraid to give her opinion on anything. 

Today, Mr. Melvin was telling us how people have always believed in monsters, since very early times. “People have a need to create monsters,” he said. “It helps us believe that the real world isn’t quite as scary. The real world isn’t as scary as the monsters we can dream up.” 

He went on like that for quite a while. I don’t think anyone was really listening. It was very early in the morning, after all. 

“There are countless legends and myths, stories and movies about monsters,” Mr. Melvin was saying. “But no one has ever proven that monsters exist. Mainly because they exist only in our imaginations.” 

“That’s not true,” Courtney interrupted. She always started talking without raising her hand first. She never cared if she was interrupting someone or not. 

Mr. Melvin’s bushy black eyebrows shot up on his shiny forehead. “Do you have proof that monsters exist, Courtney?” he asked. 

“Courtney’s a monster,” someone whispered behind me. I heard a few kids snicker. 

I was sitting on the window ledge. The morning sunlight through the window felt warm against my back. Molly was beside me, trying to unstick some gum from her braces. 

“My uncle is a scientist,” Courtney said. “He told me that the Loch Ness Monster in Scotland really exists. It lives in this big lake, and it looks like a sea serpent. And people have taken pictures of it.” 

“Those pictures aren’t really proof—” Mr. Melvin started. 

But Courtney kept going. She never stopped until she’d said all she had to say. “My uncle says that Bigfoot is real, too. He’s seen photos of Bigfoot’s footprints, taken in the Himalaya Mountains.” 

There were whispered comments around the room. I glanced at Hat, who was sitting on the floor in the middle of the meeting area, and he rolled his eyes at me. 

“People don’t just imagine all the monsters,” Courtney concluded. “They’re real. A lot of people are just too scared to admit that they’re real.” 

“That’s a very interesting theory,” Mr. Melvin said, scratching his neck. “Does anyone agree with Courtney? How many of you believe in monsters?” 

A few kids raised their hands. I didn’t notice how many. I was lost in my own thoughts. 

Courtney believes in monsters, I told myself. She really believes that monsters exist. 

Slowly, an idea began to hatch in my mind. 

Monsters... monsters... 

Monsters at night. In the dark... 

Thanks to Courtney, I was beginning to get the perfect plan for scaring her. The perfect plan that had to work! 

22 

I asked Kevin to help me, and he refused. So I brought Hat, Molly, and Charlene over to beg him. 

“Let me get this straight,” Kevin said, frowning at us. “You want me and two friends to get into our Mud Monster costumes and scare some girl in the woods?” 

“Not some girl,” I told him impatiently. “Courtney.” 

“She deserves to be scared,” Charlene quickly added. “Really. She’s been asking for it.” 

It was Saturday afternoon. We were standing in my back yard. Kevin had the garden hose in his hand. He did a lot of lawn chores on Saturdays. He was about to water the flower beds. 

“The video is all finished,” Kevin said, tightening the nozzle. “I’m glad I don’t have to get into that costume and put on all that drippy makeup again.” 

“Please!” I begged. 

“It’ll be fun,” Hat told Kevin. “It’ll be really funny.” 

Kevin turned the nozzle, but no water came out. 

“The hose is tangled,” I said, pointing. “Let me untangle it for you.” I bent down and started to work the knot out of the hose. 

“Courtney and her friend Denise have this tree house in the woods by Muddy Creek,” Charlene told Kevin. 

“I know,” Kevin replied. “We did our video there. We used the tree house in the video. The Mud Monsters climbed up into the tree house to murder a guy. It was cool.” 

“Great!” Molly cried. “How about an instant replay?” 

“Please!” I pleaded. I’d been doing a lot of pleading with Kevin ever since I got the idea. 

“So you want the three of us to wait in the woods at night, right?” Kevin asked. 

I untangled the hose. Water sprayed out onto Hat’s sneakers. 

He jumped back with a startled cry. We all laughed. 

“Sorry,” Kevin said, turning the spray on the flowers. “It was an accident.” 

“Yeah. You and your friends wait in the woods. Then, when it’s really dark, you come out and scare Courtney to death!” 

“You mean we make weird sounds and stagger around with slimy mud dripping off us and pretend to chase her,” Kevin said. 

“Right,” I replied eagerly. I could see he was starting to get interested. 

“How are you going to get her to the tree house at night?” Kevin asked. 

A good question. I hadn’t really thought about that. 

“I’ll get her there,” Molly said suddenly. She’d been very quiet all afternoon. 

“You’ll pretend to be Denise?” I asked. “That didn’t work out well last time.” 

“I won’t need to be Denise this time,” Molly said mysteriously. “Don’t worry. I’ll get her there.” 

Kevin raised the hose till the strong spray rose up the side of the house. He had his back turned to me. I couldn’t tell what he was thinking. 

“Well? Will you do it?” I asked, ready to start pleading and begging again. “Will you get your friends to help out, too?” 

“What’s in it for me?” Kevin asked without turning around. 

“Uh...” I thought quickly. “I’ll be your servant for a week, Kevin,” I said. “I’ll do all your lawn chores. I’ll mow the lawn. I’ll water and weed. And... I’ll do the dishes every night. And I’ll clean your room.” 

He turned and narrowed his eyes at me. “Get serious,” he muttered. 

“No. Really!” I insisted. “I’ll be a total servant. Total! For a whole week.” 

He turned off the nozzle. The water fizzled, then slowed to a drip. “How about for a month?” he said. 

Whoa. A month was a long time. A month of doing all of Kevin’s chores and jumping at his every command. A whole month... 

Was it worth it? Was it worth turning myself into a pitiful, overworked servant for a month just to scare Courtney? 

Of course it was! 

“Okay,” I said. “A month.” 

He grinned and shook my hand. His hand was wet from the hose. 

He handed the hose to me. “Take over, servant,” he ordered. 

I took the hose from him. Water dripped onto the front of my jeans. “When do you want the three Mud Monsters to appear?” Kevin asked. “When do you want to scare Courtney?” 

“Tomorrow night,” I replied. 

23 

Fm not really sure how the legend of the Mud Monsters got started. I heard about them first from another kid when I was little. The kid was trying to scare me, and he did a pretty good job of it. 

The legend goes something like this: 

Some early settlers of our town were too poor to build houses. So they set up little huts in the woods along the banks of Muddy Creek. 

The creek was much bigger then, much deeper and wider. It wasn’t just a muddy trickle of water the way it is today. 

The people were poor and hard-working and, pretty soon, they’d built an entire village of huts along the creek. But the people in town looked down on them. They refused to help them in any way. 

The town officials refused to share the city water supply with the Muddy Creek people. The store owners refused to let them buy anything on credit. 

Many of the Creek people were going hungry. Many of them were sick. But the town refused to help. 

This all happened over a hundred years ago. Maybe even longer. 

One night, there was a terrible rainstorm. Pouring rains and hurricane winds. 

Before the Creek people could run to safety, the creek rose up. The muddy banks towered up like a tidal wave, a tidal wave of heavy, black mud. 

The mud swept over the village. It buried all the huts and all the people. Like lava from a volcano, it buried everything beneath it. 

The next morning, there was nothing left of the village. The creek rolled by, high on its muddy banks. The woods were silent and empty. 

The village and all the people were gone. 

Only not completely. 

According to the legend, once a year when the moon is full, the villagers rise up from the mud. They’re monsters now, half-dead and half- alive. They’re Mud Monsters. 

And once a year the Mud Monsters pull themselves up from their muddy graves to dance in the moonlight—and to seek revenge on the townspeople who refused to help them. 

That’s the local legend, as much as I know of it. 

Of course it isn’t true. But it’s a really good story, I think. And it’s been told again and again, passed on from one generation to the next. 

The story has scared an awful lot of kids. Including me. 

And now, on Sunday night, Kevin and his two fellow Mud Monsters were about to terrify Courtney, the girl who couldn’t be terrified. 

At a little after seven, Kevin was in the bathroom, putting the finishing touches on his costume. He had thick, brownish-orange mud caked over his face and hair. He wore a loose-fitting black shirt over baggy black jeans. His clothing was dripping with mud, too. 

I stepped into the doorway and examined him as he piled more thick goo onto his hair. “Yuck. You really look gross,” I told him. 

“Thanks, punk,” he replied. “Did you finish loading the dishwasher?” 

“Yes,” I said grudgingly. 

“And did you collect all my dirty clothes from my room and put them in the hamper?” 

“Yes,” I muttered. 

“Yes, sir,” he corrected me. “A servant should always be polite.” 

“Yes, sir,” I repeated. He had been running me ragged ever since I’d agreed to be his servant. It was truly unbelievable how many chores he found for me to do! 

But now the big moment was rapidly approaching, the moment that would make my month of drudgery worthwhile. 

Kevin turned to me. “How do I look?” 

“Like a pile of mud,” I replied. 

He smiled. “Thanks.” I followed him down to the front hall. He picked up the car keys from the little table. “I’m going to drive over and pick up my two friends,” he said, admiring his gruesome appearance in the hall mirror. “Then we’ll find hiding places in the woods. Want a lift?” 

I shook my head. “No. Thanks. I’ve got to go to Molly’s first. There’s one little detail we have to take care of.” 

“What’s that?” Kevin asked. 

“Getting Courtney to the woods,” I replied. 

24 

“Hi, Eddie. What’s going on?” Molly’s dad asked. 

We were standing in Molly’s kitchen. Her dad pulled open the 
refrigerator and removed a can of ginger ale. Then he searched the shelves, 
squinting into the light. 

“Nothing much, Dad,” Molly replied nervously. “Eddie and I are just hanging out.” 

He turned away from the refrigerator. “You two want to play some Scrabble or something?” 

“No. No thanks,” Molly replied quickly. “Not tonight, okay?” 

I glanced up at the kitchen clock. It was getting late. We didn’t have time for any long discussions with Molly’s dad. We had to get Courtney to the woods. 

“How about some card games?” her dad said, sticking his head back in the refrigerator. “You’ve been wanting me to teach you poker. I don’t have much to do tonight, so—” 

“Eddie and I have to talk about stuff,” Molly said. “And... uh... we have to call some kids.” 

Her dad looked hurt. He pulled some cold cuts from the fridge and started to make a sandwich. “You two hungry?” 

“No. We’re not,” Molly replied impatiently. She pulled me toward the den. 

“Molly, we’ve got to hurry,” I whispered. 

“Tell me about it,” Molly said dryly. She pushed her glasses up on her nose. “Here. You can listen on this phone, Eddie. I’ll go upstairs and call Courtney.” 

“What are you going to say? You’re not going to pretend to be Denise?” I was starting to feel really nervous. We should have called 
Courtney a lot earlier. We shouldn’t have waited until the last minute. 

Molly flashed me a mysterious smile. “You’ll see,” she said slyly. Then she disappeared upstairs. 

I paced back and forth in the den for a minute or so, giving Molly time enough to dial. Then I carefully picked up the receiver and held it to my ear. 

Molly already had Courtney on the phone. “Who is this?” Courtney was asking. 

“It’s Molly,” was the reply. 

I held my breath. Why was Molly telling Courtney the truth? 

“Hi, Molly. What’s up?” Courtney asked, surprise in her voice. She and Molly had never exactly been pals. 

“I heard something I thought you’d be interested in,” Molly said breathlessly. “I just heard that the Mud Monsters are supposed to appear at the creek tonight.” 

There was a long silence on Courtney’s end. Finally, she said, “This is a joke, right?” 

“No,” Molly answered quickly. “I really heard it. They said it’s a full moon, and this is the night the Mud Monsters rise up every year.” 

“Molly, give me a break,” Courtney said sarcastically. “Come on. Why’d you call me?” 

She isn’t buying it, I thought, gripping the phone tightly, too nervous to breathe. Courtney isn’t buying it. Molly’s idea is a flop. 

“Well, Courtney, you said in school that you believed in monsters,” Molly said. “And so when I heard about the Mud Monsters, I thought you would be really desperate to see them.” 

“Where did you hear about this?” Courtney demanded suspiciously. 

“On the radio,” Molly lied. “I just heard it on the radio. They said the Mud Monsters were going to rise up in the woods tonight when the moon is up.” 

“Well, you go,” Courtney said coldly. “You can tell me about it in school on Monday.” 

Oh, no, I thought. Failure. Total failure. The whole plan is a bust. My brother is going to kill me! 

“Well, I might go,” Molly told Courtney, not giving up. “I mean, you don’t get a chance to see real monsters very often. But if you’re scared, Courtney, you should stay home.” 

“Huh? What did you just say?” Courtney demanded, her voice rising shrilly. 

“I said,” Molly repeated, “if you’re too scared, you definitely should stay away from the woods.” 

“Me? Scared?” Courtney’s voice was almost high enough for only dogs to hear. “I’m not scared of any Mud Monsters, Molly. I’ll see you there in ten minutes. Unless you ’re too scared.” 

“No. Really. Stay home,” Molly told Courtney. “I don’t want to be responsible. If you start to panic and you get hurt—” 

“See you there,” Courtney said sharply. She hung up. 

A few seconds later, Molly returned to the den with a wide, pleased smile on her face. “Am I a genius, or what?” she asked. 

“You’re a genius,” I replied. “Let’s get going.” 

25 

I felt a cold shiver as Molly and I neared the woods at Muddy Creek. The air was surprisingly cool and damp. Slender wisps of black clouds floated over the full moon, which still hovered low over the trees. 

“This is exciting,” Molly said, her eyes searching the dark trees ahead of us. “I can’t believe we’re finally going to scare Courtney.” 

“I can’t believe it, either,” I said. “I just keep wondering what will go wrong this time.” 

“Nothing will go wrong,” Molly assured me. “Stop being such a pessimist. Tonight’s the night, Eddie.” 

Charlene and Hat were waiting for us at the edge of the woods. Molly saw them first and waved. We both began jogging over to them. 

“Have you seen my brother and his two friends?” I asked, gazing toward the dark woods. 

“No,” Hat replied. 

“But we saw Courtney,” Charlene reported. 

“She and Denise were hurrying to the tree house.” 

“She brought Denise?” I cried. “Great! We’ll terrify Denise, too!” 

“Did they see you?” Molly asked Charlene. 

“No way,” Charlene replied. “Hat and I hid. Over there.” She pointed to a cluster of thick shrubs. 

The woods suddenly grew brighter. I glanced up to see that the wispy clouds had rolled away from the moon. Pale yellow light, eerie light, washed over us. 

The trees suddenly shook in a gust of wind. It sounded like whispering all around us. 

“My brother and his friends must be hiding down by the creek,” I said. “Come on. Let’s go. We don’t want to miss the big moment.” 

The four of us made our way through the trees. We tried to walk silently, but twigs and dried leaves crackled noisily under our sneakers. 

I gasped when I heard a soft moan. 

A haunting, sad cry. Mournful. 

I stopped and listened. Another moan. 

“Wh-what’s that?” I stammered in a choked whisper. 

“Sounds like a bird. A dove, maybe,” Charlene replied. 

Another moan. Yes. It was a dove, up in a tree. 

“Hey, Eddie, you’re not freaking already, are you?” Hat demanded. He 
slapped me hard on the back. “You’ve got to keep it together, man.” 

“ I’m together,” I muttered. I felt embarrassed that I’d panicked over a 
stupid dove. I was glad it was too dark for them to see me blushing. 

I reached out and flipped Hat’s cap around, just to get my mind off the 
dove. 

“Hey!” Hat cried out, spinning around angrily. 

“Ssshhh. Quiet. Courtney and Denise will hear us,” Molly scolded. 

We made our way quickly toward the tree house. The woods grew 
darker as we crept under the whispering trees. We huddled closer together 
as we walked. No one whispered or spoke. 

I heard more low moans. Soft cries. 

I forced myself to ignore them. I wasn’t going to allow myself to be 
frightened by any more birds. 

It seemed as if we had walked for hours, but I knew it had only been a 
couple of minutes. My throat felt dry, and my knees were a little shaky. Just 
from the excitement, I guessed. 

“Oh!” I cried out as I tripped over something, a raised tree root or a 
rock. I went sprawling in the dirt face first. “Ow.” 

Hat and Charlene pulled me up quickly. “Are you okay?” Charlene 
whispered. 

“Yeah. Fine,” I muttered, brushing myself off. I had landed hard on my 
right elbow, and it was throbbing like crazy. 

“Stop trying to scare us,” Charlene scolded me. 

“I’m not,” I protested. Rubbing my aching elbow, I followed them 
along the path. 

We stopped at the edge of the clearing. Keeping in the darkness of the 
trees, we stared out at the tree house. 

It was more like a platform with walls than a house. I mean, it didn’t 
have a roof or anything. Courtney and Denise were perched in it, leaning 
against one side. 

Moonlight washed over the clearing, and I could see them both clearly. 
Courtney had a pair of binoculars up to her eyes. Denise was shining a 

flashlight into the trees. She had a camera around her neck. 

Perfect, I thought, snickering to myself. They always have to be the 
perfect scientists. I was surprised they hadn’t made work sheets so they 
could check off the Mud Monsters when they saw them. Under wildlife! 

My three friends and I squatted down behind a clump of tall weeds and 
watched them. Courtney and Denise kept chatting as they peered out over 
the tree house wall. But I couldn’t hear what they were saying. 

“I can’t wait!” Hat whispered, leaning toward me. His dark eyes 
flashed excitedly under the brim of his cap. He was furiously chewing a big 
wad of gum. “Where’s your brother?” he asked. 

My eyes searched the trees that lined the creek bed just behind the 
clearing. “I don’t see him,” I whispered to Hat. “But he and his friends are 
there somewhere. And they’re going to come walking out any minute.” 

“And then the fun will begin,” Hat whispered, grinning. 

“Yeah,” I agreed. “Then the fun will begin.” 

But I had this gnawing doubt, a heavy feeling of dread. 

Where were Kevin and his friends? 

Where were they? 

And then I saw something moving behind the tree house at the edge of 
the clearing. 

26 

I grabbed Hat’s sleeve when I saw the moving shadows near the trees. 
“Look!” I whispered, my heart pounding. I pointed across the clearing. 

But I didn’t need to point. He saw them, too. We all saw them. 

Courtney and Denise were facing the other direction, unaware that 
something was happening behind them. 

I stared hard, holding my breath, keeping low behind the weeds. 

I saw a dark figure moving slowly toward the tree house. 

Then I saw another figure behind it. It seemed to be pulling itself up 
from the mud. 

A third figure staggered into the light. 

Yes! 

The three Mud Monsters! 

Kevin and his friends had come through for us! 

Courtney and Denise still didn’t see them. 

Courtney was leaning on the tree house wall, peering through the 
binoculars. 

Denise was aiming the flashlight in the other direction. 

I could see Kevin and his friends clearly now. They looked great! 

Their heads were covered with wet, dark mud. Their clothes appeared 
tattered and decayed. 

Dripping mud, they staggered forward, like zombies, with their arms 
outstretched. 

Closer. Closer to the tree house. 

Turn around! I silently urged Courtney and Denise. 

Turn around—and start screaming your heads off! 

But Courtney and Denise still didn’t turn around. They still had no 
idea the three gmesome Mud Monsters were sneaking up behind them. 

I turned and glanced quickly at my three friends. Molly and Charlene 
were frozen like statues, their mouths wide open, their eyes bulging, 
enjoying the show. Hat stared without blinking. Watching gleefully. 
Waiting. 

We were all waiting for our two victims to realize the Mud Monsters 
were approaching. 

Suddenly, as I stared at the three staggering Mud Monsters in the 
clearing, I heard a rustling sound behind me. 

Crackling twigs. The scrape of shoes against the ground. 

Footsteps. 

Low murmuring voices. 

“Huh?” With a gasp of surprise, I turned back. 

And saw three other Mud Monsters standing behind us! 

“No!” I tried to scream, but my voice came out a choked whisper. 

Hat, Molly, and Charlene spun around as the three new Mud Monsters 
moved closer. 

And I recognized Kevin in the middle of them. 

“K-Kevin!” I stammered. 

“Sorry, punk,” Kevin whispered. “But we had a flat tire.” 

27 

“Are we too late?” Kevin asked. 

I didn’t reply. I couldn’t. 

I turned back to the clearing. The three Mud Monsters were staggering 
right behind the tree house. Their sunken eyes peered out from the wet mud 
that dripped down their faces. 

And then I saw more of them. I saw arms poking up from the dirt. I 
saw mud-covered heads appear. More and more bodies rose up silently 
from the marshy ground. 

Dark figures, dripping with thick mud, pushed themselves up and 
began staggering across the clearing. Their bare feet slapped the mud as 
they walked. 

There were dozens of them now. Skinny, scraggly, twisted, mud- 
drenched bodies, all lurching toward the tree house. Dozens. And dozens 
more, pulling themselves up from under the ground. 

“Run!” I screamed, jumping out from behind the weeds. “Courtney! 
Denise! Run! Run!” 

They hesitated. Then they finally saw the hideous monsters. 

Courtney’s shrill scream rang out through the trees. 

She screamed out in terror. Again. And then again. 

She and Denise were both screaming. 

It should have been our big moment, our triumph. 

But it wasn’t. 

The two girls screamed in shrill horror. 

And then I realized we were all screaming. 

Their feet smacking wetly over the ground, the Mud Monsters 
staggered forward. 

I saw Courtney and Denise leap to the ground. 

And then I saw them running, screaming in terror as they ran. 

And then I was running, too. Running through the dark trees. Running 
from the woods. 

Running. Running. Running from the mud-covered monsters I knew 
I’d never forget, no matter how far I ran. 

Well, that all happened two weeks ago. Two long weeks ago. 

The horror is over. It’s all behind us. 

But I still don’t go out much. I really don’t like to leave the house. 
Neither do my friends. 

Yesterday, Kevin asked me if I wanted to see his Mud Monsters video. 
It’s all edited and finished, he said. 

I told him no thanks. I really don’t want to watch it. 

I’ve been very nervous and tense since that night in the woods. 

My friends have been nervous and tense, too. We’re all totally stressed 

out. 

Except for Courtney. 

You know what Courtney has been doing? She’s been bragging to 
everyone that she was right. That there really are monsters in the world. 

Courtney’s been bragging to everyone how she proved there are real 
monsters because she saw them. 

She’s worse than ever. 

My friends and I, we’d really like to give Courtney a good scare. 

We’d really like to scare Courtney once and for all. 

But we can’t. We’re just too scared. 


ONE DAY AT 
HORRORLAND 

1 

As we entered the gates to HorrorLand, we had no idea that, in just a few hours, 
we would all be lying in our coffins. 

I’m the calm one in the Morris family. Everyone says, “Lizzy, you’re the 
calm one.” And I’m trying to tell this story calmly. 

But believe me—there’s no way! 

We had never planned to go to HorrorLand. In fact, we’d never heard of it. 

The five of us were squeezed into Dad’s little Toyota, on our way to spend 
the day at Zoo Gardens Theme Park. Dad had messed up and left the map at 
home. But Mom said the park would be real easy to find. 

When we got close to the park, Mom said, there would be lots of signs to 
direct us. But so far we hadn’t seen a single sign. 

Dad was driving, and Mom was beside him in the front. I was squeezed in 
back with my little brother, Luke, who is ten, and Luke’s friend Clay. 

It wasn’t the best place to be. My brother cannot sit still for a second. 
Especially in the car. He just has too much energy. And he’s totally goofy. 

The longer we drove, the more restless Luke became. He tried wrestling 
with Clay, but there really wasn’t room. Then he tried arm wrestling with him, 
and the two of them kept bumping me until I lost my temper and started shouting 
at them to stop. 

“Why don’t you three play Alphabet?” Mom suggested from the front. 
“Look out the window for letters.” 

“There aren’t any,” Luke replied. “There aren’t any signs.” 

“There isn’t anything to look at,” Clay grumbled. 

He was right. We were driving past flat, sandy fields. There were a few 
scraggly trees here and there. The rest was all desert. 

“I’m going to take this turnoff,” Dad announced. He took off his Chicago 
Cubs cap and scratched his thinning blond hair. “Haven’t I already taken this 
turnoff?” 

Dad is the only blond in the family. Mom, Luke, and I all have straight 
black hair and blue eyes. 

In fact, Dad doesn’t look as if he belongs in the same family. The three of 
us are tall and thin, with very fair skin. And Dad is short and kind of chubby, 

with a round face that’s almost always pink. I tease him all the time because I 
think he looks a lot more like a wrestler than a bank manager, which he is. 

“I’m pretty sure we’ve already been here,” Dad said unhappily. 

“It’s hard to tell. It’s all desert,” Mom replied, gazing out her window. 

“Very helpful,” Dad muttered. 

“How can I be helpful?” Mom shot back. “You’re the one who left the map 
on the kitchen table.” 

“I thought you packed it,” Dad grumbled. 

“Why should it be my job to pack the map?” Mom cried. 

“Break it up, you two,” I interrupted. Once they start fighting, they never 
stop. It’s always best to interrupt them quickly before they really get into it. 

“I’m the Mad Pincher!” Luke cried. He let out a gruesome, horror-movie 
laugh and started pinching Clay’s ribs and arms. 

I hate Luke’s Mad Pincher routine more than anything. I was so glad that 
Clay was sitting in the middle next to Luke and not me. Usually, the only way to 
stop Luke’s pinching is to slug him. 

Clay started squirming and laughing. He thinks everything Luke does is a 
riot. He laughs at all of my brother’s stupid jokes and stunts. I think that’s why 
Luke likes Clay so much. 

The two of them began pinching each other. 

Then Luke shoved Clay into me. “Give me a break!” I cried. 

I shoved Clay back. I know I shouldn’t have. But it was getting hot in the 
car, and we’d been driving for hours, and what was I supposed to do? 

“Lizzy! Boys! Chill out back there!” Dad cried. 

“Dad, nobody says ‘chill out’ anymore,” I told him calmly and quietly. 

For some reason, that made him go berserk. He started yelling, and his face 
got bright red. 

I knew he wasn’t mad at me. He was mad because he couldn’t find Zoo 
Gardens Theme Park. 

“Everybody just take a deep breath and be silent,” Mom suggested. 

“Ow! Stop pinching me!” Clay screamed. He gave Luke a hard shove. 

“You stop pinching me!” my brother shrieked, shoving him back. 

Boys can really be animals. 

“Hey, look—a sign up ahead!” Mom pointed as a large green sign came 
into view. 

Luke and Clay stopped fighting. Dad leaned forward over the steering 

wheel, squinting through the windshield. 

“Does it say where the park is?” Luke demanded. 

“Does it say where we are?” Clay asked. 

The words on the sign came into view as we drove past it. It read: SIGN 
FOR RENT. 

We all let out disappointed groans. 

“The Mad Pincher returns!” Luke cried. He gave Clay a hard pinch on the 
arm. Luke never knows when to quit. 

“This road isn’t going anywhere,” Dad said, scowling. “I’ll have to turn 
around and get back on the highway. If I can find it.” 

“I think you should ask someone for directions,” Mom suggested. 

“Ask someone? Ask someone?” Dad exploded. “Do you see anyone I can 
ask?” His face was bright red again. He drove with one hand so he could use the 
other to shake a fist. 

“I meant if you see a gas station,” Mom murmured. 

“A gas station?” Dad screamed. “I don’t even see a tree!” 

Dad was right. I stared out the window and saw nothing but white sand on 
both sides of the road. The sun beamed down on it, making it gleam. The sand 
was so bright, it nearly looked like snow. 

“I meant to go north,” Dad muttered. “The desert is south. We must have 
gone south.” 

“You’d better turn around,” Mom urged. 

“Are we lost?” Clay asked. I could hear some fear in his voice. 

Clay isn’t the bravest kid in the world. In fact, he is pretty easy to scare. 
Once I crept up behind him in our backyard at night and whispered his name— 
and he almost jumped right out of his shoes! 

“Dad, are we lost?” Luke repeated the question. 

“Yeah, we’re lost,” Dad replied quietly. “Hopelessly lost.” 

Clay let out a soft cry and slumped in the seat. He looked a little like a 
balloon deflating. 

“Don’t tell him that!” Mom cried sharply. 

“What should I tell him?” Dad snapped back. “We’re nowhere near Zoo 
Gardens. We’re nowhere near civilization! We’re in the desert, going nowhere!” 

“Just turn around. I’m sure we’ll find someone we can ask,” Mom said 
softly. “And stop being so dramatic.” 

“We’re all going to die in the desert,” Luke said, with a gmesome grin on 

his face. “And buzzards will peck out our eyeballs and eat our flesh.” 

My brother has a great sense of humor, doesn’t he? 

You can’t imagine what it’s like having to live with a total ghoul! 

“Luke, stop scaring Clay,” Mom said, turning in her seat to glare at Luke. 

“I’m not scared,” Clay insisted. But he looked scared. His round face was 
kind of pale. And his eyes were blinking a lot behind his glasses. With his short, 
feathery blond hair and round eyeglasses, Clay looked a lot like a frightened 
owl. 

Muttering to himself, Dad slowed the car to a stop. Then he turned it 
around, and we headed back in the direction we had come. “Great vacation,” he 
said through clenched teeth. 

“It’s still early,” Mom told him, checking her watch. 

The late morning sun was nearly straight overhead. I could feel its warmth 
on my face through the open sunroof. 

We drove for nearly half an hour. Luke wanted to play Twenty Questions or 
Geography with Clay. But Clay moodily said no. He just stared out the window, 
watching the desert roll by. Every few minutes, he’d ask, “Are we still lost?” 

“Pretty lost,” my dad would reply unhappily. 

“We’re okay,” Mom kept reassuring us. 

As we drove, the scraggly trees reappeared. Then, after a while, the sand 
gave way to darker fields, dotted with trees and low shrubs. 

I sat silently, my hands clasped in my lap, staring out the window. I wasn’t 
really scared or worried. But I wished we would at least see a gas station or a 
store or one other human being! 

“I’m getting hungry,” Luke griped. “Is it lunchtime?” 

With a long sigh that sounded like air escaping from a tire, Dad pulled the 
car to the side of the road. He reached across Mom to the glove compartment. 
“There’s got to be some kind of map in there,” he said. 

“No. I already looked,” Mom told him. 

As they started to argue, I raised my eyes to the open sunroof above my 
head. 

“Oh!” I let out a cry as I saw a hideous monster staring down at me, 
lowering its enormous head, about to crush the car. 

2 

I opened my mouth to scream, but no sound came out. 

The monster glared down at me through the sunroof. It was as tall as a 
building, I realized. Its red eyes glowed with evil, and its mouth was twisted in a 
hungry grin. 

“D-Dad!” I finally managed to stammer. Dad was bent over, fumbling 
through the papers in the glove compartment. 

“Wow!” I heard Luke cry. 

I turned and saw that Luke was staring up at it, too, his blue eyes wide with 
fright. 

“Dad? Mom?” My heart was pounding so hard, I thought my chest might 
explode. 

“Lizzy, what is it?” Mom asked impatiently. 

The monster lowered its head over us. Its mouth opened wide, ready to 
swallow the whole car. 

And then Luke started to laugh. “Wow! Cool!” he cried. 

And I realized at the same time that the monster wasn’t alive. It was a 
mechanical figure, part of a giant billboard display. 

Ducking my head to get a better view through the side window, I saw that 
Dad had pulled the car up right beside the billboard. My parents were so busy 
arguing about maps, they hadn’t even noticed it! 

I stared up at the red-eyed monster. It lowered its head and opened its jaws. 
Then the jaws snapped shut, and the enormous head slid back up. 

“It looks so real!” Clay exclaimed, staring up at it. 

“Didn’t fool me,” I lied. I wasn’t going to admit that I nearly leaped out 
through the sunroof. I’m supposed to be the calm one, after all. 

I rolled down the window and stuck my head out to read the billboard in 
front of the mechanical monster. In huge red letters it said: WELCOME TO 
HORRORLAND, WHERE NIGHTMARES COME TO LIFE! 

There was a dark red arrow in the upper left-hand corner with the words: 
ONE MILE. 

“Can we go there?” Luke demanded eagerly. He leaned forward and 
grabbed the back of Dad’s seat with both hands. “Can we, Dad? How about it?” 

“It looks kind of scary,” Clay said softly. 

Dad slammed the glove compartment shut with a sigh. He was giving up on 
the map idea. “Luke, stop pulling my seat,” he snapped. “Sit back.” 

“Can we go to HorrorLand?” Luke asked. 

“HorrorLand? What’s HorrorLand?” Mom demanded. 

“Never heard of it,” Dad muttered. 

“It’s only a mile from here,” Luke pleaded. “It looks great!” 

The monster lowered its head over the car, staring in through the sunroof. 
Then it raised its head again. 

“I don’t think so,” Mom said, looking out at the huge billboard. “Zoo 
Gardens is such a wonderful park. HorrorLand doesn’t look very nice.” 

“It looks great!” Luke insisted, pulling at Dad’s seat back again. “It looks 
really excellent!” 

“Luke, sit back,” Dad pleaded. 

“Let’s go,” I urged. “We’re never going to find Zoo Gardens.” 

Mom hesitated, chewing her lower lip. “I don’t know,” she said fretfully. 
“Some of these places aren’t safe.” 

“It’ll be safe!” Luke declared. “It’ll be very safe!” 

“Luke—sit back!” Dad growled. 

“Can we go?” Luke demanded, ignoring Dad’s request. “Can we?” 

“It could be fun,” Clay said quietly. 

“Let’s give it a try,” I urged them. “If we hate it, we can always leave.” 

Dad rubbed his chin. He sighed. “Well, I guess it would be better than 
sitting here in the middle of nowhere arguing all day.” 

“YAAAAAY!” Luke screamed. 

Luke and I reached over Clay to slap each other a high five. HorrorLand 
sounded like a pretty cool place to me, too. I love scary rides. 

“If the rides are as scary as that monster,” I said, pointing at the billboard, 
“this park will be awesome!” 

“You don’t think it’s too scary—do you?” Clay asked. I saw that he had his 
hands clasped tightly in his lap. And he had that frightened owl look on his face 
again. 

“No, it won’t be too scary,” I told him. 

Oh, wow—was I wrong ! 

“I can’t believe someone would build a big theme park out in the wilderness,” 

Dad declared. 

We were driving through what seemed like an endless forest. Tall old trees 
leaned over the two-lane road, nearly blocking out the late morning sun. 

“Maybe they haven’t built the park yet,” Mom suggested. “Maybe they’re 
going to clear out these trees and build the park here.” 

All three of us in the backseat were hoping Mom was wrong. And she was. 

The road curved sharply. And as we came out of the curve, we saw the tall 
gates to the park straight up ahead. 

Behind a tall purple fence, HorrorLand seemed to stretch for miles. Leaning 
forward in my seat, I could see the tops of rides and strange, colorful buildings. 
As we drove across the enormous parking lot, eerie chords of organ music 
invaded the car. 

“YAAAAAY! This looks great!” Luke exclaimed. 

Clay and I enthusiastically agreed. I couldn’t wait to get out of the car and 
see everything. 

“The parking lot is nearly empty,” Dad said, glancing uneasily at Mom. 

“That means we won’t have to wait in long lines!” I quickly exclaimed. 

“I think Lizzy is excited about this place,” Mom commented, smiling. 

“Me, too!” Luke cried. He punched Clay enthusiastically on the shoulder. 
Luke always has to be punching or pinching somebody. 

We crossed the wide parking lot. I saw a few cars parked near the front 
gate. At the far side of the lot stood a row of purple-and-green buses with the 
word HORRORLAND across the side. 

As we rode closer, I got a good look at the front gate. The same monster we 
had seen behind the billboard rose up behind a big purple-and-green sign over 
the gate. The sign read: THE HORRORLAND HORRORS WELCOME YOU 
TO HORRORLAND! 

“I don’t get that sign,” Mom said. “What are the HorrorLand Horrors?” 

“We’ll find out!” I exclaimed happily. 

The solemn, eerie organ music floated heavily over the parking lot. Dad 
pulled into a space in an empty aisle to the right of the front gate. 

Luke and I pushed open the back doors before the car had even stopped. 
“Let’s go!” I cried. 

Luke, Clay, and I started trotting toward the gate. As I ran, I stared up at the 
green monster over the sign. This one didn’t move its head like the billboard 
monster. But it looked very real. 

I glanced back and saw that Mom and Dad were hurrying to catch up with 
us. “This is going to be way cool!” I exclaimed. 

And then I gasped as a deafening explosion made the ground shake. 

And I stared back in horror as our car burst apart, exploding into a million 
pieces. 

3 

It took me a long while to stop screaming. Finally, I swallowed hard, choking 
back my cries. 

We all stared in shock. Small chunks of twisted metal and a few burning 
cinders were all that was left of our car. 

“How—?” was all Dad managed to say. 

“I—I d-don’t believe it!” I stammered. 

“Thank goodness we were all out of the car!” Mom cried. She gathered us 
up in a big hug. “Thank goodness we’re all okay.” 

Luke and Clay still hadn’t uttered a sound. They stood wide-eyed, staring at 
the spot where the car had stood. 

“My car!” Dad choked out in a horrified whisper. “My car... How? How?” 

“We’re safe,” Mom murmured. “We’re all safe. What a terrifying explosion. 
I can’t get the sound of it out of my ears.” 

“I—I’ve got to call the police!” Dad sputtered. 

He began trotting to the gate, shaking his head, muttering to himself. 

“How could the car just blow up like that, dear?” Mom asked, hurrying 
after him. “What would make it do that?” 

“How should I know?” Dad snapped angrily. “I—I don’t get it! I really 
don’t! And now what are we going to do?” He sounded really panicked. 

I didn’t blame him. The explosion was really scary. 

And when I realized that we could have all been inside the car when it went 
off, I had cold chills down my back. 

“Maybe there’s a car rental place we can call,” Mom suggested. 

Mom is like me, calm in any emergency. 

We followed Dad as he went running up to the ticket booth at the entrance. 
A green monster stood in the booth. He had bulging yellow eyes and dark horns 
curled over his head. It was a really great costume. 

“Welcome to HorrorLand,” he said in a gruff, low voice. A loud stab of 
organ music rose up from inside the ticket booth. “I am a HorrorLand Horror. 
All of the Horrors and I hope you have a scary day.” 

“My car!” Dad cried frantically “There was an explosion. I need a phone!” 

“I’m sorry, sir. No phones,” the guy in the monster costume replied. 

“Huh?” Dad’s face was bright red again. His forehead was drenched with 
sweat. “But I need a phone! Right away!” Dad insisted, glaring angrily at the 
green monster. “My car exploded! We’re stuck here!” 

“We’ll take care of you,” the Horror replied, lowering his gruff voice nearly 
to a whisper. 

“You’ll what? Dad cried. “We need a car. I need to get to a phone! Don’t 
you understand?” 

“No phones,” the monster repeated. “But, please, sir. Allow us to take care 
of you. I promise we will take care of everything. Don’t let this spoil your visit 
to HorrorLand.” 

“Spoil my visit?!” Dad shrieked, his face growing even redder. “But my car 

_ !” 

Another loud stab of organ music made me jump. The creepy music made 
me feel as if I were actually in a horror movie! 

“We will take care of you. I promise,” the Horror said. A strange smile 
crossed his face. His yellow eyes lit up. “Please enjoy your stay, and do not 
worry about transportation. The other Horrors and I will see that you are 
properly taken care of.” 

“But—but—” Dad sputtered. 

The Horror gestured toward the park. “Please enter as our guests. Free 
admission. I apologize for your car. But, please, do not worry. I promise you will 
have no need to worry about your car.” 

Dad turned back to us, sweat dripping down his forehead. I could see that 
he was really upset. “I—I can’t enjoy an amusement park now,” he said. “I can’t 
believe this happened. I really can’t. We’ve got to get a car somehow, and—” 

“Oh, please, Dad!” Luke cried. “Please! Can’t we go inside? He said he’ll 
take care of it for us.” 

“Just for a little while?” I joined my brother in pleading. 

“We’ve had such a long drive,” Mom told Dad. “Let’s go in for a short 
while. Let them blow off some steam.” 

Dad thought about it, frowning hard. “Okay. Just for a little while,” he 
agreed finally. 

The organ music grew louder as we stepped through the gate. “Wow! Look 
at this place!” I cried. “It really is like being in a horror movie.” 

We were standing on a brown cobbled street. Strange dark cottages tilted up 
on both sides of the street. Tall trees along the street nearly blocked out all the 

sunlight. The air carried a chill. 

Low howls, like wolf howls, floated out from the cottages. 

“Cool!” Luke declared. 

A sign proclaimed: WELCOME TO WEREWOLF VILLAGE. DO NOT 
FEED THE WEREWOLVES. IF YOU CAN HELP IT. 

The frightening howls grew louder. 

Luke and I laughed at the sign. 

I saw a green monster, one of the Horrors, staring out at us through a dark 
window in the cottage across the narrow street. Another Horror walked past 
carrying a very real-looking human head. He grasped it by its long blond hair 
and bounced it up and down, sort of like a yo-yo, as he walked. 

“Cool!” Luke proclaimed again. It seemed to be his word of the day. 

We walked along the cobbled street. The sound of our thudding sneakers 
echoed off the cottage walls. 

“Ohh!” We ah let out cries of surprise as a long, low, gray wolf ran in front 
of us. It disappeared around the side of a cottage before we really got a good 
look at it. 

“Was that a real wolf?” Clay asked, his voice shaking. 

“Of course not,” I told him. “It was probably a dog. Or else it was 
mechanical.” 

“Well, they certainly keep this park clean,” Mom said, trying to sound 
cheerful. “There isn’t a piece of trash or dirt anywhere. Of course, it isn’t very 
crowded.” 

Dad lingered behind. “I—I’ve got to find a phone,” he said fretfully. “I 
can’t enjoy this until I know we have a way to get home.” 

“But, dear—” Mom started. 

“There’s got to be a phone somewhere,” Dad interrupted. “Go on without 

me.” 

“No. I’ll come with you,” Mom said. “You’re in such a frantic state. You’ll 
need me to make the calls for you. The kids will have a better time without us 
hanging around anyway.” 

“Leave them?” Dad cried. “You mean, let them go on their own?” 

“Of course,” Mom said, hurrying back to him. “They’ll be perfectly fine. 
This looks like a very nice place. What could happen?” 

What could happen? 

With those words, Mom and Dad rushed off to find a phone. 

“Meet back here!” Mom called to us. 

Luke, Clay, and I were suddenly on our own. 

I turned to watch Mom and Dad hurry away. 

I turned back in time to see a gray wolf edging out from behind the cottage. 
It lowered its head and let out a rumbling warning growl. 

All three of us froze as we realized its hungry red eyes were locked on us. 

4 

I cried out and pulled Luke and Clay back. 

The wolf slithered out, holding its head low, glaring up at us with wide red 
eyes, its mouth open hungrily. 

“It—it’s real!” Clay declared, swallowing hard. I had my hand on his 
shoulder. I could feel him trembling. 

The wolf let out a deep growl. 

Then it slid back behind the cottage wall. 

“I think it’s some kind of robot or something,” I told Clay. 

“Let’s go somewhere else,” Clay replied, suddenly very pale. 

“What does that sign up there say?” Luke asked. He went running over the 
dark cobblestones to the sign, and Clay and I followed. 

The sign read: NO PINCHING. 

Luke laughed. “That’s stupid.” 

“What a dumb sign!” Clay agreed. 

“That sign was meant just for you, Luke!” I exclaimed. I gave him a hard 
pinch on the arm. 

“Hey! Can’t you read?” he shouted angrily, pointing to the sign. 

I saw a green Horror watching us from down the street. Then I saw a family 
making its way behind the row of cottages. There was a mother, a father, and a 
little girl. The little girl was crying for some reason. The parents had their hands 
on her shoulders and looked very upset. 

A wolf howl cut through the air. 

“Let’s find some rides!” Clay suggested. 

“Some scary rides!” Luke added. 

Walking side by side, keeping close together, we made our way out of the 
Werewolf Village. The street widened into a round plaza. Bright sunlight 
returned as soon as we stepped out of the village. 

Several purple-and-green buildings surrounded the plaza. I saw a few more 
families and several green-costumed Horrors keeping an eye on everything. A 
pudgy Horror behind a purple-and-green cart was selling ice cream cones 
—black ice cream! 

“Yuck!” Luke declared, making a face. 

We hurried past the cart, past another no pinching sign, and stopped in front 
of what appeared to be a tall purple mountain. 

“It’s a ride!” I told them. 

A doorway was cut into the side of the mountain. 

And above the doorway was a sign: DOOM SLIDE. WILL YOU BE THE 
ONE TO SLIDE FOREVER? 

“Cool!” Luke cried, slapping Clay a high five. 

“Til bet you climb to the top, then slide all the way down,” I said, pointing 
to the top of the mountain-shaped building. 

“Let’s go!” Luke cried excitedly. 

We ran to the building, then through the open doorway in its side. It was 
dark and cold inside. A wide ramp curved up toward the top. 

I could hear kids squealing and laughing, but I couldn’t see them. The three 
of us half walked, half ran up the ramp, eager to get to the top. 

About halfway up, we stopped to read another sign: WARNING! YOU 
MAY BE THE ONE TO SLIDE TO YOUR DOOM! 

Now I could hear kids screaming as they slid down. But it was too dark to 
see anything. “Are you scared, Clay?” I asked, noticing his tight expression. 

“No way!” he insisted, embarrassed by my question. “I’ve seen these things 
before. They’re like really huge sliding boards. You just sit on them and slide 
down.” 

“Hurry!” Luke shouted, running ahead of us. 

“Hey—wait up!” I called. I followed them to the top of the ramp. We found 
ourselves on a wide platform. A row of long, curving sliding boards stretched to 
the end of the platform. The sliding boards were numbered from one to ten. 

In the dim light, I saw two Horrors watching us approach. They stood in 
front of the sliding boards. Their bulging yellow eyes lit up as we hurried over to 
them. 

“Do you slide all the way down?” Luke asked one of them. 

The Horror nodded. 

“Do you go really fast?” Clay asked, lingering a few feet behind us. 

The Horror nodded again. “It’s a long way down,” he rumbled. 

“Be careful which slide you pick,” the other Horror warned. “Don’t pick the 
Doom Slide.” He gestured to the number painted in black in front of each slide. 

“Yes. Don’t pick the Doom Slide,” his partner repeated. “You’ll slide down 
forever and ever.” 

I laughed. 

He was just trying to scare us— wasn’t he? 

5 

I chose slide number three because three is my lucky number. Luke sat down on 
top of the slide next to mine, slide number two. And Clay scrambled over to the 
far end and dropped down onto slide number ten. 

I glanced back to see what the Horrors were doing. But before I could focus 
on them, I felt the bottom tilt underneath me. 

I let out a long, high-pitched shriek as I began to slide. 

I raised my arms over my head, leaned back, and screamed all the way 
down. My cries echoed in the enormous dark canyon of the Doom Slide 
building. 

It felt great. The slide curved and curved, and I swirled down in the 
darkness, faster and faster. 

In the shadowy light, I could see Luke in the slide next to mine. He was 
lying on his back, staring straight up with his mouth wide open. 

I tried to call out to him. But the slide curved away, and I curved with it. 

Down, down. 

I was sliding so fast, the darkness became a solid blur. 

The slide curved up, then around, then down again. I’m a human roller 
coaster, I thought happily. 

Down, down. Darker and darker. 

I’m sliding faster than the speed of light, I thought. 

I glanced from one side to the other, trying to see Luke and Clay. But it was 
too dark, and I was moving too fast. 

Too fast. 

And then, bump. 

A chute opened up. I hit the ground hard, landing on the seat of my jeans. 

Outside. I was back outside. 

Bump. 

Luke bounced out beside me. He hit the ground, still lying on his back, and 
made no attempt to get up. He grinned up at me. “Where am I?” 

“Back on the ground,” I told him, climbing to my feet. I brushed off the 
back of my jeans, then reached behind my head to straighten my braid. “Great 
ride, huh?” 

“Let’s go again,” Luke said, still lying there. 

“We can’t go again if you don’t get up,” I said. 

“Help me.” He reached up a hand. 

I groaned as I tugged him to a sitting position. “Get up yourself,” I said 
impatiently. 

“You were screaming in there,” he told me. 

“I did it on purpose,” I said. “I wanted to scream.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” He rolled his eyes. Then he pulled himself to his feet. “Wow. 
I’m a little dizzy. How fast do you think we were going?” 

I shrugged. “Pretty fast, I think. It’s so dark in there, it’s hard to know how 
fast you’re going.” 

And then I realized we were missing a member of our sliding party. I stared 
at the closed chutes on the wall of the building. “Hey—where’s Clay?” 

“Huh?” Luke had forgotten about him, too. 

We both stared at the side of the building, waiting for Clay to pop out. 

“Where is he?” Luke demanded shrilly. “He couldn’t be that much slower 
than us—could he?” 

I shook my head. I was starting to feel really nervous. I had a heavy feeling 
in the pit of my stomach. And my hands were suddenly cold and clammy. 

“Come on, Clay,” I pleaded, staring at the wall. “Come on out.” 

Luke scratched his black hair. “Where’d he go?” he asked. “Why didn’t 
Clay come out?” 

“Maybe he came out the front,” I said. “Maybe slide number ten dumps you 
out in front. Let’s check it out.” 

As we ran around the building toward the front, I scolded myself for getting 
scared so easily. Of course Clay came out in a different chute. He was probably 
waiting for us in front of the building. He was probably worried about us. 

As we rounded the purple building, the wide, circular plaza came into view. 
I searched for Mom and Dad, but they weren’t there. I saw a couple of other 
families on the other side of the circle, and the pudgy green Horror leaning on 
his ice cream cart. 

No sign of Clay. 

Luke and I kept running, up to the front entrance of the Doom Slide. We 
stopped a few feet from the dark opening. 

“He isn’t here!” Luke cried, struggling to catch his breath. 

I was breathing hard, too. And the heavy feeling of dread in my stomach 

grew even heavier. “No. No Clay,” I muttered. 

“What are we going to do?” Luke asked. His blue eyes were wide with fear. 

I saw a green Horror woman standing just inside the entrance. “Hey!” I 
called as I ran over to her. “Did you see a kid come out of there?” I asked 
breathlessly. 

The yellow eyes on the Horror’s mask bulged and appeared to light up. 
“No. This is the entrance. No one comes out here,” she replied. 

“He’s blond and sort of chubby. He wears glasses,” I told her. “He’s 
wearing a blue T-shirt and denim shorts.” 

The Horror shook her head. “No. No one comes out this way. Did you 
check the back? Everyone comes out the back.” 

“He didn’t!” Luke said shrilly. “We were there. He didn’t come out.” My 
brother’s voice was high and squeaky. He was breathing so hard, his chest was 
heaving up and down. He was in a panic. 

I was frightened, too. But I knew I had to stay calm. For Luke’s sake. 

“He didn’t come out the back,” I told the Horror, “and he didn’t come out 
the front. So what happened to him?” 

The Horror was silent for a long moment. Then she said in a low voice just 
above a whisper, “Maybe your friend chose the Doom Slide.” 

6 

I stared at the woman in the Horror costume. “You—you’re joking, right?” I 
stammered. “I mean, the Doom Slide—that’s just a joke.” 

She stared back with her bulging yellow eyes and didn’t reply. “The signs 
give a warning,” she said. “There’s always a warning.” 

She turned and disappeared into the dark entrance. Luke and I goggled at 
each other. I swallowed hard. My throat suddenly felt very dry. My hands were 
cold as ice now. 

“This is stupid,” Luke muttered. He jammed his hands into his jeans 
pockets. “It’s just a dumb slide. Why is she trying to scare us?” 

“I guess that’s her job,” I told him. 

“We’ve got to find Mom and Dad,” Luke muttered. 

“We’ve got to find Clay first,” I told him. “If Mom and Dad find out we lost 
Clay, they’ll get angry and make us go home as soon as we find him.” 

“If we find him,” Luke said glumly. 

I glanced back across the plaza. No Mom and Dad. Two teenagers were 
buying black ice cream cones from the Horror at the cart. Two Horrors were 
sweeping the plaza with push brooms, working side by side. 

Far in the distance, I could hear the howl of a wolf from the Werewolf 
Village. 

The sun was high in the sky now. I could feel it beaming down on top of my 
head and on my shoulders. But I still felt cold all over. 

“Clay—where are you?” I asked, thinking out loud. 

“He’s sliding forever,” Luke said, shaking his head. “Sliding forever and 
ever on the Doom Slide.” 

“That’s dumb,” I replied. But Luke had given me an idea. “Come on,” I 
said, tugging the sleeve on his T-shirt. I started pulling him to the dark entrance. 

“Huh? Where?” Luke pulled back. 

“We’ll go on the slides again,” I told him. 

His mouth dropped open in protest. “Without Clay? We can’t go on it again 
without Clay.” 

“We’re going to find Clay,” I said, grabbing his arm this time and pulling 
him to the dark open doorway. 

“You mean—?” My brother was starting to catch on. 

I nodded. “Yes. We’ll follow him. We’ll take the same slide he took.” 

“Slide number ten,” Luke murmured. And then he added in a solemn 
whisper, “The Doom Slide.” 

“We’ll take it, and it will lead us right to him,” I said. 

We climbed the ramp in silence. The rapid thud of our sneakers echoed in 
the vast hollow mountain. 

We ran past the sign about halfway up to the top. I read it again as I passed 
it by: WARNING! YOU MAY BE THE ONE TO SLIDE TO YOUR DOOM! 

Clay—are you still sliding? I wondered. 

I shook my head hard, shaking away the thought. Of course he wasn’t still 
sliding. What a stupid idea! 

The two Horrors were still standing at the top of the slides. “Be careful 
which slide you pick,” one of them warned. 

“We know which one we want,” I said breathlessly. “Slide number ten. 
Both of us. Together.” 

The Horror nearest the slide motioned for us to sit down. I glanced at Luke, 
who stood right behind me, his features tight with fear. 

He tugged me back a few steps. “Maybe we shouldn’t,” he whispered. 

“Why not?” I demanded impatiently. 

“What if the warning is true ? ” Luke demanded. 

“Don’t be dumb,” I scolded him. “This is an amusement park—remember? 
They don’t kill kids or send them sliding to their doom. It’s all for fun!” 

Luke swallowed hard. “You sure?” 

“Of course I’m sure,” I replied. “Now, do you want to find Clay or not?” 

Luke nodded. 

“Then let’s go,” I ordered. 

I sat down at the top of slide number ten. Luke plopped down right behind 
me, stretching his legs outside of mine. 

I felt the floor tilt up beneath us. 

We started to slide. 

“Clay, here we come!” I cried. 

7 

I didn’t scream this time. I clasped my hands in my lap and gritted my teeth. 

There was no way I was going to enjoy this ride. I just wanted to get to the 
end of it. I wanted to solve the mystery and find Clay. 

As we slid down together, Luke grabbed onto me, his hands gripping my 
waist. He cried out when we slid over a big bump, and it felt as if we were going 
to go flying off the slide. 

Then we both screamed as the slide took a steep dive—almost straight 
down—and we started to fall. 

We landed hard, and then the slide curved sharply to the right. We were 
both screaming our lungs out now. 

We were sliding faster and faster, in total darkness, blacker than black. I 
tried to see if we were moving alongside the other slides. But it was so dark, I 
couldn’t even see my sneakers in front of me! 

Luke squeezed my waist so hard, I could hardly breathe. I tried to tell him 
to loosen his grip, but he was screaming too loud to hear. 

Down, down. 

Darker and darker. 

We hit another bump that sent us bouncing up into the air. Then the slide 
dipped and curved sharply to the left. 

We should be at the bottom by now, I realized. 

We’d been sliding a very long time. 

I gritted my teeth harder and tried to brace myself to go flying out the chute 
and bumping onto the ground. 

But no chute opened. 

The ride didn’t end. 

We began to slide faster. I gasped in mouthfuls of the hot, damp air, 
struggling to catch my breath. 

The slide dipped and curved, sending us down into the thick, heavy 
blackness. 

We’re going to slide forever. 

The warning sign didn’t lie. 

I struggled to force those frightening thoughts from my mind. 

Luke suddenly got very quiet. “Are you okay?” I called back to him. 

“I don’t know,” he replied, holding on even tighter. “Why are we sliding so 
long?” 

“You’re hurting me!” I cried. 

He loosened his hold a little. “I don’t like this!” he shouted in my ear. 

We hit another bump. His hands flew off me. 

Another bump. Even harder. I thought I was going to fly off the slide and 
fall to the bottom—if there was a bottom. 

Down, down. 

Luke and I both cried out in disgust as something sticky covered our faces. 
I reached up with both hands and tried to pull it off. 

“Yuck!” Luke screamed. “What is it? My face—!” 

“It’s like cobwebs,” I shouted back at him. “Hot, sticky cobwebs.” 

My whole face itched. The sticky threads covered my face like a net. I 
pulled frantically at them. 

“Oh!” I cried out as the slide took another sharp dip. 

Tearing at the sticky cobwebs, I managed to pull most of them off. But my 
face still itched like crazy. It felt as if a thousand ants were crawling around on 
it. 

“It’s so gross!” Luke yelled behind me. “My face—it hurts!” 

Down, down into the heavy darkness. 

And then a flare of bright light made me shut my eyes. 

Was it daylight? Were we heading outside? 

No. 

I forced my eyes open and squinted at the yellow light. 

And realized I was staring at blazing flames. 

The slide ahead of us was on fire! 

The yellow-and-orange flames raged up, topped by a curtain of billowing 
black smoke. 

I raised my hands to my face and started to shriek. 

We were sliding right into the blazing flames. 

“We’re going to burn up!” Luke screamed. “Help—somebody! Help us!” 

8 

I shut my eyes and felt a powerful burst of heat, almost like an explosion. 

I’m burning up! I thought. 

Burning up! 

A whoosh of cool air made me open my eyes. 

The fire was behind us now. We had sailed right through it. 

Curving gently, we slid through cool darkness. I could still see the orange 
flicker of flames reflected on the dark walls above us. 

Luke and I were both silent. I was waiting for my heart to stop thudding in 
my chest. 

“Great special effects!” Luke cried. He let out a wild laugh, a frantic laugh 
I’d never heard before. 

The fire was fake, I realized. Some kind of projection or something. 

I sucked in mouthfuls of the cool air. I had never been so terrified in my 

life. 

“When does this ride end?” Luke cried. His voice had become high and 
frightened. 

Never, I thought glumly. We really are going to slide forever. 

And as that frightening thought lingered in my mind, a chute opened in 
front of us. Daylight streamed in. 

Bump. 

I landed hard on soft grass. 

A second later, Luke dropped out behind me. 

I blinked several times, waiting for my eyes to adjust to the bright sunlight. 

Then I climbed slowly to my feet, my heart still pounding. 

A yellow-and-green sign on a wooden pole stood directly in front of us. It 
read: WELCOME TO DOOM, POPULATION: 0 HUMANS. 

Standing next to the sign was Clay. He came rushing over to greet us, a 
happy smile on his round, pink face. “Hey, guys—hey!” he called. “Where’ve 
you been?” He slapped Luke a high five. Then Luke gave him a playful punch in 
the stomach. 

“Where’ve we been?” I asked. “Where’ve you been?” 

“Right here,” Clay replied. “I didn’t know where I was. I think this is the 
other side of the park or something. So I just waited for you.” 

“We went back on the Doom Slide,” Luke explained. “We took your slide. 
Number ten. What a ride! It was so cool!” 

A few seconds ago, Luke had been shrieking in real terror. Now here he 
was, pretending he loved it, telling Clay how cool it was. 

“You picked the good slide!” Luke told Clay. “Wow! It was excellent!” 

“I was kind of scared,” Clay confessed. “I mean, the fire—” 

“Great special effects!” my brother exclaimed. “This park is awesome!” 

Luke was such a phony. There was no way he would ever admit that he had 
been worried about Clay. And no way he’d admit that the long slide to Doom 
had terrified him. 

But I was glad to see his old enthusiasm return. I really didn’t like seeing 
my brother frightened and in a panic. 

“It was kind of a long slide,” Clay said, frowning. His feathery blond hair 
glowed in the bright sunlight. “A little too long, I think.” 

“I’d like to go on it again!” Luke boasted. 

I turned and gazed around. We were definitely in another section of 
HorrorLand. Nothing looked familiar. 

Across the wide walkway, I saw several kids in bathing suits heading down 
a sandy path. A sign over the path read: HORROR RAPIDS. 

To our right, a square-shaped building made of glass reflected the bright 
sunlight. The glass walls shimmered brightly as if on fire. Squinting into the 
light, I could just barely make out the sign in front of it: HOUSE OF MIRRORS. 

“Let’s try the House of Mirrors!” Luke urged, pulling Clay by the arm. 

“Whoa! Wait a minute!” I cried. “Don’t you think we should try to find 
Mom and Dad?” 

“They’re way over on the other side of the park,” Luke replied, tugging 
Clay along with him across the pavement. “Let’s have some fun and then find 
them.” 

“They’re probably looking for us,” I said fretfully. 

“The park isn’t very crowded. They’ll find us,” Luke replied. “Come on, 
Lizzy—it looks like fun!” 

I hesitated, thinking about Mom and Dad. I stared into the white glare of the 
glass building. 

Suddenly, I felt someone tap my shoulder. 

Startled, I cried out and spun around. 

It was a green-costumed Horror. His bulging eyes stared into mine as he 
leaned close to me. “Get away while you can!” he whispered. 

He turned his eyes quickly from side to side, as if making sure no one was 
watching him. “Please — I’m serious! Get away while you can!” 

9 

I was so stunned, I didn’t say anything. I watched him run off, moving 
awkwardly in the bulky Horror costume, his purple tail dragging over the 
pavement behind him. 

“What did he want?” Clay called. He and Luke were nearly up to the House 
of Mirrors entrance. 

“He—he said we should get out while we can,” I stammered, running over 
to them. I lost them for a moment in the blinding sunlight reflected off the glass 
building. 

Luke laughed. “These Horror guys are great!” he declared. “They really try 
to scare you in this place!” 

Behind his glasses, Clay’s eyes narrowed thoughtfully. “He was kidding— 
right?” he asked quietly. “I mean, it was just a joke, wasn’t it?” 

“I don’t know,” I told him. “I guess so.” I watched the Horror disappear 
quickly behind a tall, blue, pyramid-shaped building. 

“That’s his job,” Luke insisted. “He goes around scaring people all day.” 

“Maybe he was really warning us,” Clay murmured, staring at me. 

“No way!” Luke declared. He gave Clay a hard slap on the back. “Stop 
looking so gloomy all the time. This is a great place! You like to be scared, don’t 
you?” 

Clay’s expression remained worried. “I guess,” he replied uncertainly. 

I started to tell Clay I was sure it was just a joke, but Luke interrupted. 
“Hurry up! Let’s check out the House of Mirrors. Let’s have some fun before 
Mom and Dad show up and make us leave.” 

He dragged Clay toward the entrance, and I followed. We passed another no 
pinching sign as we made our way to the shimmering glass building. 

Outside the entrance, I stopped to read the yellow-and-green sign. It read: 
HOUSE OF MIRRORS. REFLECT BEFORE YOU ENTER. NO ONE MAY 
EVER SEE YOU AGAIN! 

“Hey—wait up!” I called to the boys. They had already hurried inside. 

I stepped in and found myself in a narrow, dark tunnel. My eyes were still 
filled with the bright glare from outside. I couldn’t see a thing. 

“Luke, Clay—wait up!” I shouted. My voice echoed through the low 

tunnel. I could hear them laughing up ahead. 

I jogged blindly, ducking my head because the ceiling was so low. Finally, 
my eyes adjusted to the darkness. 

The tunnel ended, and I found myself in a narrow corridor with mirrored 
walls and a mirrored ceiling. 

“Oh!” I uttered a low cry. I could see my reflections—dozens of them. I 
seemed to surround myself! 

I stopped for a moment and adjusted my long black braid. It was always 
coming loose. Then I called again to the boys, “Where are you? Wait up!” 

I could hear them giggling somewhere up ahead. “Try and find us!” Luke 
called. More giggling. 

I made my way quickly through the mirrored walkway. The walls curved to 
the right, then the left. My reflections followed me, stretching deep into the 
mirrors, dozens and dozens of me, getting smaller and smaller, stretching to 
infinity! 

“Hey—don’t get too far ahead!” I cried. 

I heard them giggling. Then I heard a rumble of footsteps that seemed to 
come from the other side of the mirrored wall. 

I followed the corridor, walking slowly, carefully, until I saw a narrow 
opening up ahead. 

“Wait right there. I’m coming through!” I called. 

I started through the opening and— BONK !—hit my forehead on solid 
glass. 

“Ow!” I cried out as the pain jolted across my forehead, then down the back 
of my neck, all the way down my spine. 

I raised my hands to the glass and waited for my dizziness to fade away. 

“Lizzy, where are you? Try to find us!” I heard Luke call. 

“I hit my head!” I shouted, rubbing my forehead. 

I could hear him and Clay laughing. Their voices seemed to be behind me 
now. I turned back, but there were only mirrors behind me. No opening. 

My head still ached a little, but the dizziness had gone away. I started 
walking again, more carefully this time. I kept both hands out in front of me so I 
wouldn’t bump into anything again. 

I turned a corner and stepped into a different room. To my surprise, the 
floor in this room was a mirror. The walls, the ceiling, the floor—were all 
mirrors. I felt as if I were standing inside a mirrored box. 

I took a few careful steps. It felt so weird walking on my own reflection. 

I could see the tops and the bottoms of my sneakers as I walked. It made it 
really hard to walk. I kept having the feeling that I was going to fall into myself! 

“Hey, guys—where are you?” I called. 

No reply. 

I felt a sharp stab of fear in my stomach. 

“Luke? Clay? Are you there?” I saw the mouths of my reflections move as I 
called out, dozens of mouths. But only one voice came out, my voice, tiny and 
shrill. 

“Luke? Clay?” 

Silence. 

“Don’t fool around, guys!” I shouted. “Where are you?” 

Silence. No reply. 

I stared at the dozens of reflections on all sides of me. They all looked very 
frightened. 

“Luke? Clay?” 

Where had they gone? 

10 

I stared at my reflections as horrifying thoughts swept over me. 

Had the hoys really disappeared? 

Had they fallen into some kind of trap? Were they lost in the maze of glass 
and mirrors ? 

HorrorLand was too scary, I decided. It was fun to be scared. But it was too 
hard to tell whether the scares here were for fun—or for real. Were there dangers 
in this place? Or was it all a big scary joke? 

“Luke? Clay?” I called to them in a trembling voice, turning all around, 
searching for an exit. 

Silence. 

Then I heard a muffled giggle. 

Then I heard whispering voices. Nearby. 

Another giggle, louder this time. Luke’s giggle. 

They had been playing a little joke on me. “Hey, you’re not funny!” I 
screamed angrily. “Really! Not funny!” 

I could hear them both burst out laughing. “Come and find us, Lizzy!” Luke 
called. 

“What’s taking you so long?” Clay added. 

More giggling. It seemed to come from just up ahead. 

Sliding my hands along the mirrors, I followed the hallway around to the 
right. I had to duck my head to slip through a narrow opening between the 
mirrors. 

I found myself in another small room surrounded by mirrors above and 
below and on all sides. The mirrors were tilted at strange angles so that my 
reflections appeared to bounce off each other as I moved. 

“Where are you? Am I getting closer?” I called. 

The light grew dim as I made my way through this room. My reflections 
darkened. The shadows grew longer. 

“We can’t see you!” Clay called. 

“Hurry up!” Luke shouted impatiently. 

“I’m going as fast as I can!” I screamed. “Just don’t move, okay? Stay in 
one place.” 

“We are! ” Luke called back. 

“How will we ever get out of here?” I heard Clay ask him in a low voice. 

“Ow!” I bumped my head again on a section of clear glass. 

I pounded my fist angrily on the glass. 

This wasn’t any fun, I decided. It was too painful. 

“Hurry up!” Luke called from somewhere nearby. “It’s boring waiting here 
for you!” 

“I’m coming,” I muttered, rubbing my poor aching forehead. 

I turned a corner and stepped into a wider room. No mirrors here. The walls 
were all glass. I stopped to gaze around—and there was Luke. 

“Finally!” he cried. “Why couldn’t you find us?” 

“I kept hitting my head,” I told him. “Let’s get out of here. Where’s Clay?” 

“Huh?” Luke’s mouth dropped open in surprise. He spun around, searching 
for his friend. “He was standing right here,” he said. 

“Luke—I’m in no mood for any more dumb jokes,” I said sharply. “Clay, 
where are you hiding?” 

“I’m not hiding. I’m over here,” Clay called. 

I took a few steps closer to my brother, and Clay came into view. He was 
standing in deep shadows behind a glass wall, his hands pressed against the 
pane. 

“How’d you get over there?” Luke asked Clay. 

Clay shrugged. “I can’t find a way out.” 

I moved toward my brother, then stopped. I suddenly realized that he was 
behind a wall of glass. Luke and I were in different rooms. 

“Hey—where’s the opening?” I asked him. 

Luke glanced around. “What do you mean, Lizzy?” 

“You and I—we’re not in the same room,” I replied. I walked up to the 
glass wall and tapped on it with my fist. 

“Huh?” Luke’s face filled with surprise. He made his way over to me. Then 
he tapped on his side of the glass, as if making sure it really did exist. 

“How’d that get there?” he murmured. 

Clay started moving around his room, sliding his hands along the panes of 
glass, searching for the opening. 

“Stand right there,” I told Luke. “I’ll find a way into your room.” 

I followed Clay’s example. I moved slowly around the room, keeping a 
hand pressed against the glass. The light was dim. My shadow fell over the glass 

as I walked. I could see my face reflected darkly in the glass. My eyes stared 
back at me, dark and desperate. 

Before I realized it, I had made a complete circle. 

I was back where I had started. And there was no opening. No doorway. 

No way out. 

“Hey! I’m trapped in here!” Clay called shrilly. 

“So am I,” I told him. 

“There’s got to be an opening,” Luke said. “How did we get in?” 

“You’re right,” I replied fretfully. “We should be able to get out the way we 
came in.” I began to search along the walls again, moving quickly. 

My heart began to pound. I had a fluttering feeling in my chest. There had 
to be a way out. There had to be. 

Luke pounded hard on the glass. In the other room, I could see Clay jogging 
frantically around his room, pushing on the walls as he moved. 

I went all the way around twice, then stopped. 

There was no way out. 

“I—I’m trapped,” I stammered. “It’s like a box. A glass box.” 

“We’re all trapped!” Clay cried. 

Luke was still pounding frantically on the glass with his fists. “Luke— 
stop!” I cried shrilly. “That isn’t helping!” 

He lowered his fists to his sides. “This is ridiculous,” he muttered. “There’s 
got to be a way out.” 

“Maybe there’s a trapdoor or something,” I suggested. I began to search the 
mirrored floor. It was too dark to see well. The floor appeared solid to me. 

I returned to the glass wall. “This isn’t much fun,” I said glumly. 

Luke and Clay nodded. I could see they were both really frightened. So was 
I. But I decided I was two years older than them, so I had to try to be the brave 
one. 

I wasn’t feeling very brave, though. Uttering a worried sigh, I leaned 
against the wall that separated Luke and me. 

And as I leaned, the wall started to move. 

I jumped back with a sharp cry. 

The wall was sliding toward me, closing in on me. 

I took another step back. 

Glancing around frantically, I saw that all the walls were sliding in. 

“Luke!” I cried. I turned to see him backing up, too. 

“The walls!” Clay called. “Help me!” 

“They’re sliding in on me, too!” Luke screamed. “Each room must have its 
own glass walls!” 

All three of us were trapped. 

With a desperate groan, I threw myself against one of the walls and tried to 
push it back. 

But I couldn’t stop it. 

The box was closing in, growing smaller. Smaller. 

“We’re going to be crushed!” I cried. 

11 

“Do something! Please—do something!” Clay was screaming. 

Luke lowered his shoulder to the glass and struggled to stop it from 
moving. But he wasn’t strong enough. The walls kept sliding in on him. 

I backed up, my hands raised like a shield. 

Closer, closer. The glass walls moved slowly, silently. 

I backed up until my back hit the wall behind me. 

There was nowhere to go. 

“Do something! Somebody —do something!” Clay’s terrified screams rang 
in my ears. 

“The glass—it’s squeezing me!” Luke shrieked. “Lizzy!” 

“I—I can’t move!” I shouted to him. 

The panes of glass began to press in on me from all sides. Above and 
below, too. 

I suddenly pictured one of those crushed cars. 

You know. The ears that are crunched into a perfect square in those big 
compactor machines. 

My entire body shuddered as I realized I was going to be crushed into a 
perfect square, too. 

“Ow!” I cried out as the glass pressed down on me. “Somebody—help!” I 
tried to scream, but my voice came out a muffled yelp. 

It was getting hard to breathe. 

The glass panes moved in. Tighter. Tighter. 

I gasped for air. 

I tried to push with all my might against the glass. 

But it was no use. 

I was being crushed into a human square. 

12 

I couldn’t hear Luke or Clay anymore. 

I could only hear my gasping, choked breath. 

I shut my eyes. 

And felt the floor drop away. 

And before I realized what was happening, I was falling, falling rapidly 
down. 

I opened my eyes in time to see the glass walls roll above me as I slid 
down, down, down through an open chute. 

And in a few seconds, I was back outside. I landed sitting up on the grass 
with a gentle thud. 

Luke and Clay came sliding out beside me. 

For a long moment, we sat on the grass, blinking in the bright sunlight, 
staring at each other in disbelief. 

“We’re okay,” Clay said uncertainly, finally breaking the silence. He slowly 
climbed to his feet. His round face was bright red, and his glasses were crooked 
and nearly falling off his nose. “We’re okay!” 

Luke let out a laugh. A gleeful laugh. He stood up and began jumping up 
and down for joy. 

I didn’t exactly feel like jumping up and down. I was still picturing the 
crushed car. 

Luke reached down, grabbed both of my hands, and pulled me to my feet. 
“What should we do next?” he demanded, grinning. 

“Huh? Next?” I cried. “Are you for real?” 

“That was really scary,” Clay said, his face still red. “I thought we were 
going to be scrunched flat.” 

“It was awesome!” Luke declared. 

Once again, he was forgetting that a few seconds before, he’d been 
screaming in total panic. 

“It was way too scary,” Clay murmured, shaking his head. 

“Clay’s right,” I agreed. “It was too scary to be fun. One more second, 
and...” 

“Don’t you see? That’s the whole idea!” Luke cried. “That’s how they scare 

you here. It’s so awesome! They make you think that one more second and 
you’re a goner. But it’s all perfectly timed. They want you to be terrified—and 
then— poof —you’re okay!” 

“I guess you’re right,” said Clay doubtfully. He pushed up his glasses, then 
mbbed his chin. 

“We’re not really going to get hurt or anything,” Luke continued. “This is 
an amusement park, remember? They want you to come back again and again. 
So they’re not going to really hurt anybody.” 

“Maybe,” Clay said. 

“But, Luke, what if they mess up?” I asked him. “What if the machines get 
goofed up? What if the timing gets off? Let’s say the floor underneath us got 
stuck. Then what?” 

Luke didn’t reply. He stared back at me thoughtfully. 

“What would have happened to us if the floor hadn’t dropped away at the 
right moment?” I demanded. 

Luke shrugged. “They make sure everything works okay,” he answered 
finally. 

I rolled my eyes. “Yeah. Sure.” 

“Is it possible to really be scared to death?” Clay asked me, a solemn 
expression on his face. “I mean, I know it happens in books and movies. But 
does it happen in real life?” 

“I don’t know. Maybe,” I replied. 

“I’ll bet people could get scared to death in that House of Mirrors,” Clay 
continued seriously. 

“No way!” Luke insisted. “Listen to me. This is just a place for fun. Scary 

fun.” 

He was watching something over my shoulder. I turned to see one of the 
guys in a green Horror costume walking by, carrying a huge bouquet of black 
balloons. 

Luke hurried up beside the Horror. “Hey, has anyone ever died here in this 
park?” Luke asked. 

The Horror kept walking. The black balloons bobbed above his head. “Only 
once,” he told Luke. 

“One person died here?” Luke asked. 

The Horror shook his big green head. “No. Not what I meant.” 

“What did you mean?” Luke demanded. 

“A person can only die once here,” the Horror said. “No one has ever died 
twice.” 

13 

“Do you mean people have really died here?” I shouted. 

But the Horror walked quickly on, the black balloons bouncing against each 
other, floating darkly against the clear blue sky. 

The Horror’s answer made me shiver. It wasn’t just his words. It was the 
cold tone of his voice, the way he made it sound like a warning. 

“He was joking—right?” Clay asked in a trembling voice. He scratched his 
blond hair nervously. 

“Yeah. I guess,” I replied. 

A family walked past us, heading toward the House of Mirrors. They had 
two little boys with them, both about five or six, and both of them were crying. 

“I’ve seen so many crying kids in this park!” I commented. 

“They’re just wimps,” Luke replied. “Scaredy-cats. Let’s go find another 
ride or something.” 

“No, I really think we should find Mom and Dad,” I told him. 

“Yeah. Let’s go find them,” Clay said eagerly. The poor kid. I think he was 
really scared. But he was trying his best not to let my brother see how frightened 
he was. 

“Aw, what’s the hurry?” Luke protested. “Let them find us. ” 

“But they’re probably really worried,” I insisted. I started walking toward 
the front gate. 

“Dad will only make us leave,” Luke grumbled. But he followed anyway. 
And Clay gratefully came along, keeping close to my side. 

Following the trail, we passed by a rickety old wooden roller coaster. It rose 
up as high as a four-story building, casting a wide, dark shadow over the walk. A 
sign in front read: OUT OF ORDER, DO YOU DARE TO RIDE IT ANYWAY? 

The gate was open. There was no attendant. 

“Hey, Lizzy, want to ride it?” Luke asked, staring at the beat-up old cars 
parked at the bottom of the tracks. 

“No way!” Clay and I replied in unison. We kept on walking. 

The trail curved under thick trees, and we were suddenly in the shade. A 
sign read: BEWARE OF TREE SNAKES. 

Clay covered his head with his hands. All three of us raised our eyes to the 

trees. 

Were there really snakes up there? 

It was too dark to see anything. The leaves were so thick, no sunlight 
filtered through. 

Suddenly, I heard a gentle hissing sound. 

At first I thought it was just the rustle of the leaves. 

But then the hissing grew louder—until all of the trees seemed to be hissing 
down at us. 

“Run!” I cried. 

The three of us started running along the trail, ducking low, our sneakers 
thudding hard on the pavement. The hissing in the trees above us grew louder, 
angrier. 

I thought I saw a long, dark snake slithering in the grass beside the trail. But 
it might have just been a shadow. 

We kept running even after the trees ended and we were in sunlight again. 
The trail curved past a row of evil-looking statues. They were made of stone. 
They were statues of grinning monsters, eyes narrowed menacingly, fangs 
lowered from their twisted mouths. Their arms were outstretched, ready to grab 
anyone who came close. 

I slowed to a trot, my eyes on the ugly statues. Suddenly, I heard low, evil 
laughter. 

“It—it’s coming from the statues!” Clay exclaimed. “Keep running!” 

Did the statues move toward us? Did they raise their arms higher? Did they 
beckon to us to come closer? 

I’m not sure. With their evil laughter in my ears, I lowered my head and 
turned on the speed. 

All three of us were panting hard as we ran along the trail. I didn’t see any 
other people. I didn’t see anyone in a Horror costume, either. 

We slowed as we came to another sign. This one had an arrow pointing in 
the direction we were running. It read: FRONT EXIT, DON’T BOTHER, YOU 
WILL NEVER ESCAPE. 

I caught the worried expression on Clay’s face as he read the sign. “It’s only 
a joke,” I told him. “The signs are supposed to be funny.” 

“Ha-ha,” he said weakly. He was panting hard, struggling to catch his 
breath. 

Without warning, Luke jumped on Clay’s shoulders. “Hey, Clay—how 

about a ride?” 

Clay cried out angrily, “Get off!” 

Luke laughed and hung on. Clay dropped to his knees, trying to throw Luke 
off. 

“Come on, guys,” I pleaded. “Luke, stop being such a goof. We’re trying to 
find Mom and Dad.” 

But now they were laughing and wrestling on the ground. 

“Come on, guys!” I shouted, rolling my eyes. “Let’s go!” I tugged my 
brother to his feet. 

Clay’s glasses had flown off. He stopped to pick them up from the grass. 
Then we continued on our way. 

The path led past a rectangular flower garden—filled with black flowers! 
Then it suddenly came to a stop in front of a large red barn. 

The boys walked up to the open doorway of the barn. I stayed back, 
searching for a path that led around the barn. I couldn’t see one. 

“The path goes right through the barn to the other side,” Luke called to me. 
“Come on, Lizzy!” He motioned for me to join them. 

I spotted a small sign painted to the right of the barn’s double doors. It read: 
BAT BARN. 

“Hey—are there bats in there?” I called, feeling a cold shudder run down 
my back. I like most animals. But bats really give me the creeps. 

Luke stepped inside the barn. Clay hung back, standing just outside the 
door. “I don’t see any,” Luke called out to me. “It’s kind of dark.” 

A strange odor invaded my nostrils. It was strong and sour. It came from the 

barn. 

I didn’t want to go in there. 

“Come on, Lizzy!” Luke called. “The path goes right out the other side. 
Don’t be chicken. You can run straight through.” 

I stepped up beside Clay at the doorway and peered inside the barn. 

“It looks okay,” Clay said quietly. 

The sour odor was much stronger. “Yuck,” I said, making a face. “It really 
stinks.” 

Luke stood inside the barn, his eyes raised to the rafters. “I don’t see 
anything up there,” he reported. 

Doors on the opposite wall were wide open. It would only take ten seconds 
to run through the barn and out the other side, I realized. 

“Let’s go,” I told Clay. 

He and I stepped into the barn. The sour smell was overpowering. I held my 
breath and pinched my fingers over my nose. 

We started running to the doors on the opposite wall—and they slammed 

shut. 

With a gasp of surprise, I turned back to the doors we had entered. They 
slammed shut, too. 

“Hey!” I shouted angrily. 

“What’s going on?” Clay cried in a whisper. 

We were in total darkness, blacker than black. 

The sour odor swept over me. I started to feel sick. 

And then I heard the rapid flutter of wings. Soft at first, then louder, closer. 

I screamed as I felt something brush against the back of my neck. 

14 

“Go away!” I let out a low moan of horror and swung my hands wildly above 
my head. 

The rapid fluttering retreated, then returned. 

“Bats!” Clay cried in a terrified, tiny voice. I felt him grab my arm. 

“I can’t see!” Luke shouted. “It’s so dark!” 

“I—I hate bats! ” I stammered. 

I felt a cold whoosh of air as a bat flapped over my head. 

I swung my hands wildly. 

The flapping, fluttering sounds were all around us. 

As my eyes slowly adjusted to the darkness, I began to see shadowy shapes 
shooting past. Back and forth. Faster and faster. 

I felt one brush my shoulder. 

“Oh, help!” I cried. 

Clay started to shriek. “Help us! Help us!” 

“They’re zooming right at me!” Luke wailed. 

Something bumped into my shoulder. I screamed. 

“Help us! Help us!” Clay continued to plead at the top of his lungs. His 
shouts were nearly drowned out by the flapping of wings. 

I felt another bat brush against my shoulder. Covering my face, I tried to 
make my way blindly to the door. 

The sour odor choked me. My terror made my legs shaky. I could barely 
walk. 

And then I felt a hard tug in my hair. 

Another tug. Loud flapping right on my head. 

A shrill whistling hiss. So close, it could have been coming from me. 

I screamed. I screamed again. 

“It—it’s caught in my hair!” I cried, falling to my knees. 

Another shrill hiss. Another tug of my hair. 

I swung my hands. I hit it. I felt a warm body, felt the brush of fluttering 
wings. 

I shoved it hard—shoved it from my hair. 

“Ohhh, help!” I cried. 

The flapping wings and shrill whistles surrounded me. I could hear Luke 
and Clay shouting. But they seemed far, far away. 

Another one brushed my cheek. Another one bumped my shoulder. 

The shadows darted back and forth. The barn was alive with flying, 
chittering bats. 

“Ohh, help! Help us, please!” Another one brushed my face. I felt a rush of 
air, beating wings on the top of my head. “Help us! Help us!” But there was no 
one around to help. 

15 

I covered my eyes with one hand and thrashed out wildly with the other hand, 
trying to beat the bats away. 

Choking and sobbing, I could barely breathe. 

I heard Luke calling far, far away. He seemed to be behind a curtain of 
flapping, chittering bats. 

And then, suddenly, sunlight invaded the barn. 

On my knees, I lowered my hand from my eyes and saw that the barn door 
had slid open. 

Luke, standing at the door, his mouth open in shock, turned back to Clay 
and me. “I—I touched the door, and it opened,” he explained. 

Clay’s glasses were hanging off one ear. His blond hair was totally messed 
up. His eyes darted around the barn. “Where are the bats?” he cried. 

I raised my eyes to the rafters. “Hey!” I cried out. No bats. No sign of any 
bats anywhere. 

I climbed to my feet, pulling my hair back with both hands. “Let’s get out 
of here!” I cried. 

Clay and I followed Luke out of the barn. The warm sunshine felt so good! 

I was still itchy from the bats. I rubbed my shoulders and the back of my 
neck. “I hate bats! I really do!” I exclaimed with a shudder. 

“But there weren’t any bats,” Luke said, grinning at me. “It was all a fake.” 

“Huh? It was not!” Clay cried angrily. “Those were bats. I could hear them 
—and feel them!” 

“All special effects,” Luke claimed. 

“It wasn’t special effects when one got tangled in my hair!” I cried. Just 
thinking about it gave me cold shivers. 

“Special effects,” Luke repeated. “Really excellent special effects. I was 
almost scared, too.” 

“Almost!” I cried. I walked over, grabbed him, and pretended to wring his 
neck. “Almost? I heard you screaming your head off, Luke! ” 

He pulled out of my grasp, laughing. “I knew it wasn’t real. I was just 
screaming like that to scare you!” 

What a liar! I really didn’t believe my brother. He was scared. He was 

plenty scared. I knew he was! 

“They were bats, not special effects,” I insisted angrily. 

“Then where did they go when the door opened?” Luke demanded. “As 
soon as the door opened, the bats all vanished.” 

“Let’s stop talking about it,” Clay pleaded. “Let’s find your parents— 
okay?” 

“Yeah, okay,” I agreed, glaring at Luke. “You really are nuts, you know 
that?” I told him. 

He stuck his tongue out at me. 

I wanted to punch his lights out. But I try to be a nonviolent person. So I 
just gave him one hard punch on the shoulder. 

He howled in protest. “You’re stupid, Lizzy. You’re really stupid,” he 
muttered. “And you’re afraid of pretend bats!” 

I ignored him and led the way down the path toward the front gate. Two 
people in Horror costumes appeared on the path, going the other way, chatting 
enthusiastically. 

“Is this the way to the front gate?” I called to them. 

They ignored my question and walked right past us. 

“Hey!” I called to them. 

But they both kept jabbering away and didn’t even seem to see or hear me. 

The sun beamed down on us. The air had become hot and still, with no 
breeze at all. 

I wiped sweat off my forehead with one hand. I could still smell the sour 
aroma of the Bat Barn. The odor was on my hands, on my clothes. 

I saw four teenagers in bathing suits, two boys and two girls, hurrying over 
the grass toward a large brown pond. A sign came into view near the shore. It 
read: ALLIGATOR POND, FEEL FREE TO SWIM HERE. 

Luke laughed. “Are those guys crazy?” 

We stopped to watch them step into the water. 

“Do you think there are really alligators in there?” Clay asked, biting his 
lower lip. 

I shrugged. “Who knows? I don’t know what to think about this park!” 

We continued along the path. A few minutes later, I recognized the 
mountain-shaped structure of the Doom Slide. The wide, circular plaza came 
into view. It was nearly deserted. Even the ice-cream-selling Horror had 
vanished from his cart. 

“Where do you suppose Mom and Dad are?” I asked. 

“They’ve probably been looking for us for hours, and now they’re really 
mad,” Luke said, frowning. 

“Where are they?” Clay cried. He was starting to sound really stressed out. 
“We’ve got to find them.” 

“Is that them?” Luke asked. He was pointing to a man and a woman in the 
shade of a large stone fountain. 

I shielded my eyes from the sun with one hand. The woman was tall, with 
dark hair. The man was short and blond. 

“Yes! That’s them!” I cried happily. I started running to the fountain, calling 
to them, “Mom! Dad!” 

The boys came racing after me. 

“Mom! Dad! Hey!” I shouted happily. 

They both turned around, surprised expressions on their faces. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I saw it wasn’t them. I stopped short, and Luke 
bumped right into me. 

“Sorry,” I told the confused couple. “We thought you were someone else.” 

The three of us hurried across the plaza. I could hear the wail of wolf howls 
from the Werewolf Village. The ice cream cart stood lonely and deserted near the 
entrance to the Doom Slide. 

“Where are they?” Clay asked, whining. “I’m starting to get hungry.” 

“Yeah. It’s way past lunchtime,” I agreed. 

“They could be anywhere,” Luke said unhappily, kicking a pebble across 
the pavement. “They could be anywhere in this giant park.” 

I sighed. “Let’s look for them in the shade. The sun is really getting hot.” 

We headed toward the shade of the Doom Slide building. Suddenly, two 
green-costumed Horrors came into view. Their big yellow eyes bulged in front of 
their heads. 

Without thinking, I went running up to them. “Have you seen our parents?” 
I asked breathlessly. 

They stared at me in surprise. “Your parents?” one of them repeated. 

“Yeah.” I nodded. “My mom has black hair. My dad is kind of short and he 
has blond hair.” 

“Hmmmm.” The two Horrors glanced at each other. 

“Mom was wearing a bright yellow sundress,” I told them. 

“And Dad had a Chicago Cubs cap on his head,” Luke added. 

“Oh, yeah. Right,” one of the Horrors, a woman, replied. 

“You saw them?” I asked eagerly. 

She nodded. “Yeah. I remember them. They left. They left about half 
hour ago.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her in disbelief. 

“They asked me to give you a message,” the Horror said. 

“Message? What message?” I asked. 

“Good-bye,” the Horror replied. 

16 

“You’re wrong!” I cried. “They wouldn’t leave.” 

“About half an hour ago,” the Horror repeated. She shrugged her shoulders 
under the bulky monster costume. “I was at the gate when they left.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

The two Horrors turned and began walking toward a small white shed at the 
edge of the plaza. 

“Hey, wait!” I called, chasing after them. “You made a mistake. Our parents 
wouldn’t leave without us.” 

They disappeared into the shed. The door slammed behind them. 

I turned back to Luke and Clay. They stared at me blankly. 

“She was wrong,” I told them. “Mom and Dad are still here. I know it.” 

“Then why did she say—” Clay started, but his voice broke. I could see that 
he was very worried and upset. Beads of sweat ran down his pink forehead. 

Luke tried to make a joke. “I guess that means we have the whole park to 
ourselves!” he exclaimed, forcing a smile. 

“Very funny,” I replied sarcastically. “We also have no money, and we’re 
about three hundred miles from home.” 

“We could call somebody,” Luke suggested. 

“No phones,” Clay muttered. He lowered his head, shoved his hands into 
the pockets of his shorts, and turned away from us. 

“Oh, right,” Luke remembered. “They told Dad there are no phones in the 
park.” 

“That’s crazy,” I said heatedly. “They’re liars. The Horrors are all liars.” 

“I guess that’s their job,” Luke said. “Telling us lies to scare us to death. 
That’s why they call it HorrorLand.” 

“They should call it DumbLand,” Clay muttered bitterly. 

“But it’s so cool!” Luke protested. “I love being scared out of my wits. 
Don’t you?” He gave Clay a hard shove. 

“No,” Clay replied softly. He made no attempt to shove Luke back. 

“Well, she was lying about Mom and Dad,” I insisted, gazing at the white 
shed. “She was just trying to scare us. Mom and Dad are still here. We just have 
to find them.” 

“Come on, let’s go,” Luke urged. “I hope we find them soon. I’m getting 
really hungry.” 

We wandered through the park for what seemed like hours. We searched through 
dark, mysterious woods and strange monster villages. We passed through a 
carnival area with dozens of scary-looking rides. 

On the other side of Vampire Village, we passed a building marked Monster 
Zoo. It was closed. But we could hear the most terrifying grunts, howls, and 
moans coming from inside. 

A long yellow building had a sign outside that proclaimed: GUILLOTINE 
MUSEUM, PLEASE HOLD ON TO YOUR HEAD. Luke wanted to go inside, 
but Clay and I talked him out of it. 

HorrorLand was surprisingly empty. We passed several Horrors scurrying 
along the paths in their bright green costumes. And we saw a few families 
wandering around, always with crying kids. 

The rides in the carnival area were all running empty. All of the food stands 
and restaurants were empty, too. 

We walked clear across to the other end of the park. I was feeling more and 
more worried. 

Why hadn’t we run into Mom and Dad? 

Surely we should have seen them by now. 

Clay had become very quiet. I could tell he was really scared. Even Luke 
trudged along with his shoulders slumped and his head down. 

By the time we found ourselves back at the Alligator Pond, I was feeling 
pretty bad. I crossed the grassy shore and walked up to the edge of the brown 
water. 

“What do you think happened to those teenagers who went swimming 
here?” Luke asked, staring across the pond. “Think the alligators ate them?” 

“Maybe,” I replied. I wasn’t really listening to him. I was thinking about 
Mom and Dad. 

“Hey, look!” Clay cried, pointing to the water. 

I saw two long, greenish-brown logs floating toward us on top of the water. 
It took me a while to realize that the logs were alligators. 

“Big ones!” Clay declared in a hushed whisper. 

“Better step back,” I warned them. 

All three of us were standing at the water’s edge. The alligators floated 

silently just below the surface of the still water, hardly creating a ripple. 

“Mom and Dad didn’t leave without us,” I repeated for the thousandth time. 

“But we searched everywhere,” Luke said quietly. 

“They didn’t leave without us,” I said. “They would never leave without us. 
So...” I hesitated. I was thinking hard, and my thoughts were all frightening. 

“So?” Clay asked eagerly. 

“So if they’re not in the park,” I continued, “it means something happened 
to them. Something bad happened to them.” 

Clay gasped. Luke narrowed his blue eyes at me. “What do you mean, 
Lizzy?” he asked. 

“I mean maybe this place really is evil,” I said. “And maybe the Horrors or 
somebody did something bad to Mom and Dad.” 

I stared down at the brown alligator backs gliding so smoothly, so 
effortlessly toward us. 

“That’s crazy,” Luke muttered. 

I knew it was crazy. But I had no other explanation. 

“I have such a bad feeling about this park,” I told them. “A real bad 
feeling.” 

And as I said that, I felt strong hands grab me from behind and push me 
into the Alligator Pond. 

17 

I screamed. 

Then I realized I wasn’t being tossed into the water. 

The hands were holding on to my shoulders. 

I spun around. “Dad!” I cried. 

“Lizzy!” he exclaimed, still holding on to me. “Where have you guys 
been?” 

“We’ve searched this entire park twelve times!” Mom declared. She was 
standing behind us on the grass, hands pressed tensely on her waist. 

“We were looking for you!” I cried. 

“They told us you left!” Luke said. 

“We were kind of scared,” Clay added. 

We all started talking at once. I was so happy to see them. And I could see 
that Luke and Clay were really happy, too. 

I had imagined all sorts of terrible things happening to Mom and Dad. It 
wasn’t like me to let my imagination run away like that. 

But HorrorLand was such a scary place. It was impossible not to have scary 
thoughts here. 

“I want to go home,” I said. 

“Did you find a phone?” Clay asked. “Did you find a car?” 

Dad shook his head. “No. No phones. The guy in the monster costume 
didn’t lie. There are no phones in the park.” 

“But the Horrors were very nice to us,” Mom broke in. “They told us not to 
worry about a thing.” 

“They said to just come to the ticket booth when we were ready to leave,” 
Dad reported. 

Mom ran a hand tenderly through Luke’s hair. “Did you go on any rides or 
anything?” 

“We did a lot of scary stuff,” Luke told her. 

“Very scary,” Clay added. 

“I’m really hungry,” Luke said. 

Dad glanced at his watch. “It’s way past lunchtime. I think we’re all 

hungry.” 

“The restaurants and foodstands are all on the other side of the park,” Mom 

said. 

“Can we just eat lunch and then leave?” I asked eagerly. I still had a bad 
feeling about the place. I wanted to get away from HorrorLand, far away. 

“Your mom and I have spent all our time searching for you,” Dad said, 
wiping sweat off his sunburned forehead with one hand. “We haven’t had any 
fun at all.” 

“We should all at least go on one ride together before we leave,” Mom said. 

“I just want to go,” I urged. “I really do.” 

“Lizzy, that’s not like you,” Mom scolded. 

“She’s scared,” Luke told them. “She’s a chicken.” 

“Maybe there’s a ride that will take us to the front of the park,” Dad 
suggested. “We could all take it, then have some lunch and leave.” 

“That sounds good,” Mom said. She stared at me. “Okay with you?” 

“I guess,” I told her, sighing. “It’s just that the rides here are all too scary. 
They aren’t any fun.” 

Luke laughed. “They’re too scary for Lizzy—but not for Clay and me,” he 
said. “Right, Clay?” 

“I was a little scared in the Bat Barn,” Clay confessed. 

We headed away from the Alligator Pond, across the grassy shore to the 
paved walkway. A couple of costumed Horrors walked past, chattering in low 
voices. 

A girl’s high-pitched shrieks of terror floated in the air from somewhere in 
the distance. The same frightening cry repeated over and over. 

Wolf howls rose up in front of us. And from a speaker hidden somewhere in 
the trees, I heard evil laughter, a hideous cackle that repeated over and over. 

“It’s like being in a horror movie,” Mom commented. 

“Very clever,” Dad added, walking with a hand on my shoulder. “It’s 
strange that we never heard of this park.” 

“They should put some ads on TV,” Mom said. “Then they’d get more 
people to come here.” 

We passed by a tall, narrow green building with a sign in front that read: 
FREE FALL, THE ONLY BUNGEE JUMP WITHOUT A CORD. 

“Want to try that?” Dad asked, squeezing my shoulder and grinning at me. 

“I don’t think so,” I quickly replied. 

Luke was way ahead of us. He turned around and walked backward, 
waiting for us to catch up. “Mom and Dad should try the Doom Slide,” he said, 
grinning. “It’s awesome!” 

Had he really forgotten how terrified he was? 

“I don’t think they’d like it,” I said quietly. 

“Maybe we could find something that’s just a little scary,” Clay suggested. 

Dad laughed. “Are you having a good time, Clay?” 

Clay hesitated. “A little,” he replied finally. 

“I’m having a great time!” Luke declared. 

The path curved along a narrow brown river. Millions of tiny white insects 
flitted over the surface of the water. Catching the bright sunlight, they looked 
like little sparkling diamonds. 

A small brown boathouse came into view. Behind it, I could see slender 
canoes bobbing beneath a wooden dock. 

A sign beside the boathouse read: COFFIN CRUISE. 

A RELAXING FLOAT TO THE GRAVE. 

“This might be fun,” Mom said, her eyes on the small boats. 

“I think the river flows toward the front of the park,” Dad said. “Let’s take 
it!” 

Luke cheered and went running to the dock. 

I lingered behind the others. When I finally stepped out onto the dock, it 
took me a while to realize that the objects bobbing in the brown water weren’t 
canoes—they were coffins! 

They were made of black polished wood. The lids were pulled back, 
revealing red satin interiors. Each coffin was big enough for one person. 

I felt a cold chill run down my back. “We’re really going to climb into 
coffins?” I asked. 

“They look comfy,” Mom said, smiling at me. “The water is flat and gentle, 
Lizzy. It won’t be a scary ride.” 

“Me first!” Luke cried, running to the end of the wooden dock. 

Two costumed Horrors appeared to help us into the coffins. “Lie back. 
Enjoy the ride,” one of them said. 

“It will be your last,” the other Horror added with a low chuckle. 

When we were all inside coffins, the Horrors untied them and gave us a 
hard push away from the dock. 

Here I am, I thought, lying in my coffin. 

Here we all are, my entire family, on our backs in our coffins. 

The coffin floated gently, bobbing in the water. I stared up at the bright blue 
sky. Trees shimmered on both banks as I floated past. 

It was so pretty, so relaxing. 

Why did I think something terrible was about to happen? 

18 

Lying on my back, I couldn’t see the others over the coffin sides. But I could 
hear the splash of their coffins around mine. 

“This is nice,” Mom said. “Very relaxing.” 

“It’s boring!” Luke declared from up ahead of me. “Where’s the scary 
part?” 

“It’s just a nice ride in a coffin,” Dad said. “Do you think we’re really 
floating? Or do you think the coffin is on some kind of track?” 

“I could float like this for hours,” Mom said. 

“The rides here are pretty long,” Clay told her. 

“Is that a hawk up in the sky?” Dad asked. “Can everyone see it?” 

Shielding my eyes from the sun with one hand, I searched the sky. Directly 
above, a dark shadow hovered high in the sky, a little bigger than a dot. 

“It’s not a hawk. I’ll bet it’s a vulture!” Luke declared. “It sees the coffins, 
and it’s waiting to eat our flesh!” He laughed. 

“Luke—where do you get these hideous ideas?” Mom demanded. 

“Maybe Luke should live in HorrorLand!” Dad exclaimed. “We could get 
him one of those green monster costumes, and he’d fit right in perfectly!” 

“He doesn’t need a costume!” I joked. I was starting to feel a little better. 
The ride was gentle and relaxing. And I figured nothing terrible could happen 
with my whole family around. 

I settled back on the coffin bottom, my hands resting at my sides, and stared 
up dreamily at the bird circling high in the clear sky. The coffin bobbed gently, 
making soft splashing sounds. 

So pleasant... 

So quiet... 

And then, before I could utter a sound, the coffin lid slammed shut over me. 
And I was trapped in total darkness. 

19 

“Hey!” I shouted. My voice was muffled by the heavy lid over me. 

I could hear the dull thud of the other coffin lids slamming shut. 

“Hey—let me out!” 

I pushed against the lid with both hands. But it wouldn’t budge. 

I took a deep breath and tried again. This time, I pushed with my hands and 
my feet. The heavy lid still didn’t move. 

My heart was pounding so hard, I thought my chest would explode. The air 
inside the closed coffin was already getting hot and stuffy. 

“Open up! Open up!” I screamed. 

I tried pushing the lid again. I could hear Clay’s muffled cries in the coffin 
next to mine. The poor guy was screaming his head off. 

I let out a loud groan as I pushed up with all my strength. The lid wouldn’t 
give an inch. 

Calm down, Lizzy. Calm down, I instructed myself. It’s just a stupid ride. 
The coffin lid will open any second. 

Breathing hard, I waited. 

I counted to ten. 

I counted to ten again. 

The lid didn’t snap open. 

I tried shutting my eyes and counting to fifty. When I reach fifty, I told 
myself, I’ll open my eyes, and the lid will be open. 

“...twenty-two, twenty-three, twenty-four...” I counted out loud. My voice 
sounded tiny and choked. It was getting hard to breathe. The air began to feel 
really stale. 

I stopped counting at twenty-five and opened my eyes. The lid hadn’t 
popped open. 

It’s so hot in here, I thought. The sun is beating down on the lid. There’s no 
air, and I’m going to fry! 

I tried to scream, but no sound came out. 

I gasped for air. 

Outside, I could hear muffled shouts and cries. 

Was that my mother screaming like that? 

“It’s just a ride,” I said out loud. “Just a stupid ride. The lid is going to pop 
— now! ” 

But it didn’t. 

The air was so hot, so hot and stale. 

Why didn’t the lid open? 

Why? 

I tried to force back my panic, but I couldn’t. My entire body was shaking 
and shivering. I felt cold perspiration drip down my forehead. 

“Something has gone wrong!” I cried out loud. “The lid is supposed to open 
—but it doesn’t!” 

Frantically, I pushed up with both hands. My arms ached from pushing so 
hard. But the lid didn’t move. 

The coffin bobbed and rocked in the water. 

I lowered my hands in defeat. I sucked in a mouthful of the hot, stale air. 
My chest was heaving. My body trembled. 

And then I felt my legs start to itch. A tingly feeling down near my ankles. 

Moving up my legs. 

An itchy, crawly feeling. 

Something was crawling slowly up my legs. 

Something small and prickly. 

“Ohh.” I let out a low, terrified groan. 

Spiders! 

20 

I tried to scratch my legs, but my arms weren’t long enough. Unable to move or 
bend in the cramped coffin, I couldn’t reach down to them. 

The tingling moved higher. 

I wanted to scream, but I started to cough. 

And then the coffin lid popped open. Bright sunlight made me shut my 

eyes. 

“Oh!” I pulled myself up to a sitting position. Blinking against the light, I 
saw the others already scrambling up out of their coffins. 

I scratched my legs furiously. To my surprise, there were no spiders. No 
bugs of any kind. 

The coffin had pulled up to a small dock. I braced both hands against the 
sides of the coffin and heaved myself to my feet. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I heard Clay cry. 

“That was horrible /” my mom shrieked. 

Luke didn’t say anything. His face was pale, and his black hair was matted 
to his forehead with sweat. 

“They really went too far!” Dad said angrily. “I’m going to complain.” 

“Let’s just go!” Mom told him. 

We all scrambled onto the dock. I helped pull Clay up. Then I took several 
deep breaths of fresh air. 

Dad ran off the dock toward the open plaza, and the rest of us hurried after 
him. “To the ticket booth!” he called back to us. “Right up there!” He pointed. 

The coffin ride had taken us to the front of the park. I could see the front 
gate and the row of green ticket booths to the right. 

“That ride was really gross!” Clay said, shaking his head. 

“My legs got all itchy. I thought it was ants!” Luke declared. 

“I thought it was spiders!” I told him. 

“I wonder how they did that,” Luke said thoughtfully. 

“I don’t care,” I replied. “I just want to get out of here. I hate this place!” 

“So do I,” Clay agreed. 

“They just go too far,” Mom said breathlessly, jogging to keep up with us as 

we followed Dad. “It isn’t any fun when a ride is that scary. I really had trouble 
breathing.” 

“So did I,” I told her. 

“Hey, how do we get home?” Luke suddenly demanded, staring at Mom. 
“Our car blew up.” 

“I think those people in the monster costumes will lend us a car,” Mom 
replied. “They told your father just to come to the ticket booth.” 

“Can we stop and get pizza?” Luke asked. 

“Let’s get out of this place and then worry about lunch,” Mom told him. 

The main plaza was totally empty. Not another living person. 

We followed Dad to the first ticket booth. He turned back to us, making a 
disappointed face. “Closed,” he said. A metal grate had been pulled over the 
window. 

Dad was breathing hard from running all the way. He pushed his blond hair 
off his sweaty forehead with both hands. “Over here,” he said. 

We followed him to the next ticket booth. Also closed. 

Then the next. Closed. 

It didn’t take us long to discover that all of the ticket booths were closed. 

“Weird,” Luke said, shaking his head. 

“Don’t they expect any more visitors today?” Mom asked Dad. “How can 
they just close up like that?” 

Dad shrugged. “We’ll have to ask someone.” His eyes searched the empty 
grounds. 

I turned and checked out the plaza along with him. Still no one in sight. No 
visitors. No Horrors. 

“Let’s try over there,” Dad said. He started walking to a low green building 
that stood beyond the ticket booths. It looked like some kind of office. 

It was closed, too. Dad tried the door. It was locked. 

Dad scratched his head. “What’s going on here? Where’d everyone 
disappear to?” he demanded. 

Mom took his arm. “It’s very strange,” she said softly. 

I glanced at Luke and Clay. They were standing tensely side by side on the 
walk in front of the office. Neither of them spoke. 

“Are you sure these are the right ticket booths?” I asked. 

“Yes,” Dad replied wearily. “This is the front entrance.” 

“So where can everyone be?” Mom asked, chewing her lower lip. 

“Maybe we can find someone in the parking lot,” I suggested. “You know. 
A parking attendant or something. They’ll be able to tell us how to get a car to 
go home.” 

“Good idea, Lizzy,” Dad said. He patted the top of my head, the way he 
used to when I was a little girl. 

I waited for Luke to make fun of me. But he didn’t say a word. I guess he 
was too worried and upset. 

“Come on,” I urged. I turned and ran past the empty ticket booths. The tall 
metal front gate to HorrorLand stood just beyond the booths. 

I stopped for a second to read a sign on the side of one of the ticket booths. 
It said: NO EXIT, NO ONE LEAVES HORRORLAND ALIVE! 

“Ha-ha,” I said sarcastically. “These signs are a riot, aren’t they?” 

I jogged the rest of the way and reached the gate first. I pulled it, and it 
wouldn’t open. So I tried pushing it. 

It didn’t move. 

Then I saw the heavy chain and the large steel padlock on the gate. 

Swallowing hard, I turned back to the others. 

“We’re locked in!” I told them. 

21 

“What?” Dad stared at me, his face twisted in confusion. I don’t think he 
believed me. 

“We’re locked in!” I repeated. I lifted the heavy metal padlock with both 
hands and then let it fall back with a loud clang against the bars of the gate. 

“But that’s impossible!” Mom cried, raising her hands to her cheeks. “They 
can’t lock people inside an amusement park!” 

“Maybe it’s another joke,” Luke suggested. “Everything in this place turns 
out to be a joke. Maybe this is one, too.” 

I lifted the heavy padlock again. “It doesn’t look like a joke, Luke,” I said 
unhappily. 

“Then there must be another gate where they want us to exit,” Mom 
suggested. 

“Maybe,” Dad said doubtfully. “Maybe there’s a side exit. But I haven’t 
seen one.” 

“What are we going to do?” Clay asked, whining. His face was red, and he 
was breathing hard. 

“Where is everyone?” Luke demanded, whining, too. “They’ve got to let us 
leave. They’ve got to!” 

“Let’s try to stay calm,” Dad said, putting a hand on Luke’s shoulder. 
“There’s no reason to panic. This is a strange place, but we’re not in any 
danger.” 

“He’s right,” Mom broke in. “There’s no reason to be afraid. We’ll be out of 
here and on our way home in no time.” She forced a smile. 

“As soon as we get out, I’ll buy you guys pizzas and big, cold drinks,” Dad 
promised. “And we’ll all have a good laugh about our terrifying adventures 
today in HorrorLand.” 

“But how do we get out?” Luke demanded shrilly. 

“Well...” Dad rubbed his chin. 

“Do you think we could climb the fence?” I asked. 

We all raised our eyes to the top of the iron fence. It was way over our 
heads. It must have been about twenty feet tall. 

“I can’t climb that!” Clay cried. “I’d fall!” 

“It’s too high,” Mom said quickly. 

“Bad idea,” I murmured. 

A large white cloud drifted over the sun. Our shadows grew longer over the 
pavement. The air quickly grew cooler. 

I felt a chill run down my back. 

“There’s got to be a way out of this stupid park!” I cried angrily. I hoisted 
up the padlock and slammed it against the bars of the gate. 

“Hold on, Lizzy,” Dad said soothingly. “We just have to find one of those 
costumed park workers. They’ll tell us how to get out.” 

“Uh... Dad...” I turned and saw Luke grab Dad’s arm. “Here they come.” 

We all uttered astonished cries as we saw the Horrors crossing the plaza. 
Dozens of them. They moved quickly, with a steady rhythm. Silently. 

A few seconds before, the plaza had been empty. Now it was filled with 
green-costumed Horrors marching toward us, spreading out, preparing to 
surround us. 

I could feel the panic rise up from my stomach. My knees began to shake. I 
stared in horror at them as they drew closer, closer. I couldn’t speak. I couldn’t 
move. 

“What are they going to do?” Clay cried, his features twisted in terror. He 
slipped behind Dad. “What are they going to do to us?” he cried. 

22 

We huddled together as the Horrors marched silently toward us. The only sound 
was the soft thud of their monster feet on the pavement, and their long purple 
tails dragging on the ground. 

“There are hundreds of them!” Mom murmured. She grabbed Dad’s arm 
with one hand. She slipped her other arm around my shoulders and pulled me 
closer. 

We had our backs against the iron fence. We stared helplessly at the 
grinning green faces, the bulging yellow eyes, which appeared to be laughing 
cruelly at us. 

Finally, they stopped a few feet in front of us. 

The plaza was still and silent. Terrifyingly silent. 

The sun was still hidden behind the big cloud. Two large blackbirds 
swooped low in the gray sky. 

We stared at the Horrors, and they stared back at us. 

I swallowed hard, leaning against my mother. I could feel her entire body 
trembling. 

I took a deep breath and then cried out: “What do you want?” The sound of 
my own voice startled me. 

One of the Horrors, a young woman, stepped forward. 

Frightened, I tried to back up. But my back was already pressing against the 
fence. 

“What do you want?” I repeated in a trembling voice. 

The costumed Horror stared at us one by one. “I want to thank you,” she 
said in a cheery voice. 

“Huh?” I uttered. 

“I’m the HorrorLand MC. We all want to thank you for being our guests 
today.” She flashed us a warm smile. 

“You mean we can go ? ” Luke demanded, half hidden behind my dad. 

“Of course,” the Horror said, grinning warmly. “But first we all want to 
thank you for appearing on HorrorLand Hidden Camera. ” 

The dozens of Horrors behind her broke into applause and loud cheers. 

“Huh? You mean this is some kind of show?” Dad demanded, frowning. 

“See the cameras?” the MC asked. She gestured up to two tall poles in the 
plaza. 

Raising my eyes to the top, I saw two TV cameras. 

“You mean we were on TV?” Luke cried. 

“Since the moment you arrived,” the MC replied. “Our hidden cameras 
followed you everywhere. From the hilarious scene where we blew up your car, 
our cameras were with you. And I know our home audience loved the terrified 
expressions on your faces and all of your horrified screams as you took our 
HorrorLand rides!” 

“Now, wait a minute,” Dad said angrily. He took a step forward. His hands 
were balled into tense fists at his sides. “You say this is a TV show? How come 
I’ve never seen it?” 

“We’re seen every weekend on The Monster Channel,” the Horror replied. 

“Oh,” Dad replied quickly, lowering his eyes. “We don’t have cable.” 

“You should get it,” the Horror told him. “You’re missing a lot of great 
scary shows on The Monster Channel.” 

The Horrors all clapped and cheered. 

“Well, you’ve been very good sports,” the MC continued, her yellow eyes 
bouncing in front of her head as she talked. “We’ve enjoyed having you. And to 
show our appreciation, we have a brand-new car waiting for you in the parking 
lot!” 

More cheers and applause from the Horrors. 

“Anew car? Excellent!” Luke exclaimed. 

“Does that mean we can leave?” Clay asked timidly. 

The Horror nodded. “Yes, it’s time for you to leave. The real exit is right 
over there, through that doorway.” 

She pointed to a tall green building near the end of the fence. I saw a yellow 
door on the side. 

“Take the yellow door,” the Horror instructed. “And thanks again for 
appearing on HorrorLand Hidden Camera /” 

As all the Horrors clapped their big green hands, we stepped away from the 
fence and hurried toward the exit. “I can’t believe we were on TV the whole 
time!” Mom declared. 

“And we’re getting a new car!” Luke exclaimed happily. He started 
jumping up and down. Then he leaped onto Clay’s back, nearly knocking him 

over. 

I laughed. It was good to see the old Luke back with us. 

“We’ve got to get cable!” Luke told Dad. “I want to see The Monster 
Channel. It’s got to be awesome!” 

“We’ll have to order it so we can see ourselves,” Mom said. 

I reached the yellow door first and pulled it open. I stepped into an 
enormous room, with white walls that shone under the bright white lights from 
the ceiling. 

“Is this the exit?” I cried. 

As soon as we were all inside, the door slammed shut with a bang that 
made my heart skip. 

Then all the lights went out. 

“Welcome to the HorrorLand Challenge!” boomed a deep, frightening voice 
over a loudspeaker. 

“Huh?” I gazed blindly around, trying to see something—anything—in the 
total darkness. 

“You have one minute to go through the Monster Obstacle Course,” the 
voice thundered. “Please keep in mind that the games are now over. This is real. 
You’re playing for your life!” 

23 

“We’ve been tricked!” I heard Dad cry angrily. And then he shouted at the top of 
his lungs, “Let’s get out of here!” 

“Run!” the deep voice boomed over the loudspeaker. “You have fifty-six 
seconds.” 

Dad started to shout again. But we stopped when a dim light came up, and a 
disgusting four-armed creature stepped toward us. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out without even realizing it. 

The size of a gorilla, the monster had huge green eyes surrounded by thick 
red fur over its face. Saliva drooled from its mouth. And as it opened its jaws 
wider, two rows of long fangs slid over its thin purple lips. 

“Don’t just stand there! Run! This is an obstacle course!” the voice boomed 
impatiently. “You have fifty seconds to live! At least make a good race of it.” 

The monster uttered a low growl and lumbered toward us in the dim light. 
Its jaws were opened wide as if preparing to bite. Its four enormous clawed 
hands swiped at the air in front of it. 

I was too stunned to move, too frightened to run. 

But suddenly, I felt a hand grab mine and tug me hard. 

It was Dad, I realized, trying to pull me to safety. 

I heard the boys screaming in fear. I felt Mom brush beside me as we 
started to stumble forward. 

“Run! Run!” the deep voice urged over the shrieks of the two boys. 

I couldn’t see where I was running. The light was so dim, so shadowy. I 
saw only a blur now, a blur of running feet, of moving shadows. 

The monster let out a deafening roar. I covered my ears and kept running. 

Its four clawed hands swiped at Dad. Missed. 

We hurtled past it. 

Only to face two giant birds, at least ten feet tall. They looked like cranes. 
They squawked and flapped their enormous wings. It sounded like canvas tents 
flapping in a strong wind. 

“Ohh! Help!” 

Was that me shrieking like that? 

Was I really being wrapped in their hot, flapping wings? Smothered? 

Choked? 

“No—p/ease!” 

How did I break away? 

Was I being chased now by six growling piglike creatures with sharp, 
pointed teeth curling from their twisted mouths? 

The screams and terrified shrieks of my family rose over the beating birds’ 
wings, the monstrous growls and grunts. 

I heard Dad cry out. And in the dim light, I saw him struggling to free 
himself from the four-armed creature. 

“No!” I screamed as I felt something warm wrap around my ankle. A fur- 
covered snake! 

I screamed again and kicked wildly, sending it flying into the darkness. 

But before I could move away, another furry snake spun around my leg, 
tightening quickly. 

I bent and pulled at it as it hissed in protest. 

I tossed it aside. 

“Run! Run!” the voice on the loudspeaker boomed. “Twenty seconds to 
live!” 

More monsters loomed in front of us. Disgusting yellow lizardlike creatures 
with dark flicking tongues like bullwhips. A hopping furry ball that roared as it 
hopped, sharp teeth poking out of three mouths. 

Hissing snakes, enormous buzzing insects with glowing red eyes, more 
gmnting pig monsters. Then a giant bearlike creature came at us on two legs. It 
tossed its dark, round head back and laughed like a hyena as its paws punched 
the air. 

“Help me!” I heard Luke shriek. And then I saw him disappear, wrapped 
inside the beating wings of one of the giant birds. 

The bird cawed in triumph as its wings tightened around my brother. 

“Ten seconds!” the voice boomed. 

“No!” I cried. I lunged toward the bird, grasped the beating wing, and 
pulled it open. 

Luke slid out, and we both began to run. 

Monsters growled, and flapped, and grunted, and roared. 

“Are we... going to make it?” Luke asked in a tiny voice. 

I didn’t have a chance to answer. 

Two powerful paws grabbed me around the waist, hoisted me high in the 

air, then slammed me to the floor. 

I landed hard on my stomach. My forehead hit the floor. 

Dizzy and hurt, I looked up in time to see an enormous elephantlike 
creature about to flatten me with its huge furry back foot. 

I’m not going to make it, I realized. 

I’m not going to make it. 

24 

The enormous flat foot lowered over me slowly, steadily. The monster was 
taking its time. 

It all seemed to be happening in slow motion. 

I wanted to move. I wanted to roll out from under it. 

But the fall had taken my breath away. I lay there gasping, watching the 
monster foot coming down to crush me. 

“Ohhh.” I couldn’t catch my breath. I couldn’t squirm away. 

I could feel the heat of the monster foot. I could smell its putrid sweat. 

The foot pressed down on my stomach. 

I shut my eyes and waited for the pain. 

The jarring blast of a buzzer made my eyes shoot open. 

The monster raised its heavy foot from my body. The floor shook under its 
weight as it began to lumber away. 

Am I alive? I wondered. 

Or am I only dreaming that I’m still alive? 

Is that creature really leaving without crushing me? 

The buzzer echoed in my ear. Then it abruptly stopped. The loudspeaker 
crackled on. 

“Time’s up!” a woman’s voice said. The voice of the HorrorLand MC who 
had led us to this terrifying obstacle course. 

“Time is up. What a thrilling race!” she gushed. 

I groaned and started to pull myself up. In the dim light, I saw that all of the 
monsters had vanished. 

“That was a tough battle,” the MC continued over the loudspeaker. “Do we 
have any survivors?” 

“Yes, we do,” the deep, booming voice replied. 

“How many survivors do we have in there?” the woman asked. 

“Three,” the booming voice replied. “Three survivors out of five.” 

25 

A cold chill ran down my body. 

I opened my mouth in a silent cry of shock and leaped to my feet. 

Three out of five? 

Did that mean that two of us were dead? 

My chest still ached. My knees were trembling. I squinted into the dim 
light, searching desperately for the others. 

Halfway across the room, I saw Luke and Clay. They were huddled 
together, walking as if in a daze toward the far wall. 

“Hey!” I tried to call to them. But my voice came out a choked whisper. 

Where were Mom and Dad? 

Were they both killed by the monsters? 

Three out of five. Three out of five. 

“Nooooooooo!” I finally found my voice and let out a horrified wail that 
echoed off the walls. 

“Excuse me. A slight mistake,” the deep voice boomed. “Make that five out 
of five survivors.” 

“Five out of five!” the HorrorLand MC exclaimed. “A new record. We’ve 
never had a perfect score before. Let’s give them a round of applause, 
everyone!” 

I took a deep breath and held it, trying to stop my trembling. 

They’re okay! I thought happily. Mom and Dad are okay. 

And then I saw them. They had their arms around Luke and Clay and were 
making their way toward me. 

“We’re okay!” I cried, rushing to them, my arms outstretched. “We’re 
okay!” 

All five of us huddled in the center of the dark room, hugging each other 
and sobbing. 

Dad’s arm was bleeding from a deep gash. One of the monsters had clawed 

him. 

Aside from that, we were shaken but not hurt. 

“Now what?” Luke asked in a trembling voice. “Are they going to let us 

go?” 

“They can’t get away with this,” Dad said angrily. “They can’t do this to 
people and get away with it. I don’t care if it is TV!” 

“Those monsters were real!” I exclaimed with a shudder. “It wasn’t a fake. 
They were really trying to kill us.” 

“How do we get out?” Luke demanded. “Will they let us out?” 

We all started chattering at once, our voices high and frightened. 

Suddenly, the ceiling lights flashed on, flooding the room with bright light. 
And the MC’s voice broke through our frightened conversation. “Let’s bring our 
winners out with a round of applause! ” she announced cheerfully. 

We all cried out as the floor began to tilt beneath us. I grabbed on to Dad, 
and we started to slide. 

The floor tilted down like a sliding board. And we slid out of the room— 
and landed in the plaza outside. 

Still feeling dazed, I jumped quickly to my feet as the HorrorLand MC 
hurried to greet us. The big crowd of Horrors behind her was clapping and 
cheering. 

“You can’t do this to us!” I screeched. 

I was so angry, I didn’t know what I was doing. I just totally freaked. 

I leaped at the woman, grabbed the top of her mask, and started to pull it off 
with both hands. 

“You can’t do this! You can’t!” I shrieked. “Let me see your face! Let me 
see who you really are!” 

Using all of my strength, I gave the mask a hard tug. 

Then I screamed and let go as I realized the truth. 

26 

She wasn’t wearing a mask! 

The monstrous green face was her face. 

She wasn’t wearing a monster costume. None of the Horrors were wearing costumes, I realized. 

I stepped back, raising my hands in horror as if trying to shield myself. 
“You—you’re really monsters!” I stammered. 

They nodded back at me, pleased grins on their ugly faces. Their yellow eyes bobbed gleefully. 

“You—you’re all monsters!” I screamed. “But—but you said this was a TV show,” I stammered to the Horror MC. 

Her bulging yellow eyes gazed at me. “We’re happy to say it is the top- rated show on The Monster Channel,” she said cheerily. “Thanks to great contestants like you and your family. The Monster Channel is watched by nearly two million monsters all over the world.” 

“But—but—” I stammered, taking another step back. 

“People don’t always take us seriously,” she continued. “People come to HorrorLand and think it’s all a big joke. People laugh at the signs around the park. They laugh at the rides and attractions. But it’s all very serious to us. All of it.” 

My father stepped up beside me, shaking a fist angrily. “But you can’t do this to innocent people!” he shouted. “You can’t bring people into this park to torture them, and—and—” 

“Oh, I’m sorry. Our time is up,” the MC interrupted, shaking her enormous green head. “I’m sad to say it’s time to say good-bye to our special guests for this week.” 

“Now, wait—” Dad shouted, raising both hands for quiet. 

The crowd of Horrors silently pushed forward. We had no choice but to start moving with them. 

“Let me show you people the way we say good-bye on HorrorLand Hidden Camera, ” the MC said. 

Dad tried to hold back, to resist, but several Horrors bumped against him. They were bumping all of us now, pushing us toward what appeared to be a round purple pond just beyond the plaza. 

We couldn’t fight back. There were too many of them. 

We couldn’t run. They had us surrounded. 

They drove us like sheepdogs herding cattle. In a few seconds, we were standing at the edge of the purple pond. 

A foul smell rose up from the pond. The purple liquid bubbled and gurgled, making a sick sucking sound. 

“Let us go!” Luke cried shrilly. “We want to go home!” 

The HorrorLand MC ignored his frantic pleas and stepped to the edge of the gurgling pond. “Saying good-bye is always sad,” she said. “So we try to have a little fun with our farewells.” 

“Just let us go!” Luke insisted. Dad put a hand on his shoulder to try to comfort him. 

We all stared at the MC as she raised a large rock in one hand and held it over the disgusting, bubbling pond. “Watch,” she instructed us with a smile. 

She let the rock drop into the pond. 

As soon as it touched the thick surface, it was pulled down with a loud sucking sound. 

“See how easy it is to say good-bye?” the Horror said, turning to us. “Now, will you jump in—or do you want to be pushed?” 

27 

Silently, the Horrors began moving in on us. Closer. Closer. 

Backing up, Clay tripped over my foot and nearly fell into the gurgling 
purple pit. I grabbed him and held on to him until he regained his balance. 

All five of us were standing at the edge of the pit. 

The sour odor swept over me. I felt sick. The thick purple slime lapped up 
at my ankles as if reaching out to grab me. 

“Mom! Dad!” I cried. I didn’t know what I expected them to do. We were 
all helpless. 

I knew we weren’t going to escape this time. 

Without realizing it, we were all holding hands. 

“Will you jump in—or do you want to be pushed?” The MC repeated her 
question. 

“I’m real sorry,” Dad murmured to us, ignoring her. “I’m real sorry I 
brought you here. I—I didn’t know...” His voice broke. He lowered his eyes. 

“Dad, it’s not your fault!” I told him, squeezing his hand. 

And as I squeezed his hand, I had an idea. 

A wild idea. A stupid idea. A really crazy idea. 

I knew I had to try it. It was the only idea I had. 

“People laugh at everything in the park,” the HorrorLand MC had told us. 
“But it’s all very serious to us,” she’d said. 

All very serious ... 

Very serious... 

She stood right in front of me now, waiting for us to jump to our deaths, 
eager for us to get sucked down into the purple slime. 

I knew this was my last chance. I knew it was crazy. 

But I knew I had to try it. 

I stepped up to the MC, reached out, and pinched her arm as hard as I could. 

28 

Her mouth opened wide, and she let out a startled gasp. 

She tried to pull her arm away. But I held on and pinched harder. “The Mad Pincher strikes again!” I shouted, remembering Luke’s annoying cry. 

Her yellow eyes rolled around crazily. “No!” she pleaded. 

Harder. Harder. 

And then I was the one to cry out as her mouth opened wide, and, with a loud whoosh, a rush of air escaped her lips. 

I leaped back. 

As the air rushed from her mouth, she appeared to deflate, just like a balloon. 

I gaped in amazement as she folded helplessly to the ground. 

An angry cry rose up from the crowd of Horrors. “Inflate her!” one of them yelled. “Inflate her immediately!” 

They began moving in on us, growling and grumbling menacingly. 

“Pinch them!” I shouted to my family. “Pinch them! The ‘No Pinching’ signs that we thought were so stupid—they were serious! The Horrors deflate if they’re pinched!” 

A Horror stepped up, arms outstretched to push me into the pond. I pinched his arm hard, and a few seconds later, he deflated. 

I heard the whoosh of air escaping to my right and saw that Luke had deflated one, too. 

Whoosh! Another one deflated and folded to the pavement. 

That’s all it took. 

The plaza filled with frightened cries and gasps of horror. 

The alarmed Horrors turned and ran. Stampeded is a better word. They scattered through the park, screaming as they ran. 

Taking a long, deep breath, I happily watched them flee. “See? I always come through in a pinch!” I said, amazing myself by making a joke. 

I don’t think anyone else in my family heard me. They were shouting for joy, hugging each other, jumping up and down. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I shouted. I started running toward the front gate. The others followed close behind. 

The gate was open now. I guess the Horrors had opened it, figuring the only place we were heading was to the bottom of the purple pond. 

Without looking back, we ran out into the empty parking lot. 

And stopped. 

“No car,” I murmured. 

In all the excitement, I had forgotten that our car had been blown up. 

I let out a weary sigh. I felt as if I were deflating, just like the Horrors. 
“Now what?” I asked, staring across the enormous flat parking lot. 

“It’s too far to walk!” Luke wailed. “How do we get out of here?” 

“The buses!” Mom cried, pointing. I turned my eyes to the row of purple- and-green buses parked on the side of the lot. They glowed under the bright afternoon sun. 

“Yeah!” Dad cried excitedly. “Maybe we can start one up and get away from here!” 

We started jogging over the pavement to the buses. “Cross your fingers,” Dad called, leading the way. “Maybe they leave the keys in them. It’s our only chance!” 

“Hurry!” Luke shouted suddenly. “They’re coming!” 

My heart leaped in my chest. I turned back toward the gate. 

Sure enough, the Horrors were pouring out of the park, chasing after us. “Give up! You cannot escape!” one of them screamed. 

“No one ever escapes!” another Horror shouted. 

“Hurry!” Luke cried. “Hurry! They’re going to catch us!” 

29 

With the Horrors close behind, shouting and threatening us, we ran full speed toward the row of buses. 

My heart was pounding almost as loud as my sneakers against the pavement. My throat ached, and I had a sharp pain in my side. 

But I kept running. 

“You cannot escape!” 

“Stop now!” 

“Give up!” 

The angry cries of the Horrors sounded even closer. But I didn’t turn back to see if they were catching up. 

The door to the first bus was open. Dad got there first and scrambled up the steps and inside. 

Mom stepped in, followed by the two boys. 

I pulled myself inside and the bus door slid shut behind me. “Dad—the keys!” I choked out. 

“Yes! They’re here!” he cried happily. “Hold on! We’re getting away!” 

The engine coughed, then started up with a roar. Dad lowered his foot on the gas pedal, and the bus shot forward. I stumbled down the aisle and fell into a seat behind Luke and Clay. 

“Hurry! They’re coming! They’re coming!” Luke and Clay were screaming in unison. 

I could hear the angry shouts of the Horrors through the closed bus windows. 

“We’re okay!” Dad cried, leaning over the big steering wheel. “We’re okay! We’re outta here!” 

“Yes!” I shouted happily. “Yes!” 

We all started to cheer. We kept cheering until we were out of the parking lot and back on the highway. 

We laughed and celebrated all the way home. 

The drive took hours and hours, but we didn’t care. We were safe! We had escaped! 

It was night when Dad pulled the bus up our driveway. “Home, sweet 



home!” I cried joyfully. 

We all piled eagerly out of the bus. I took a deep breath and stretched. The 
air smelled so sweet and fresh. A full moon made the front lawn shine. 

Then I saw him. It was a Horror, and he was clinging to the back of our bus. 
“Oh, no!” I cried out. 

“What are you doing there?” Dad demanded. 

“Did you ride there the whole way home?” Luke asked in disbelief. 

I shrank back as the Horror let go of the bus and slid to the ground. His 
yellow eyes studied us menacingly. He moved toward us quickly. 

Clay and Luke hid behind Dad. Mom’s mouth dropped open in fright. 

“What do you want?” I cried. 

He reached out his green hand. “Here,” he said. “We forgot to give you 
your free passes for next year!” 



WHY I'M AFRAID 
OF BEES 

1 

If you’re afraid of bees, I have to warn you—there are a lot of bees in this story. 
In fact, there are hundreds. 

Up until last month, I was afraid of bees. And when you read this story, 
you’ll see why. 

It all started in July when I heard a frightening buzz, the buzz of a bee. 

I sat up straight and searched all around. But I couldn’t see any bees 
anywhere. The scary buzzing sound just wouldn’t stop. In fact, it seemed to be 
getting louder. 

“It’s probably Andretti again,” I told myself. “Ruining my day, as usual.” 

I’d been reading a stack of comic books under the big maple tree in my 
back yard. Other kids might have better things to do on a hot, sticky summer 
afternoon—like maybe going to the pool with their friends. 

But not me. My name is Gary Lutz, and I have to be honest. I don’t have 
many real close friends. Even my nine-year-old sister, Krissy, doesn’t like me 
very much. My life is the pits. 

“Why is that?” I constantly ask myself. “What exactly is wrong with me? 
Why do all the kids call me names like Lutz the Klutz? Why does everybody 
always make fun of me?” 

Sometimes I think it might be because of the way I look. That morning, I’d 
spent a long time studying myself in the mirror. I’d stared at myself for at least 
half an hour. 

I saw a long, skinny face, a medium-sized nose, and straight blond hair. Not 
exactly handsome, but not terrible. 

Bzzzzzz. 

I can’t stand that sound! And it was coming even closer. 

I flopped over on my stomach. Then I peered around the side of the maple 
tree. I wanted to get a better view of my neighbor’s yard. 

Oh, no, I thought. I was right. The buzzing sound was coming from Mr. 
Andretti’s bees. My neighbor was at it again. He was always hanging out in the 
back by his garage, messing with those bees of his. 

How could he handle them every day without worrying about getting 
stung? I asked myself. Didn’t they give him the creeps? 

I climbed to my knees and edged a few inches forward. Even though I 
wanted to get a better look at Mr. Andretti, I didn’t want him to see me. 

The last time he caught me watching him, he made a big deal out of it. He 
acted as if there were some kind of law against sitting outside in your own back 
yard! 

“What’s this?” he bellowed at the top of his lungs. “Did someone start a 
neighborhood watch committee without informing me? Or is the FBI recruiting 
ten-year-old spies these days?” 

This last remark really steamed me, because Mr. Andretti knows perfectly 
well that I’m twelve years old. After all, my family has lived next door to him for 
my entire life. Which is bad luck for me. Mainly since I’m afraid of bees. 

I might as well confess it right away. I’m scared of a few other things, too, 
such as: dogs, big mean kids, the dark, loud noises, and swimming in the ocean. 
I’m even scared of Claus. That’s Krissy’s dumb cat. 

But, most of all, I’m scared of bees. Unfortunately, with a beekeeper for a 
neighbor, there are always bees around. Hairy, crawly, buzzing, stinging bees. 

“Meow!” 

I jumped up as Claus the cat came creeping up behind me. “Why do you 
have to stalk me like that?” I cried. 

As I spoke, Claus moved forward and wrapped himself around my leg. 
Then he dug his long, needle-sharp claws into my skin. 

“Ouch!” I screamed. “Get away from me!” I cannot understand how Krissy 
can love that creature so much. She says he only jumps on me because he “likes” 
me. Well, all I can say is that I don’t like him! And I wish he would keep away 
from me! 

When I finally managed to chase Claus away, I went back to studying my 
neighbor. Yes, I’m scared of bees. And I’m fascinated by them, too. 

I can’t seem to stop watching Mr. Andretti all the time. At least he keeps his 
hives in a screened-in area behind his garage. That makes me feel pretty safe. 
And he acts as if he knows what he’s doing. In fact, he acts as if he’s the world’s 
greatest living expert on bees! 

Today, Mr. Andretti was wearing his usual bee outfit. It’s a white suit, and a 
hat with a wire-screen veil hanging down to protect his face. His clothes are tied 
with string at the wrists and ankles. He looks just like some kind of alien 
creature out of a horror movie. 

As my neighbor carefully opened and closed the drawerlike sections of his 

hanging hives, I noticed he wasn’t wearing any gloves. 

Once, when I was with my dad, Mr. Andretti had explained this to us. “It’s 
like this, Lutz,” he said. Lutz is my father, Ken Lutz. Naturally, during this entire 
conversation, Mr. Andretti had acted as if I wasn’t even there. 

“Your average beekeepers usually wear gloves,” he explained. “A lot of the 
brave ones use gloves with no fingers and thumbs so they can work with the 
bees more easily.” 

Mr. Andretti thumped himself on the chest and went on. “But your truly 
outstanding beekeeper—such as myself—likes to work with his bare hands. My 
bees trust me. You know, Lutz, bees are really a lot smarter than most people 
realize.” 

Oh, sure, I said to myself at the time. If they’re really so smart, why do they 
keep coming back to your hive and letting you steal all their honey from them? 

Bzzzzzz. 

The humming from Mr. Andretti’s hives suddenly grew louder and more 
threatening. I stood up and walked over to the fence between our two back yards. 
I gazed into the screened-in area to see what was going on. 

Then I gasped out loud. 

Mr. Andretti’s white suit didn’t appear white anymore. It had become black! 

Why? Because he was totally covered with bees! 

As I stared, more and more of the insects oozed out of their hives. They 
crawled all over Mr. Andretti’s arms and chest, and even on his head. 

I was so grossed out, I thought I might puke! 

Mr. Andretti’s hat and veil shimmered and bulged as if they were alive! 

Wasn’t he scared of all those stingers? 

As I leaned over the fence, Andretti suddenly yelled at me: “Gary—look 
out/” 

I froze. “Huh?” 

“The bees!” Mr. Andretti screamed. “They’re out of control! Run!” 

2 

I never ran so fast in my life! I charged across the yard and stumbled up the back 
steps of my house. 

I flung open the screen door and almost fell into the house. Then I stopped 
and leaned against the kitchen table, gasping for air. 

When I finally caught my breath, I listened hard. I could still hear the angry 
buzzing of the bees from the next yard. Then I heard something else. 

“Haw haw haw!” 

Somebody was laughing out there. And it sounded suspiciously like Mr. 
Andretti. 

Slowly, I turned around and peered out through the screen door. My 
neighbor was standing at the bottom of the back steps. He’d taken off his bee 
veil, and I could see that he had a huge grin on his face. 

“Haw haw! You should have seen the expression on your face, Gary. You 
never would believe how funny you looked! And the way you ran! 

I stared at him. “You mean your bees weren’t escaping?” 

Mr. Andretti slapped his knee. “Of course they weren’t! I have complete 
control of those bees at all times. They come and go, bringing nectar and pollen 
back from the flowers.” 

He paused to wipe some sweat off his forehead. “Of course, sometimes I 
have to go out and recapture a few lost bees with my net. But most of them know 
my hives are really the best home they can possibly have!” 

“So this was all a joke, Mr. Andretti?” I tried to sound angry. But that’s hard 
to do when your voice is shaking even harder than your knees! “It was supposed 
to be funny?” 

“I guess that’ll teach you to get a life and stop staring at me all day!” he 
replied. Then he turned and walked away. 

I was so angry! What a mean trick! 

It was bad enough having kids my age pick on me all the time. But now the 
grown-ups were starting in! 

I pounded my fist on the kitchen table just as my mother walked into the 
room. “Hi, Gary,” she said, frowning. “Try not to destroy the furniture, okay? I 
was just about to make myself a sandwich. Would you like one?” 

“I guess so,” I muttered, sitting down at the table. 

“Would you like the usual?” 

I nodded. “The usual” was peanut butter and jelly, which I never get tired 
of. For a snack, I usually like taco chips, the spicier the better. As I waited for 
my sandwich, I ripped open a new bag of chips and started chewing away. 

“Uh-oh.” Mom was rummaging through the refrigerator. “I’m afraid we’re 
out of jelly. Guess we’ll have to use something else.” 

She pulled out a small glass jar. “How about this with your peanut butter?” 

“What is it?” I asked. 

“Honey.” 

“Honey!” I shrieked. “No way!” 

Later, I was feeling lonely. I wandered over to the school playground. As I 
walked by the swing set, I saw a bunch of kids I knew from school. 

They were standing around on the softball diamond, choosing up sides for a 
game. I joined them. Maybe, just maybe, they’d let me play. 

“Gail and I are captains,” a boy named Louie was saying. 

I walked over and stood at the edge of the group. I was just in time. 

One by one, Louie and Gail picked players for their teams. Every kid was 
chosen. Every kid except one, that is. I was left standing by myself next to home 
plate. 

As I slumped my shoulders and stared down at the ground, the captains 
starting fighting over me. “You take him, Gail,” Louie said. 

“No. You take him.” 

“No fair. I always get stuck with Lutz!” 

As the two captains argued over who was going to be stuck with me, I 
could feel my face getting redder and redder. I wanted to leave. But then they all 
would have said I was a quitter. 

Finally, Gail sighed and rolled her eyes. “Oh, all right,” she said. “We’ll 
take him. But remember the special Lutz rule. He gets four strikes before he’s 
out!” 

I swallowed hard and followed my teammates out onto the diamond. At that 
point, luck was with me. Gail sent me to the outfield. 

“Go way out in right, Lutz,” Gail ordered. “By the back fence. Nobody ever 
hits it out there.” 

Some kids might be angry about being stuck so far away from the action. 

But I was grateful. If no balls were hit to me, I wouldn’t have a chance to drop 
them the way I always did. 

As I watched the game, my stomach slowly tied itself into a tight knot. I 
was last in the batting order. But when my turn at the plate finally came around, 
the bases were loaded. 

I picked up the bat and wandered out toward the plate. A groan rose up 
from my teammates. “Lutz is up?” somebody cried in disbelief. 

“Easy out!” yelled the girl playing first base. “No batter, no batter, no 
batter!” Everyone on the other team hooted and laughed. Out of the corner of my 
eye I saw Gail put her face in her hands. 

I ground my teeth together and started praying. Please let me get a walk. 
Please let me get a walk. I knew I could never hit the ball. So a walk was my one 
and only hope. 

Of course I struck out. 

Four straight strikes. 

“Lutz the Klutz!” I heard someone cry. Then a lot of kids laughed. 

Without looking back, I marched off the baseball diamond and away from 
the playground. I was heading home toward the peace and quiet of my own 
room. It might not be perfect, I thought. But at least at home no one teased me 
about being a klutz. 

“Hey, look, guys!” a voice shouted as I turned onto my street. 

“Hey—wow—it’s Lutz the Klutz!” someone else answered. 

“Lookin’ good, dude!” 

I couldn’t believe my bad luck. The three voices belonged to the biggest, 
meanest, toughest creeps in the entire neighborhood—Barry, Marv, and Karl. 
They’re my age, but at least five times as big! 

These guys are gorillas! I mean, their knuckles drag on the sidewalk! 

And when they’re not swinging back and forth on a tire swing in their 
gorilla cage, what’s their favorite activity? 

You guessed it. Beating me up! 

“Give me a break, guys,” I pleaded. “I’m having a bad day.” 

They laughed. 

“You want a break, Lutz?” one of them shouted menacingly. “Here!” 

I only had time to blink as I watched a huge, mean-looking fist heading 
right for my nose. 

3 

A long, painful ten minutes later, I walked through the back door of my house. 
Fortunately, my mom was somewhere upstairs. She didn’t see my bloody nose, 
scratched, bruised arms, and torn shirt. 

All I needed was for her to start fussing over me and threatening to call the 
other boys’ parents. If that happened, Barry, Marv, and Karl really would kill me 
the next time they saw me. 

As I crept up the stairs, Claus the cat came leaping out at me. 

“Yowl!” 

“Whoooooa!” I was so shocked, I almost fell back down the stairs. “Get 
away from me, you monster!” 

I pushed the cat away and hurried down the hall to the bathroom. I gazed 
into the mirror and almost heaved. I looked like road kill! 

I rinsed off my nose with ice-cold water. Then I cleaned off all the blood 
and staggered to my room. 

I took off my ripped-up T-shirt and hid it behind my bed. Then I put on a 
winter shirt with long sleeves. It would be hot, but it would hide my scratched 
arms. 

Downstairs in the kitchen, I found Mom and Krissy. Mom was getting out 
mixing bowls and eggs, and Krissy was tying a big apron around her waist. As 
usual, Claus was purring and wrapping himself around Krissy’s legs. Why did he 
act like such an innocent little kitten around her, and such a monster around me? 

“Hi, Gary,” my mom said to me. “You want to help us make peanut butter 
cookies?” 

“No, thanks,” I said. “But I’ll lick the bowl for you later.” I walked over to 
the table and picked up the bag of taco chips I’d left there before. 

“Well, at least you can help by getting that new jar of peanut butter out of 
the cupboard and opening it for me,” Mom said. “This recipe calls for a lot of 
peanut butter.” 

“Sounds good,” I said. “Just so long as it doesn’t have any honey in it.” 

I opened the cupboard door and took out the peanut butter. I tried to twist 
off the cap. I twisted as hard as I could, but the top just wouldn’t move. I banged 
the jar on the countertop and tried again. Still no luck. 

“Do you have a wrench or something around, Mom?” I asked. “This thing 
just won’t budge.” 

“Maybe if you ran hot water on it,” my mother began. 

“Oh, puh-lease!” Krissy said with a snort. Wiping her hands on her apron, 
she crossed the room and grabbed the jar away from me. 

With two fingers, she twisted off the cap. 

Then she started laughing her head off. My mom started laughing, too. 

Can you believe it? My own mother was laughing at me! 

“I guess you forgot to eat your oat bran this morning,” Mom said. 

“I’m leaving,” I muttered to Mom and Krissy. “Forever.” 

The two of them were laughing together. I don’t think they even heard me. 

Totally miserable, I stepped out the front door and slammed it hard behind 
me. I decided to ride my bike around the block a few times. When I went around 
to the side of the house and got it out of the garage, I started to cheer up a little 
bit. 

My bike is really awesome. It’s a new, blue, twenty-one speed, and it’s real 
sleek and cool. My dad gave it to me for my twelfth birthday. 

I jumped on my bike and headed down the driveway. As I turned onto the 
street, I saw some girls walking down the sidewalk. Out of the corner of my eye, 
I recognized them. 

Wow! I thought. It’s Judy Donner and Kaitlyn Davis! 

Both Judy and Kaitlyn go to my school. They’re really pretty and very 
popular. 

To be honest, I’ve had a major crush on Judy since the fourth grade. And 
once, at the fifth-grade picnic, she actually smiled at me. At least, I think it was 
at me. 

So when I saw those girls walking down the street, I decided it was a good 
time to try to be really cool. 

I flipped my baseball cap around so the brim was at the back of my head. 
Then I folded my arms across my chest and started pedaling no-handed. 

As I passed them, I glanced over my shoulder and flashed my most 
glamorous smile at Judy and Kaitlyn. 

Before my beautiful smile faded, I felt a tug at my sneaker. I realized 
instantly that my shoelace was caught in the chain! 

A horrible grinding sound filled the air. The bike jerked and lurched from 
side to side—and I lost control! 

“Gary—!” I heard Judy shriek. “Gary—look out for that car!” 

4 

CRAAAAAAACK. 

I didn’t see the lamppost until I hit it. 

As I toppled off my bike and shot sideways through the air, I heard the 
sound of metal crumpling, ripping, and shredding. 

I landed on my face in a deep, warm puddle of mud. 

I heard the car rumble past me. 

Slowly, I pulled my face out of the mud. 

Guess I didn’t look too cool, I thought bitterly. Maybe at least I’ll get a little 
sympathy. 

No way. 

I could hear Judy and Kaitlyn laughing behind me on the sidewalk. “Nice 
bike, Gary!” one of them called. They hurried away. 

I had never been so humiliated in all my life. If I could have, I would have 
put down roots in that mud puddle and turned myself into a tree. It might not be 
the most exciting life in the world. But at least no one laughs at a tree. 

I’m serious. At that moment, I would have happily traded lives with a tree. 
Or a bird. Or a bug. Or just about any other living object on the planet. 

With that sad thought, I decided to get myself up and out of there before 
anyone else came along. It took all my strength to peel my wrecked bicycle off 
the lamppost. Luckily, I didn’t have far to drag it. 

For the second time in the same afternoon, I crept into my house and up the 
stairs so I could get cleaned up before anyone saw me. Now, as I studied my 
reflection in the bathroom mirror, I saw there was no way I could hide all my 
cuts and scrapes from my mom. 

“Oh, who cares?” I moaned as I washed the mud off my face and hands. 
“Who cares if Mom sees them? I’ll be doing her a favor by giving her something 
else to laugh at. It’ll really make her day!” 

I went back into my room and changed into my last clean shirt. Then I 
glanced around, trying to find something to do. 

I decided to boot up my computer. Playing with my computer is one of the 
few things I really like. When I’m lost in the world of a computer game, 
sometimes I can actually forget I’m a total jerk named Gary Lutz. Nobody in a 

computer game ever calls me Lutz the Klutz. 

I turned on the computer and decided to have another try at the Planet 
Monstro Fantasy game I’d been stuck on for two days. Monstro is a really cool 
game. 

When you play it, you’re a character named The Warrior, and you’re 
trapped on the planet Monstro. You have to get yourself out of all kinds of scary 
situations. 

Before I started to play, I thought I’d check Computa Note, one of the 
electronic bulletin boards I’m connected to on the computer. 

I’d left a message there on Monday, asking if anyone knew how to defeat 
the two-headed dragon that kept eating me on the thirteenth moon of Monstro. 
Sometimes other people in the country who are playing the same game will send 
each other hints. 

When I accessed Computa Note, I saw the following computer-game- 
related messages on the screen: 

To Arnold in Milwaukee: Have you tried rubbing smashed-up eucalyptus leaves 
all over yourself in the rain forest game? It’s an ecologically correct way of 
repelling the poisonous ants in EcoScare 95. From Lisa in San Francisco 

To R from Sacramento: The only way to escape from the flood on your spaceship 
in SpaceQuest 20 is to inflate your suit and float away. From L in St. Louis 

To Gary in Millville: Try stabbing the dragon between the eyes. It worked for 
me. From Ted in Ithaca 

Oh, terrific, I thought. I’d been trying to stab the dragon between the eyes. But 
the creature always ate me before I could do it! What was “Ted in Ithaca” doing 
that I wasn’t? 

I decided to leave another electronic note, asking Ted to explain what he 
meant. But, as I started typing, I noticed another message at the very bottom of 
the computer screen. 

I read it. Then I read it again very carefully: 

TAKE A VACATION FROM YOURSELF. 
Change places with someone for a week! 

5 

What could that mean? 

I pressed the Enter button so I could read what was next. I desperately 
wanted more information about the message. This is what I saw: 

TAKE A VACATION FROM YOURSELF. 

Change places with someone for a week! 

PERSON-TO-PERSON VACATIONS 
113 Roach Street, Suite 2-B 
or call 1-800-555-SWAP 

How could it possibly work? I asked myself. How could two people change lives 
without getting into all kinds of trouble? 

I had to admit it sounded totally crazy. 

Crazy, but interesting. 

I yawned and scratched the back of my head. 

“Ouch!” My hand grazed one of the painful bumps I’d gotten from Barry, 
Marv, and Karl. 

It really hurt. But the stab of pain helped me make up my mind. I was 
definitely ready for some changes in my life. 

“I don’t want to spend the rest of my life getting beat up!” I told myself. 
“Or crashing into lampposts, either! Or being the last person chosen for the 
team!” 

I took out a piece of paper and copied the address from the screen. As I did, 
I realized it was only a few blocks from my school. I knew just where it was. I 
could stop by the Person-to-Person office the next day. 

I’m really going to check it out, I decided. 

Making up my mind like that improved my mood a lot. I was beginning to 
feel almost cheerful when I went back downstairs. But not for long. When my 
family sat down in the dining room for dinner, my father noticed my banged-up 
face. 

“Gary!” he exclaimed. “What in the world happened to you?” 

“Er,” I said. “I had a little accident on my bike.” I winced as I said the word 
“bike”. I was thinking about the mangled wreck in the corner of the garage. 

“I don’t believe that for a minute,” Mom said. “I’m sure you’ve been 
fighting with those big kids in the neighborhood again. Why in the world can’t 
you children learn to settle your disagreements peacefully?” 

Krissy started laughing so hard, she almost choked on her tuna casserole. 
“Gary doesn’t have any disagreements with those guys, Mom!” she said. “They 
just like to beat him up!” 

My mother shook her head angrily. “Well, I think that’s just outrageous!” 
she said. “I have a good mind to call those boys’ parents up right now and give 
them a piece of my mind!” 

I groaned loudly. “I’m telling you, Mom, I really had an accident with my 
bike. If you don’t believe me, go check it out in the garage.” 

Then my father did believe me. He started lecturing me about bike safety 
and why I should have been wearing my helmet and how I was going to have to 
pay to have the bike fixed with my own money. 

After a while, I stopped paying much attention. As I pushed my casserole 
around on my plate, all I could think about was my plan for changing my life 
with Person-to-Person Vacations. 

The sooner the better, I thought. The sooner I get out of this life, the better 
off I’ll be. 

We finished dinner, and I went upstairs to play on my computer again. I 
spent the rest of the evening with my Planet Monstro game. 

I kept trying to stab the dragon between the eyes. But even though I 
followed Ted from Ithaca’s advice, I couldn’t do it. The dragon ate me twenty- 
three times. 

Finally, I gave up and crawled into bed. I was so wiped out, I started 
drifting off to sleep almost right away. I turned over and pulled the blanket up 
under my chin. I curled up into a ball. The toes on my right foot touched 
something. 

“Huh?” I said out loud. “What is that down there?” 

My heart pounded in my chest. 

Slowly, I moved my toes again. 

“Ohhhhhh.” My blood turned into ice. 

I jumped out of bed and let out a bloodcurdling scream. 

6 

Frantically, I ripped the blankets off my bed. In the dim light coming in through 
the window, I could see the rat—fat and hairy, its red eyes gleaming at me. 

I screamed again. 

Then I heard laughter down the hall. Krissy’s laughter. 

My stomach sank. I made my way to the switch and turned on the light. 

Sure enough. The rat still stared at me from my bed. But now I recognized 
it. A gray rubber rat. One of Claus’ favorite toys. 

In her room down the hall, Krissy squealed with laughter. 

“I’m going to get you, you little brat!” I screamed. I thought about going 
down the hall and really thumping her. But I quickly decided against it. 

Even though Krissy is only nine, she happens to be pretty strong. There was 
an excellent chance she could beat me up. 

With an angry growl, I grabbed the rat off my bed and heaved it into the 
corner of my room. Then, my heart still pounding with rage, I turned off the light 
and climbed back under the covers. 

“Tomorrow,” I promised myself in the dark room. “Tomorrow, you, Gary 
Lutz, are going to check out that ad and find out if you can change your life. 
Even if it’s only for a week, it has to be better than this miserable life you have 
now!” 

The next day I kept my promise to myself. After breakfast, I walked the six 
blocks to Roach Street and started reading the street numbers, trying to find 
number 113. 

I guess I was looking for some kind of big, glass office building. But when I 
finally found number 113, it was on a small, gray building that looked something 
like my dentist’s office. A little sign on the outside read: 

PERSON-TO-PERSON VACATIONS, 

Suite 2-B 

I opened the door and walked up a flight of steps. At the top, I opened another 
door and went into a kind of waiting room with beige carpeting and tan leather 

chairs. 

A dark-haired woman sat behind a big glass window. She smiled at me 
when I came in, and I walked over to talk to her. 

“Good afternoon,” she said into a microphone. 

I jumped. Even though the woman was right in front of me, her voice came 
out through a speaker on the wall. 

“Uh... um,” I stammered nervously. “I came about the message on the 
electronic bulletin board?” 

“Oh, yes,” the woman replied with another smile. “A lot of people learn 
about us from their computers. Pardon me for staying behind this glass shield. 
But the equipment behind me is so delicate, we have to be very careful about 
protecting it.” 

I peered over the woman’s shoulder. I could see gleaming metal counters 
and a wall of electronic equipment, including what appeared to be heart 
monitors, video screens, X-ray machines, and cameras. It looked like something 
right out of Star Trek! 

I suddenly had a heavy feeling in my stomach. Maybe this is a bad idea, I 
thought. “Y-you probably don’t like kids hanging around in here,” I stammered. I 
started backing away toward the door. 

“Not true,” she said. “Many of our customers are young people such as you. 
A lot of kids are interested in changing places with someone else for a week. 
What did you say your name was?” 

“Gary. Gary Lutz.” 

“Nice to meet you, Gary. My name is Ms. Karmen. How old are you. About 
twelve?” 

I nodded. 

“Come over here for a minute,” Ms. Karmen said, motioning with her hand. 

Cautiously, I walked back over to the glass booth. She opened a little slot at 
the bottom of her window and pushed out a book. I picked it up and saw that it 
was a photo album, like the one my parents have from their wedding. 

I opened it and started looking through it. “It’s kids!” I exclaimed. “All 
about my age.” 

“Correct,” said Ms. Karmen. “They’re all interested in switching lives with 
someone else for a week.” 

“Wow.” I studied the album. 

A lot of the kids in the pictures looked big and strong. And cool. Kids like 

that wouldn’t be afraid of anything, I told myself. I wondered what it would be 
like to be one of them. 

“You can pick a boy—or even a girl, for that matter—to trade places with 
for a week,” Ms. Karmen was saying. 

“But how does it work?” I asked. “Do I just go take over somebody’s room 
and live in his house for a week? Go to his school? Wear his clothes?” 

The woman laughed. “It’s far more interesting than that, Gary. With our 
getaway vacations, you actually become the other person for a week.” 

“Huh?” 

“What we have,” the woman explained, “is a safe, painless way to switch 
one person’s mind into another person’s body. So, while you’ll know you’re 
really you, no one else will recognize you. Not even the other boy’s parents!” 

I was still confused. “But... what about my body? Does it get stored here?” 

“No, no. We here at Person-to-Person will find someone else to take over 
your body for the week. Your parents will never even know you’re gone!” 

I looked down at my skinny body and wondered who could possibly want 
to borrow it for a week. Ms. Karmen leaned forward in her chair. “So what do 
you say? Are you interested, Gary?” 

I stared into her dark brown eyes and swallowed hard. I broke into a cold 
sweat. This whole thing was really weird—and scary! “Uh,” I said. “I don’t 
know. I mean I’m just not sure.” 

“Don’t feel bad,” Ms. Karmen said. “Many people take some time to get 
used to the idea of a body switch. You can think it over for as long as you wish.” 

She took out a small camera. “But in the meantime, would you mind if I 
took your picture? That way, we can find out if anyone is interested in being in 
your body for a week.” 

“Well, I guess it’s okay,” I replied. 

She snapped the picture, and the flash went off in front of my eyes. “But 
I’m still not sure I want to go through with it.” 

“There’s no obligation,” Ms. Karmen said. “Why don’t we leave it this 
way? You fill out a form describing yourself. Then I’ll put your picture into our 
display album. And, when we find someone to take your place, I’ll call you to 
see if you’ve made up your mind.” 

“Okay,” I replied. What harm could that do? I asked myself. There was no 
way she would ever find anybody who’d want my body for a week! 

I spent a few minutes filling out the form. I had to write down my name and 

address. Then I had to tell all about my hobbies, and how well I did in school, 
and things like that. When I was finished, I handed it to Ms. Karmen, said good¬ 
bye, and headed out the door. 

I made it most of the way home without getting into trouble. A block and a 
half from my house, I ran into my three most unfavorite people in the world— 
Barry, Marv, and Karl. 

“Hey, guys!” Barry cried with an ugly smile. “The Klutz is up and walking 
around. That must mean we didn’t do a very good job of pounding him 
yesterday.” 

“No,” I insisted. “You did a good job. You did a very good job, guys!” 

I guess they didn’t believe me. They all jumped me at once. 

When they were finally finished—about five minutes later—I lay on the 
ground and watched them walk away through one swollen black eye. 

“Have a nice day!” Marv called back to me. All three of them roared with 
laughter. 

I sat up and pounded the ground with my fist. 

“I’m sick of this!” I wailed. “I want to be somebody else —anybody else!” 

Slowly and painfully, I dragged myself to my feet. “I’m doing it,” I decided. 
“And nobody’s going to stop me. Tomorrow I’m going to call Person-to-Person 
Vacations. I want them to put me into somebody else’s body. As soon as they 
can!” 

7 

I spent the next few days changing my Band-Aids and hoping the woman from 
Person-to-Person Vacations would call me. 

At first, I ran to answer the phone every time it rang. But of course it was 
never for me. Usually, it was one of Krissy’s dumb friends, wanting to giggle 
and gossip. 

One afternoon, I was reading a science-fiction book in my usual spot 
behind the big maple tree. I heard a sound, and peered around from behind the 
tree. 

Sure enough, there was Mr. Andretti walking across the lawn. He was 
dressed in his beekeeping outfit. As I watched, Mr. Andretti went to the 
screened-in area off the garage and started opening up the little doors to his 
beehives. 

Bzzzzzz. 

I covered my ears, but I couldn’t shut out the loud, droning hum. How I 
hated that sound! It was just so frightening. 

I shivered and decided it was time to go back inside. 

As I climbed to my feet, a bullet-sized object shot right by my nose. A bee! 

Were the bees escaping for real this time? 

I gasped and stared over at Andretti’s house. Then I almost choked. There 
was a big hole in the screen around the beekeeping area. 

A lot of bees were flying out! 

“Ow!” I cried out as a bee landed on the side of my head and buzzed loudly 
into my ear. 

Frantically, I batted it away. Then I ran toward the house. For one wild 
moment, I thought about calling the police or maybe the paramedics. 

But, as I slammed the back door, I heard an all-too-familiar sound. “Haw 
haw haw!” 

Once again, Mr. Andretti was laughing at me. 

I pounded my fist into my other hand. Oh, how I’d like to sock that guy in 
the nose! I thought. 

I was interrupted by the sound of the phone ringing. 

“Give me a break!” I cried as I stomped off to answer it. “Don’t Krissy’s 

moron friends have anything better to do than talk on the phone all day long?” 

“Whaddya want?” I snarled into the mouthpiece. 

“Is this Gary?” a woman’s voice asked. “Gary Lutz?” 

“Uh... yes,” I answered in surprise. “I’m Gary.” 

“Hi, Gary. This is Ms. Karmen. From Person-to-Person Vacations? 
Remember me?” 

My heart started thumping in my chest. “Yes. I remember,” I answered. 

“Well, if you’re still interested, we’ve found a match for you!” 

“A match?” 

“Correct,” said Ms. Karmen. “We’ve found a boy who wants to switch 
bodies with you for a week. Are you interested?” 

I hesitated for a few seconds. But, then, as I gazed out the back door of the 
kitchen, I saw a big, fat bee throwing itself against the outside of our screen 
door. “Haw haw!” Mr. Andretti’s scornful laughter boomed across the back yard. 

My mouth tightened into a thin line. “Yes,” I said firmly. “I’m really 
interested. When can we make the switch?” 

“Why, we could do it now,” said Ms. Karmen. “If that’s all right with you.” 

My pulse raced as I thought. My parents were both out for the afternoon, 
and Krissy was playing at a friend’s house. The timing was perfect. I’d never get 
another chance like this! 

“Now is great!” I exclaimed. 

“Terrific, Gary. It will take me about twenty minutes to get to your house.” 

“I’ll be waiting.” 

The next twenty minutes seemed to take forever. While I waited, I paced back 
and forth in the living room, wondering what my new body would be like. 

What would my new parents be like? My house? My clothes? Would I 
actually have some friends this time around? 

By the time Ms. Karmen arrived, I was a wreck. When the doorbell rang, 
my hand was sweating so much, I could barely turn the doorknob to let her in. 

“Let’s go in the kitchen,” Ms. Karmen suggested. “I like to set up my 
equipment on a table.” She opened a small case and took out some black boxes 
with monitors on them. 

I showed her the way to the kitchen. “So who’s this kid who wants to 
switch places with me?” I asked. 

“His name is Dirk Davis.” 

Dirk Davis! I thought excitedly. Even his name sounded cool. “What does 
he look like?” 

Ms. Karmen opened up a white photo album. “Here’s his picture,” she said, 
passing it to me. 

I looked down at a picture of a tall, athletic-looking blond boy in black 
Lycra bike shorts and a blue muscle shirt. I blinked in surprise. 

“He looks like a surfer or something!” I cried. “Why in the world does he 
want to switch bodies with me? Is this some kind of trick?” 

Ms. Karmen smiled. “Well, to be honest, it’s not exactly your body he’s 
interested in, Gary. He wants your mind. You see, Dirk needs someone who is 
good in math. He has some very hard math tests coming up in summer school. 
He wants you to take them for him.” 

“Oh,” I said. I felt relieved. “Well, I usually do pretty well on math tests.” 

“We know that, Gary. Person-to-Person does its homework. You’re very 
good at math. Dirk’s good at skateboarding.” 

I sat down at the table. 

Bzzzzzz. 

A bee buzzed right under my nose. “Hey!” I yelled, jumping back up. 
“How’d that bee get in here?” 

Ms. Karmen glanced up from her equipment. “Your back door is open just a 
bit. Now please sit down and try to relax. I need to fasten this strap around your 
wrist.” 

With a nervous glance at the back door, I sat back down. Ms. Karmen 
strapped a black band around my wrist. Then she started fiddling with some 
wires attached to one of her machines. 

Bzzzzzz. 

Another bee flew in front of me, and I wiggled around in my chair. 

“Please sit still, Gary. Otherwise the equipment won’t work.” 

“Who can sit still with all these bees buzzing around in here?” I asked. I 
lowered my eyes and saw three fat bees walking across the table. 

Bzzzzzz. 

Another bee flew past my right eye. 

“What’s up with these bees?” I was starting to panic. 

“Don’t pay any attention to them,” Ms. Karmen said, “and they won’t 
bother you.” She made one more adjustment to her machine. “Besides, Dirk 
Davis isn’t afraid of bees. And, as soon as I flip this switch, you won’t be, 

either!” 

“But...!” 

ZZAAAAPPPP! 

A blinding white light flashed in front of my eyes. 
I tried to cry out. 

But my breath caught in my throat. 

The light grew brighter, brighter. 

And then I sank into a deep pool of blackness. 

8 

Something was wrong. 

Colors returned. But they were a total blur. 

I struggled to make everything come clear. But I couldn’t seem to focus on 
anything. 

My new body didn’t feel right, either. I was lying on my back, and I felt 
light as a feather, light enough to float away. 

Could this be Dirk Davis’ tall, muscular body? It certainly didn’t feel like it! 

Was this some kind of trick? I asked myself. Was the picture of Dirk Davis 
a phony? Was he really a lot smaller than he looked in the photo album? 

I reached out one of my hands and tried to touch my stomach. But my hand 
felt really weird, too. It was small, and my arm seemed to be bending in several 
places at once! 

What’s going on? I wondered, trembling with fright. 

Why do I feel so weird? 

“Whooooa!” I cried out as I finally managed to touch my body. “Yuck.” My 
skin was soft. And it was covered with a fine layer of fuzz. 

“Help! Ms. Karmen! Help! Something’s wrong!” I tried to shout. 

But there was something wrong with my voice. It came out all tiny and 
squeaky. Little mouse squeaks. 

I rolled over onto my stomach and tried to get up. I spread my arms to 
balance myself. 

I gasped as I realized my feet weren’t even touching the ground! 

I was flying! 

“What’s happening to me?” I cried in my squeaky little voice. I floated 
forward and crashed into a kitchen cupboard. 

“Ow! Help me!” 

I moved my strange new arms and realized I had some control over which 
way I flew. I felt some weird muscles in my back going into action. Testing my 
new muscles, I flew over to the kitchen window. 

Exhausted, I landed on the sill. I turned my head to one side. Then I gasped 
in fright. 

A hideous monster was reflected in the window glass! 

The creature had two huge glaring eyes. And it was staring right at me. 

I tried to scream. But I was too terrified to utter a sound. 

I—I have to get away! I decided. 

I moved my feet and started to run. The monster in the glass ran, too. 

I stopped and stared at the window glass. The monster stopped and stared 
back at me. 

“Oh, no! Please—no!” I cried. “Please don’t let it be true!” I reached up and 
tried to cover my eyes. The creature in the window did the same thing. 

And suddenly I knew the hideous truth. The monster in the mirror—it was 
me. 

Ms. Karmen had messed up. Totally. 

And now I was trapped inside the body of a bee! 

9 

I don’t know how long I stood there. 

I couldn’t stop staring at my reflection. 

I kept waiting to come out of this nightmare. I kept waiting to blink my 
eyes and find myself in Dirk Davis’ big, muscular body. 

But I didn’t look at all like Dirk Davis. 

I had two giant eyes—one on either side of my head—and two skinny little 
antennas sticking out of my forehead. 

My mouth was truly disgusting. I had some kind of long tongue, which I 
soon discovered I could move all around and make longer and shorter if I 
wanted. Which I didn’t. 

My body was covered with thick, black hair. I had three legs on either side 
of my body. And let’s not forget the wings sticking out of my shoulders! 

“This is the pits!” I cried. “I’m a bug! I’m a disgusting, hairy bug! Ms. 
Karmen—something went wrong! Help me!” 

Creeeeak. 

Slam! 

What was that? 

Oh, no! I realized that Ms. Karmen had just gone out the kitchen door. 

“No—wait! Wait!” I squeaked. She was my only hope! 

I had to catch her. I had to tell her what had happened! 

“Ms. Karmen!” I squeaked. “Ms. Karmen!” 

Frantically, I flew out of the kitchen into the living room. Out the window, I 
could see her car still parked out in front of the house. 

But the front door to the outside was shut. And bees can’t open doors. I was 
trapped inside my own house! 

The back door! I remembered. Ms. Karmen had said it was open just a bit. 

Yes! That was how all those bees got into the house in the first place! 

I fluttered my new wings and flew back into the kitchen. As I soared, I 
realized I was getting more and more control over my flight pattern. 

But I didn’t care about that right now. All I knew was that I had to get to 
Ms. Karmen before she drove away. 

I darted out the tiny opening in the back door. “Ms. Karmen!” I shouted as I 
flew around the side of the house. “Ms. Karmen! Help me! You messed up! I’m 
a bee! Help me!” 

My voice was so tiny, she couldn’t hear me. She opened her car door and 
started to climb behind the wheel. My only chance for a normal life was about to 
drive away! 

What could I do? How could I get her attention? 

Thinking quickly, I flew right toward her head. “Ms. Karmen!” I shouted in 
her ear. “It’s me. Gary!” 

Ms. Karmen uttered a startled cry. Then she drew back her hand and 
swatted me. Hard. 

“Ow!” My entire body vibrated with pain. The force of her swat sent me 
falling to the street. I hit the pavement with a painful splat. 

I shook my head, trying to clear my eyes. That’s when I realized I had an 
extra set of tiny eyes arranged in a kind of triangle on the top of my head. I used 
them to gaze straight up. 

And then I screamed in terror. 

I saw the tire rolling toward me. 

Ms. Karmen was about to drive right over me. I was about to be squashed 
like the bug that I was! 

10 

“Oh!” I froze in panic. 

Even with my blurred bee vision, I could see the deep treads in the tire as it 
rolled steadily toward me. 

Closer. Closer. 

I have to move! I told myself. 

Fly away! Fly away! 

But in my panic, I forgot how to use my new muscles. 

I—Fm going to be squashed! I realized. 

I uttered a final, weak cry. 

And the car stopped. 

“Huh?” My entire body was trembling. But somehow I managed to pull 
myself up. Up into the air. 

Yes. I was flying now. 

I could see Ms. Karmen inside the car. She was fastening her seat belt. She 
had stopped the car to put on her seat belt! 

“Hey, seat belts really do save lives!” I told myself. 

I called out to her. But of course she couldn’t hear me. I watched the car roll 
away until it was a blur of color. 

Then, exhausted and terrified, I buzzed over to a nearby lilac bush and 
dropped onto a leaf. “That was too close!” I told myself, in between gasps for 
air. “I’m going to get killed out here!” 

A green caterpillar inched its way up onto a nearby stem and started 
chewing noisily on the leaf I was resting on. I’d never really examined a 
caterpillar before. Up close, they’re real ugly. They look a little bit like dragons. 
Only scarier. 

“Keep away from me!” I yelled in my tiny voice. The caterpillar didn’t 
even turn its head. Maybe it didn’t hear me. 

I forgot all about the caterpillar when I heard footsteps coming up the front 
walk. I turned my head and used my sideways eye to see who it was. 

“Mom!” I screamed. “Mom! Over here!” 

She couldn’t hear me. She hurried up the steps and into the house. 

Suddenly, I was overcome by a wave of sadness. My own mother didn’t 
recognize me! 

Desperately, I fluttered my wings and flew away from the leaf. I made my 
way to the front of the house, and started buzzing around the front windows. 

I had my wings under complete control by now. But the scene I saw inside 
the house was enough to make me fall down onto the ground again. 

My mother stood in the living room talking to me! Or at least, that’s what 
she thought. Only I knew it couldn’t be me. / was stuck outside. But who was in 
there with my mom? Had Dirk Davis managed to get inside my body? 

I landed on the ledge and stared into the house. My mom was talking. The 
boy was nodding and laughing. He said something to her. If I stared closely, I 
could read his lips. 

“Hey, did you buy taco chips? I’m really starving, Mom.” 

That had to be Dirk talking inside my body. 

My mom smiled at him and patted him on the arm. I read his lips and saw 
that he was calling her “Mom” again. How could he do that? How could he call 
my mother “Mom”? 

If bees could cry—which I now know they can’t—I would have started 
bawling right then and there. Who did that boy think he was? For that matter, 
what kind of mom did I have, who couldn’t even tell that a total stranger was 
living inside her son’s body? 

As I watched “myself” and my mom chatting in the living room, I totally 
lost it. Like a crazed maniac, I started bashing my insect body into the window. 

“Buzz!” I cried. “Buzz! Buzz! Buzz! It’s me, Gary. Look out here! Help 

me!” 

Again and again, I smashed myself up against the glass. But no one inside 
the house noticed. 

After a few minutes, Mom brought the new me a bag of taco chips. I 
watched “Gary” rip the bag open and take out a handful of chips. Crumbs fell on 
the living room carpet as he crunched the spicy chips. 

I realized I was starving. 

But what do bees eat? I asked myself. Desperately, I tried to remember 
everything I’d ever read about the creatures. 

I thought of the hungry caterpillar, crunching away on the leaf. But I was 
almost positive bees didn’t eat leaves. 

But what did they eat? Other bugs? Ugh! The thought made me shudder. I’d 

die before I’d eat a bug! 

I buzzed around the yard, hoping to see something—anything—I could use 
for food. As I flew, I found that I was getting used to my strange new vision and 
learning how to work my different sets of eyes. 

I remembered something I’d once read in an old picture book called The 
Big Book of Bees. It said that bee eyes each have thousands of tiny lenses 
crowded together. But, because they don’t have pupils, they can’t really focus 
their eyes. 

Interesting, I thought. But not very helpful. If I could remember about bees’ 
eyesight, why couldn’t I remember what they ate? 

I settled onto another bush to think. And suddenly, I became aware of a 
wonderful odor nearby. I turned my head and saw a beautiful yellow flower. 

Then I remembered something else I’d read. “Pollen,” I said out loud. 
“Bees eat pollen. And they get it from flowers!” 

Excitedly, I flew up into the air and started hovering over the yellow 
blossom. I tried to open my mouth—before I remembered I didn’t have that kind 
of mouth anymore! 

Instead, I had my long, weird tongue. But how was I supposed to use it to 
get the stuff out of the flower? 

I didn’t have a clue! 

As I hummed around in the air, I realized I was becoming more and more 
exhausted. If I didn’t get something to eat soon, I was going to faint. 

I started to feel dizzy. I hardly knew where I was. 

I became more and more confused. My brain got so fuzzy, I even began to 
wonder if I’d ever actually been a boy at all. Maybe I’d really been a bee for my 
entire life, and I’d just dreamed about being a boy. 

Slam! 

Somebody closed a car door nearby, and I was startled out of my mental 
fog. I swiveled my head to look. 

Dad! 

He was closing the garage door. Now he was walking across the driveway 
and heading toward the back door of the house. 

“Dad!” I screamed. “Dad. It’s me. Gary! Help me!” 

“Hi, Gary,” Dad said. 

11 

“Dad! You can hear me!” I cried joyfully. “Dad—you’ve got to help me!” 

My heart sank when Dad walked right past me and started talking to the 
fake Gary. 

Desperately, I started buzzing round and round their heads. 

“Looks like Andretti’s lost one of his workers,” my dad laughed. He 
swatted at me with his rolled-up newspaper. 

A near miss. I darted away. 

“Uh, right,” the fake Gary laughed, pretending he knew what Dad was 
talking about. “Andretti.” 

“Let’s help get dinner on,” my dad said. He put a friendly hand on my 
former shoulder. “Okay, son?” 

“Sure thing, Dad.” 

Like best pals, my dad and his phony son crossed the lawn and opened the 
screen door. 

“Wait!” I shouted. “Wait!” 

Like a space rocket, I shot through the air after them. If I really put the 
speed on, I thought I could make it through the door before it closed. Fast, faster, 
and... 

BLAM! 

The screen door banged shut, right on top of my tiny bee body. Once again, 
I sank into a deep pool of blackness. 

“Ohhhhhh. Where am I? What happened? Am I still a bee?” 

Dazed, I fought my way back to the real world. When I was able to get my 
eyes open, I realized I was still a bee—a small, frail, slightly damaged bee— 
who’d just narrowly missed being scrunched by a screen door. 

Now I was lying on my back on the grass in our yard. My six legs were 
thrashing the air. 

“I was a klutz as a human—and I’m a klutz as a bee!” I wailed. I tried to 
flip myself over. “I’ve only been a bee for an hour, and I’ve almost been killed. 
Twice!” 

I suddenly knew what I had to do. I had to get to Ms. Karmen’s office and 
tell her what had happened. 

I didn’t know if I could do it. But I knew I had to try. 

I let out a small grunt, and with a huge effort, flipped over onto my 
stomach. Using all five of my eyes, I checked myself out. Both sets of wings 
seemed to be working. And all my six legs were still there. 

“Okay,” I told myself. “You can do it. Just fly to the Person-to-Person office 
and go inside.” 

I flapped my wings and started to take off into the air. But I’d only risen 
about an inch up off the ground when I heard a sound that made my blood run 
cold. 

It was Claus the cat. With his long, sharp claws extended, he leaped through 
the air. 

I let out a squeal as he pounced on me, grabbed me in one paw, and began 
to tighten his claws around my body. 

12 

As the cat’s claws closed around me, I saw his hideous mouth gape open. 

Sting him! Sting him! 

The thought burned into my mind. 

But something held me back. Something told me not to use my stinger. 

I suddenly remembered something else I’d read in The Big Book of Bees. 
Honeybees die once they use their stingers! 

No way! I thought. 

I was still hoping to come out of this alive. And back in my old body. 

So, if using my stinger was out, I’d have to use my wits instead. 

With a loud gnashing of his teeth, Claus snapped his huge mouth shut. He 
lowered his head, preparing to snap up his furry prize—me. 

At just the right moment, I burst out of his claws and ducked out from 
under his gnashing teeth. 

I tried to shoot off through the air. But the cat whipped out his paw and 
batted me down. 

Claus was playing with me as if I were one of the chewed-up catnip mouse 
toys Krissy always gives him for Christmas. 

With my last burst of strength, I spread my wings, shot up through the air, 
and flew as fast as I could. A backwards look out of one of my eyes told me that 
I’d left the surprised cat sitting in the grass. 

For one second, I experienced a wonderful sensation of triumph. “You did 
it, Gary!” I crowed to myself. “You, a tiny little bee, managed to fight off a great 
big vicious cat!” 

I was so pleased with myself, I decided to take a little victory lap. I spread 
my wings out wide and began a big, slow circle in the air. 

Whap! 

Oh, no! Now what? 

I’d crashed right into something! But what was it? It wasn’t hard, like a 
wall or a tree. Instead, it was soft and clinging, like cloth. And my feet were all 
tangled up in it. 

I struggled to squirm free. I wiggled and pushed. But my legs were caught. 

I was trapped. 


“Haw haw haw!” 

The booming laughter made my entire body shake. 

I suddenly realized where I was. 

I was caught in Andretti’s net. 

A wave of despair made me slump against the white netting. 
I knew exactly what would happen next. 

He would put me in his hives—and I would never get away. 

13 

“Time to go back home now, my little buzzing babies,” Mr. Andretti sang. “Time 
to get back to work, my honeys.” He started to laugh at his stupid pun. “My 
honeys! Haw haw! Oh, my, wasn’t that a good one?” 

Bzzzzz. Bzzzzzzz. 

From the loud humming sounds in my ears, I knew I wasn’t the only bee 
Andretti had caught in his net. In fact, out of my right eye, I could see another 
bee who looked just like me. He loomed right in front of me, and wiggled his 
antennas in my face. 

Whooa! What a monster! 

My wiry legs began trembling with fright. I twisted myself around and 
around, struggling to get away from him. 

I finally got myself turned the other way. But then I saw I was facing 
another bee. And another. Each one looked scarier than the last. 

They all had big, bulging eyes and creepy antennas! And they all buzzed 
menacingly at me. 

The frightening hum grew louder and louder as Mr. Andretti caught more 
bees in the net. Suddenly, the net began to shake. Up and down, up and down— 
like a violent earthquake—until I couldn’t even think straight! 

As the net shook, I lost my footing and fell into a big, squirming cluster of 
bees at the bottom of the net. 

Whooooa! I stumbled over the pile of wriggling, hairy bees. And as I 
staggered in terror, bees fell on top of me. 

A crawling, buzzing nightmare! 

I’ve never been so terrified. I screamed in my tiny voice. I tried to climb up 
the side of the net, but my feet were stuck under another bee’s body. How I hated 
the feel of his disgusting fuzz! 

In my terror, I knew I had to escape. I had to get away from here. I had to 
get to Ms. Karmen’s office and beg her to help me. 

Then I had the most terrifying thought of all. If I couldn’t escape, I 
suddenly realized, I would remain a bee for the rest of my life! 

As Mr. Andretti carried me and the other bees across his back yard, I started 
buzzing and shivering with panic. How could this have happened to me? I asked 

myself. How could I ever have been so stupid as to try to change bodies with 
somebody else? Why wasn’t I happy with the perfectly good body I’d already 
had? 

Mr. Andretti opened the door to the screened-in area off the side of his 
garage. “We’re back now, my little honeys,” he cooed. 

The net started to shake, and I figured out that Mr. Andretti was slowly 
turning it inside out. One by one, he started plucking us—his prisoners—off the 
side of the mesh cloth and plopping each one back inside his hanging drawer 
hives. 

As Andretti reached for the bees, they started buzzing louder than ever. 
Finally, it was my turn to be plucked out of the net. 

When I saw the ends of Andretti’s grasping fingers reaching for me, I hung 
back, clinging to the net. I suddenly remembered his bragging speech about how 
he never used gloves because his bees “trusted” him. 

I watched his fingers stretch toward me. 

It would be so cool to plunge my stinger into his soft, plump skin, I thought. 

Should I do it? 

Should I sting him? 

Should I? 

14 

I didn’t sting him. 

I really didn’t want to die. 

Sure, things really looked terrible for me right now. But I was still clinging 
to a shred of hope. 

Maybe, somehow, I’d find my way out of this bee prison and back into my 
own body. It didn’t seem very likely. But I was determined to keep on trying. 

“In you go, my fuzzy little friend,” Mr. Andretti said. He opened up one of 
the removable drawerlike parts of his hive and dropped me in. 

“Ohhhh,” I moaned. It was so dark inside the hive. And so confusing. 

Where should I go? What should I do? 

The air was hot and wet. Everywhere I turned, I was surrounded by a 
deafening, droning hum. 

“I—I can’t stand it!” I cried. I could feel myself totally losing it! 

All around me, bees scurried around in the darkness. I stayed where I was, 
too frightened to move. 

I suddenly realized I was still very hungry. If I didn’t get something to eat, I 
knew I’d never be able to find a way out of here! 

I spun around and started trying to explore. 

Out of my left eye, I saw another bee glaring at me. I froze in my tracks. 
Did bees attack each other inside their hives? I wondered. 

I didn’t remember reading anything about that in my bee book. But this bee 
really looked ready for a fight. 

“Please leave me alone,” I begged in my tiny voice. “Please give me a 
break.” 

The bee glared back at me. I’ve never seen such big, angry-looking eyes! 

Slowly, I started backing away from him. “Uh...” I squeaked nervously. 
“I’ve got to be going now. I... um... I have to get to work.” 

The bee bulged his eyes and waved his antennas in a threatening way. I was 
sure he planned to sting me. I turned and flew away as fast as I could. I tried to 
hide. 

I was so frightened, I couldn’t even make myself move. What if I bumped 
into another bee? I couldn’t even stand to think about what might happen if I did. 

I realized I had to move. I had to find something to eat. 

Shaking with fear, I tiptoed out into the open. I took a nervous look around. 

On the far wall, I could see a large cluster of bees, busily building 
something. A honeycomb! 

And where there was a honeycomb, I told myself, there was honey. 

I’ve always hated the sweet, sticky goo. But I knew I had to eat some. Right 
away! 

As quietly as I could, I crept over and joined the bee workers. Out of the 
corner of my eye, I saw them doing really gross things with their mouths. 

First, they used their legs to pick little flakes of waxy-looking stuff off their 
abdomens. Then they crammed the wax into their mouths and started working 
their jaws up and down like little chewing machines. Finally, they spit out the 
wax and used it to build part of the honeycomb they were working on. 

“Yuck!” It looked so disgusting. It made me sick! 

But what choice did I have? I had to eat some honey—even if it was 
covered with bee spit. 

I turned my head and practiced sucking my tongue up and down. Then I 
slurped up a big puddle of honey. 

Amazing! For the first time in my life, I actually liked that stuff. Soon, I 
was sucking it down as if it were chocolate milk. 

After a while, I got quite good with my tongue, which was actually more of 
a bendable tube than a tongue. It was really the perfect tool for guzzling honey. 

If I ever made it back to the outside world, I thought I’d now be pretty good 
at using it for gathering nectar and pollen. Why, I might turn out to be the best 
worker in the whole hive! 

I tried to smile, and then I almost gagged on my honey. 

What was happening to me? 

What was I thinking? I was actually starting to feel like a bee! 

I had to get out of this place. Before it was too late! 

I wanted to start searching for an escape route right away. But I suddenly 
felt so tired. So completely worn out... 

Was it the honey? Or was it the strain of so much fear? 

I could barely keep my eyes open. The droning hum grew louder. 

With a weary sigh, I sank against a clump of hairy bodies. 

I sank into the warm darkness of the hive, surrounded by the steady buzz. 
Breathing the sweet aroma of the honey, I sank beside my furry brothers and 

sisters. 

I’m one of them now, I told myself weakly. I’m not a boy anymore. I’m 
bee. A buzzzzzzzzzing bee. A bee sinking into the warm, dark hive. My home. 
Sinking... sinking... 

15 

I woke up with a start and tried to brush a bee away from my face. It took me a 
few moments to remember. I wasn’t lying in my back yard anymore, trying to 
keep the bees away from me. I was a bee—a bee trapped inside a hive! 

I jumped up, took a step, and immediately came face to face with another 
bee! I couldn’t tell if he was the same one I’d seen the night before. But he 
looked just as angry. His big eyes were bulging with rage. And he was moving 
deliberately toward me. 

As fast as I could, I spun around and flew away. Of course, I had no idea 
where I was going. 

The hive seemed to be made up of a lot of long, dark hallways. All around 
me, groups of bees were building honeycombs. As they worked, they kept up a 
steady buzz. The sound was really driving me off the wall! 

I began searching for a way out. I wandered in and out, in and out 
throughout the dark, sticky honeycombs. 

From time to time, I shot out my tongue and lapped up some honey. I was 
getting a little tired of the sweet stuff. But I knew I had to keep up my strength if 
I wanted to try to break out of the hive. 

As I searched for a way to escape, I noticed that every single bee seemed to 
have an assigned job, either building honeycombs, caring for the babies of the 
queen or whatever. And the little bugs never stopped working! They were “busy 
as bees” from morning till night. 

Darting through the tangled darkness, I began to lose hope. 

There’s no way out, I decided. No way out. 

I sank unhappily to the sticky hive floor. And as I dropped, three large bees 
moved in front of me. 

They buzzed angrily, bumping up against me with their hairy, damp bodies. 
It was easy to tell these bees were angry with me. 

Maybe it was because I wasn’t doing my “job.” But what was my job? How 
could I tell the bees I didn’t know what I was supposed to be doing? 

I tried to slip past them, but they moved to block my path. 

Three tough bees. They made me think of Barry, Marv, and Karl. 

I shrank back as one of them pointed his stinger at me. 

He was getting ready to kill me! And I didn’t even know what I’d done! 

I screamed and whirled around. As fast as my six legs would carry me, I 
darted back down the narrow passageway and turned another corner. 

“Oh!” I bumped hard into another bee. Luckily, he was hurrying off 
somewhere, and barely seemed to notice me. 

I gasped with relief. And then an idea came to me. Where was that bee 
going in such a hurry? Was he taking something somewhere? Could he be going 
to an area I hadn’t searched yet? 

I decided to follow him and find out. I needed to learn everything I could 
about the hive. Maybe, just maybe, it would help me escape. 

I hurried after the bee. I thought I’d find him quickly. But he was already 
long gone. 

I searched in and out among the different honeycombs, but I couldn’t find 
him anywhere. After a while, I gave up. 

Way to go, Lutz the Klutz, I scolded myself. I felt worse than ever. 

I shot out my tongue and slurped up a big helping of honey to keep myself 
going. Then I began my endless searching again. 

“Whoooa!” I stopped when I reached an area that looked familiar. I was 
pretty sure it was the place where Andretti had dropped me when he first put me 
into the hive. 

All at once, a large group of angrily buzzing bees crowded against me. 

“Hey—!” I protested as they shoved me forward. 

They replied with a sharp, rising buzz. 

What were they doing? Were they attacking me? Were they all going to 
sting me at once? 

They had me surrounded. I couldn’t run away. 

But how could I possibly fight off all these bees? I was doomed, I realized. 
Finished. Sighing in defeat, I closed my eyes and started to shake. 

And waited for them to swarm over me. 

16 

I waited to be crushed. 

And waited some more. 

When I opened my eyes, the angry bees had moved to the side of the hive. 
They weren’t paying any attention to me. 

I saw a single bee, standing in the center of the hive floor. He was 
performing a kind of jumping, twisting, hip-hop dance. 

How weird! I thought. The other bees were watching intently, as if this were 
the most interesting thing in the world. 

“Those bees didn’t care about me,” I told myself. “They were trying to get 
me out of the way so this bee could do his dance.” 

I realized I’d wasted a lot of time. I had to keep searching for an escape 
route. 

I tried to push myself away from the group of bees, but the hive floor had 
become too crowded to move. 

The bee danced faster and faster. He moved his body toward the right. All 
the other bees stared intently at him. 

What was going on? 

At that moment, something from my old Big Book of Bees came back to 
me. I remembered that bees send out scouts to find their food. Then the scouts 
“dance” to tell the other bees where to go get it! 

If the scout was reporting on where to get food, it meant he’d just been out 
of the hive. That meant there had to be a way out of this place! 

I was so excited, / almost started dancing! 

But I didn’t have a chance because, suddenly, all the bees in the hive rose 
up like a dark cloud. I spread my wings and flew up with them. 

As I followed, the bees formed a single, orderly line and shot out through a 
tiny hole in a far, upper corner of the hive. 

I buzzed around until I found the end of the line. Then I got ready to escape. 

Would I make it? 

The very last bee in line, I shot out of the tiny hole into open space. For a 
few seconds, I watched the other bees floating away, busily hunting for nectar 
and pollen. 

I knew I looked just like them. The difference was that they would willingly 
return to Andretti’s hive. But I never, ever would. At least, not if I could help it. 

“I’m out!” I cried joyfully in my tiny voice. “I’m out! I’m free!” 

Dazzled by the sudden bright light of the outer world, I flew around and 
around in the beekeeping area. Then I headed for the hole I’d seen in the screen 
when I was still in my own body. 

I knew it was on the wall that faced my family’s yard. But when I flew over 
to it, I stopped and gasped in disappointment. 

The hole had been patched up. Mr. Andretti had fixed it! 

“Oh, no!” I wailed. “I can’t be trapped! I can’the!” 

My heart started thumping crazily. My whole body was vibrating. 

I forced myself to calm down and look around. 

None of the other bees were in the screened-in area anymore. They’d 
already gone outside to collect pollen. And that meant there had to be another 
way out. 

I wasn’t thinking clearly because I was exhausted, worn out from all my 
flying around. I sat down on top of the hive to rest. 

At that instant, the door between the beekeeping area and the garage 
opened. “Good morning, my little bee friend,” Mr. Andretti’s voice boomed. 
“What are you doing, lying around on top of the hive? Why aren’t you busy 
inside making me some honey? Are you sick? You know we can’t have any sick 
bees around here.” 

As I gazed up weakly, Mr. Andretti moved closer. His huge, dark shadow 
fell over me. 

I tried to curl up into a ball and disappear. But it was no use. His large 
fingers were stretching right toward me! 

I yelled in terror. But of course, he couldn’t hear me. What is he going to do 
to me? I asked myself. What does he do with sick bees? 

17 

What does he do with sick bees? I wondered again, quivering in terror. 

He probably throws them in the garbage, I thought. Or even worse—he 
feeds them to his pet bird or frog. 

Despite my weariness, I knew I couldn’t wait around to find out. I had to 
get out of there! 

Just as Mr. Andretti’s fingers were about to fold around me, I shot up into 
the air and buzzed around his head. At the same instant, I saw some other bees 
flying in through a tiny hole in the screen. It was in the corner, near the ceiling. 

I buzzed Mr. Andretti’s face one more time. Then I raced toward the hole. 
As I tried to squeeze myself out the exit hole, I crashed right into another bee 
who was flying in. He glared at me and gave me an angry buzz. 

Frightened, I backed off and clung to the screen. I had to wait for a long 
fine of bees to come back inside. It seemed to take them forever. 

When I was finally sure the last bee had come in, I leaped forward and shot 
out of the hole. I was out in the open sky! 

“This time I really am free!” I screamed in celebration, forgetting my 
weariness. “And Andretti’s never going to catch this bee again!” 

I landed on a leaf and let the morning sun warm my back and wings. It was 
a beautiful day—a beautiful day for finding somebody who could help me get 
back into my human body! 

Like a rocket, I shot straight up into the air and gazed around. I recognized 
the familiar creak of my father opening the back door of my house. 

Panting hard, I raced forward. 

My father called, “Good-bye, hon! Tell the kids I’ll see them tonight!” over 
his shoulder and let go of the door. 

I darted into the house. The door slammed hard. Another near miss. 

I hummed with happiness. It felt so good to be back in my own house and 
out of that dark, sticky hive! I landed on the counter and gazed around at the old, 
familiar walls. 

Why hadn’t I ever realized how nice my house was before? 

Step, step, step. 

Someone was coming into the kitchen! I flew up onto the windowsill for a 

better look. 

Krissy! 

Maybe I could get her to listen to me. 

“Krissy! Krissy!” I buzzed. “Over here by the window. It’s me, Gary!” 

To my delight, she turned and stared in my direction. 

“Yes!” I cried excitedly. “Yes—it’s me! It’s me!” 

“Oh, terrific,” Krissy groaned. “One of Andretti’s dumb bees got in here 
again.” 

Okay, so it wasn’t exactly the reaction I’d been hoping for. But she’d still 
noticed me! Maybe, I thought, if I flew right onto her shoulder and spoke into 
her ear, she’d be able to understand me! 

My heart vibrating my entire body, I lifted myself up off the windowsill and 
soared toward my sister. “Krissy!” I buzzed as I approached her shoulder. “You 
have to listen to me!” 

“Aaaaiii!” 

Krissy screeched so loud, I was afraid the glass in the windows would 
shatter. “Get away from me, bee!” 

She started thrashing her hands in the air, trying to bat me away. 

“Ow!” I cried out as she slapped me. Stung with pain, I lost control and 
landed with a thud on the tiled countertop. 

I raised my eyes in time to see Krissy grab a flyswatter from out of the 
broom closet. 

“No, Krissy, no!” I screamed. “Not that! You don’t want to do that to your 
own brother!” 

My sister lifted up the flyswatter and thwacked it down right next to me. I 
could feel the rush of air from it. And I felt the entire counter shake. 

I screamed and quickly rolled to one side. 

Krissy, I knew, was a menace with a flyswatter. 

She was the champion in our family. She never missed. 

The eyes on top of my head spun in terror. And in the gray blur, I could see 
the shape of the flyswatter, rising up to slap me again. And again. 

18 

“Stop, Krissy!” I screamed. “Stop! You’re squashing me!” 

With a strangled gasp, I toppled off the counter. I hit the floor hard and 
struggled dizzily to my feet. 

Now I started to get angry. Why did Krissy have to be so bloodthirsty? 
Couldn’t she just open a window and shoo me out? 

Buzzing weakly, I floated up off the floor. Regaining my strength, I began 
darting wildly around the room, crashing into the walls and cupboards to show 
Krissy how upset I was. Then I shot out of the kitchen. 

In a rage, I headed up the stairs to my room. If my sister wouldn’t help me, 
I’d get someone else to help. Namely, the new Gary! 

The morning sun was high in the sky. But “Gary” was still sound asleep in 
my bed. 

Seeing him lying there so peacefully, so completely at home, made me even 
angrier. 

“Wake up, you slug!” I buzzed at him. He didn’t move. His mouth hung 
open as he slept, making him look like a real jerk. 

“Yuck! What a creep!” I was sure my mouth never hung open when I slept! 

I decided to take action. I landed on “Gary’s” head and started walking 
around on his face. I was sure my little insect legs would tickle him and wake 
him up. 

Nothing. He didn’t move. 

Even when I stuck a leg up his nose, “Gary” slept without stirring. 

“Why is he so wrecked?” I wondered. “Has he been wearing out my body?” 

Furious, I ran across “Gary’s” face and climbed down through his hair. 
Then I crawled onto his ear. “BUZZ!” I shouted as loudly as I could. “BUZZ! 
BUZZ! BUZZ!” 

Incredible as it seems, the new “Gary” didn’t even budge. 

Just my luck. Dirk Davis was turning out to be the world’s soundest 
sleeper! 

I sighed and gave up. I crawled off “Gary’s” ear and flew around my old 
room, gazing down at my bed, my dresser, and my computer. 

“My computer!” I cried excitedly. “Maybe I can put a message on the 

screen! Maybe I can tell my parents what has happened to me!” 

I swooped down to the computer, buzzing eagerly. 

Yes! The computer had been left on. 

What luck! I knew I wasn’t heavy enough to push the Power button. 

Would I be strong enough to type? 

A clear blue screen greeted me on the monitor. My heart pounding, I 
lowered myself to the keyboard and started hopping around on the letters. 

Yes! I was heavy enough to make the keys go up and down. 

I paused, resting on the Enter key. 

What should I type? What message should I put on the screen? 

What? What? What? 

As I frantically thought, I heard “Gary” stir behind me on the bed. He let 
out a groan. He was waking up. 

Quick! I told myself. Type something! Type anything! 

He’ll see it as soon as he gets out of bed. 

I hopped over to the letters and began to jump up and down, spelling out 
my desperate message. 

It was hard work. My bee eyes weren’t made for reading letters. And I kept 
leaping up and falling in the cracks between the keys. 

After eight or nine jumps, I was gasping for air. 

But I finished my message just as “Gary” sat up in bed and stretched. 
Floating up in front of the monitor, I struggled to read what I had typed: 

I AM NOT BEE. I AM GARY. HELO ME. 

Through my blurred vision, I saw that I missed the P in HELP and hit the O 
instead. I wanted to go back and fix it. But I was totally wiped out. I could barely 
buzz. 

Would they understand? 

Would they read the message and see me standing on top of the monitor and 
understand? 

“Gary” would understand. I knew he would. Dirk Davis would figure it out. 
I climbed wearily to the top of the monitor and watched him climb out of 

bed. 

Here he comes, I saw eagerly. He brushed his hair out of his eyes. He 
yawned. He stretched again. 

Over here! I urged. 

Dirk — please—check out the computer monitor! 

Dirk—over here! 

He picked up a crumpled pair of jeans off the floor and pulled them on. 
Then he found a wrinkled T-shirt to go with it. 

Come on, Dirk! I pleaded, hopping up and down on top of the monitor. 
Read the screen—please ? 

19 

Would he read it? 

Yes! Rubbing his eyes, “Gary” shuffled over to the computer. 

Yes! Yes! 

I nearly burst for joy as I watched him squint at the screen. “Go ahead, 
Gary! Read it! Read it!” I squeaked. 

He squinted at the screen some more, frowning. “Did I leave that thing on 
overnight?” he muttered, shaking his head. “Wow. I must be losing it.” 

He reached down and clicked off the power. Then he turned and made his 
way out of the room. 

Stunned, I toppled off the monitor, landing hard on the desk beside the 
keyboard. All that work for nothing. 

What was “Gary’s” problem, anyway? Doesn’t he know how to read? 

I’ve got to talk to him, I told myself, pulling myself together. I’ve got to 
communicate with him somehow. 

I lifted my wings and floated up after him. I followed him through the 
kitchen, and then slipped through the back door with him. 

As he strode across the grass, I started buzzing around his head. But he 
didn’t pay any attention to me. 

He crossed the yard and opened our garage door. Then he went inside and 
brought out my old skateboard. 

I hadn’t used that skateboard in at least two years. My uncle had given it to 
me for my tenth birthday, and I almost broke my leg trying to ride it. After that, I 
put it away and refused to touch it again. 

“Don’t get on that thing!” I yelled at “Gary”. “It’s dangerous. You might 
hurt my body. And I want it back in one piece!” 

Of course “Gary” didn’t even notice me. Instead, he carried the skateboard 
out in front of the house and put it down on the ground. 

A short while later, Kaitlyn and Judy walked up the sidewalk. I waited for 
them to start giggling and making fun of the new me. 

“Hi, Gary,” Kaitlyn said. She brushed some curly hair off her forehead and 
smiled. “Are we late for our skateboarding lesson?” 

“Gary” flashed her a big smile. “No way, Kaitlyn,” he answered in my 

voice. “Want to head over to the playground like we did yesterday?” 

I couldn’t believe my ears. Skateboarding lesson? Head over to the 
playground like we did yesterday? What was going on around here? 

“I hope you don’t mind, Gary,” Judy said. “We told some of the other kids 
—like Gail and Louie—how good you are. They all said they can’t wait to take a 
lesson from you, too. Is that okay? Because if it isn’t, we can call them, and—” 

“No problem, Jude,” “Gary” broke in. “Let’s get going, okay?” The new 
“me” hopped onto his skateboard and smoothly rolled his way down the 
sidewalk. Judy and Kaitlyn hurried after him. 

For a second, I was too shocked to move. But then I decided to follow 
them. 

As I swooped after them, I kept muttering to myself, “I can’t believe it! 
Lutz the Klutz is giving skateboard lessons at the playground? Everybody’s 
waiting for him to show up? What is going on?” 

A few minutes later, the four of us had reached the playground. Sure 
enough, a whole gang of kids was waiting there for “Gary”. He put down his 
skateboard and started giving everybody pointers on “boarding”, as he called it. 

I buzzed over to him and started shouting in his ear again. “Dirk!” I 
shouted. “Dirk Davis! It’s me. The real Gary Lutz!” 

Very casually, he swatted me away. 

I tried to speak to him again. This time he swatted me really hard, sending 
me spinning to the ground. 

Trying to shake off the pain, I gave up. Dirk isn’t going to help me, I 
realized. 

Ms. Karmen is my only hope. After all, she was the one with all the 
equipment. She was the only person who could reverse what she had done. 

I flew onto a tree and tried to figure out which way to fly. When you’re an 
insect, everything looks different to you. Things that seem small to a person 
appear huge to a bee. So I wanted to be sure I didn’t get myself mixed up and fly 
off in the wrong direction. 

Standing on a big leaf, I gazed up and down the block until I was sure I 
knew which way to go. As I got ready to take off, a large shadow suddenly 
loomed over my head. At first, I thought it was a small bird. But then I realized it 
was a dragonfly. 

“Stay calm,” I told myself. “A dragonfly is an insect, isn’t it? And insects 
don’t eat each other, right?” 

I guess no one had told the dragonfly. 

Before I could move, it zoomed down, wrapped its teeth around my middle, 
and bit me in two. 

20 

I uttered a last gasp and waited for everything to go dark. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that the dragonfly had turned and 
buzzed off in the other direction. 

My imagination was running away with me. That’s what always happened 
when I got overtired. 

I took a deep breath, grateful to still be in one piece. I decided I had to use 
my remaining strength to get to Ms. Karmen at the Person-to-Person Vacations 
office. 

I rose up into the air, looked both ways for oncoming dragonfly traffic, then 
fluttered away. 

After a long, tiring trip, I floated past a street sign that told me I’d made it 
to the right block. Roach Street. 

I buzzed along the sidewalk until I came to the Person-to-Person building. 
Then I sat down on the stoop and tried to figure out how I was going to get 
inside. 

Luckily, as I rested on the warm cement, I saw a mailman marching up the 
street, stopping at each house along his route. Quickly, I flew over to the Person- 
to-Person entrance and checked it out. Just as I’d hoped, there was a mail slot in 
the middle of the door. 

I buzzed over to the doorknob, and waited for my chance. Slowly, the 
mailman trudged up to the building. 

“Hurry up!” I screamed at him. “Do you think I have all day here?” Of 
course he couldn’t hear me. 

He fumbled around in his bag and pulled out a bundle of letters. Then, 
slowly, he reached out and pushed open the mail slot. 

Before the mailman had a chance to react, I swooped down in front of his 
nose and buzzed right through the mail slot. As I zipped along, I heard him gasp, 
and I knew he’d seen me. But for once, luck was with me. I moved so quickly, 
there hadn’t been any time for the mailman to try to swat me. 

My luck held when I flew up the stairs. 

I’d just reached the top when the door to Person-to-Person Vacations 
opened, and a girl about my age came out. She had long, curly red hair and had a 

serious, thoughtful expression on her face. Was she thinking of trading places 
with someone? 

“Go home!” I shouted at her. “And don’t come back. Stay away from this 
place! Just look what happened to me!” 

Even though I was screaming, the girl didn’t even turn her head. But she 
left the door open just long enough for me to buzz into the Person-to-Person 
office. 

I flew across the waiting room and saw Ms. Karmen, sitting in the same 
chair she’d been in when I first met her. 

I shot right toward her—and smacked into something hard. 

Pain roared through my body. I dropped to the floor, dizzy and confused. 

As my head began to clear, I remembered the glass wall separating Ms. 
Karmen from the waiting area. Like some kind of brainless June bug, I’d crashed 
right into it! 

I shook myself to clear my mind. “Ms. Karmen!” I yelled. “Ms. Karmen. 
It’s me—Gary Lutz. Look what happened! Can you help me? Can you?” 

21 

Ms. Karmen didn’t even glance up from her paperwork. Once again, I realized 
no one could hear my squeaky insect voice. 

With a defeated moan, I sank down onto the seat of the chair and curled up 
into a tiny ball. I’d come all this way for nothing, I realized. I’d found the one 
person in the world who might be able to help me. And she couldn’t even hear 
me! 

“I give up,” I whispered sadly. “It’s hopeless. I have to get used to the idea 
of being a bee forever! There’s no way I’ll ever get my old body back.” 

I had never been so miserable in all my life. I wished someone would come 
along, drop into the chair, and sit on me! 

A strange sound startled me from my unhappy thoughts. I sat up straight 
and listened hard. 

“Whoo-ah. Whoo-ah. ” It almost sounded like someone breathing. But how 
could that be? It was so loud! 

I floated up off the chair and buzzed around the room, trying to find out 
where the sound was coming from. I had circled the room twice before I figured 
it out. 

Ms. Karmen was bending over to pick up something she’d dropped on the 
floor. Her nose and mouth were only inches from the top of her desk. And the 
microphone she used to talk to people had picked up the sounds of her breathing! 

Suddenly, I had a brilliant idea. If I could get to the other side of the glass, I 
could use the microphone to make Ms. Karmen hear me. 

I swooped over to the wall and flew straight up to the ceiling. No luck 
there. The sheet of glass went all the way up. There was no space for me to 
wedge myself through to the other side. 

I buzzed down to the place where the glass met the top of Ms. Karmen’s 
desk. Yes! There was a small slot in the glass. I remembered how she had passed 
through the book of photographs on my first visit to the office. 

The slot wasn’t very large. But it was plenty big enough for my round little 
bee body. 

I shot through the hole and jumped up on top of the microphone. 

“Ms. Karmen!” I shouted, putting my mouth next to the hard metal. “Ms. 

Karmen!” 

Her eyes opened wide. Her mouth dropped open in confusion. She stared 
out into the waiting room, searching for the person speaking. 

“It’s Gary Lutz!” I called out. “And I’m down here on your microphone.” 

Ms. Karmen stared down at the microphone. Then her eyes narrowed in 
fear. “What’s going on? Who’s doing this? Is this a joke?” 

“No!” I cried. “It’s no joke at all. It’s really me—Gary Lutz!” 

“But—but—” she stammered, but no other words came out. “What’s the 
joke? How are you doing that?” 

Her voice was so loud, the sound waves nearly blasted me off the 
microphone. 

“You don’t have to yell!” I cried. “I can hear you.” 

“I don’t believe this!” she exclaimed in a trembling voice. She stared down 
at me. 

“It’s all your fault!” I shouted angrily. “You messed up the transfer 
operation. When you made the switch, one of my neighbor’s bees must have 
gotten into the machine. So, instead of putting me into Dirk Davis’ body, you put 
me into a bee! ” 

Ms. Karmen blinked. Then she slapped her forehead. “Well that explains 
it!” she cried. “That explains why Dirk Davis’ body has been behaving so 
strangely.” 

She picked up some papers on her desk and started putting them into her 
briefcase. “I really must apologize,” she said. “I feel really bad, Gary. We’ve 
never had a mix-up like this before. I hope... I hope it’s at least been interesting 
for you.” 

“Interesting?” I shrieked. “It’s been a nightmare! You wouldn’t believe 
what I’ve been through. I’ve been attacked by screen doors, cats, flyswatters— 
you name it! You yourself almost ran me over with your car!” 

All the color drained from her face. “Oh, no,” she cried, her voice a 
whisper. “I’m so sorry. I—I didn’t know.” 

“Well, what about it?” I asked her impatiently. 

“What about what?” 

“What about getting me back into my body! Can you do it right away?” 

Ms. Karmen cleared her throat. “Well, I could,” she replied slowly. 
“Normally, I could transfer you right back. But there’s a slight problem in your 
case.” 

“What kind of problem?” I demanded. 

“It’s Dirk Davis,” Ms. Karmen replied. “It seems he’s become very attached 
to your old body. He likes your house and your parents, too. In fact, he even 
likes your sister, Krissy!” 

“So?” I cried. “So what’s that supposed to mean?” 

Ms. Karmen stood up and pushed in her desk chair. “It means,” she said, 
“that Dirk Davis is refusing to give up your old body. He says he absolutely 
won’t go back to his old life. He plans to keep your body forever.” 

22 

“WHAT?” I screamed, hopping up and down angrily on the microphone. 

“Just what I said,” Ms. Karmen said. “Dirk Davis wants to keep your body 
for the rest of his life.” 

“But he can’t do that, can he?” 

“It is very upsetting,” she replied, biting her lower lip. “It wasn’t what he 
said in our original agreement. But if he refuses to get out of your body and your 
life, there’s really nothing I can do.” 

Ms. Karmen gazed down at me sympathetically. “I’m so sorry about this, 
Gary,” she said softly. “I guess I’ll have to be more careful in the future.” 

“What about my future? What am I supposed to do now?” I wailed. 

Ms. Karmen shrugged. “I don’t know. Maybe you could go back, wait in 
the hive—and maybe Dirk Davis will change his mind.” 

“Back to the hive?!” My antennas stood straight on end, quivering with 
rage. “Do you have any idea what it’s like in there? Cramped together with those 
hairy bees in the darkness? Listening to that deafening buzz day and night?” 

“It’s a way of staying alive,” Ms. Karmen replied bluntly. 

“I—I don’t care!” I stammered. “I’m never going back there! Never!” 

“This is tragic. Tragic!” Ms. Karmen cried. “I’ll give your case some 
thought tonight, Gary. I promise. Maybe I can come up with a way of getting 
your body away from Dirk.” 

She crossed the room and opened the office door. “I’m so upset. So upset,” 
she murmured. Then she disappeared out the door, slamming it behind her. 

Trembling with anger at Dirk Davis, I hopped down to the desk. “Hey, 
wait!” I called after her. “You’ve locked me in!” 

Ms. Karmen was so upset, she forgot about me! 

I rose up into the air and started after her. But, then, I happened to glance 
back down at her desk. Dirk Davis’ questionnaire was right on top of a pile of 
papers. His address was next to his name. He lived at 203 Eastwood Avenue. 

Eastwood Avenue was near the computer store, so I knew where it was. 
“Maybe the old Dirk Davis will know how to get my body back!” I told myself. 

It was worth a try. I ducked through the slot in the glass and flew around the 
waiting room. 

No exit. No open window. No crack in the door. 

Once again, I was trapped. 

Frantically, I buzzed all around the waiting room. Then I went back through 
the slot in the glass. I checked out the whole equipment room. Every window 
was closed tight. 

I flew past a calendar and happened to see the date. “Oh, no!” I cried. “It’s 
Friday! It’s the weekend. Ms. Karmen might not come back to work for two 
whole days.” 

In two days, I realized, I would starve to death! 

I had to get out! I went over to the far wall and noticed another door I 
hadn’t seen before. I zipped through it. 

The room turned out to be a tiny bathroom. With one small window. Which 
was open just a crack. It was all I needed. 

“Hurray!” I yelled. I shot out through the window and sailed into the open 
air. Then I turned right and headed for Eastwood Avenue. Luckily, it wasn’t very 
far away. All this flying around was really beginning to wear me out. 

I found Dirk Davis’ house without any trouble. When I got there, I saw 
“Dirk” himself—or whoever he was now—standing in the front yard. I 
recognized him from the picture I’d seen in the Person-to-Person album. 

“Hey!” I yelled to him. “Hey, er... Dirk!” 

The tall, good-looking boy turned around and stared at me. His mouth 
moved, and it looked as if he was saying something. 

But I couldn’t understand any words. All I heard was a humming sound. 

“I’m Gary Lutz!” I cried in my little voice. “Can you help me get Dirk 
Davis out of my body?” 

The boy stared at me. Then he grinned. 

I was confused. What was he grinning about? 

“Hey, you can hear me! ” I cried. 

Now “Dirk” motioned with his hand. 

“You want me to follow you?” I asked. I felt excited. “Are you taking me 
someplace where we can get help?” 

“Dirk” grinned again. Then he turned and walked around the corner of the 
house. I didn’t know where we were going. But I knew I had to follow him. 

I found “Dirk” in the back yard. “Hum,” he said to me. “Hum.” He pointed 
to a big rosebush and grinned. Then he stuck his nose deep inside one of the 
blossoms. “Hummmmmmmmm,” he said. “Yummmmmm.” 

I gaped at him in shock. “Of course!” I cried. 

“You got the bee’s mind when I got the bee’s body!” 

“Dirk” didn’t say anything. But when he pulled his face out of the rose, the 
end of his nose was covered with yellow pollen. 

“Dirk” looked a little surprised. And disappointed. I guess he missed his 
long, sucking tongue—the tongue that was now hanging off the front of my face. 

“You can’t help me,” I muttered to him. “You’re in worse shape than I am!” 

“Hum?” he replied. “Hum?” 

He looked kind of silly with that yellow nose. But I felt sorry for him. He 
and I had the wrong brains in the wrong bodies. I knew exactly how he felt. 

“I’m going to go get help for both of us,” I told him. “If I get my body 
back, maybe you’ll get yours, too.” 

With a loud buzz, I flew out of the Davises’ yard. As I left, I thought I heard 
“Dirk” buzz back at me. I glanced over my wing and saw him sticking his face 
into another rose. Maybe this time he’d have better luck getting the pollen out. 

I headed toward my own house. This time I planned to make Dirk Davis 
give me my body back. Or else. 

As I turned up my street, I suddenly heard a familiar voice coming from 
behind a tree. 

“Don’t mess with me! Don’t mess with me, man!” 

I couldn’t believe it. The voice belonged to Marv. But who was he talking 
to? 

I shot around the tree to find out. To my surprise, I saw that Marv was 
talking to me—or, Dirk Davis, in my body. Barry and Karl were right beside 
him. 

Look out, Dirk! I thought. Run! Run! 

Please don’t let them wreck my body! 

But I was too late. 

Barry, Marv, and Karl were closing in on him, about to give him the 
pounding of his life. 

23 

I flew closer. 

“Look out, Dirk! Look out!” I squeaked. 

But to my surprise, the three hulking creeps weren’t moving in on “Gary”— 
they were backing away from him! 

“Don’t mess with me!” Marv cried. “I said I was sorry.” 

“We apologized,” Barry whined. “Don’t hit us again, Gary! Please!” 

Karl whimpered behind him, nursing a bloody nose. 

“You guys are losers,” I heard “Gary” tell them. “Take a hike. Go get a 

life.” 

“Okay! Okay!” Marv cried. “Just no more rough stuff, okay, Gary?” 

“Gary” shook his head and walked away. 

I don’t believe this! I thought gleefully. Barry, Marv, and Karl were afraid 
of me! 

I decided I’d have some fun with them, too. 

I swooped down and landed on Barry’s nose, buzzing as loudly and 
menacingly as I could. 

“Yowwwww!” he shrieked in surprise—and swatted himself on the nose. 

I was too fast for him. I was already on Karl’s ear. 

Karl cried out and toppled backwards into a thorny rosebush. 

Then I buzzed round and around Marv. 

“Get away!” he shouted angrily. 

And I flew right into his mouth. 

His scream nearly deafened me. But it was worth it. 

Marv started spitting and choking and gagging. 

I flew up into the air, laughing so hard, I nearly popped my antennas. That 
was the most fun I’d had since becoming a bee! 

I watched the three gorillas run away. Then I flew up the block to my house. 

“Gary” had left the window open, and I was able to shoot in. He was lying 
on my bed, reading one of my comic books and eating crackers with honey on 
them. 

The honey smelled really good, and I realized I was hungry again. I 

reminded myself to stop by a flower and get a snack the next time I went 
outside. 

But, meanwhile, I had work to do. I flew over and landed on Gary’s 
earlobe. 

“Hey, you! Dirk Davis!” I yelled at the top of my little voice. “I need to talk 
to you!” 

He reached a hand up and flicked me off his face. I fell down and landed 
with a bounce on the bed. 

I buzzed angrily and shot right back up to his earlobe. “Hey, you! I want my 
body back! You have to get out of it. Now!” 

“Gary” folded up his comic book and swung it at me. I buzzed with rage 
and frustration. I wasn’t going to give up this time. No way! I had to make him 
hear me. 

I rocketed up in the air and landed on the top of his head. Then I climbed 
down to his other earlobe and tried one more time. “I’m not leaving you alone 
till you get out of my body!” I screeched. “Do you hear me?” 

He sighed and shrugged his shoulders. “Will you please quit bothering 
me?” he asked. “Can’t you see I’m trying to relax?” 

“You can hear me?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” he muttered. “I can hear you okay.” 

“You can?” I was so surprised, I almost fell off his ear. 

“Yes, I can hear you perfectly. Weird, huh? I’m not sure why. But I think 
some bee cells got mixed up with my human cells during our electronic transfer. 
I can hear all kinds of little bug noises now.” 

“Your human cells? Those are my human cells!” I cried. 

Dirk shrugged. 

“Enough chitchat,” I told him. “When do you plan to get out of my body?” 

“Never,” he replied. He picked up his comic book and started reading it 
again. “I like your body. I can’t understand why you gave it up to go become a 
bee.” 

“That wasn’t my idea!” I screamed. 

“You’ve got a good life here,” he continued. “I mean, you have great 
parents. Krissy is an okay sister. And Claus is an awesome cat. Too bad you 
didn’t know all that when you were in your body. Which is now my body!” 

“It’s not your body! It’s mine! Give it back!” I started to buzz furiously all 
around his head, swooping down in front of his nose, crashing into his ears, 

batting my wings in his eyes. 

Dirk Davis didn’t even flinch. 

“What’s the matter with you, anyway?” I yelled. “You’re me now. You’re 
supposed to be scared of bees!” 

“Gary” laughed. “You’ve forgotten something,” he said. “I’m not you. I’m 
just inside your body. I’m still me inside. And I’m not the least bit afraid of 
bees!” 

“And, now,” he went on, “take a hike, okay? Buzz off. I’m busy.” 

Frozen with anger and disappointment, I slumped on the bedspread without 
moving. “Gary” raised the comic book up into the air. “I’d hate to swat you,” he 
said. “But I will if I have to!” 

I dodged away just as the comic book slapped down on the bedspread. Then 
I shot back out the window. 

For a few minutes, I flew aimlessly around, lost in my sad thoughts. Finally, 
I remembered how hungry I was. I perched on top of a big, orange lily blossom 
and started sucking up some nectar. 

Not bad, I told myself as I drank. But honey on crackers would be much 
better. 

“What am I supposed to do now?” I asked myself. “Am I really doomed to 
be a bee for the rest of my life?” I pulled my head out of the orange blossom and 
looked around. “And how long is the rest of my life anyway?” 

I remembered a page from The Big Book of Bees. 

“The life of the average bee is not very long. While the queen can live 
through as many as five winters, the workers and drones die off in the fall.” 

In the fall? 

It was already nearly August! 

If I stayed in this bee body, I had only a month or two at most! 

I gazed sadly up at my house. “Gary” had turned the light on in my room, 
and it twinkled in the early evening dusk. 

How I wished I could be up there! Why, why had I ever been stupid enough 
to think I’d be better off in someone else’s body? 

Then I heard a buzz. I peered over the blossom. Sure enough, I saw a bee. 

He hopped up onto the flower. Two other bees quickly joined him. Then 
three more. They buzzed angrily. 

“Go away!” I cried. 

I tried to fly away. 

But before I could lift off, they all swarmed over me. 

I couldn’t move. The bees had taken me prisoner. 

“Don’t take me back to the hive!” I shrieked. “Don’t take me back!” 
But to my horror, they started to drag me away. 

24 

I struggled to squirm away. But they turned their stingers on me. 

Were they some kind of bee police? Did they think I was trying to escape 
the hive? 

I didn’t have a chance to discuss it with them. They lifted me up into the air. 
There were bees in front of me, bees behind, and bees on all sides. 

We flew past my bedroom window. “Help!” I called. 

“Gary” glanced up from his plate of crackers and honey. He smiled and 
waved at me. 

I was so angry, I thought I might explode. 

But then an idea came to me. A crazy idea. A desperate idea. 

I buzzed as loudly as I could. Then I darted out of line and shot into the 
open bedroom window. 

Were the others following me? Were they? 

Yes! 

They didn’t want to let me escape. 

“Gary” sat up when he saw me and my buzzing followers. He rolled up his 
comic book, preparing to swat us. 

I circled the room, and the other bees followed. 

“Get out! Get out!” “Gary” screamed. 

There weren’t enough of us, I decided. I needed a huge swarm. 

I flew back out the window. The others buzzed after me. 

Now I was the head bee. As fast as I could, I led my group back to Mr. 
Andretti’s garage, and in through the hole in the screen. 

I hesitated at the hive entrance. I took a deep breath. 

Was I really going to go back inside? 

I knew I had no choice. “Go for it, Lutz!” I shouted to myself. 

I shot in through the entrance hole. 

Then I began flying crazily through the hive, buzzing angrily, bumping the 
walls, bumping other bees. 

The hive stirred to life. 

The buzzing grew to a dull roar. Then a loud roar. Then a deafening roar! 

Round and round I raged, flying faster, faster, throwing myself frantically 
against the sticky hive walls, tumbling, darting, buzzing furiously. 

The entire hive was in an uproar now. 

I had turned the bees into an angry swarm. 

Out of the hive I flew. Out into the darkening evening. Out through the hole 
in the screen, up, up, and away. 

And the bees swarmed after me, like a black cloud against the gray-blue 

sky. 

Up we soared. Up, up. 

A buzzing, swarming funnel cloud. 

Up, up. 

I led them up to the bedroom window. 

Tumbling over each other, raging through the air, we swarmed into 
“Gary’s” room. 

“Huh?” He jumped off the bed. 

He didn’t have time to say a word. 

I landed in his hair. The raging swarm followed, buzzing angrily, 
surrounding him, covering his head, his face, his shoulders. 

“H-help!” His weak cry was drowned out by the roar of the bees. “Help 

me!” 

I dropped down onto the tip of Gary’s nose. “Have you had enough?” I 
demanded. “Are you ready to give me back my body?” 

“Never!” he cried. “I don’t care what you do to me! You’ll never get your 
body back! It’s mine, and I’m keeping it forever!” 

Whoooa! I could not believe my ears. 

I mean, he was covered in bees! And still he wouldn’t listen to reason! 

I didn’t know what to do. 

The other bees were starting to lose interest. 

Some of them drifted to the plate of honey. Most of them floated back out 
the open window. 

“You can’t get away with this, Dirk!” I screamed. 

With a furious wail, I whirled around. Then I stabbed my razor-sharp 
stinger deep into the side of “Gary’s” nose. 

“Owwwwwww!” He let out a high-pitched shriek and grabbed at his nose. 
Then he staggered backwards and fell over onto the bed. 

“Yaaaaay!” I cried out in celebration. 

For one instant, I felt triumphant. 

A tiny bee had defeated a huge enemy! I was victorious! I had won a fight 
against a giant! 

My celebration didn’t last very long. 

I suddenly realized what I had done. And I remembered what happens to a 
honeybee after it stings someone. 

“I’m going to die,” I murmured weakly. “I stung someone, and now I’m 
going to die!” 

25 

Weaker. 

I felt the strength drain from me. 

Weaker and weaker. 

“What have I done?” I asked myself. “I gave up my life for the chance to 
sting Dirk Davis! Why was I such a jerk?” 

I struggled to keep my wings moving, struggled to stay in the air. 

I knew I was doomed. But I wanted to stay alive as long as I could. Maybe, 
I thought, as I felt my strength fading, maybe I’ll have a chance to tell my family 
good-bye. 

“Mom! Dad! Krissy!” I buzzed faintly. “Where are you?” 

It was hard to breathe. I felt so tired, so weak. 

I floated out the window and sank to the grass below. 

I thought I recognized the shape of the old maple tree where I used to read 
books and spy on Mr. Andretti. But my sight was so bad, it was hard to be sure 
about anything. The whole world swirled in gray shadow. 

I could no longer hold up my head. The gray shadows grew darker and 
darker. 

Until the world faded completely from view. 

I sat up slowly. The ground spun beneath me. 

Where was I? 

My back yard? 

I blinked, struggling to bring it all into focus, waiting for my eyes to clear. 

“There’s the old maple tree!” I cried. “And there’s my house! And there’s 
Mr. Andretti’s house!” 

Was I alive? 

Was I really alive, sitting in my back yard, seeing all the familiar places? 

Did I have my strength back? 

I decided to test it. I tried to spread my wings and fly up into the air. 

But for some reason, my wings didn’t seem to be working. My body felt 
heavy and strange. 

I frowned and looked down, inspecting myself to see what was wrong. 
“Whoooa!” I cried out in surprise. Instead of six legs, I saw two arms and two 
legs and my skinny old body. 

Breathlessly, I reached up to touch my face. My extra eyes were gone—and 
so were my antennas, and my layer of feathery fuzz. Instead, I felt hair! And 
smooth, human skin! 

I jumped up and shouted for joy. “I’m a person again! I’m me! I’m me!” 

I threw my arms around my chest and gave myself a hug. Then I danced 
around the back yard, testing my arms and legs. 

They worked! They all worked! 

I couldn’t get over how wonderful it was to be human again! 

“But how did it happen?” I asked myself. “What happened to Dirk Davis?” 

For a chilling instant, I wondered if Dirk had been forced into a bee’s body 
the way I had. 

Probably not, I decided. 

But what had happened? 

How did I get my body back? 

Was it the bee sting? Did the shock of the sting send us all back to the 
bodies we belonged in? 

“I’ve got to call Ms. Karmen and find out!” I realized. 

But for now, all I wanted to do was see my family. 

I hurried up the back steps and into the house. As I ran through the kitchen, 
I crashed right into Krissy. As usual, she was carrying Claus under one arm. 

“Watch where you’re going!” Krissy snapped at me. 

She probably expected me to snap back at her and try to push her out of my 
way. But instead I grabbed her shoulders and gave her a big hug. Then I planted 
a kiss on her cheek. 

“Yuck! Gross!” she cried and wiped the cheek with her hand. 

I laughed happily. 

“Don’t give me your cooties, creep!” Krissy cried. 

“You’re a creep!” I replied. 

“No, you’re a creep!” she repeated. 

“You’re a jerk!” I shouted. 

It felt so good to be calling her names again! 

I gleefully called her a few more things. Then I hurried upstairs to see my 
parents. 

I met them as they were coming out of my room. 

“Mom! Dad!” I cried. I hurried to them, planning to throw my arms around 
them. 

But they thought I was just trying to get into my room. “Don’t go in there, 
Gary,” warned my dad. “You left your window open again, and a swarm of bees 
got in there.” 

“You’d better go next door,” Mom said. “Get Mr. Andretti. He’ll know how 
to get them out.” 

I couldn’t hold back any longer. I threw my arms around my mother’s neck 
and gave her a big kiss. “Mom, I missed you so much!” 

My mother hugged me back, but I saw her exchange a curious look with my 
dad. “Gary?” she asked. “Are you okay? How could you miss me when you’ve 
been right here in this house?” 

“Well...” I thought fast. “I meant that I missed spending time with you. We 
really need to do more things together.” 

My mother spread one hand over my forehead. “No. No temperature,” she 
told my father. 

“Gary,” Dad said impatiently. “Would you mind running over and getting 
Mr. Andretti? If we don’t get those bees out of your room, you’ll never be able 
to go to sleep tonight!” 

“Bees?” I said casually. “Hey, no problem. I’ll take care of them.” 

I reached out and started to open my door. Before I could, Dad grabbed my 
arm. “Gary!” he cried in alarm. “What’s the matter with you? There are bees in 
your room! B-E-E-S. Don’t you remember—you’re scared of bees!” 

I stared back at him and thought about what he’d said. To my surprise, I 
realized I was no longer the slightest bit scared of bees! In fact, I was actually 
looking forward to seeing them again. 

“No problem, Dad,” I told him. “I guess I must have outgrown that, or 
something.” 

I opened the door and went into my room. Sure enough, there was the old 
swarm, buzzing away over the plate of honey and crackers on the bed. 

“Hi, guys!” I said cheerfully. “Time to leave now!” 

I walked over to the bed and waved my hands at them, trying to shoo them 
back out the window. A few of them buzzed angrily at me. 

I laughed to myself. Then I picked up the plate of crackers and honey and 
dumped it out the window. “Go get it!” I told them. 

I shooed them gently out the window. 

“Good-bye!” I called to them as they left. “Thanks! Take good care of the 
honeycombs! I’ll try to come visit as soon as I can!” 

When the last bee was gone, I turned around and saw my parents. They 
were standing absolutely motionless in the doorway, staring at me, frozen with 
shock. 

“Dad?” I said. “Mom?” 

My dad blinked and seemed to come back to life. He crossed the room and 
put a hand on my shoulder. “Gary? Are you feeling all right?” 

“Just fine,” I replied, grinning happily. “Just fine.” 

26 

That whole crazy adventure happened about a month ago. 

Now it’s nearly fall. I’m sitting in my favorite place under the maple tree in 
the back yard, reading a book and chomping down taco chips. 

I just love coming out here. All the fall flowering plants are in bloom, and 
the yard is really pretty. 

I’ve been spending the last few days of my summer vacation relaxing back 
here. Of course, I also go to the playground a lot. 

The other day I ran into that girl with the red hair I saw coming out of the 
Person-to-Person office. We started talking, and I didn’t trip over my own feet or 
anything. She seems very nice. I hope she doesn’t plan to switch lives with 
anybody else! 

That conversation and a lot of things have made me realize that my short 
life as a bee really changed me. 

First of all, it taught me to appreciate my family for the first time ever. My 
parents are pretty nice. And my sister is okay. For a sister. 

And now, I’m not scared of any of the things I used to be scared of. 
Yesterday, I walked right by Marv, Barry, and Karl, and I didn’t bat an eye. 

In fact, when I remembered how I buzzed them, I almost burst out laughing. 

I’m not at all scared of them anymore. And I’m different in other ways, too. 

I’m a lot better at sports and bike riding and things. And I’m a great 
skateboarder now. In fact, I still give lessons. Judy and Kaitlyn hang around me 
all the time. And Gail and Louie, too. 

The other day, I actually ran into Dirk Davis at the playground. At first, I 
didn’t want to talk to him. But then he turned out to be pretty nice. 

He apologized to me. “I’m sorry I tried to steal your body,” he said. “But 
things didn’t turn out so well for me, either. That bee flunked all my math tests 
in summer school!” 

We both had a good laugh about that. And now Dirk and I are friends. 

So all in all, my life is back to normal. 

I feel terrific, totally normal. 

In fact, I feel much better than normal. 

It’s so great to sit here in the back yard, reading and relaxing, smelling the 

fresh fall air, enjoying the flowers. 

Mmmmmm. 

Those hollyhocks are really awesome. 

Excuse me a moment while I get up and take a closer look. 

That blossom down near the ground is so perfect. 

I think I’ll get down on my knees to take a quick taste. 

Do you know how to suck the pollen out? 

I’ve figured out the best way. It’s not as hard as it looks. 

You just pucker your lips and stick your tongue way out like this, see? 

Then you dip your face down into the blossom and suck up all the pollen 
you want. 

Try it. 

Go ahead. 

Mmmmmmmm. 

Go ahead. It’s easy. Really! 


MONSTER BLOOD II 


1 

Evan Ross backed into the corner of the den as he stared at his dog Trigger. 

The tan cocker spaniel lowered his head and stared back at Evan with wet, 
brown eyes. The old dog’s tail began to wag excitedly. 

“Trigger—” Evan cried angrily. “Did you eat Monster Blood again?” 

The dog’s tail began wagging faster. Trigger let out a low bark that rumbled 
like thunder. 

Evan’s back pressed against the dark-paneled den wall. 

Trigger took a few heavy steps toward him, panting hard. His huge pink 
tongue, as big as a salami, hung out of his enormous mouth. 

“Did you?” Evan demanded. “Did you eat more Monster Blood?” 

The answer to Evan’s question was obvious. 

Trigger had been normal cocker spaniel size that morning. Now the dog 
stared down at Evan, as big as a pony. 

Trigger’s furry paws, the size of elephant hooves, thudded on the den 
carpet. His enormous tail pounded louder than a bass drum against the side of a 
leather couch. 

Evan covered his ears as Trigger let out an excited, high-pitched bark that 
shook the den walls. “Stay! Stay!” Evan shouted. 

The enormous dog panted hard, his tail wagging furiously. 

Oh, no! Evan thought in horror. He wants to play! 

“Sit!” Evan screamed. “Sit!” 

But Trigger didn’t know how to sit. For ten years —seventy dog years !— 
Evan had tried to teach Trigger to sit on command. 

But Trigger just didn’t get it. 

“Where did you find the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded. “We all saw it 
disappear into thin air. Gone. It was just gone. You know that stuff makes you 
grow. And grow and grow and grow. Where did you find it?” 

Trigger tilted his big head at an angle, as if trying to understand Evan’s 
words. Then, wagging his huge tail excitedly, he started to run to Evan. 

No! Evan thought. He’s going to jump on me! He’s going to jump! If he 
jumps, he’ll crush me! 

An enormous glob of drool escaped Trigger’s open mouth and hit the carpet 
with a loud smack. 

“Sit!” Evan cried, his voice choked with panic. “Sit, boy! Sit!” 

Trigger hesitated, staring down at Evan. To Evan’s horror, the dog was 
growing even bigger. Trigger was now as tall as a horse! 

Where did he find the container of Monster Blood? Evan wondered, his 
back pressed against the wall. Where? 

The dog’s brown eyes gaped at Evan like shimmering, dark pools. Trigger 
uttered another deafening bark that shook the whole house. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, squeezing his nose with two fingers. The dog’s breath 
rushed at him like a strong wind. And it smelled as sour as a dead mouse. 

“Back! Get back, Trigger!” Evan pleaded. 

But Trigger had never learned that command, either. 

Without warning, the giant dog leaped at Evan. 

“Down! Down!” Evan shrieked. 

Trigger’s mouth gaped open. The dog’s huge tongue licked the side of 
Evan’s face. The tongue felt scratchy and hot. Evan’s carrot-colored hair was 
matted down with sticky dog saliva. 

“No—please!” Evan screamed. “I’m only twelve! I’m too young to die!” 

He started to scream again. But Trigger’s big teeth clamped around his 
waist, cutting off his breath. 

“Trigger—put me down! Put me down!” Evan choked out. 

The dog’s wagging tail sent a lamp crashing to the floor. 

The teeth held Evan gently but firmly. He felt himself being lifted off the 
floor. 

“Put me down! Put me down!” 

Why wouldn’t the stupid dog listen? 

Evan thrashed his arms and legs frantically, trying to squirm free. But 
Trigger held on tightly. 

The dog’s enormous paws pounded on the carpet. He carried Evan through 
the hall and across the kitchen. Then he lowered his head and butted the kitchen 
screen door open. 

The door slammed hard behind them. Trigger began trotting over the grass. 

“Bad dog! Bad dog!” Evan cried. His voice came out in a tiny squeak. 

Had Trigger grown even bigger? 

Evan was at least three feet off the ground now! 

“Put me down! Down!” he cried. 

Evan watched the green grass of the back yard bounce beneath him. Trigger 
was panting as he walked. The panting sounds made Evan’s whole body vibrate. 
He realized his jeans and T-shirt were soaked from dog saliva. Trigger doesn’t 
mean to hurt me, Evan told himself. He’s just being playful. Thank goodness 
he’s such an old dog. His teeth aren’t very sharp. 

The dog stopped at the edge of the flower garden in the back of the yard. 
He lowered Evan nearly to the ground, but didn’t let go. 

His paws began to churn up the soft dirt. 

“Let me down!” Evan shrieked. “Trigger—listen to me!” 

Breathing hard, his hot, sour breath pouring over Evan, the big dog 
continued to dig. 

A wave of horror swept over Evan as he realized what Trigger was doing. 
“No!” Evan shrieked. “Don’t bury me, Trigger!” 

The dog dug faster, its front paws churning furiously. The soft dirt flew past 
Evan’s face. 

“I’m not a bone!” Evan cried frantically. “Trigger—I’m not a bone! Don’t 
bury me, Trigger! Please—don’t bury me!” 

2 

“Don’t bury me. Please don’t bury me!” Evan murmured. 

He heard laughter. 

He raised his head and glanced around—and realized that he wasn’t home 
in his back yard. He was sitting in his assigned seat in the third row near the 
window in Mr. Murphy’s science class. 

And Mr. Murphy was standing right at Evan’s side, his enormous, round 
body blocking the sunlight from the window. “Earth calling Evan! Earth calling 
Evan!” Mr. Murphy called, cupping his chubby pink hands over his mouth to 
make a megaphone. 

The kids all laughed. 

Evan could feel his face growing hot. “S-sorry,” he stammered. 

“You seem to have been somewhere in Daydream Land,” Mr. Murphy said, 
his tiny black eyes twinkling merrily. 

“Yes,” Evan replied solemnly. “I was dreaming about Monster Blood. I—I 
can’t stop thinking about it.” 

Ever since his frightening adventure the past summer with the green, sticky 
stuff, Evan had been dreaming and daydreaming about it. 

“Evan, please,” Mr. Murphy said softly. He shook his round, pink head and 
made a “tsk-tsk” sound. 

“Monster Blood is real!” Evan blurted out angrily. 

The kids laughed again. 

Mr. Murphy’s expression grew stern. His tiny eyes locked onto Evan’s. 
“Evan, I am a science teacher. You don’t expect a science teacher to believe that 
you found a can of sticky green gunk in a toy store that makes things grow and 
grow.” 

“Y-yes, I do,” Evan insisted. 

“Maybe a science-fiction teacher would believe it,” Mr. Murphy replied, 
grinning at his own joke. “Not a science teacher.” 

“Well, you’re dumb!” Evan cried. 

He didn’t mean to say it. He knew immediately that he had just made a 
major mistake. 

He heard gasps all around the big classroom. 

Mr. Murphy’s pink face darkened until it looked like a red balloon. But he 
didn’t lose his temper. He clasped his chubby hands over the big stomach of his 
green sportshirt, and Evan could see him silently counting to ten. 

“Evan, you’re a new student here, isn’t that right?” he asked finally. His 
face slowly returned to its normal pink color. 

“Yes,” Evan replied, his voice just above a whisper. “My family just moved 
to Atlanta this fall.” 

“Well, perhaps you’re not familiar with the way things work here. Perhaps 
at your old school the teachers liked it when you called them dumb. Perhaps you 
called your teachers ugly names all day long. Perhaps—” 

“No, sir,” Evan interrupted, lowering his head. “It just slipped out.” 

Laughter rang through the classroom. Mr. Murphy glared sternly at Evan, 
his face twisted in an angry frown. 

Give me a break, Evan thought unhappily. Glancing quickly around the 
room, Evan saw a sea of grinning faces. 

I think I’m in trouble again, Evan thought glumly. Why can’t I keep my big 
mouth shut? 

Mr. Murphy glanced up at the wall clock. “School is nearly over,” he said. 
“Why don’t you do us all a little favor, Evan, to make up for the time you made 
us waste today?” 

Uh oh, Evan thought darkly. Here it comes. 

“When the bell rings, go put your books away in your locker,” Mr. Murphy 
instructed. “Then come back here and clean Cuddles’ cage.” 

Evan groaned. 

His eyes darted to the hamster cage against the wall. Cuddles was 
scratching around in the wood shavings on the cage floor. 

Not the hamster! Evan thought unhappily. 

Evan hated Cuddles. And Mr. Murphy knew it. This was the third time Mr. 
Murphy had made Evan stay after school and clean out the gross, disgusting 
cage. 

“Perhaps while you clean the hamster cage,” Mr. Murphy said, returning to 
his desk, “you can think about how to do better in science class, Evan.” 

Evan jumped to his feet. “I won’t do it!” he cried. 

He heard shocked gasps all around him. 

“I hate Cuddles!” Evan screamed. “I hate that stupid, fat hamster!” 

As everyone stared in amazed horror, Evan ran over to the cage, pulled 

open the door, and grabbed Cuddles up in one hand. 

Then, with an easy, graceful motion, he flung the hamster across the room 
—and out the open window. 

3 

Evan knew he was having another daydream. 

He didn’t jump up screaming and throw the hamster out the window. 

He only thought about it. Everyone thinks about doing crazy, wild things 
once in a while. 

But Evan would never do anything that crazy. 

Instead, he said, “Okay, Mr. Murphy.” Then he sat quietly in his seat, 
staring out the window at the puffy white clouds in the bright blue sky. 

He could see his own reflection staring back at him in the glass. His curly, 
carrot-colored hair looked darker in the reflection. So did the freckles that dotted 
his cheeks. 

His expression was mournful. He hated being made fun of in front of the 
entire class. 

Why am I always getting myself into trouble? he wondered. Why can’t Mr. 
Murphy ever give me a break? Didn’t the teacher realize how hard it was to be 
the new kid in school? How am I supposed to make new friends if Murphy is 
always making me look like a total jerk in class? 

Bad enough that no one believed him about the Monster Blood. 

Evan had eagerly told the kids in his new school about it. How he had 
stayed with his great-aunt the past summer. How he and a girl he met named 
Andy had found the blue container of Monster Blood in a creepy, old toy store. 

And how the green, yucky Monster Blood had started to grow and grow. 
How it had bubbled out of its container, outgrown a bucket, outgrown a bath tub! 
And just kept growing and growing as if it were alive! 

And Evan had told kids how Trigger had eaten just a little of the Monster 
Blood—and had grown nearly as big as a house! 

It was such a frightening, amazing story. Evan was sure his new friends 
would find it really cool. 

But, instead, they just thought he was weird. 

No one believed him. They laughed at him and told him he had a sick 
imagination. 

Evan became known around his new school as the kid who made up stupid 
stories. 

If only I could prove to them that the story is true, Evan often thought sadly. 
If only I could show them the Monster Blood. 

But the mysterious green gunk had vanished from sight before Evan left his 
great-aunt’s house. Not a trace of it had been left. Not a trace. 

The bell rang. Everyone jumped up and headed for the door, talking and 
laughing. 

Evan knew that a lot of his classmates were laughing at him. Ignoring them, 
Evan picked up his backpack and started to the door. 

“Hurry back, Evan,” Mr. Murphy called from behind his desk. “Cuddles is 
waiting!” 

Evan growled under his breath and stepped out into the crowded hallway. If 
Murphy loves that stupid hamster so much, why doesn’t he ever clean out the 
cage? he wondered bitterly. 

A group of kids laughed loudly as Evan passed by. Were they laughing at 
him? Evan couldn’t tell. 

He started jogging to his locker—when something hit his leg just above the 
ankle. His feet flew out from under him, and he toppled face down onto the hard 
tile floor. 

“Hey—!” Evan cried angrily. 

He stared up at a big, tough-looking kid from his class named Conan 
Barber. All the kids called him Conan the Barbarian. For good reason. 

Conan was twelve, but he looked about twenty years older! He was taller 
and wider and stronger and meaner than any kid in the school. 

He wasn’t a bad-looking guy, Evan grudgingly admitted. He had wavy, 
blond hair, blue eyes, and a handsome face. He was very athletic-looking, and 
played all the sports at school. 

He was an okay guy, Evan thought wistfully. 

Except that he had one very bad habit. Conan loved to live up to his 
nickname. 

He loved being Conan the Barbarian. 

He loved strutting around, pounding kids who weren’t his size—which 
included everyone! 

Evan had not hit it off with Conan. 

He met Conan on the playground a few weeks after moving to Atlanta. 
Eager to make a good impression, Evan told him the whole Monster Blood story. 

Conan didn’t like the story. He stared back at Evan with his cold, blue eyes 

for a long, long time. Then his expression hardened, and he murmured through 
clenched teeth: “We don’t like wise guys down here in Atlanta.” 

He gave Evan a pretty good pounding that day. 

Evan had tried to stay away from Conan ever since. But it wasn’t easy. 

Now he gazed up at Conan from his position on the floor. “Hey—why’d 
you trip me?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

Conan grinned down at him and shrugged. “It was an accident.” 

Evan tried to decide whether it was safer to stand up or to stay down on the 
floor. If I stand up, he’ll punch me, he thought. If I stay down here, he’ll step on 
me. 

Tough choice. 

He didn’t get to make it. Conan reached down and, with one hand, pulled 
Evan to his feet. 

“Give me a break, Conan!” Evan pleaded. “Why can’t you leave me 
alone?” 

Conan shrugged again. It was one of his favorite replies. His blue eyes 
twinkled merrily. “You’re right, Evan,” he said, his grin fading. “I shouldn’t have 
tripped you.” 

“Yeah,” Evan agreed, straightening his T-shirt. 

“So you can pay me back,” Conan offered. 

“Huh?” Evan gaped at him. 

Conan stuck out his massive chest. “Go ahead. Hit me in the stomach. I’ll 
let you.” 

“Whoa. No way,” Evan replied, trying to back up. He stumbled into a group 
of kids. 

“Go ahead,” Conan urged, following after him. “Hit me in the stomach. As 
hard as you can. It’s only fair.” 

Evan studied his expression. “You really mean it?” 

Conan nodded, tight-lipped. He stuck out his chest. “As hard as you can. 
Go ahead. I won’t hit back. I promise.” 

Evan hesitated. Should he go ahead and do it? 

I may never get a chance like this again, he thought. 

A lot of kids were watching, Evan realized. 

If I hit him really hard, if I hurt him, if I make him cry out—then maybe 
kids around here will have a little respect for me. 

I’ll be Evan the Giant Killer. The guy who pounded Conan the Barbarian. 

He balled his hand into a tight fist and raised it. 

“Is that your fist?” Conan cried, laughing. 

Evan nodded. 

“Oooh—this is going to hurt!” Conan cried sarcastically. He made his knees 
tremble. 

Everyone laughed. 

I may surprise him, Evan thought angrily. 

“Go ahead. As hard as you can,” Conan urged. He sucked in a deep breath 
and held it. 

Evan pulled his arm back and swung his fist as hard as he could. 

The fist made a solid thud as it hit Conan’s stomach. 

It felt like hitting a concrete wall. 

Evan’s hand throbbed with pain. 

“Hey—!” a man’s voice called angrily. 

Startled, Evan spun around—to see Mr. Murphy glaring at him. 

“No fighting!” Mr. Murphy yelled at Evan. 

The teacher came bouncing up to them and stepped between the two boys. 
Huffing for breath, he turned to Conan. “Why did Evan hit you?” he demanded. 

4 

Conan shrugged. His blue eyes went wide and innocent. “I don’t know, Mr. 
Murphy,” he replied in a tiny, forlorn voice. “Evan just walked up and hit me as 
hard as he could.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach and uttered a short whimper. “Ow. He really hurt 

me.” 

Mr. Murphy narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. His chubby face turned 
bright red again. “Evan, I saw the whole thing. I really don’t understand you,” he 
said softly. 

“But Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

The teacher raised a hand to silence him. “If you were angry about what 
happened in class,” Mr. Murphy said, “you shouldn’t take it out on other kids.” 

Conan rubbed his stomach tenderly. “I hope Evan didn’t break anything!” 
he murmured. 

“Do you want to see the nurse?” Mr. Murphy asked. 

Conan shook his head. Evan could see he was having trouble keeping a 
straight face. “I’ll be okay,” he said, and staggered away. 

What a phony! Evan thought bitterly. 

Did Conan know the whole time that Murphy was standing there? Probably. 

“Go take care of Cuddles,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, frowning. “And try to 
shape up, Evan. I’m going to be watching you.” 

Evan muttered a reply and trudged back into the classroom. Sunlight 
streamed in through the wall of windows. A strong breeze made the window 
shade flap over the open window near the teacher’s desk. 

Feeling angry and upset, his stomach churning, Evan made his way through 
the empty room to the hamster cage. Cuddles wrinkled his nose in greeting. The 
hamster knew the routine by now. 

Evan gazed into the metal cage at the brown-and-white creature. Why do 
people think hamsters are cute? he wondered. 

Because they wrinkle their noses? Because they run around and around on 
wheels like total jerks? Because of their cute little buck teeth? 

Cuddles stared up at him with his little black eyes. 

He has Mr. Murphy’s eyes, Evan thought, chuckling to himself. Maybe 

that’s why Murphy likes him so much. 

“Okay, okay. So you’re kind of cute,” Evan told the hamster. “But I know 
your secret. You’re just a big fat rat in disguise!” 

Cuddles wrinkled his nose again in reply. 

With a loud sigh, Evan went to work. Holding his breath because he hated 
the smell, he pulled out the bottom tray. 

“You’re a messy little guy,” he told the hamster. “When are you going to 
learn to clean up your own room?” 

Still holding his breath, he dumped out the old newspaper shavings and 
replaced them with fresh shavings from the box in the supply closet. 

He returned the bottom tray to its place as Cuddles watched with great 
interest. Then he poured fresh water into the water bottle. 

“How about some sunflower seeds?” Evan asked. He began to feel a little 
more cheerful, knowing his job was almost finished. 

He removed the seed cup from the cage and made his way across the room 
to the supply closet to get fresh sunflower seeds. 

“Okay, Cuddles,” he called, “these look yummy!” 

He started to carry the seeds back to the cage. Halfway across the room, 
Evan stopped and uttered a startled gasp. 

The cage door hung wide open. 

The hamster was gone. 

5 

A choking sound escaped Evan’s lips as he stared at the empty cage. 

His eyes darted frantically around the room. “Cuddles? Cuddles?” he called 
in a frightened voice. 

Why am I yelling? he asked himself, spinning around in a total panic. The 
dumb hamster doesn’t know its name! 

He heard footsteps out in the hall. 

Mr. Murphy? 

No, please—no! Evan pleaded silently. 

Don’t let it be Mr. Murphy. Don’t let him return until I have Cuddles safely 
back in his cage. 

Cuddles was Mr. Murphy’s most precious possession. He had told this to 
the class time and again. 

Evan knew that if anything happened to Cuddles, Mr. Murphy would be on 
Evan’s case for the rest of the year. No—for the rest of his life! 

Evan froze in the center of the room, listening hard. 

The footsteps passed by the room. 

Evan started breathing again. 

“Cuddles? Where are you, Cuddles?” he called in a trembling voice. “I have 
some delicious sunflower seeds for you.” 

He spotted the furry, brown-and-white creature on the chalk tray under the 
front chalkboard. 

“There you are! I see you!” Evan whispered, tiptoeing toward it. 

Cuddles was busily chewing on something. A small piece of white chalk. 

Evan tiptoed closer. “I have seeds for you, Cuddles,” he whispered. “Much 
tastier than chalk.” 

Cuddles held the stick of chalk in his front paws, turning it as he chewed. 

Evan crept closer. Closer. 

“Look. Seeds.” He held the plastic seed cup toward the hamster. 

Cuddles didn’t look up. 

Evan crept up closer. Closer. 

Close enough to dive forward— 

—and miss! 

The hamster dropped the chalk and scampered down the chalk tray. 

Evan made another frantic grab—and came up with nothing but air. 

Letting out a frustrated groan, Evan saw the hamster dive to the floor and 
scamper behind Mr. Murphy’s desk. The hamster’s feet skidded and slid on the 
linoleum floor, its toenails clicking loudly. 

“You can’t get away! You’re too fat!” Evan cried. He dropped to his knees 
and peered under the desk. 

He could see Cuddles staring back at him from the darkness. The animal 
was breathing rapidly, its sides swelling with each breath. 

“Don’t be scared,” Evan whispered soothingly. “I’m going to put you back 
in your nice, safe cage.” 

He crawled quickly to the desk. 

The hamster stared back at him, breathing hard. It didn’t move—until Evan 
reached for him. Then Cuddles scampered away, his tiny paws sliding on the 
floor. 

Evan jumped angrily to his feet. “Cuddles—what’s your problem?” he 
demanded loudly. “This isn’t a stupid game!” 

It wasn’t a game at all, Evan knew. 

If he didn’t get the hamster back in the cage, Mr. Murphy would flunk him 
for sure. Or suspend him from school. Or get his family kicked out of Atlanta! 

Calm down, Evan urged himself. Don’t panic. 

He took a deep breath and held it. 

Then he saw the hamster on the window ledge just inside the open window. 

Okay, Evan—go ahead and panic! he told himself. 

This was definitely panic time. 

He tried to call to the hamster. But his voice came out a choked whisper. 

Swallowing hard, Evan edged slowly toward the window ledge. 

“Come here, Cuddles,” he whispered. “Please, Cuddles—come here.” 

Closer, closer. 

Almost close enough to reach the hamster. 

Almost close enough. 

“Don’t move, Cuddles. Don’t move.” 

He reached out his hand slowly. Slowly. 

Cuddles glanced back at him with his soft black eyes. 

Then the hamster jumped out the window. 

6 

Evan hung back for only a second. 

Then he jumped out the window after the hamster. 

Luckily, the science classroom was on the ground floor. Evan landed face 
down in a low evergreen hedge. Struggling and squirming, it took him a while to 
climb to his feet. 

He took several steps over the grass, then turned and stared back along the 
bottom of the long hedge. “Cuddles—are you under there?” 

Evan squatted down to get a better view. The hedge stretched the entire 
length of the school building. Cuddles could hide under there forever. 

And if I don’t find him, Evan told himself bitterly, I’d better hide under 
there forever, too! 

To the right, Evan could hear voices from the playground. Happy, shouting 
voices. Carefree voices. 

Still squatting, he turned toward the happy voices—and saw a fat brown 
ball wobbling over the grass toward the playground. 

No. Not a ball. “Cuddles!” 

That fat hamster isn’t getting away this time! Evan decided, jumping up and 
starting to chase after the creature. I’ll catch him if I have to sit on him! 

A picture flashed into Evan’s mind of Cuddles, flat as a pancake after Evan 
had sat upon him. A little, round, furry hamster rug. 

Despite his panic, the thought of Cuddles as a rug brought a smile to Evan’s 
perspiring face. 

As he ran, he kept his eyes on Cuddles. The hamster was wobbling rapidly 
over the grass toward the playground. 

“Oh, no!” Evan cried out in horror as Cuddles darted in front of two girls 
speeding across the grass on bikes. 

Laughing together, they didn’t even see the hamster. 

Cuddles is about to be road kill! Evan thought, shrinking back. He shut his 
eyes and waited for the squish. 

But the bikes rolled smoothly on. And when they had passed, Evan spotted 
Cuddles continuing his journey to the playground unharmed. 

“Cuddles—come back here!” he shouted furiously. 

The hamster appeared to speed up. He tumbled onto the baseball diamond, 
all four paws scurrying over the dirt of the third-base line. 

Several kids stopped their game to stare. 

“Stop him! Grab the hamster!” Evan shouted desperately. 

But the kids only laughed. 

“Know how to catch him?” a joker named Robbie Greene called to Evan. 
“Make a sound like a sunflower seed!” 

“That’s an old joke!” a girl called to Robbie. 

“Thanks for your help!” Evan shouted sarcastically. He ran over the 
pitching mound and had crossed second base when he realized he had lost sight 
of Cuddles. 

He stopped and spun around, his heart thudding wildly in his chest. He 
searched the grass of the infield. “Where—where is he?” he stammered. “Do you 
see him?” 

But the kids had returned to their softball game. 

I can’t lose him now! Evan told himself, choked with panic. I can’t! 

Sweat poured down Evan’s forehead. He mopped it with one hand, 
brushing back his curly, red hair. His T-shirt clung wetly to his back. His mouth 
felt dry as cotton. 

Jogging into the outfield, he searched the grass. 

“Cuddles?” 

No sign of him. 

A round, brownish lump in the grass turned out to be someone’s baseball 
glove. 

“Cuddles?” 

A kickball game was underway on the opposite diamond. Kids were 
shouting and cheering. Evan saw Bree Douglas, a girl from his class, slide hard 
into second base just before the ball. 

“Has—has anyone seen Cuddles?” Evan gasped, trotting onto the diamond. 

Kids turned to gawk at him. 

“Out here?” Bree called, brushing off the knees of her jeans. “Evan, did you 
take the hamster out for a walk?” 

Everyone laughed. Scornful laughter. 

“He—he got away,” Evan replied, panting. 

“Is this what you’re looking for?” a familiar voice called. 

Evan turned to see Conan Barber, a pleased smile on his handsome face, his 

blue eyes gleaming. 

Gripping it by its furry back, Conan held the hamster up in one hand. 
Cuddles’ four legs scurried in midair. 

“You—you caught him!” Evan cried gratefully. He let out a long sigh of 
relief. “He jumped out the window.” 

Evan reached out both hands for the hamster, but Conan jerked Cuddles out 
of his reach. “Prove it’s yours,” Conan said, grinning. 

“Huh?” 

“Can you identify it?” Conan demanded, his eyes burning into Evan’s, 
challenging Evan. “Prove this hamster is yours.” 

Evan swallowed hard and glanced around. 

Kids from the kickball game were huddling near. They were all grinning, 
delighted with Conan’s mean joke. 

Evan sighed wearily and reached again for the hamster. 

But Conan was at least a foot taller than Evan. He lifted the hamster high 
above Evan’s head, out of Evan’s reach. 

“Prove it’s yours,” he repeated, flashing the others a grin. 

“Give me a break, Conan,” Evan pleaded. “I’ve been chasing this stupid 
hamster for hours. I just want to get him back in his cage before Mr. Murphy—” 

“Do you have a license for him?” Conan demanded, still holding the 
squirming hamster above Evan’s head. “Show me the license.” 

Evan jumped and stretched both hands up, trying to grab Cuddles away. 

But Conan was too fast for him. He dodged away. Evan grabbed air. 

Some kids laughed. 

“Give him the hamster, Conan,” Bree called. She hadn’t moved from 
second base. 

Conan’s cold blue eyes sparkled excitedly. “I’ll tell you how you can get the 
hamster back,” he told Evan. 

“Huh?” Evan glared at him. He was getting really tired of Conan’s game. 

“Here’s how to get old Cuddles back,” Conan continued, holding the 
hamster tightly against his chest in one hand and petting its back with the other. 
“Sing a song for it.” 

“Hey—no way!” Evan snapped. “Give it to me, Conan!” 

Evan could feel his face growing even hotter. His knees started to tremble. 
He hoped no one could see it. 

“Sing ‘Row, Row, Row Your Boat’, and I’ll give you Cuddles. Promise,” 

Conan said, smirking. 

Some kids laughed. They moved closer, eager to see what Evan would do. 

Evan shook his head. “No way.” 

“Come on,” Conan urged softly, stroking the hamster’s brown fur. “'Row, 
Row, Row Your Boat.’ Just a few choruses. You know how it goes, don’t you?” 

More cruel laughter from the others. 

Conan’s grin grew wider. “Come on, Evan. You like to sing, don’t you?” 

“No, I hate singing,” Evan muttered, his eyes on Cuddles. 

“Hey, don’t be modest,” Conan insisted. “I’ll bet you’re a great singer. Are 
you a soprano or an alto?” 

Loud laughter. 

Evan’s hands tightened into hard fists at his sides. He wanted to punch 
Conan, and punch him and punch him. He wanted to wipe the grin off Conan’s 
handsome face with his fists. 

But he remembered what it had felt like to punch Conan. It had felt like 
hitting the side of a truck. 

He took a deep breath. “If I sing the stupid song, will you really give me 
back the hamster?” 

Conan didn’t reply. 

Evan suddenly realized that Conan wasn’t looking at him anymore. No one 
was. They had all raised their eyes over Evan’s shoulder. 

Confused, Evan spun around—to face Mr. Murphy. 

“What is going on here?” the teacher demanded, his tiny black eyes moving 
from Evan to Conan, then back to Evan. 

Before Evan could reply, Conan held up the hamster. “Here’s Cuddles, Mr. 
Murphy,” Conan said. “Evan let him get away. But I rescued Cuddles just as he 
was going to get run over.” 

Mr. Murphy let out a horrified gasp. “Run over?” he cried. “Cuddles? Run 
over?” 

The teacher reached out his chubby pink hands and took the hamster from 
Conan. He held the hamster against his bulging shirt and petted it, making 
soothing sounds to it. 

“Thank you, Conan,” Mr. Murphy said after calming Cuddles. He glared at 
Evan. “I’m very disappointed in you, Evan.” 

Evan started to defend himself. But Mr. Murphy raised a hand to silence 
him. “We’ll talk about it tomorrow. Right now I must get poor Cuddles back into 

his cage.” 

Evan slumped to the ground. He watched Mr. Murphy carry the hamster 
back to the school building. Mr. Murphy waddles just like the hamster, Evan 
realized. 

Normally, that thought would have cheered him up. 

But Evan was far too unhappy to be cheered up by anything. 

Conan had embarrassed him in front of all the others. And the big, grinning 
hulk had managed to get Evan in trouble with Mr. Murphy twice in one 
afternoon! 

The kickball game had started up again. Evan climbed slowly to his feet 
and began trudging to the school building to get his backpack. 

He couldn’t decide who he hated more—Cuddles or Conan. 

He had a sudden picture of Cuddles stuffed inside a muffin tin, being baked 
in an oven. 

Even that lovely thought didn’t cheer Evan up. 

He pulled his backpack out of the locker and slung it over his shoulder. 
Then he slammed the locker shut, the sound clanging down the empty hallway. 

He pushed open the front door and headed for home, walking slowly, lost in 
his unhappy thoughts. 

What a horrible day, he told himself. At least nothing worse could happen 
to me today. 

He had just crossed the street and was making his way on the sidewalk in 
front of a tall hedge—when someone leaped out at him, grabbed his shoulders 
hard from behind, and pulled him roughly to the ground. 

Evan let out a frightened cry and gazed into his attacker’s face. “You!” he 
cried. 

7 

“Here’s a little advice, Evan,” Andy said, grinning down at him. “Don’t go out 
for the wrestling team.” 

“Andy!” Evan cried, staring up at her in surprise. “What are you doing 
here?” 

She reached out both hands and helped tug him to his feet. Then she tossed 
back her short, brown hair with a flick of her head. Her brown eyes flashed 
excitedly. 

“Didn’t you read any of my letters?” she demanded. 

Evan had met Andy the past summer, when he’d stayed with his great-aunt 
for a few weeks. He and Andy had become good friends. 

She was with him when he bought the container of Monster Blood. She 
shared the whole frightening Monster Blood adventure with him. 

Evan liked Andy because she was funny, and fearless, and kind of crazy. He 
never could predict what she would do next! 

She didn’t even dress like other girls Evan knew. Andy loved bright colors. 
Right now she was wearing a sleeveless magenta T-shirt over bright yellow 
shorts, which matched her yellow sneakers. 

“I told you in my last letter that my parents were sent overseas for a year,” 
Andy said, giving Evan a playful shove. “I told you they were sending me to 
Atlanta to live with my aunt and uncle. I told you I’d be living just three blocks 
away from you!” 

“I know. I know,” Evan replied, rolling his eyes. “I just didn’t expect to see 
you jump out of the hedge at me.” 

“Why not?” Andy demanded, her dark eyes exploring his. 

Evan didn’t know how to answer that question. 

“Glad to see me?” Andy asked. 

“No,” he joked. 

She pulled up a thick blade of grass and stuck it in the corner of her mouth. 
They began walking toward Evan’s house. 

“I’m starting at your school on Monday,” she told him, chewing on the 
blade of grass. 

“Thrills and chills,” he replied, snickering. 

She shoved him off the sidewalk. “I thought people were supposed to be 
polite in the South.” 

“I’m new here,” Evan replied. 

“How’s Trigger?” she asked, kicking a pebble across the sidewalk. 

“Good,” Evan told her. 

“Like to talk a lot?” she asked sarcastically. 

“I’m in a bad mood,” he confessed. “It hasn’t been the greatest day.” 

“It couldn’t be as bad as the day the Monster Blood went berserk!” Andy 
exclaimed. 

Evan groaned. “Don’t mention Monster Blood to me. Please!” 

She studied him. Her expression turned serious. “What’s wrong, Evan? You 
look really upset,” she said. “Don’t you like it here?” 

He shook his head. “Not much.” 

As they walked, he told her about all the trouble he was having in his new 
school. He told her about Mr. Murphy and Cuddles, and how the teacher was 
always on his case. 

And he told her about Conan the Barbarian, and how Conan was always 
picking on him, always getting him into trouble, always playing tricks on him 
and making him look bad. 

“And no one will believe me about the Monster Blood,” Evan added. 

They were standing at the bottom of his driveway. They glanced up at 
Evan’s new house, a two-story red brick house with a sloping red tile roof. The 
late afternoon sun dipped behind a large puff of cloud, and a broad shadow 
rolled across the lawn. 

Andy’s mouth dropped open. The blade of grass fell out. “You told kids 
about the Monster Blood?” she asked in surprise. 

Evan nodded. “Yeah, why not? It’s a cool story, isn’t it?” 

“And you expected kids to believe you?” Andy cried, slapping her 
forehead. “Didn’t they just think you were weird?” 

“Yeah,” Evan replied bitterly. “They all think I’m weird.” 

Andy laughed. “Well, you are weird!” 

“Thanks a bunch, Annnndrea!” Evan muttered. He knew she hated to be 
called by her real name. 

“Don’t call me Andrea,” she replied sharply. She raised a fist. “I’ll pound 
you.” 

“Annnnnndrea,” he repeated. He ducked away as she swung her fist. “You 

punch like a girl!” he exclaimed. 

“You’ll bleed like a boy!” she threatened, laughing. 

He stopped. He suddenly had an idea. “Hey—you can tell everyone I’m not 
weird!” 

“Huh? Why would I do that?” Andy demanded. 

“No. Really,” Evan said excitedly. “You can tell everyone at school that the 
Monster Blood was real. That you were there. That you saw it.” 

Andy’s expression suddenly changed. Her dark eyes lit up, and a sly grin 
crossed her face. “I can do better than that,” she said mysteriously. 

Evan grabbed her shoulder. “Huh? What do you mean? What do you mean 
you can do better?” 

“You’ll see,” she replied, teasing him. “I brought something with me.” 

“What? What is it? What do you mean?” Evan demanded. 

“Meet me tomorrow after school,” she told him. “At that little park over 
there.” 

She pointed to the next block. A narrow park, only a few blocks long, ran 
along the bank of a shallow creek. 

“But what is it?” Evan cried. 

She laughed. “I love torturing you!” she declared. “But it’s a little too easy.” 

Then she turned and headed down the street, running at full speed. 

“Andy—wait!” Evan called. “What have you got? What did you bring?” 

She didn’t even turn around. 

8 

Evan dreamed about Monster Blood that night. 

He dreamed about it nearly every night. 

Tonight he dreamed that his dad had eaten a glob of it. Now Mr. Ross 
wanted to go to his office, but he had grown too big to fit through the door. 

“You’re in trouble now, Evan!” Mr. Ross bellowed, making the whole 
house shake. “Big trouble!” 

Big trouble. 

The words stuck in Evan’s mind as he sat up in bed and tried to shake away 
the dream. 

The curtains flapped silently in front of his open bedroom window. Pale 
yellow stars dotted the charcoal sky. Staring hard, Evan could see the Big 
Dipper. Or was it the Little Dipper? He never could remember. 

Shutting his eyes and settling back on the pillow, Evan thought about Andy. 
He was glad she had come to stay in Atlanta for a while. She could be a real 
pain. But she was also a lot of fun. 

What did she want to show him in the park after school? 

Probably nothing, Evan guessed. It was probably just a dumb joke. Andy 
loved dumb jokes. 

How can I get her to tell the kids at school about Monster Blood? he 
wondered. How can I get Andy to tell everyone that I didn’t make it up, that it’s 
true? 

He was still thinking about this problem as he fell back into a restless sleep. 

The next day at school wasn’t much better than the last. 

Somehow during free reading period, Conan had crept under the table and 
tied Evan’s sneaker laces together. When Evan got up to go to the water 
fountain, he fell flat on his face. He scraped a knee, but no one cared. The kids 
laughed for hours. 

“Evan’s mommy tied his shoes funny this morning!” Conan told everyone. 
And they laughed even harder. 

In science class, Mr. Murphy called Evan over to the hamster cage. “Look 
at poor Cuddles,” the teacher said, shaking his round head solemnly. 

Evan peered down into the metal cage. Cuddles was curled up in a corner 
under a pile of shavings. The hamster was trembling and breathing in short 
gasps. 

“Poor Cuddles has been like that ever since yesterday,” Mr. Murphy told 
Evan with an accusing frown. “Cuddles is sick because of your carelessness.” 

“I—I’m sorry,” Evan stammered. He stared hard at the quivering hamster. 
You’re faking—aren’t you, Cuddles? Evan thought. You’re faking just to get me 
in trouble! 

The hamster twitched and stared up at him with mournful, black eyes. 

When Evan sat back down in his seat, he felt cold water seep through the 
back of his jeans. With a startled cry, he jumped right back up. Someone— 
probably Conan—had poured a cup of water on his chair. 

That had the class laughing for at least ten minutes. They stopped only 
when Mr. Murphy threatened to keep everyone after school. 

“Sit down, Evan,” the teacher ordered. 

“But, Mr. Murphy—” Evan started. 

“Sit down—now!” Mr. Murphy insisted. 

Evan dropped back down into the wet chair. What choice did he have? 

Andy was waiting for Evan by the trickling brown creek that rolled through the 
tiny park. The old sassafras trees bent and whispered in a hot breeze. A tall 
Georgia pine leaned over the water as if trying to reach across the creek. 

Andy was wearing a bright blue T-shirt over lime-green short-shorts. She 
had been staring at her reflection in the muddy creek water. She spun around 
smiling as Evan called to her. 

“Hey, how’s it going?” he called. He stepped up beside her and dropped his 
backpack to the ground. 

“How was school?” Andy asked. 

“Same as always,” Evan replied, sighing. Then his expression brightened. 
“What did you bring?” he asked eagerly. 

“You’ll see.” She clasped a hand over his eyes. “Shut your eyes, Evan. And 
don’t open them until I say.” 

He obediently shut his eyes. But when she pulled her hand away, he opened 
them a tiny crack, just enough to see. He watched her go behind the pine tree and 
pick up a small brown paper bag. 

She carried the bag over to him. “You’re peeking—aren’t you?” she 

accused him. 

“Maybe,” he confessed, grinning. 

She punched him playfully in the stomach. He cried out and his eyes shot 
open. “What’s in the bag?” 

Grinning, Andy handed the bag to him. 

He pulled it open, peered inside—and his mouth dropped open in shock. 

The familiar blue can, about the size of a can of soup. 

“Andy—you—you—” Evan stammered, still staring wide-eyed into the 

bag. 

He reached in and pulled out the plastic can. 

He read the faded label: MONSTER BLOOD. 

Then he read the words in tiny type below it: SURPRISING MIRACLE 
SUBSTANCE. 

“I saved it,” Andy said, beaming proudly. 

Evan couldn’t get over his shock. “You brought Monster Blood! I don’t 
believe it! You brought Monster Blood!” 

“No.” She shook her head. “It’s empty, Evan. The can is empty.” 

His face fell. He sighed in total disappointment. 

“But you can show the can to everyone,” Andy insisted. “That will prove 
you didn’t make it up. It will prove that Monster Blood really exists.” 

Evan sighed again. “What good is an empty can?” he groaned. 

He pulled off the top, peered inside—and screamed. 

9 

With a trembling hand, Evan tilted the can so that Andy could see inside. 

“Oh, no!” she shrieked, pulling her hands to her cheeks. 

The can was half full. 

Inside, a green glob of gooey Monster Blood shimmered in the sunlight like 
lime jell-o. 

“But it was empty!” Andy protested, staring into the can. “I know it was!” 

Evan shook the can. The green glob inside quivered. 

“There must have been a tiny speck in there,” Evan guessed. “Down at the 
bottom of the can. And now it’s growing and growing again.” 

“Great!” Andy declared. She slapped him on the back so hard, he nearly 
dropped the blue can. 

“Great? What’s so great?” he demanded shakily. 

“Now you can show this to the kids at your school,” she replied. “Now 
they’ll have to believe you.” 

“I guess,” Evan replied in a low voice. 

“Oh! I have a better idea!” she exclaimed, her dark eyes lighting up 
mischievously. 

“Uh-oh,” Evan moaned. 

“Slip a little glob of it in that guy Conan’s lunch tomorrow. When he starts 
to grow as big as a hippo, everyone will see that the Monster Blood is real.” 

“No way!” Evan cried. He cupped the blue can in both hands, as if 
protecting it from Andy. “Conan is already big enough!” he told her, taking a 
step back. “I don’t want him to grow another inch. Do you know what he could 
do to me if he became a giant?” 

Andy laughed and shrugged. “It was just an idea.” 

“A bad idea,” Evan said sharply. “A really bad idea.” 

“You’re no fun,” she teased. She leaped forward and tried to wrestle the can 
from his hands. 

He spun around, turning his back to her, and hunched over, protecting the 

can. 

“Give it to me!” she cried, laughing. She started tickling his sides. “Give it! 
Give it!” 

“No!” he protested, breaking free. He ran to the safety of a tall evergreen 
shrub. 

“It’s mine!” Andy declared, coming after him, hands at her waist. “If you’re 
not going to use it, hand it back.” 

Evan stood his ground. His expression turned serious. “Andy, don’t you 
remember?” he demanded shrilly. “Don’t you remember how scary this stuff 
was? Don’t you remember how dangerous it was? All the trouble it caused?” 

“So?” she replied, her eyes on the blue can. 

“We have to get rid of it,” Evan told her firmly. “We can’t let it out of the 
can. It will grow and grow and never stop.” 

“But I thought you wanted to show it to the kids to prove that it’s real.” 

“No,” Evan interrupted. “I changed my mind. This stuff is too dangerous. 
We have to get rid of it.” He locked his eyes on hers, his features tight with fear. 
“Andy, I’ve had nightmares every night because of this stuff. I don’t want any 
new nightmares.” 

“Okay, okay,” she muttered. She kicked at an upraised tree root. Then she 
handed him the brown paper bag. 

Evan clicked the top back on the can of Monster Blood. Then he shoved the 
can into the bag. “Now how do we get rid of it?” he wondered out loud. 

“I know. Dump it in the creek,” Andy suggested. 

Evan shook his head. “No good. What if it gets out and pollutes the creek?” 

“This creek is already polluted!” Andy exclaimed. “It’s just a big mud 
puddle!” 

“It isn’t deep enough,” Evan insisted. “Someone will find the can and pull it 
out. We can’t take a chance.” 

“Then how do we get rid of it?” Andy asked, twisting her face in 
concentration. “Hmmmm. We could eat it ourselves. That would get rid of it!” 

“Very funny,” Evan muttered, rolling his eyes. 

“Just trying to be helpful,” Andy said. 

“You’re about as helpful as a toothache!” Evan shot back. 

“Ha-ha. Remind me to laugh at that sometime,” she replied, sticking her 
tongue out at him. 

“How can we get rid of it?” Evan repeated, gripping the bag in both hands. 
“How?” 

“I know!” a boy’s voice called, startling them both. 

Conan Barber stepped out from behind a tall shrub. 

“You can give it to me!” he declared. He reached out a big, powerful- 
looking hand to grab the bag. 

10 

Evan swung the paper bag behind his back. 

Conan lumbered toward them over the tall grass. His eyes were narrowed 
menacingly at Evan. 

How long has he been hiding there? Evan wondered. Did he hear us talk 
about the Monster Blood? Is that why he wants the bag? 

“Hi, I’m Andy,” Andy chirped brightly. She stepped in between the two 
boys and flashed Conan a smile. 

“Andy is a boy’s name,” Conan said, making a disgusted face. He turned 
his hard stare on her, challenging her. 

“And what kind of a name is Conan?” Andy shot back, returning his stare. 

“You know me?” Conan asked, sounding surprised. 

“You’re famous,” Andy replied dryly. 

Conan suddenly remembered Evan. He stuck out his big paw. “I’ll take the 
bag now.” 

“Why should I give it to you?” Evan demanded, trying to keep his voice 
calm and steady. 

“Because it’s mine,” Conan lied. “I dropped it here.” 

“You dropped an empty bag here?” Evan asked. 

Conan swatted a fly from his blond hair. “It isn’t empty. I saw you put 
something in it. Hand it over. Now.” 

“Well... okay.” Evan handed him the paper bag. Conan eagerly reached 
inside. 

His hand came out empty. 

He peered inside the bag. Empty. 

He stared hard at Andy, then at Evan. 

“I told you it was empty,” Evan said. 

“Guess I made a mistake,” Conan muttered. “Hey, no hard feelings. Shake.” 
Conan reached out his big right hand to Evan. 

Evan reluctantly stuck out his hand. 

Conan slid his hand over Evan’s and began to tighten his grip. Harder. 
Harder. 

Evan’s fingers cracked so loudly, they sounded like a tree falling! 

Conan squeezed Evan’s hand harder and harder until Evan screamed in 
pain. When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a slab of raw hamburger. 

“Nice handshake you got there!” Conan exclaimed, grinning. 

He snapped his finger against Andy’s nose, then headed off quickly toward 
the street, taking long strides, laughing to himself. 

“Great guy,” Andy muttered, rubbing her nose. 

Evan blew on his hand, as if trying to put out a fire. “Maybe I can learn to 
be left-handed,” he murmured. 

“Hey—where’s the Monster Blood?” Andy demanded. 

“I—I dropped it,” Evan replied, still examining his hand. 

“Huh?” She kicked away a clump of weeds and stepped over to him. 

“I thought I could shove the can into my back jeans pocket while Conan 
was talking to you,” Evan explained. “But it slipped out of my hand. I dropped 
it.” 

He turned, bent over, and picked it up from the tall grass. “Good thing it 
didn’t roll or anything. Conan would have seen it.” 

“He wouldn’t know what to do with it if he had it,” Andy said. 

“What are we going to do with it?” Evan demanded. “It’s already caused us 
trouble. We’ve got to hide it, or throw it away, or—or—” 

He pulled open the lid. “Oh, wow! Look!” He held the can up to Andy’s 
face. The green goo had grown nearly to the top of the can. “It’s starting to grow 
a lot faster. I guess because we exposed it to the air.” 

Evan slammed the lid on tight. 

“Let’s bury it,” Andy suggested. “Here. Right under this tree. We’ll dig a 
deep hole and bury it.” 

Evan liked the idea. It was simple and quick. 

They squatted down and began digging with their hands. The dirt beneath 
the tree was soft. The hole grew deep before they had worked up a sweat. 

Evan dropped the blue can of Monster Blood into the hole. Then they 
quickly covered it with dirt, smoothing it out until it was impossible to tell a hole 
had been dug. 

“This was a good plan,” Andy said, climbing to her feet, playfully wiping 
the dirt off her hands on the back of Evan’s T-shirt. “If we need it, we’ll know 
where it is.” 

Evan’s red hair was matted to his forehead with sweat. He had a wide smear 

of dirt across his freckled forehead. “Huh? Why would we need it?” he 
demanded. 

Andy shrugged. “You never know.” 

“We won’t need it,” Evan told her firmly. “We won’t.” 

He was very, very wrong. 

11 

“Hey, Dad, what’s up?” Evan stepped into the garage. 

Mr. Ross stopped hammering and turned around. He smiled at Evan. “Want 
to see my newest work?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. Every weekend, his father spent hour after hour 
in his garage workshop, banging away on large sheets of metal, making what he 
called his “works”. 

He chiseled and hammered and sawed, and put a lot of effort into his 
sculptures. But to Evan, they all looked like banged-up sheets of metal when 
they were finished. 

Mr. Ross took a few steps back to admire his current project. He lowered 
his heavy mallet in one hand and pointed with the chisel he held in his other 
hand. “I used brass for this one,” he told Evan. “I call it ‘Autumn Leaf’.” 

Evan studied it thoughtfully. “It looks like a leaf,” he lied. It looks like Dad 
mined a perfectly good piece of brass, he thought, trying to keep a straight face. 

“It’s not supposed to look like a leaf,” Mr. Ross corrected Evan. “It’s 
supposed to look like my impression of a leaf.” 

“Oh.” Evan scratched his curly, red hair as he studied it some more. “Neat, 
Dad,” he said. “I see what you mean.” 

Then something else caught his eye. “Hey—what’s this?” 

Evan carefully stepped over several jagged, bent shards of metal. He made 
his way to another metal sculpture and ran his hand over the smooth, shiny 
surface. It was an enormous aluminum cylinder that rested above a flat wooden 
base. 

“Go ahead. Spin it,” Mr. Ross instructed, smiling proudly. 

Evan pushed the cylinder with both hands. It spun slowly over the wooden 

base. 

“I call it ‘The Wheel’,” his father told him. 

Evan laughed. “That’s cool, Dad. You invented the wheel!” 

“Don’t laugh!” Mr. Ross replied, grinning. “That sculpture was accepted at 
the annual arts competition at your school. I have to take it to the auditorium 
later this week.” 

Evan gave “The Wheel” another spin. “I’ll bet no one else made a wheel 

that really spins,” he told his father. “You can’t lose with this, Dad,” he teased. 

“Sarcasm is the lowest form of humor,” Mr. Ross muttered with a frown. 

Evan said good-bye and made his way out of the garage, stepping carefully 
over the jagged pieces of brass and tin. As he headed to the house, he could hear 
the clang clang clang as his dad hammered away on his impression of a leaf. 

In the halls after school on Monday, Evan hurried around a corner and bumped 
right into Andy. “I can’t talk now,” he told her breathlessly. “I’m late for 
basketball tryouts.” 

He glanced down the long hall. It was nearly empty. The gym door opened, 
and he could hear the thump of basketballs against the floor. 

“How come you’re late?” Andy demanded, blocking his path. 

“Murphy kept me after class,” Evan told her with a groan. “He put me on 
permanent hamster duty. I have to take care of Cuddles every afternoon for the 
rest of my life.” 

“Bad news,” Andy murmured. 

“No. That’s the good news,” Evan replied bitterly. 

“What’s the bad news?” 

“The bad news is that Mr. Murphy is also the basketball coach!” 

“Well, good luck,” she said. “Hope you make the team.” 

Evan ran past her, his heart pounding. 

Mr. Murphy is such a rat, he thought unhappily. He’ll probably keep me off 
the team because I’m late to practice—even though it’s his fault I’m late! 

Evan took a deep breath. No. Stop thinking like that, he scolded himself. 

Think positive. I’ve got to think positive. 

Sure, I’m not as tall as the other guys. Maybe I’m not as big or as strong. 
But I’m a good basketball player. And I can make this team. 

I can make this team. I know I can! 

Having finished his pep talk to himself, Evan pulled open the double gym 
doors and stepped into the huge, brightly lit gym. 

“Think fast!” a voice called. 

Evan felt his face explode with pain. 

Then everything went black. 

12 

When Evan opened his eyes, he found himself staring up at about twenty guys 
and Mr. Murphy. 

He was stretched out fiat on his back on the gym floor. His face still hurt. A 
lot. 

He reached a hand up and touched his nose. To his dismay, it felt like a 
wilted leaf of lettuce. 

“You okay, Evan?” Mr. Murphy asked quietly. As the teacher leaned over 
Evan, the whistle that was on a string around his neck bumped against Evan’s 
chest. 

“Did my face explode?” Evan asked weakly. 

Some of the guys snickered. Mr. Murphy glowered at them angrily. Then he 
turned back to Evan. “Conan hit you in the face with the basketball,” he 
reported. 

“He’s got bad reflexes, Coach,” Evan heard Conan say from somewhere 
above him. “He should’ve caught the ball. I really thought he’d catch it. But he’s 
got bad reflexes.” 

“I saw the whole thing,” Conan’s friend, a huge hulk of a kid named Biggie 
Malick, chimed in. “It wasn’t Conan’s fault. Evan should’ve caught the ball. It 
was a perfect pass.” 

Perfect, Evan thought with a sigh. He touched his nose again. This time, it 
felt like a lump of mashed potatoes. At least it isn’t broken, he thought glumly. 

Evan’s basketball tryout went downhill from there. 

Mr. Murphy helped him to his feet. “You sure you want to try out?” he 
asked. 

Thanks for the support, Evan thought bitterly. 

“I think I can make the team,” he said. 

But Conan, Biggie, and the other guys had other ideas. 

During the ball-handling tryout, Evan confidently began dribbling across 
the floor. Halfway to the basket, Biggie bumped him hard—and Conan stole the 
ball away. 

They blocked Evan’s shots. They stole his passes. 

They bumped him every time he moved, sending him sprawling to the 

hardwood floor again and again. 

A fast pass from Conan caught Evan in the mouth. 

“Oops! Sorry!” Conan yelled. 

Biggie laughed like a hyena. 

“Defense! I want to see defense!” Mr. Murphy shouted from the sidelines. 

Evan lowered himself into a defensive stance. As Conan dribbled the ball 
toward him, Evan prepared to defend the basket. 

Conan drove closer. Closer. 

Evan raised both hands to block Conan’s shot. 

But to Evan’s surprise, Conan let the ball bounce away. In one swift motion, 
he grabbed Evan by the waist, leaped high in the air, and stuffed Evan into the 
basket. 

“Three points!” Conan shouted in triumph. 

Biggie and the other guys rushed to congratulate Conan, laughing and 
cheering. 

Mr. Murphy had to get a stepladder to help Evan down. 

His hand on Evan’s shoulder, the teacher led him to the side. “You’re just 
not tall enough, Evan,” he said, rubbing his pink chins. “Don’t take it personally. 
Maybe you’ll grow. But for now, you’re just not tall enough.” 

Evan didn’t say a word. He lowered his head and sadly slumped out of the 

gym. 

Conan came running up to him at the door. “Hey, Evan, no hard feelings,” 
he said. He stuck out his big, sweaty hand. “Shake.” 

Evan held up his hand to show Andy. “It looks like a wilted petunia,” she said. “I 
can’t believe I fell for Conan’s stupid handshake trick twice!” Evan wailed. It 
was the next afternoon. Evan and Andy had walked from school to the small 
park near their houses. Evan had complained about Mr. Murphy and Conan and 
the other basketball players the whole way. 

The late afternoon sun beamed down on them as they walked. Andy 
stopped to watch two monarch butterflies, their black-and-gold wings fluttering 
majestically as they hovered over a patch of blue and yellow wildflowers along 
the creekbed. 

Even the trickling brown creek looked pretty on this bright day. Tiny white 
gnats sparkled like diamonds in the sunlight over the shimmering water. 

Evan kicked at a fallen tree branch. Everything looked dark to him today. 

Dark and ugly. 

“It just wasn’t fair,” he grumbled, kicking the branch again. “It wasn’t a fair 
tryout. Mr. Murphy should have given me a better chance.” 

Andy tsk-tsked, her eyes on the sparkling creek. 

“Someone should teach Mr. Murphy a lesson,” Evan said. “I wish I could 
think of some way of paying him back. I really do.” 

Andy turned to him. A devilish grin crossed her face. “I have a plan,” she 
said softly. “A really neat plan.” 

“What is it?” Evan demanded. 

13 

“What’s your idea?” Evan demanded again. 

Andy grinned at him. She was wearing a long, lime-green T-shirt over a 
Day-Glo orange T-shirt, pulled down over baggy blue shorts. The sunlight made 
all the colors so bright, Evan felt like shielding his eyes. 

“You might not like it,” Andy said coyly. 

“Try me,” Evan replied. “Come on. Don’t keep me in suspense.” 

“Well...” Her eyes wandered over to the tree where they had buried the 
Monster Blood. “It has to do with the Monster Blood,” she said reluctantly. 

He swallowed hard. “That’s okay. Go on.” 

“Well, it’s a pretty simple plan. First, we dig up the Monster Blood,” Andy 
said, watching his reaction. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we take some to school,” she continued. 

“Yeah?” 

“Then we feed it to Cuddles.” 

Evan’s mouth dropped open. 

“Just a little bit!” Andy quickly explained. “We feed Cuddles a tiny glob of 
it. Just enough to make him the size of a dog.” 

Evan laughed. It was a terrible idea, a truly evil idea—but he loved it! 

He slapped Andy on the back. “You’re bad, Andy!” he cried. “You’re really 
bad!” 

Andy grinned proudly. “I know.” 

Evan laughed again. “Can you see the look on Murphy’s face when he 
comes in and sees his precious little hamster has grown as big as a cocker 
spaniel? What a riot!” 

“So you’ll do it?” Andy asked. 

Evan’s smile faded. “I guess,” he replied thoughtfully. “If you promise 
we’ll only use a tiny bit. And we’ll bury the rest right away.” 

“Promise,” Andy said. “Just enough to play our little joke on Mr. Murphy. 
Then we’ll never use the stuff again.” 

“Okay,” Evan agreed. 

They shook hands solemnly. 

Then they hurried to the tree. Evan searched the entire park, squinting 
against the bright sunlight. He wanted to make sure no one was spying on them 
this time. 

When he was sure the park was empty, he and Andy dropped to their knees 
under the tree and began scooping the dirt off the hole with their hands. 

They had dug nearly two feet down when they realized the hole was empty. 

“The Monster Blood!” Evan cried. “It—it’s gone!” 

14 

“We must be digging under the wrong tree,” Evan said, sweat pouring down his 
freckled forehead. 

Andy pushed a wet strand of brown hair off her face with a dirt-covered 
finger. “No way.” She shook her head. “This is the right tree. And the right 
hole.” 

“Then where is the Monster Blood?” Evan demanded shrilly. 

They both came up with the answer to his question at the same time: 
“Conan!” 

“He must have watched us bury it,” Evan said, his eyes darting around the 
park as if he expected to see Conan jump out from behind a bush. “I thought he 
hurried away awfully fast that afternoon. He knew the paper bag wasn’t empty.” 

Andy agreed. “He hid and watched us bury it. Then he waited till we were 
gone, and dug it up.” 

They both stared into the empty hole in horrified silence. 

Andy broke the silence. “What is Conan going to do with it?” she asked, 
her voice just above a whisper. 

“Probably eat it so he can grow bigger and pound me harder,” Evan replied 
bitterly. 

“But he doesn’t know what Monster Blood does,” Andy said. “He doesn’t 
know how dangerous it is.” 

“Of course he does. I told him all about it,” Evan replied. He slammed his 
hand against the tree trunk. “We have to get it back!” 

Before science class the next afternoon, Evan found Conan in the hall. He and 
Biggie were standing next to Evan’s locker. They were laughing loudly about 
something, slapping each other high-fives. 

Conan wore a tight blue muscle shirt and baggy faded denim jeans with 
enormous holes at the knees. Biggie had wavy brown hair down to his shoulders. 
He wore a sleeveless white T-shirt and tight-fitting black denims. 

They look like a couple of tag-team wrestlers! Evan thought as he stepped 
between them. 

“Hey, look—it’s Air Evan!” Conan joked. “King of the slam dunk!” 

He and Biggie guffawed loudly. Conan gave Evan a slap on the back that 
sent him sprawling into Biggie. 

“Uh... Conan? Did you find something in the park?” Evan asked, 
struggling to regain his balance. 

Conan narrowed his eyes at Evan and didn’t reply. 

“Did you find something that belongs to Andy and me?” Evan repeated. 

“You mean like your brains ?” Conan exclaimed. He and his tag-team 
partner roared with laughter over that gem. 

“Why don’t we dribble him to class?” Biggie asked Conan. “Coach Murphy 
would like to see us get in some extra practice.” 

Conan laughed gleefully at that idea. 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” Evan said sarcastically. “Look, Conan—that stuff you 
took. It’s really dangerous. You have to give it back.” 

Conan opened his eyes in wide-eyed innocence. “I really don’t know what 
you’re talking about, Evan. Did you lose something?” 

“You know I lost something,” Evan replied sharply. “And I want it back.” 

Conan flashed a sly grin at Biggie. Then he turned back to Evan, his 
expression hardening. “I don’t know what you mean, Evan,” he said. “Really. I 
don’t know what you and that girl lost. But tell you what. I’m a nice guy. I’ll 
help you look for it.” 

He grabbed Evan around the waist with both hands. Biggie pulled Evan’s 
locker door open. 

“I’ll help you look for it in your locker,” Conan said. 

He shoved Evan inside the locker and slammed the door shut. 

Evan started pounding on the metal door, shouting for help. 

But the bell had rung. Evan knew the hall was empty. There was no one to 
hear his cries. 

He decided to try fiddling with the latch. But it was too dark to see 
anything. And he was so jammed in, he couldn’t raise his arms. 

Finally, two girls happened to walk by, and they pulled open the locker 

door. 

Evan came bursting out, red-faced, gasping for air. 

The girls’ laughter followed him all the way to Mr. Murphy’s class. “You’re 
late,” the teacher said sternly, glancing up at the wall clock as Evan staggered in. 

Evan tried to explain why. But all that escaped his lips was a whistling 
wheeze. 

“I’m really tired of you disrupting my class, Evan,” Mr. Murphy said, 
rubbing his nearly bald head. “I’m afraid I’ll be seeing you after school again. 
You can give Cuddles’ cage a double cleaning. And while you’re at it, you can 
scrub the chalkboards and clean out all the test tubes, too.” 

* * * 

“It’s so dark,” Evan whispered. 

“It usually gets dark at night,” Andy replied, rolling her eyes. 

“The streetlight is out,” Evan said, pointing. “And there’s no moon tonight. 
That’s why it’s so dark.” 

“Hide! ” Andy whispered. 

They ducked behind the hedge as a car rolled slowly past. Evan shut his 
eyes as the white headlights moved over him. When the car turned the corner, 
they climbed to their feet. 

It was a little after eight o’clock. They were standing in the street in front of 
Conan’s house. Leaning against the low hedge, they stared across the sloping 
front lawn into the large picture window in the front of the house. 

The lamp in the living room was lit, casting a dim rectangle of orange light 
that spilled onto the front yard. The old trees at the sides of the small brick house 
whispered in a hot breeze. 

“Are we really doing this?” Evan asked, huddling close to Andy. “Are we 
really going to break into Conan’s house?” 

“We’re not going to break in,” Andy whispered. “We’re going to sneak in.” 

“But what if the Monster Blood isn’t there?” Evan asked, hoping she 
couldn’t see his knees trembling. 

“We have to look, don’t we?” Andy shot back. 

She turned to study his face. He saw that she was frightened, too. “The 
Monster Blood will be there,” she told him. “It’s got to be.” 

Bending low, she started to creep across the dark yard to the house. 

Evan hung back. “You checked it out?” he called to her. “Everyone is really 
gone?” 

“His parents left right after dinner,” Andy told him. “Then I saw Conan go 
out about ten minutes ago,” 

“Where?” Evan demanded. 

“How should I know?” she asked sharply, putting her hands on her waist. 

“He left. The house is empty.” She came back and tugged Evan’s arm. “Come 
on. Let’s sneak into Conan’s room, get the Monster Blood, and get out of here!” 

“I can’t believe we’re doing this,” Evan said, sighing. “We—we could be 
arrested!” 

“It was your idea!” Andy reminded him. 

“Oh. Yeah. Right.” He took a deep breath and held it, hoping it would help 
calm him down. “If we don’t find it right away, we get out of there—right?” 

“Right,” Andy agreed. “Now come on.” She gave him a little shove toward 
the house. 

They took a few steps over the dew-wet grass. 

They both stopped when they heard the low barking. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s arm. 

The barking grew louder. They could hear the dog’s heavy paws pounding 
the ground, approaching fast. 

Two angry eyes. A loud warning bark. Another. 

The dog attacked at full speed. 

“Run!” Evan cried. “Conan has a guard dog!” 

“Too late to run!” Andy shrieked. 

15 

The dog barked again. 

Evan cried out and threw up his hands as the dog leaped for his throat. 

The dog wasn’t as big as Evan had thought—but it was strong. 

It licked his face, pressing its wet snout into his cheek. 

It licked his chin. And then his lips. 

“Yuck!” Evan cried, laughing. “Trigger—how did you get here?” 

Evan pulled the cocker spaniel off him and lowered it to the ground. Its 
stubby tail wagging furiously, Trigger started jumping on Andy. 

“Your dumb dog scared me to death,” she moaned. 

“Me, too,” Evan admitted. “I didn’t hear him following us, did you?” 

Andy squatted down and gave Trigger a few quick pats. Then she glanced 
down the street. 

“Let’s get inside,” she said. “Conan or his parents could be back any 
minute.” 

Trigger pranced along as they made their way over the grass to the front 
door. The house loomed much bigger and darker as they crept onto the stoop. 

“Down, Trigger. Stay down,” Evan whispered. “You can’t come in with us.” 

Andy tried the front door. “Locked.” 

Evan groaned. “Now what?” 

“We try the back door, of course,” Andy replied. She had already jumped 
down off the stoop and was heading around the side of the house. 

“You’ve done this before—haven’t you?” Evan demanded, following her. 

“Maybe,” she replied, grinning at him in the dark. 

A loud howl somewhere nearby made them both stop. 

“What was that?” Evan cried. 

“A werewolf,” Andy told him calmly. “Or maybe a cat.” 

They both laughed. Nervous laughter. 

The back door was locked, too. But the kitchen window was open a crack. 
Evan pushed it open wider, and they crept into the dark kitchen. 

Holding his breath, Evan could hear every sound. Their sneakers scraped 
noisily against the linoleum. The refrigerator hummed. Water swirled in the 

dishwasher. 

I can even hear the pounding of my heart, Evan thought. What am I doing? 
Have I really broken into Conan’s house? 

“This way,” Andy whispered. “His room is probably upstairs.” 

Evan kept against the wall as he followed Andy to the front stairs. They 
passed the small living room, bathed in orange light. The floorboards creaked 
under their shoes. Evan stumbled over a pile of old newspapers stacked in the 
narrow hallway. 

Up the wooden stairs. The banister squeaked under Evan’s hand. A 
Venetian blind rattled against an open window, startling him. 

“Sure is dark,” Andy muttered as they reached the top of the stairs. 

Evan tried to reply, but his breath caught in his throat. 

Holding onto the wall, he followed Andy to the first bedroom. She fumbled 
until she found a light switch, then clicked it on. The ceiling light revealed that 
they had found Conan’s room. 

They both stood in the doorway, waiting for their eyes to adjust to the light. 
Then they quickly glanced around. 

The walls of the small, square room were filled with posters of sports stars. 
The biggest poster, above Conan’s bed, showed Michael Jordan jumping about 
ten feet in the air as he slam-dunked a basketball. A bookshelf against one wall 
held very few books—but was loaded with sports trophies that Conan had won 
on various teams. 

Suddenly, Andy started to laugh. 

Evan turned to her, startled. “What’s so funny?” 

She pointed to Conan’s bed. “Look—he still has a teddy bear!” 

Evan turned his eyes to the bed, where a forlorn-looking, nearly flat, one- 
eyed teddy bear rested on the pillow. “Conan the Barbarian?” he cried, laughing. 
“He sleeps with a teddy bear?” 

A loud creak made them cut their laughter short. 

They listened hard, their eyes wide with fear. “Just the house,” Evan 
whispered. 

Andy shivered. “Enough fooling around. Let’s find the Monster Blood and 
get out of here.” 

They moved into the center of the room. “Where do you think he hid it?” 
Evan asked, pulling open the closet door. 

“He didn’t,” Andy replied. 

“Huh?” Evan spun around. 

Andy had the blue can of Monster Blood in her hand. Grinning, she held it 
up to show Evan. 

Evan let out a surprised cry. “You found it? Where?” 

“Right on this shelf,” she replied, pointing. “He put it next to his tennis 
trophies.” 

Evan hurried over to her and took the blue can from her hand. As he held it 
up to examine it, the lid popped off. 

The green Monster Blood began bubbling over the top of the can. 

“It’s growing fast!” Evan declared. 

Andy stooped down and picked up the lid. She handed it to Evan. “Put it 
back on. Hurry.” 

Evan tried pushing the lid back on. It kept slipping off. 

“Hurry up,” Andy urged. “We’ve got to go.” 

“The Monster Blood—it’s up over the top,” Evan cried. 

“Shove it down,” Andy instructed. 

Evan tried pushing the green gunk down into the can, pressing against it 
with the palm of his hand. Then he tried pushing it with three fingers. 

He gasped as he felt the green goo tighten around his fingers and start to 
pull them down. 

“It—it’s got me!” Evan stammered. 

Andy’s mouth dropped open. “Huh?” 

“It’s got my fingers!” Evan cried shrilly. “It won’t let go!” 

As Andy hurried to help him, they both heard the front door slam. 

“Someone’s home!” Evan whispered, tugging to pull his fingers free. 
“We’re caught!” 

16 

Andy froze in the center of the room, her eyes wide with horror. 

Evan nearly dropped the can of Monster Blood. The sticky green substance 
tightened its grip on his fingers, making loud sucking sounds. 

But Evan only cared about the sounds coming from downstairs. 

“I’m home!” he heard Conan shout. 

“We’re home, too!” It was a woman’s voice, probably Conan’s mother. 

“They’re all home,” Evan whispered. 

“We’re dead meat!” Andy murmured. 

“I’m going upstairs,” Conan called to his parents. 

Evan let out a terrified cry as he heard Conan’s heavy footsteps on the 
stairs. “Andy—wh-what do we do?” he stammered. 

“The window!” she replied. 

They both lunged toward the open window and peered out. A narrow 
concrete ledge stretched just beneath the window. 

Without hesitating, Andy raised a leg over the windowsill and climbed out 
onto the ledge. “Evan—hurry!” she whispered, gesturing frantically. 

Evan was still desperately trying to pull his fingers from the bubbling green 
goo. Andy reached in through the window and grabbed him by the shoulder. 
“Evan—!” 

He heard Conan’s footsteps in the upstairs hall just outside the bedroom. 

Using his free hand for support, Evan scrambled out the window and joined 
Andy on the narrow ledge. 

“D-don’t look down,” Andy instructed in a trembling whisper. 

Evan didn’t obey. He glanced down. The ground seemed very far below. 

They each stood on a side of the window—Andy to the left, Evan the right. 
They pressed their bodies against the brick wall—and listened. 

They heard Conan step into the room. 

Did he notice that the light had been turned on? 

No way to tell. 

Loud rap music suddenly jarred the silence. Conan had turned on his boom 
box. He started chanting off-key along with the music. 

Evan pressed as tightly against the side of the house as he could. 

Go back downstairs, Conan, he pleaded silently. Please—go back 
downstairs! 

How will Andy and I ever get away from here? he wondered, feeling all of 
his muscles tighten in panic. 

Despite the hot night air, a cold chill ran down Evan’s back. He shuddered 
so hard, he nearly toppled off the ledge. 

The blue can stuck to his hand. The Monster Blood sucked at his fingers. 
But he couldn’t worry about that now. 

He could hear Conan moving around inside the room. Was he dancing to 
the loud music? 

Evan glanced across the window at Andy. Her eyes were shut. Her face was 
clenched in a tight frown. 

“Andy—!” Evan whispered. He knew that Conan couldn’t hear a whisper 
over the booming music. “Andy—it’ll be okay. As soon as he leaves, we’ll jump 
inside and sneak down the stairs.” 

Andy nodded without opening her eyes. “Did I ever tell you I’m afraid of 
heights?” she whispered. 

“No,” Evan replied. 

“Well, remind me to tell you!” 

“We’ll be okay,” he murmured. 

Clinging to the side of the house, Evan kept repeating those words to 
himself. “We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay. We’ll be okay.” 

Then Trigger started to bark. 

A low bark of surprise at first. And then a louder series of barks, insistent 
barks, excited barks. 

Evan swallowed hard. He glanced down to the ground. 

Trigger was peering up at him, jumping against the side of the house, as if 
trying to reach the ledge. The dog barked louder with each jump. 

“Trigger—no!” Evan called down in a frantic whisper. 

That only made the dog bark more furiously. 

Did Conan hear it? Could he hear Trigger’s ferocious barks over the music? 

“Trigger—stop! Go home! Go home!” 

Suddenly the music stopped. 

Trigger’s excited barks rose up even louder against the new silence. 

Conan must hear them now, Evan realized. 

The cocker spaniel threw himself wildly against the side of the house, 
trying to get up to Evan and Andy. Despite Evan’s frantic signals to be quiet, the 
dumb dog barked his head off. 

Evan’s breath caught in his throat as he heard Conan making his way to the 
window. 

A second later, Conan stuck his head out. “What’s going on?” he shouted. 

Evan’s knees buckled. He started to fall. 

17 

Evan clung to the brick wall and stopped his fall. 

He stared at Conan’s blond hair poking out the window. Evan was close 
enough to reach out and touch it. 

“Shut up down there!” Conan shouted. 

That made Trigger bark even louder. 

He’s going to see us, Evan thought, trembling all over. 

There’s no way Conan won’t see us. 

“Conan—come downstairs!” Mrs. Barber’s voice floated up from 
downstairs. “Conan—come down and have your cake and ice cream. You said 
you were dying for dessert!” she called. 

Conan’s head disappeared back into the bedroom. “There’s some stupid dog 
barking down there,” he called to his mother. 

Clinging to the side of the house, struggling to keep his quivering knees 
from buckling again, Evan shut his eyes and listened. 

He heard Conan’s footsteps cross the room. The bedroom light went out. 

Silence. 

“He—left,” Evan choked out. 

Andy let out a long breath. “I can’t believe he didn’t see us out here.” 

Evan glanced down to the ground. Trigger had finally stopped barking. But 
he continued to stand and stare up at them, his front paws against the side of the 
house, his stubby tail spinning like a propeller. 

“Dumb dog,” Evan muttered. 

“Let’s go,” Andy urged. She didn’t wait for Evan. She practically did a 
swan dive into the house. 

It took Evan a few moments to get his legs to work. Then he ducked his 
head and climbed through the window after Andy. 

Holding his breath, he led the way on tiptoe to the bedroom door. He 
stopped and listened. 

Silence. No one in the dark hallway. 

He could hear the Barbers’ voices downstairs in the kitchen. 

He and Andy made their way to the top of the stairs. Then, holding tightly 

to the banister, they crept halfway down. 

Evan stopped to listen again. Andy bumped right into him, nearly sending 
him sailing down the stairs. “Shhh!” she cried. 

They could hear Conan talking to his parents in the kitchen. He was 
complaining about the other guys on the basketball team. “They’re all wimps,” 
Evan heard Conan say. 

“Well, that’ll make you look even better,” Mr. Barber replied. 

Evan took another deep breath and held it. Then he made his way down to 
the bottom of the stairs. 

Almost out, he thought, his entire body shaking. Almost out of here. 

He reached for the front doorknob. 

“Conan, go upstairs and get your math book,” he heard Mr. Barber say. “I 
want to see the homework you had trouble with.” 

“Okay,” Conan replied. His chair scraped against the floor. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder. 

They stared in frozen horror at each other—one foot away from escape— 
and waited to be caught. 

18 

“Conan—don’t go now. Get the book later,” Mrs. Barber chimed in. Then they 
heard her scold Conan’s father: “Let the boy have his cake and ice cream.” 

“Fine, fine,” Mr. Barber replied. “He can show me the book later.” 

Conan’s chair scraped back into place under the table. 

Evan didn’t wait another second. 

He jerked open the front door, pushed open the screen door, and burst out of 
the house like a rocket. 

He could hear Andy gasping as she ran behind him. And then he could hear 
Trigger’s shrill yips as the dog followed, too. 

Down the Barbers’ front lawn, into the street. Their sneakers slapped the 
pavement as they ran full speed through the darkness. 

They didn’t stop until they reached Evan’s driveway. 

Evan leaned against his family’s mailbox and struggled to catch his breath. 
He raised his hand to wipe the sweat off his forehead—and saw the blue can still 
stuck there. 

“Help me,” he pleaded. He reached out his hand to Andy. 

She was breathing hard, too. Her eyes kept darting back down the street, as 
if she expected Conan to be chasing after them. 

“Close one,” she murmured. She turned to Evan. Her eyes glowed excitedly 
in the light from the streetlamp. “That was fun!” 

Evan didn’t agree. In his opinion, it was far too scary to be fun. And here he 
was, still stuck to the can of Monster Blood. 

He pushed his hand toward Andy. “Pull it off,” he told her. “I think you 
need both hands. I can’t do it.” 

She grabbed the can in both hands. The green gunk bubbled over the sides, 
making loud sucking sounds. 

Andy tugged. Then tugged harder. Then she took a deep breath, leaned 
back, and tugged with all her might. 

The Monster Blood finally let go of its grip on Evan’s fingers. The can slid 
off with a loud pop. Andy went tumbling back onto the pavement. 

“Ow!” Evan held up his three fingers and tried to examine them under the 
streetlight. They were all wrinkled and pruney, the way they looked when he had 

been swimming for an hour or two. 

“Yuck! That stuff is so gross!” he cried. 

Andy climbed slowly to her feet. She still cradled the Monster Blood can in 
both hands. “At least we got it back,” she murmured. 

“Yeah. Now we can bury it again,” Evan said, still examining his fingers. 
“Huh? Bury it?” Andy pulled the can away, as if protecting it from Evan. 
“You heard me,” Evan said firmly. “It’s just too dangerous to mess with, 
Andy. Take it home and bury it in your back yard, okay?” 

Andy stared down at the can. She didn’t reply. 

“Bury it,” Evan repeated. “Take it home and bury it. Promise?” 

“Well...” Andy hesitated. Then she said, “Okay. Promise.” 

Evan woke up with a bad sore throat the next morning. 

His mother worried that he might be coming down with the flu. So she kept 
him home from school. Evan spent the day reading comic books and watching 
MTV. His sore throat disappeared by midafternoon. 

He returned to school the next day, feeling refreshed and ready to see 
everyone. 

The good feeling lasted until he stepped into Mr. Murphy’s science class 
near the end of the day. Evan had to walk past the hamster cage to get to his seat. 
As he neared the cage, he peered in. 

That’s weird, he thought. Where’s Cuddles? 

When did Mr. Murphy get a rabbit? 

A rabbit?! 

He stopped and leaned closer to the cage. 

Familiar black eyes stared up at him. A familiar pink nose twitched at him. 

It was Cuddles, Evan realized. 

Cuddles had grown as big as a rabbit! 

19 

Evan leaned over the hamster cage, staring at the giant-sized Cuddles, as the bell 
rang. He turned to see that the other kids had all taken their seats. 

“Evan, I see you’re examining your victim,” Mr. Murphy said from the 
front of the room. 

“I—uh—” Evan couldn’t think of a reply. “Victim?” 

Mr. Murphy angrily narrowed his beady black eyes at Evan. “You’ve been 
overfeeding Cuddles, Evan. Look how fat he has become.” 

Almost as fat as you! Evan wanted to say. 

Evan knew that Cuddles’ weight problem wasn’t his fault. 

And it had nothing to do with overeating. 

Cuddles had grown to triple-hamster size because of Monster Blood. 

“When I find Andy, I’ll strangle her!” Evan muttered. 

“What did you say, Evan?” Mr. Murphy demanded. 

Evan could feel his face turning bright red. He hadn’t meant to talk out 

loud. 

“Uh... nothing,” he replied, totally embarrassed. He slunk to his seat. 

Andy has gone too far this time, he thought bitterly. She promised she’d 
bury the Monster Blood. She promised! 

And now she’s turned Cuddles into a fat freak! And Murphy thinks it’s all 
my fault! 

“Please stay after school,” Mr. Murphy told Evan, “so we can discuss 
Cuddles’ diet.” 

Evan heard some kids snickering. He knew they were laughing at him. 

He saw Conan and Biggie at their seats in the back. Conan was twitching 
his nose, puffing out his cheeks, pretending to be a fat hamster. Biggie was 
laughing his head off. 

Evan stared at the hamster all through class. Cuddles appeared to grow right 
before Evan’s eyes. With each breath, the hamster seemed to puff up wider and 
taller. 

Its black eyes were as big as marbles now. They stared back at Evan, as if 
accusing him. 

When the hamster moved to its water tube, the entire cage rattled and 

shook. 

Please don’t grow anymore! Evan pleaded silently, staring at the shaking 
cage. Please stop right now, Cuddles. Okay? 

The hamster breathed noisily. Wheezing gasps. Evan could hear Cuddles 
panting all the way across the room. 

The cage shook again as Cuddles turned around. Evan watched in horror as 
the cage nearly toppled off its table. 

I’ll kill Andy! Evan thought bitterly. How could she do this to me? 

When the bell rang, the other kids all gathered up their books and headed 
out the door. Evan stood up and walked over to Cuddles’ cage. 

Panting loudly, Cuddles stared up at him. He’s too big to fit on his wheel, 
Evan realized. If he grows any more, he’ll burst out of the cage! 

How much Monster Blood did Andy feed him? Evan wondered. He had to 
find out. 

He turned to Mr. Murphy, who was reading over some papers at his desk. 
“I’ve got to find someone,” Evan called up to him. “I’ll be right back.” 

“Don’t take too long,” the teacher replied without looking up. 

Evan hurried from the room—and ran into Conan. “Hey, I was looking for 
you,” Conan said, sidestepping to the right, then the left, and stretching out both 
arms to keep Evan from getting away. 

“No time now,” Evan said sharply. But Conan wouldn’t let him pass. “I’m 
kind of in a hurry,” Evan told him. “I don’t have time to be stuffed into my 
locker right now.” 

A big grin crossed Conan’s handsome face. “Hey, I’m sorry about that,” he 
said, his blue eyes twinkling. 

“Huh? You’re sorry?” Evan’s mouth dropped open in shock. 

“Yeah. No hard feelings,” Conan said, lowering his eyes. “Shake.” 

Evan stuck out his hand. Then remembered Conan’s crushing handshake. 
He tried to pull back his hand. 

Too late. 

Conan gripped it tightly and began to squeeze. As he squeezed Evan’s hand, 
his grin grew wider and wider. 

Down the hall, Evan saw Andy heading out the door. He tried to call to her. 
But all that came out of his mouth was a squeak of pain. 

Andy disappeared out the front door of the school. 

The bones in Evan’s hand cracked and crunched. 

When Conan finally let go, the hand looked like a sad lump of soft red clay. 

“Wow! That’s some handshake you’ve got!” Conan cried, laughing. He 
pretended his hand hurt. He shook it hard and blew on it. “You killed me that 
time! You been working out or something?” 

Conan headed off to basketball practice, laughing and shaking his hand. 

He really cracks himself up, Evan thought. An angry cry burst from his 
throat. He slammed his good hand into a locker. He was so furious, he thought 
he could feel steam pouring out his ears. 

“Evan—you’re keeping me waiting!” Mr. Murphy called in a singsong 
from the classroom doorway. 

“Coming,” Evan muttered miserably, and slunk back into the room. 

He tried calling Andy for hours that night. But there was no one home. 

In his sleep, he dreamed that Trigger ate a big glob of Monster Blood and 
grew to giant size. Evan tried to stop him. But the enormous dog took off after 
the mailman. 

It wasn’t much of a chase. Trigger caught the mailman easily. The mailman 
was the size of a hamster. 

Evan woke up drenched with sweat. He glanced at his bedtable clock. Only 
six in the morning. He normally didn’t get up until seven. 

He climbed out of bed, anyway, feeling shaky and scared. 

He decided he had to get to school before everyone else. He had to see if 
Cuddles had grown any bigger. 

“Evan—where are you going?” his mother called sleepily as Evan headed 
out the front door. 

“Uh—school,” Evan replied. He had hoped to sneak out before she woke 
up. 

“So early?” She padded into the room, struggling with the belt to her blue 
cotton robe. 

“Well... I have a science project I need to work on,” Evan told her. It was 
almost the truth. 

“A science project?” She eyed him suspiciously. 

“Yeah. It’s... big!” Evan replied, thinking quickly. “It’s really big! So I 
couldn’t bring it home.” 

“You’re going without any breakfast?” Mrs. Ross demanded, yawning. 

“I’ll grab something at school,” he said. “Later, Mom.” He disappeared out 

the door before she could ask any more questions. 

A red sun was just climbing over the trees in a gray sky. The air still carried 
the chill of the night. The lawns Evan passed shimmered wetly with morning 
dew. 

He jogged the whole way, his backpack flopping heavily on his shoulder. 
There were no other kids on the playground or on the walk heading into the 
building. 

He crept into the school and made his way down the silent, empty hall. His 
sneakers echoed loudly as he trotted toward the science classroom. 

Maybe Cuddles didn’t grow overnight, Evan told himself. 

Maybe he didn’t grow at all. Maybe he shrank. Maybe he shrank back to his 
old size. 

It was possible. 

It was possible that Andy had fed the hamster only a teeny tiny speck of 
Monster Blood. Just enough for Cuddles to swell up to the size of a fat rabbit— 
then shrink right back down to cute, cuddly hamster size. 

It was possible—wasn’t it? 

Yes! Yes! Evan crossed his fingers on both hands. He wished he could cross 
his toes. 

By the time he reached the classroom, he was breathless. His heart thudded 
loudly in his chest. 

He hesitated at the door. 

Please, Cuddles—be small. Be small! 

Then Evan took a deep breath, held it—and stepped inside. 

20 

Evan stepped into the room, staring at the cage against the far wall. At first, he 
didn’t see Cuddles. 

Had Cuddles shrunk? Had he? 

Sometimes prayers are answered, Evan told himself. Sometimes good 
things happen. 

Evan took a few hesitant steps closer. Then a few more steps. 

Every muscle in his body had tensed. He was so frightened, it was actually 
hard to walk. 

He could feel the blood throbbing at his temples. He mopped the cold beads 
of sweat off his forehead. 

He still couldn’t see Cuddles. Where was he? 

Where? 

Gray morning light filtered in through the windows. The floor creaked 
under Evan’s sneakers. 

Evan took another hesitant step toward the cage. 

Another step. 

Then he cried out in horror. 

Evan hadn’t seen Cuddles at first—because Cuddles was too big! 

Cuddles filled the entire cage. 

Evan held back, gaping in disbelief. 

The hamster groaned noisily with every loud breath. It let out several 
disgusting grunts as its body pressed against the wire cage. 

Its big, furry head pushed up against the top of the cage. Evan could see one 
enormous black eye, the size of a jar lid, staring out at him. 

“No!” Evan cried out loud, feeling his knees begin to tremble. “This is 
impossible!” 

The hamster uttered a few more low grunts. 

The cage shook on its table. 

The big black eye glared out at Evan. 

And then as Evan stared in horrified disbelief, the hamster reached up its 
two pink paws. The toes slipped around the wires of the cage. 

Cuddles let out an ugly groan. 

Evan saw its spongy pink nose twitch. He saw a flash of big white teeth. 
Another groan. 

The two front paws pushed against the cage wires. 

The wires bent away. 

Cuddles grunted again, wheezing loudly, excitedly. 

He pushed the cage wires aside. Then he started to squeeze his big, fur- 
covered body through the opening. What do I do? Evan frantically asked 
himself. What do I do now? Cuddles is escaping! 

21 

“So what did you do?” Andy asked. 

They were sitting together in the tall grass of the tiny park, watching the 
brown creek trickle past. The late afternoon sun felt warm on their backs. 
Crickets chirped in the trees behind them. 

Three boys rolled past on bikes on the other side of the creek, heading 
home from school. One of them waved to Evan. He didn’t wave back. 

Andy wore a bright red sleeveless T-shirt over white denim jeans. She had 
slipped off her yellow sneakers and was digging her bare feet into the soft 
ground. 

“So what did you do?” she repeated. 

Evan picked up a hard clump of dirt and tossed it into the creek. Then he 
leaned back, his hands planted firmly behind him on the ground. 

“I got a dog leash,” he told Andy. “In the supply closet.” 

Andy’s eyes widened in surprise. “Murphy keeps a dog leash? What for?” 

Evan shrugged. “He has all kinds of junk back there.” 

“So you put the leash on Cuddles?” 

“Yeah,” Evan told her. “He was just the right size. As big as a dog. Maybe a 
little bigger.” 

“As big as Trigger?” Andy demanded. 

Evan nodded. “Then I tied the other end to the leg of Murphy’s desk—and I 
ran out of there as fast as I could.” 

Andy laughed. But she cut it short when she caught Evan’s angry glare. 
“What happened when you went to science class?” she asked, turning back to the 
creek. 

“I didn’t,” Evan muttered. 

“Huh?” 

“I didn’t go,” Evan said softly. “I was afraid to go. I didn’t want Murphy to 
start blaming me in front of everyone.” 

“So you cut class?” Andy asked, startled. 

Evan nodded. 

“So what did you do?” Andy asked. She pulled up a handful of the tall grass 
and let it sift through her fingers. 

“I sneaked out and came here,” Evan replied, frowning. 

“Everyone was talking about Cuddles all day,” Andy reported. Her dark 
eyes flashed. She couldn’t keep an amused grin off her face. “Everyone had to 
go in and see him. The stupid hamster practically caused a riot!” 

“It isn’t funny,” Evan murmured. 

“It’s kind of funny!” Andy insisted. “Mr. Murphy was bragging that 
Cuddles could beat up any other hamster in the country. He said he was going to 
try to get Cuddles on TV!” 

“Huh?” Evan jumped to his feet. “You mean Mr. Murphy wasn’t upset?” 

“I heard that he was at first,” Andy replied thoughtfully. “But then I guess 
he got used to Cuddles being so big. And he was acting kind of proud. You 
know. Like he had the biggest pumpkin at the fair or something. A blue-ribbon 
winner!” Andy snickered. 

Evan kicked at the grass. “I know he’s going to blame me. I know it!” 

“Everyone was feeding Cuddles carrots all day,” Andy said, not seeming to 
hear Evan’s unhappy wails. “The hamster ate the carrots whole. One big chomp. 
Then it made this really gross swallowing sound. It was a riot.” 

“I can’t believe this!” Evan groaned. He lowered his eyes angrily to Andy. 
“Why did you do it? Why?” 

Andy gazed up at him innocently. “I wanted to give you a laugh,” she 
replied. 

“Huh? A laugh?” he shrieked. 

“You were looking pretty down. I thought it might cheer you up.” 

Evan let out an angry cry. 

“I guess it didn’t cheer you up,” Andy muttered. 

She pulled up another handful of grass and let the blades fall over the legs 
of her white jeans. 

Evan stomped over to the edge of the creek. He kicked a rock into the 
water. 

“Come on, Evan,” Andy called. “You have to admit it’s a little funny.” 

He spun around to face her. “It’s not,” he insisted. “Not funny at all. What if 
Cuddles just keeps growing and growing? Then what?” 

“We could put a saddle on his back and give everyone hamster rides!” She 
giggled. 

Evan scowled and kicked another rock into the creek. “You know how 
dangerous that Monster Blood is,” he scolded. “What are we going to do? How 

are we going to get Cuddles back to hamster size?” 

Andy shrugged. She pulled up another handful of grass. 

The sun sank lower behind the trees. A shadow rolled over them. Two little 
kids chased a white-and-red soccer ball on the other side of the creek. Their 
mother shouted to them not to get wet. 

“Where’s the Monster Blood can?” Evan demanded, standing over Andy. 
“Maybe it tells the antidote on the can. Maybe it tells how to reverse the whole 
thing.” 

Andy shook her head. “Evan, you know it doesn’t say anything on the can. 
No instructions. No ingredients. Nothing.” She climbed to her feet and brushed 
off the legs of her jeans. “I’ve got to get home. My aunt doesn’t know where I 
am. She’s probably having a cow.” 

Evan followed her toward the street, shaking his head. “How big?” he 
muttered. 

She glanced back at him. “What did you say?” 

“How big will Cuddles be tomorrow?” Evan asked in a trembling voice. 
“How big?” 

22 

“Andy—will you hurry up?” 

Evan had agreed to meet Andy at her aunt’s house the next morning so they 
could go to school early. But Andy had found a spot on her jeans and had gone 
back up to her room to change. 

And now they were no longer early. 

“Sorry,” she said, hurtling down the stairs two steps at a time. She had 
changed her entire outfit. Now she had on a red-and-black-striped vest over a 
yellow T-shirt, pulled down over pale blue shorts. 

“Didn’t you leave out a color?” Evan demanded sarcastically, grabbing 
Andy’s backpack for her and hurrying to the front door. 

She made a face at him. “I like bright colors. It suits my personality.” 

“Your personality is late!” he declared. 

She followed him out the door and down the front lawn to the sidewalk. “At 
least I have a personality!” she cried. “What’s your hurry, anyway?” 

Evan didn’t answer. He adjusted his backpack on his shoulder, then began 
running toward school. 

“Hey—wait up!” Andy called, running after him. 

“How much Monster Blood did you give Cuddles, anyway?” Evan 
demanded without slowing his pace. “The whole can?” 

“No way!” Andy called breathlessly. “Just a spoonful. He seemed to like 
it.” 

“I guess he liked being as big as a dog, too,” Evan said, turning the corner. 
The tall, redbrick school building came into view. 

“Maybe he’s back to normal today,” Andy said. 

But as they came near the building, it was easy to tell that things were not 
normal. 

Evan heard a loud crash from the side of the building. It sounded like glass 
shattering. 

Then he heard excited shouts. Loud kids’ voices filled with alarm. 

“What’s going on?” Andy cried. 

They dove up the stairs and burst into the building. Running full speed, they 
turned the corner and made their way to the science classroom. 

Evan reached it a few steps ahead of Andy. Hearing excited shouts and 
cries, he lurched into the room—and then stopped with a startled cry. 

“No! Oh, please—no!” 

“Stand back! Everyone stand back!” a red-faced Mr. Murphy was 
screaming. 

Cuddles uttered a loud grunt and flailed his giant legs wildly in the air. 

“He—he’s ten feet tall!” Evan heard Andy scream at his side. 

“Al-almost!” Evan stammered. 

The grunting, groaning hamster towered over Mr. Murphy. Its pink paws 
batted the air. Its monstrous mouth opened wide, revealing two enormous, sharp 
white teeth. 

“Back! Everyone back!” Mr. Murphy shrieked. 

The terrified kids in the classroom pressed back against the walls. 

Mr. Murphy picked up a wooden chair in one hand, the torn dog leash in the 
other. Holding the chair by the back, he came at the grunting monster like a lion 
tamer. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down! Sit! Sit!” 

He poked the wooden chair up at the giant hamster and snapped the dog 
leash like a whip. 

Cuddles’ watery black eyes, as big as soccer balls, glared down at the red¬ 
faced teacher. The hamster didn’t seem terribly impressed with Mr. Murphy’s 
lion-tamer act. 

“Down, Cuddles! Get down!” The teacher’s chins quivered, and his big 
belly bounced up and down beneath his tight gray knit polo shirt. 

Cuddles pulled back his huge lips and bared his white teeth. He let out a 
growl that made the light fixtures shake. 

Terrified cries rang out through the room. Evan glanced back to see a 
horrified crowd of teachers and students jammed in the doorway. 

“Down, Cuddles!” 

Mr. Murphy shoved the wooden chair up at the raging hamster. He cracked 
the dog-leash whip near the hamster’s throbbing, fur-covered belly. 

The huge black eyes stared down angrily at Mr. Murphy. The pink hamster 
paws clawed in the air. 

Andy grabbed Evan’s shoulder and held on tight. “This is terrible!” she 
cried. “Terrible!” 

Evan started to reply—but frightened shrieks drowned out his words. 

Cuddles grabbed the chair with both paws. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy screamed. He struggled to hold on to the chair. 

Cuddles pulled the chair. Mr. Murphy desperately held tight. He let the 
leash fall so he could hold on to the chair with both hands. 

The teacher and Cuddles had a short tug-of-war. 

Cuddles won easily. The hamster pulled the chair up, nearly jerking Mr. 
Murphy’s arms out of their sockets. 

With a loud groan, the teacher toppled heavily to the floor. 

Kids screamed. 

Two teachers rushed forward to help the gasping Mr. Murphy to his feet. 

Evan stared up as the hamster raised the wooden chair to its mouth. The 
enormous white teeth opened quickly. The pink nose twitched. The watery black 
eyes blinked. 

Then Cuddles chewed the wooden chair to pieces. 

Splinters rained down on the floor. 

The chomping teeth sounded like a lumberjack’s ax biting into a tree. 

Evan froze in horror along with everyone else in the room. 

Andy was squeezing his shoulder so hard, it hurt. “This is our fault,” she 
murmured. 

“Our fault?” Evan cried. “Our fault?” 

She ignored his sarcasm. He saw the fear in her eyes as she stared up at the 
hamster. Cuddles had turned the chair into toothpicks! 

“We’ve got to do something, Evan,” she whispered, huddled close to him. 

“But what?” Evan replied in a trembling voice. “What can we do?” 

Then, suddenly, he had an idea. 

23 

“Come with me!” Evan cried, tugging Andy’s arm. 

She hesitated, staring up at the giant hamster. “Where?” 

“I have an idea,” Evan told her. “But we have to hurry!” 

Cuddles lumbered over to Mr. Murphy’s desk. The hamster’s heavy 
footsteps made the floor sag. 

“Here, fella! Here!” Mr. Murphy was tossing handfuls of sunflower seeds 
up to Cuddles. Cuddles glared down at him. The seeds were too small to bother 
with. 

“Hurry!” Evan pleaded. He pulled Andy through the frightened crowd of 
kids and teachers at the door. Then he began running full speed toward the 
auditorium. 

“We can’t just run away! We have to do something!” Andy cried. 

“We’re not running away,” Evan called back to her, turning a corner. “My 
father’s sculpture—it’s in the auditorium.” 

“Huh?” Andy’s eyes narrowed in confusion. “Evan—have you totally lost 
it? Why do you want to look at your father’s sculpture now?” 

He burst through the auditorium doors and ran past the dark rows of seats 
toward the stage. Several pieces of sculpture had been set up there. 

“Evan—I don’t get it!” Andy cried, right behind him. 

“Look,” Evan said breathlessly. He pointed to his father’s work near the 
back of the stage. “My dad’s sculpture. It’s just like a hamster wheel—see?” 

Her mouth dropped open as she stared at it. 

“It’s a big metal wheel and it spins,” Evan explained as they pulled 
themselves up onto the stage. “Come on. Help me drag it back to Murphy’s 
room. It’s big enough for Cuddles.” 

“Whoa!” Andy cried. “You want to bring Cuddles a wheel? What for?” 

“To distract him,” Evan replied, grabbing one side of the big sculpture. “If 
we can get Cuddles running on this wheel, it will give us time to figure out 
where to keep him. And it will stop him from chewing the whole school to 
pieces.” 

Andy grabbed hold of the other side, one hand on the wheel, one hand on 
the platform. “Maybe Cuddles will mn so hard, he’ll lose weight. Maybe he’ll 

shrink back to his normal size,” she said. 

Luckily, the platform was on wheels. They rolled the sculpture toward the 
stage door at the side. “I just want to distract him,” Evan said, tugging hard. “I 
just want to give us time to think, to make a plan.” 

“Wow! This is heavy!” Andy cried. They rolled it into the hall. “Heavy 
enough for Cuddles, I guess.” 

“I hope,” Evan replied solemnly. 

By the time they rolled the sculpture to the classroom, the crowd of 
frightened kids and teachers had grown even bigger. “Make way! Make way!” 
they both shouted, pushing their way through the crowd. 

They set the wheel down in the center of the floor and gazed over at 
Cuddles. The hamster had two teachers cornered, their backs pressed against the 
chalkboard. It was gnashing its huge teeth at them, slapping its pink paws 
together as if eager to fight them. 

Evan gasped when he saw Mr. Murphy’s desk, crushed flat on the floor. 

“I—I called the police! ” Mr. Murphy cried, his face beaded with large drops 
of sweat. “I begged them to come. But when I said it was a giant hamster, they 
didn’t believe me! They thought it was a practical joke!” 

“Stand back, everyone!” Evan cried shrilly. “Stand back—please! Let 
Cuddles see the wheel!” 

The giant hamster turned suddenly. The two teachers scrambled away from 
the wall. Kids and teachers screamed and hurried toward the door. 

“Maybe he’ll run on the wheel for a while,” Andy explained to Mr. Murphy. 
“Then we can figure out what to do with him!” 

“He—he sees it!” Mr. Murphy cried breathlessly, all of his chins quivering 
at once. 

Cuddles stared down at the wheel. His stub of a tail thudded loudly against 
the chalkboard. He dropped heavily to all fours and took a lumbering step 
toward the wheel. 

“He sees it. He’s going to it,” Evan murmured softly. 

A hush fell over the room as everyone stared at the hamster. 

Will Cuddles climb inside? Evan wondered, holding his breath. 

Will he run on the wheel? 

Will my plan work? 

24 

The hamster sniffed the wheel. Its pink nose twitched. It uttered a low grunt. 

Then it raised itself back onto its hind legs. The hamster’s massive shadow 
fell over the room. 

With another disgusting grunt, it picked the sculpture up in its front paws 
and raised it to its face. 

“No!” Evan cried. “Cuddles—no!” 

The metal clanged as Cuddles bit into the wheel. Evan saw deep tooth 
marks in the aluminum. Cuddles bit down again. Then, seeing that he couldn’t 
chew the wheel up, he pulled it apart, holding the sculpture in his paws and 
twisting it furiously with his teeth. 

Then he tossed the mangled wheel away. It slammed into a window, 
shattering it into a thousand pieces. 

“Back to the drawing board,” Andy muttered to Evan. 

Evan shook his head glumly. That plan was a bust, he told himself. Now 
what? 

He didn’t have time to think about it. 

He heard shrill cries and shrieks of terror. 

“Put him down! Cuddles—put him down!” Mr. Murphy was screaming. 

Evan turned and saw that the giant hamster had picked up a kid. 

Conan! 

Cuddles held Conan in both paws and was raising him toward his gaping 
mouth. 

“Drop! Drop!” Mr. Murphy was shouting. 

Conan thrashed his arms and legs. “Help me! Ohhh, hellllp me!” he 
shrieked. He started to cry. Gasping sobs. Tears rolled down his red cheeks. 

“Helllllp! Mommmmmy! Mommmmmy! Hellllp me!” 

Normally Evan would have enjoyed watching Conan cry like a baby. But 
this was too serious. Cuddles could chew Conan in half! Evan realized. 

He grabbed Andy. “Where’s the Monster Blood?” 

“Huh? In my locker. I hid it under a bunch of stuff in my locker. Why?” 

“I need it,” Evan said. “Come on. I have another idea.” 

“I hope it’s better than the last one,” Andy muttered. 

They hurried to the door, then glanced back. 

Cuddles was playing with Conan, tossing him from paw to paw, licking him 
with his huge, pink tongue. Conan was wailing his head off. 

Evan led the way to Andy’s locker. “I’m going to eat some Monster Blood,” 
he told her, thinking out loud. “I’ll eat a lot. I’ll grow bigger than Cuddles.” 

“I get it,” Andy said, running beside him. “You’ll turn yourself into a giant. 
You’ll make yourself as big as Cuddles.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Bigger. Much bigger. I’ll make myself so big that 
Cuddles will look hamster size. Then I’ll stuff him in the supply closet and lock 
the door.” 

“It’s a stupid plan,” Andy said. 

“I know,” Evan agreed. 

“But it’s worth a try,” Andy added. 

Evan swallowed hard and didn’t reply. He was staring across the hall at 
Andy’s locker. 

“Oh, no!” Andy cried out when she saw what Evan was gaping at. 

The locker door bulged as if about to burst open. And green goo poured out 
from the sides and the bottom. 

“The Monster Blood—it outgrew my locker!” Andy cried. 

Evan ran up to it and grabbed the door handle. He started to tug. “Is it 
locked?” 

“No,” Andy replied, hanging back. 

Evan tugged. He tugged harder. With a loud groan, he tugged with both 
hands. “It won’t open!” he cried. 

“Let me try it,” Andy said. 

But before she could step forward, the locker door burst open with a loud 
whoooosh. 

Sticky, green gunk splashed over Evan. 

He didn’t have a chance to cry out. 

It poured over him like a tall, cresting ocean wave. 

An ocean wave of Monster Blood. 

It’s burying me! Evan realized. 

The huge, sticky glob splashed out of the locker, plopped over him, 
smothering him, choking him. 

It’s sucking me in! I can’t move! 

I can’t move! 

25 

Evan shut his eyes as the heavy, green gunk rolled over his head. He shot his 
arms out, trying to push it away. 

As it swept over him, he fell to his knees. Kicking and thrashing, it forced 
him down to the floor. 

I’m stuck inside, he thought. Stuck inside... 

He felt hands grab his ankles. 

The hands tugged hard. 

He began to slide. Over the floor. Over the thick layer of Monster Blood. 

“I’ve got you!” he heard Andy cry. “I’ve got you out!” 

He opened his eyes. He saw her pulling him, tugging him out of the thick 
green gunk by the ankles. 

It clung to his clothes and his skin. But he was out. 

“Thanks,” he murmured weakly. He climbed shakily to his feet. 

He could hear Conan screaming and crying back in the classroom. There 
was still time to save him, Evan realized. 

He pulled a hunk of Monster Blood off the quivering green mound—and 
jammed it into his mouth. 

“I’m going to be sick,” Andy groaned, holding her stomach. 

Evan swallowed and reached for another mouthful. “It doesn’t taste bad,” 
he told her. “A little lemony.” 

“Don’t eat too much!” she cried, half-covering her eyes as she watched him 
swallow another mouthful. 

“I have to grow big enough so that Cuddles is hamster size compared to 
me,” Evan said. He grabbed another hunk. 

He could already feel himself start to grow. His head was already over the 
tops of the lockers. 

Back in the classroom, Conan let out another terrified wail. 

“Let’s go!” Evan boomed. His voice thundered deeply in his new, larger 
body. He could feel himself growing taller. Taller. 

He had to lower his head to get through the classroom door. 

Kids and teachers moved out of his way, crying out their surprise and 

alarm. 

He crossed the room, passed Mr. Murphy, and stepped up to the giant 
hamster. “I’m as big as Cuddles!” Evan called down to Andy. 

He reached out and lifted Conan from Cuddles’ paws. Cuddles reached out 
to take Conan back. But Evan lowered him gently to the floor. 

“Hellllp me! Helllp me! ” Conan ran bawling from the room. 

Evan turned to face the hamster. They stared at each other eye to eye. 

Cuddles’ huge pink nose twitched. He sniffed Evan, inhaling so hard that 
Evan was nearly sucked forward. 

Evan took a step back. 

Keep growing! he urged himself. I’ve got to keep growing! 

Cuddles eyed him warily, still sniffing. His watery black eyes stared hard as 
if trying to figure out if Evan was friend or foe. 

“Don’t you remember me, Cuddles?” Evan said softly. “Remember, I’m the 
one who fed you after school every day?” 

Keep growing! he silently urged himself. 

Why aren’t I growing any taller? 

Down below, he could see Andy, Mr. Murphy, and the others huddled 
against the far wall, staring up at the two giants in hushed terror. 

Keep growing! Keep growing! 

There was no way he could pick Cuddles up now, Evan realized. They were 
exactly the same height. And Cuddles outweighed him by at least a ton! 

Keep growing! 

“What’s wrong, Andy?” Evan called down to her in a trembling voice. “I 
ate tons of the stuff. Why did I stop growing?” 

“I don’t know!” she called up to him. Her voice sounded as tiny as a 
mouse’s squeak. 

He saw that she had the blue can in her hand. She was turning it over, 
reading the label. “I don’t know, Evan!” she shouted. “I don’t know why you’re 
not growing!” 

Then, as Evan turned back to face Cuddles, the hamster reached out and 
grabbed his waist with both front paws. 

“Ow!” Evan cried as the hamster tried to lift him off the floor. 

Gazing up, he saw the gaping hamster mouth open, the sharp white teeth 
emerge. 

Evan squirmed desperately, pulling himself loose. Then he wrapped both 

arms around the hamster’s middle. 

They started to wrestle. Evan fought hard, but the hamster overpowered 
him. Cuddles rolled Evan onto his back on the floor. 

Evan spun quickly away, climbed to his feet, and pulled the hamster down. 

The two giants wrestled over the floor, surrounded by the shrill screams of 
teachers and kids. 

Grow bigger! Grow bigger — now! Evan pleaded. 

But it was too late, he saw. 

The hamster lowered its hot, furry body over him. Evan could feel the 
creature’s booming heartbeat as it pressed him to the floor. 

Then its teeth rose up over Evan’s head. 

The hamster’s mouth opened wide. 

The teeth swung down. 

A wave of hot, sour hamster breath blew down over Evan. 

He shut his eyes. 

“Sorry,” he murmured to Andy. 

He held his breath and waited for the teeth to clamp down. 

26 

Evan heard a pop, like the sound of a cork flying off a bottle. 

Still sprawled on his back on the floor, Evan opened his eyes. 

“Huh?” Cuddles had disappeared. Vanished. 

Evan stared up at the startled faces of kids and teachers against the wall. 
“Wh-where’s Cuddles?” he stammered. 

Andy stood frozen like a statue, her mouth open. 

Evan slowly realized that she was nearly as big as he was. In fact, everyone 
was about his size. 

He pulled himself up to a sitting position. “Hey—I’m back to my normal 
size! ” he cried. He shook his head hard as if trying to shake away his close call 
with the giant hamster. 

“There’s Cuddles!” Andy cried, pointing. 

Evan turned to see Cuddles huddled against the wall. “He’s a little hamster 
again!” Evan exclaimed happily. He took three quick steps, bent down, and 
grabbed Cuddles between his hands. “Gotcha!” 

Holding the hamster in front of him, he turned back to Andy and the others. 
“What happened? Why did we shrink back?” 

Andy was studying the blue Monster Blood can. Suddenly she tossed back 
her dark hair, her brown eyes lit up, and she started to laugh. “It’s the expiration 
date!” she cried happily. “The expiration date on the can—it’s today! The 
Monster Blood stops working today! The magic has worn out!” 

Evan let out a whoop of joy. 

Mr. Murphy, a wide grin on his round face, hurried over and put his arm 
around Evan’s shoulders. “Fine job, Evan! Fine job!” he exclaimed. “You saved 
the school. I’m proud of you!” 

“Thanks, Mr. Murphy,” Evan replied awkwardly. 

“You’ll never make a basketball player now that you’re short again,” Mr. 
Murphy said, smiling. “But that was quite a good match with Cuddles. Have you 
ever thought of trying out for the wrestling team?” 

Andy came to Evan’s house for dinner that night. He greeted her at the door, 
eager to tell her how all the kids had apologized for not believing him about the 

Monster Blood. 

But before he could say anything, she held up a large brown envelope and 
grinned at him. 

“What’s that?” he asked, following her into the living room. 

“It’s a present my parents sent me from Europe,” she replied, her grin 
growing wider. “You won’t believe what it is.” 

She started to pull open the envelope. But the front doorbell rang. 

Evan hurried to see who it was. 

“Mr. Murphy!” he cried in surprise. 

“Hi, Evan,” the teacher said, his round body nearly filling the entire front 
stoop. “Hope I’m not interrupting your dinner.” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Want to come in?” 

“No thanks,” Mr. Murphy replied. His expression turned solemn. “I came 
by because I thought you should have some sort of reward, Evan. You were a 
real hero at school today.” 

“Aw, not really,” Evan said awkwardly. He could feel his face growing hot 
and knew he was blushing. 

What kind of reward? Evan wondered, staring back at the teacher. A cash 
reward? 

Mr. Murphy raised the hamster cage into Evan’s view. “I’ve decided to 
reward you with Cuddles,” the teacher said. “I know how fond of him you are.” 

“No, please!” Evan started to plead. 

“It’s a small token,” Mr. Murphy said. “To show how grateful I am. How 
grateful we all are.” 

“Please—no—!” 

But before Evan realized it, the hamster cage was in his hand, and Mr. 
Murphy was waddling back down the driveway to his car. 

“He gave you Cuddles?” Andy asked as Evan returned to the living room 
carrying the cage. He set it down on the coffee table. 

“It’s my reward,” Evan told her, rolling his eyes. “Do you believe it?” 

“Well, you won’t believe this!” Andy declared. “Look what my parents 
found in Europe!” 

She reached into the envelope and pulled out a blue plastic can. “It’s 
Monster Blood!” 

“Oh, no!” Evan wailed. 

“They wrote that they remembered how much fun I had with the old can,” 

Andy said, holding up the blue container. “So when they saw this can in a toy 
store in Germany, they decided to send me a new one.” 

Evan’s eyes went wide with fear. “You—you’re not going to open it?” he 
demanded warily. 

“Already did,” Andy replied. “Just to take a look. But I’m not going to use 
it. Really. I promise.” 

Evan started to say something—but he was interrupted by his mother’s call 
from the kitchen. “Dinnertime, you two! Wash your hands and come to the 
table!” 

Andy set the can of Monster Blood down on the desk in the corner. They 
obediently hurried to wash their hands. 

They had a lively dinner. There was lots to talk about. They laughed and 
joked about all that had happened at school. It was easy to laugh about it now 
that it was all over. 

After dinner, Evan and Andy returned to the living room. 

Andy was the first to see that the door to the hamster cage was wide open. 
The cage was empty. 

Evan was the one who spotted Cuddles on the desk. 

“Cuddles—what are you eating?” he cried. “What are you eating?” 

